re generally tall, straight, well-built, and of
singular proportion; they tread strong and clever, and mostly walk with
a lofty chin. . . . Their eye is little and black, not unlike a
straight-looked Jew. . . . I have seen among them as comely
European-like faces of both sexes as on your side of the sea; and truly
an Italian complexion hath not much more of the white, and the noses of
several of them have as much of the Roman. . . . For their original, I
am ready to believe them to be of the Jewish race--I mean of the stock
of the ten tribes--and that for the following reasons: first, in the
next place, I find them to be of the like countenance, and their
children of so lively a resemblance that a man would think himself in
Duke's Place or Berry Street in London when he seeth them. But this is
not all: they agree in rites, they reckon by moons, they offer their
first-fruits, they have a kind of feast of tabernacles, they are said to
lay their altars upon twelve stones, their mourning a year, customs of
women, with many other things that do not now occur."

Upon this question of complexion Catlin, in his "Indians of North
America," vol. i., p. 95, etc., gives us some curious information. We
have already seen that the Mandans preserved an image of the ark, and
possessed legends of a clearly Atlantean character. Catlin says:

"A stranger in the Mandan village is first struck with the different
shades of complexion and various colors of hair which he sees in a crowd
about him, and is at once disposed to exclaim, 'These are not Indians.'
There are a great many of these people whose complexions appear as light
as half-breeds; and among the women particularly there are many whose
skins are almost white, with the most pleasing symmetry and proportion
of feature; with hazel, with gray, and with blue eyes; with mildness and
sweetness of expression and excessive modesty of demeanor, which render
them exceedingly pleasing and beautiful. Why this diversity of
complexion I cannot tell, nor can they themselves account for it. Their
traditions, so far as I can learn them, afford us no information of
their having had any knowledge of white men before the visit of Lewis
and Clarke, made to their village thirty-three years ago. Since that
time until now (1835) there have been very few visits of white men to
this place, and surely not enough to have changed the complexions and
customs of a nation. And I recollect perfectly well that Governor Clarke
told me, before I started for this place, that I would find the Mandans
a strange people and half white.

"Among the females may be seen every shade and color of hair that can be
seen in our own country except red or auburn, which is not to be found.
. . . There are very many of both sexes, and of every age, from infancy
to manhood and old age, with hair of a bright silvery-gray, and in some
instances almost perfectly white. This unaccountable phenomenon is not
the result of disease or habit, but it is unquestionably an hereditary
characteristic which runs in families, and indicates no inequality in
disposition or intellect. And by passing this hair through my hands I
have found it uniformly to be as coarse and harsh as a horse's mane,
differing materially from the hair of other colors, which, among the
Mandans, is generally as fine and soft as silk.

"The stature of the Mandans is rather below the ordinary size of man,
with beautiful symmetry of form and proportion, and wonderful suppleness
and elasticity."

Catlin gives a group (54) showing this great diversity in complexion:
one of the figures is painted almost pure white, and with light hair.
The faces are European.

  GOVERNOR AND OTHER INDIANS OF THE PUEBLO OF SAN DOMINGO, NEW MEXICO.

Major James W. Lynd, who lived among the Dakota Indians for nine years,
and was killed by them in the great outbreak of 1862, says (MS. "Hist.
of Dakotas," Library, Historical Society, Minnesota, p. 47), after
calling attention to the fact that the different tribes of the Sioux
nation represent several different degrees of darkness of color:

"The Dakota child is of lighter complexion than the young brave; this
one lighter than the middle-aged man, and the middle-aged man lighter
than the superannuated homo, who, by smoke, paint, dirt, and a drying up
of the vital juices, appears to be the true copper-colored Dakota. The
color of the Dakotas varies with the nation, and also with the age and
condition of the individual. It may be set down, however, as a shade
lighter than olive; yet it becomes still lighter by change of condition
or mode of life, and nearly vanishes, even in the child, under constant
ablutions and avoiding of exposure. Those children in the Mission at
Hazlewood, who are taken very young, and not allowed to expose
themselves, lose almost entirely the olive shade, and become quite as
white as the American child. The Mandans are as light as the peasants of
Spain, while their brothers, the Crows, are as dark as the Arabs. Dr.
Goodrich, in the 'Universal Traveller,' p. 154, says that the modern
Peruvians, in the warmer regions of Peru, are as fair as the people of
the south of Europe."

The Aymaras, the ancient inhabitants of the mountains of Peru and
Bolivia, are described as having an olive-brown complexion, with regular
features, large heads, and a thoughtful and melancholy cast of
countenance. They practised in early times the deformation of the skull.

Professor Wilson describes the hair of the ancient Peruvians, as found
upon their mummies, as "a lightish brown, and of a fineness of texture
which equals that of the Anglo-Saxon race." "The ancient Peruvians,"
says Short ("North Americans of Antiquity," p. 187), "appear, from
numerous examples of hair found in their tombs, to have been an
auburn-haired race." Garcilasso, who had an opportunity of seeing the
body of the king, Viracocha, describes the hair of that monarch as
snow-white. Haywood tells us of the discovery, at the beginning of this
century, of three mummies in a cave on the south side of the Cumberland
River (Tennessee), who were buried in baskets, as the Peruvians were
occasionally buried, and whose skin was fair and white, and their hair
auburn, and of a fine texture. ("Natural and Aboriginal History of
Tennessee," p. 191.)

                                CHOCTAW.

Neither is the common opinion correct which asserts all the American
Indians to be of the same type of features. The portraits on this page
and on pages 187 and 191, taken from the "Report of the U. S. Survey for
a Route for a Pacific Railroad," present features very much like those
of Europeans; in fact, every face here could be precisely matched among
the inhabitants of the southern part of the old continent.

                                SHAWNEES.

On the other hand, look at the portrait of the great Italian orator and
reformer, Savonarola, on page 193. It looks more like the hunting
Indians of North-western America than any of the preceding faces. In
fact, if it was dressed with a scalp-lock it would pass muster anywhere
as a portrait of the "Man-afraid-of-his-horses," or "Sitting Bull."

                               SAVONAROLA.

Adam was, it appears, a red man. Winchell tells us that Adam is derived
from the red earth. The radical letters ADaM are found in ADaMaH,
"something out of which vegetation was made to germinate," to wit, the
earth. ADoM and ADOM signifies red, ruddy, bay-colored, as of a horse,
the color of a red heifer. "ADaM, a man, a human being, male or female,
red, ruddy." ("Preadamites," p.161.)

"The Arabs distinguished mankind into two races, one red, ruddy, the
other black." (Ibid.) They classed themselves among the red men.

Not only was Adam a red man, but there is evidence that, from the
highest antiquity, red was a sacred color; the gods of the ancients were
always painted red. The Wisdom of Solomon refers to this custom: "The
carpenter carved it elegantly, and formed it by the skill of his
understanding, and fashioned it to the shape of a man, or made it like
some vile beast, laying it over with vermilion, and with paint, coloring
it red, and covering every spot therein."

The idols of the Indians were also painted red, and red was the
religious color. (Lynd's MS. "Hist. of Dakotas," Library, Hist. Society,
Minn.)

The Cushites and Ethiopians, early branches of the Atlantean stock, took
their name from their "sunburnt" complexion; they were red men.

The name of the Phoenicians signified red. Himyar, the prefix of the
Himyaritic Arabians, also means red, and the Arabs were painted red on
the Egyptian monuments.

The ancient Egyptians were red men. They recognized four races of
men--the red, yellow, black, and white men. They themselves belonged to
the "Rot," or red men; the yellow men they called "Namu"--it included
the Asiatic races; the black men were called "Nahsu," and the white men
"Tamhu." The following figures are copied from Nott and Gliddon's "Types
of Mankind," p. 85, and were taken by them from the great works of
Belzoni, Champollion, and Lepsius.

In later ages so desirous were the Egyptians of preserving, the
aristocratic distinction of the color of their skin, that they
represented themselves on the monuments as of a crimson hue--an
exaggeration of their original race complexion.

In the same way we find that the ancient Aryan writings divided mankind
into four races--the white, red, yellow, and black: the four castes of
India were founded upon these distinctions in color; in fact, the word
for color in Sanscrit (varna) means caste. The red men, according to the
Mahabharata, were the Kshatriyas--the warrior caste-who were afterward
engaged in a fierce contest with the whites--the Brahmans--and were
nearly exterminated, although some of them survived, and from their
stock Buddha was born. So that not only the Mohammedan and Christian but
the Buddhistic religion seem to be derived from branches of the Hamitic
or red stock. The great Manu was also of the red race.

              THE RACES OF MEN ACCORDING TO THE EGYPTIANS.

The Egyptians, while they painted themselves red-brown, represented the
nations of Palestine as yellow-brown, and the Libyans yellow-white. The
present inhabitants of Egypt range from a yellow color in the north
parts to a deep bronze. Tylor is of opinion ("Anthropology," p. 95) that
the ancient Egyptians belonged to a brown race, which embraced the
Nubian tribes and, to some extent, the Berbers of Algiers and Tunis. He
groups the Assyrians, Phoenicians, Persians, Greeks, Romans,
Andalusians, Bretons, dark Welshmen, and people of the Caucasus into one
body, and designates them as "dark whites." The Himyarite Arabs, as I
have shown, derived their name originally from their red color, and they
were constantly depicted on the Egyptian monuments as red or light
brown. Herodotus tells us that there was a nation of Libyans, called the
Maxyans, who claimed descent from the people of Troy (the walls of Troy,
we shall see, were built by Poseidon; that is to say, Troy was an
Atlantean colony). These Maxyans painted their whole bodies red. The
Zavecians, the ancestors of the Zuavas of Algiers (the tribe that gave
their name to the French Zouaves), also painted themselves red. Some of
the Ethiopians were "copper-colored." ("'Amer. Cyclop.," art. Egypt, p.
464.) Tylor says ("Anthropology," p. 160): "The language of the ancient
Egyptians, though it cannot be classed in the Semitic family with
Hebrew, has important points of correspondence, whether due to the long
intercourse between the two races in Egypt or to some deeper ancestral
connection; and such analogies also appear in the Berber languages of
North Africa."

These last were called by the ancients the Atlanteans.

"If a congregation of twelve representatives from Malacca, China, Japan,
Mongolia, Sandwich Islands, Chili, Peru, Brazil, Chickasaws, Comanches,
etc., were dressed alike, or undressed and unshaven, the most skilful
anatomist could not, from their appearance, separate them." (Fontaine's
"How the World was Peopled," pp. 147, 244.)

Ferdinand Columbus, in his relation of his father's voyages, compares
the inhabitants of Guanaani to the Canary Islanders (an Atlantean race),
and describes the inhabitants of San Domingo as still more beautiful and
fair. In Peru the Charanzanis, studied by M. Angraud, also resemble the
Canary Islanders. L'Abbe Brasseur de Bourbourg imagined himself
surrounded by Arabs when all his Indians of Rabinal were around him; for
they had, he said, their complexion, features, and beard. Pierre Martyr
speaks of the Indians of the Parian Gulf as having fair hair. ("The
Human Species," p. 201.) The same author believes that tribes belonging
to the Semitic type are also found in America. He refers to "certain
traditions of Guiana, and the use in the country of a weapon entirely
characteristic of the ancient Canary Islanders."

When science is able to disabuse itself of the Mortonian theory that the
aborigines of America are all red men, and all belong to one race, we
may hope that the confluence upon the continent of widely different
races from different countries may come to be recognized and
intelligently studied. There can be no doubt that red, white, black, and
yellow men have united to form the original population of America. And
there can be as little doubt that the entire population of Europe and
the south shore of the Mediterranean is a mongrel race--a combination,
in varying proportions, of a dark-brown or red race with a white race;
the characteristics of the different nations depending upon the
proportions in which the dark and light races are mingled, for peculiar
mental and moral characteristics go with these complexions. The
red-haired people are a distinct variety of the white stock; there were
once whole tribes and nations with this color of hair; their blood is
now intermingled with all the races of men, from Palestine to Iceland.
Everything in Europe speaks of vast periods of time and long. continued
and constant interfusion of bloods, until there is not a fair-skinned
man on the Continent that has not the blood of the dark-haired race in
his veins; nor scarcely a dark-skinned man that is not lighter in hue
from intermixture with the white stock.

CHAPTER VI.

GENESIS CONTAINS A HISTORY OF ATLANTIS

The Hebrews are a branch of the great family of which that powerful
commercial race, the Phoenicians, who were the merchants of the world
fifteen hundred years before the time of Christ, were a part. The
Hebrews carried out from the common storehouse of their race a mass of
traditions, many of which have come down-to us in that oldest and most
venerable of human compositions, the Book of Genesis. I have shown that
the story of the Deluge plainly refers to the destruction of Atlantis,
and that it agrees in many important particulars with the account given
by Plato. The people destroyed were, in both instances, the ancient race
that had created civilization; they had formerly been in a happy and
sinless condition; they had become great and wicked; they were destroyed
for their sins--they were destroyed by water.

But we can go farther, and it can be asserted that there is scarcely a
prominent fact in the opening chapters of the Book of Genesis that
cannot be duplicated from the legends of the American nations, and
scarcely a custom known to the Jews that does not find its counterpart
among the people of the New World.

Even in the history of the Creation we find these similarities:

The Bible tells us (Gen. i., 2) that in the beginning the earth was
without form and void, and covered with water. In the Quiche legends we
are told, "at first all was sea--no man, animal, bird, or green
herb--there was nothing to be seen but the sea and the heavens."

The Bible says (Gen. i., 2), "And the Spirit of God moved upon the face
of the waters." The Quiche legend says, "The Creator--the Former, the
Dominator--the feathered serpent--those that give life, moved upon the
waters like a glowing light."

The Bible says (Gen. i., 9), "And God said, Let the waters under the
heaven be gathered together unto one place, and let the dry land appear:
and it was so." The Quiche legend says, "The creative spirits cried out
'Earth!' and in an instant it was formed, and rose like a vapor-cloud;
immediately the plains and the mountains arose, and the cypress and pine
appeared."

The Bible tells us, "And God saw that it was good." The Quiche legend
says, "Then Gucumatz was filled with joy, and cried out, 'Blessed be thy
coming, O Heart of Heaven, Hurakan, thunder-bolt.'"

The order in which the vegetables, animals, and man were formed is the
same in both records.

In Genesis (chap. ii., 7) we are told, "And the Lord God formed man of
the dust of the ground." The Quiche legend says. "The first man was made
of clay; but he had no intelligence, and was consumed in the water."

In Genesis the first man is represented as naked. The Aztec legend says,
"The sun was much nearer the earth then than now, and his grateful
warmth rendered clothing unnecessary."

Even the temptation of Eve reappears in the American legends. Lord
Kingsborough says: "The Toltecs had paintings of a garden, with a single
tree standing in the midst; round the root of the tree is entwined a
serpent, whose head appearing above the foliage displays the face of a
woman. Torquemada admits the existence of this tradition among them, and
agrees with the Indian historians, who affirm that this was the first
woman in the world, who bore children, and from whom all mankind are
descended." ("Mexican Antiquities," vol. viii., p. 19.) There is also a
legend of Suchiquecal, who disobediently gathered roses from a tree, and
thereby disgraced and injured herself and all her posterity. ("Mexican
Antiquities," vol. vi., p. 401.)

The legends of the Old World which underlie Genesis, and were used by
Milton in the "Paradise Lost," appear in the Mexican legends of a war of
angels in heaven, and the fall of Zou-tem-que (Soutem, Satan--Arabic,
Shatana?) and the other rebellious spirits.

We have seen that the Central Americans possessed striking parallels to
the account of the Deluge in Genesis.

There is also a clearly established legend which singularly resembles
the Bible record of the Tower of Babel.

Father Duran, in his MS. "Historia Antiqua de la Nueva Espana," A.D.
1585, quotes from the lips of a native of Cholula, over one hundred
years old, a version of the legend as to the building of the great
pyramid of Cholula. It is as follows:

"In the beginning, before the light of the sun had been created, this
land (Cholula) was in obscurity and darkness, and void of any created
thing; all was a plain, without hill or elevation, encircled in every
part by water, without tree or created thing; and immediately after the
light and the sun arose in the east there appeared gigantic men of
deformed stature and possessed the land, and desiring to see the
nativity of the sun, as well as his occident, proposed to go and seek
them. Dividing themselves into two parties, some journeyed to the west
and others toward the east; these travelled; until the sea cut off their
road, whereupon they determined to return to the place from which they
started, and arriving at this place (Cholula), not finding the means of
reaching the sun, enamored of his light and beauty, they determined to
build a tower so high that its summit should reach the sky. Having
collected materials for the purpose, they found a very adhesive clay and
bitumen, with which they speedily commenced to build the tower; and
having reared it to the greatest possible altitude, so that they say it
reached to the sky, the Lord of the Heavens, enraged, said to the
inhabitants of the sky, 'Have you observed how they of the earth have
built a high and haughty tower to mount hither, being enamored of the
light of the sun and his beauty? Come and confound them, because it is
not right that they of the earth, living in the flesh, should mingle
with us.' Immediately the inhabitants of the sky sallied forth like
flashes of lightning; they destroyed the edifice, and divided and
scattered its builders to all parts of the earth."

                     RUINS OF THE TEMPLE OF CHOLULA.

One can recognize in this legend the recollection, by a ruder race, of a
highly civilized people; for only a highly civilized people would have
attempted such a vast work. Their mental superiority and command of the
arts gave them the character of giants who arrived from the East; who
had divided into two great emigrations, one moving eastward (toward
Europe), the other westward (toward America). They were sun-worshippers;
for we are told "they were enamored of the light and beauty of the sun,"
and they built a high place for his worship.

The pyramid of Cholula is one of the greatest constructions ever erected
by human hands. It is even now, in its ruined condition, 160 feet high,
1400 feet square at the base, and covers forty-five acres; we have only
to remember that the greatest pyramid of Egypt, Cheops, covers but
twelve or thirteen acres, to form some conception of the magnitude of
this American structure.

It must not be forgotten that this legend was taken down by a Catholic
priest, shortly after the conquest of Mexico, from the lips of an old
Indian who was born before Columbus sailed from Spain.

Observe the resemblances between this legend and the Bible account of
the building of the Tower of Babel:

"All was a plain without hill or elevation," says the Indian legend.
"They found a plain in the land of Shinar, and they dwelt there," says
the Bible. They built of brick in both cases. "Let us build us a tower
whose top may reach unto heaven," says the Bible. "They determined to
build a tower so high that its summit should reach the sky," says the
Indian legend. "And the Lord came down to see the city and the tower
which the children of men had builded. And the Lord said, Behold . . .
nothing will be restrained from them which they have imagined to do. Go
to, let us go down and confound them," says the Bible record. "The Lord
of the Heavens, enraged, said to the inhabitants of the sky, 'Have you
observed,' etc. Come and confound them," says the Indian record. "And
the Lord scattered them abroad from thence on all the face of the
earth," says the Bible. "They scattered its builders to all parts of the
earth," says the Mexican legend.

Can any one doubt that these two legends must have sprung in some way
from one another, or from some common source? There are enough points of
difference to show that the American is not a servile copy of the Hebrew
legend. In the former the story comes from a native of Cholula: it is
told under the shadow of the mighty pyramid it commemorates; it is a
local legend which he repeats. The men who built it, according to his
account, were foreigners. They built it to reach the sun--that is to
say, as a sun-temple; while in the Bible record Babel was built to
perpetuate the glory of its architects. In the Indian legend the gods
stop the work by a great storm, in the Bible account by confounding the
speech of the people.

Both legends were probably derived from Atlantis, and referred to some
gigantic structure of great height built by that people; and when the
story emigrated to the east and west, it was in the one case affixed to
the tower of the Chaldeans, and in the other to the pyramid of Cholula,
precisely as we find the ark of the Deluge resting upon separate
mountain-chains all the way from Greece to Armenia. In one form of the
Tower of Babel legend, that of the Toltecs, we are told that the pyramid
of Cholula was erected "as a means of escape from a second flood, should
another occur."

But the resemblances between Genesis and the American legends do not
stop here.

We are told (Gen. ii., 21) that "the Lord God caused a deep sleep to
fall upon Adam," and while he slept God made Eve out of one of his ribs.
According to the Quiche tradition, there were four men from whom the
races of the world descended (probably a recollection of the red, black,
yellow, and white races); and these men were without wives, and the
Creator made wives for them "while they slept."

Some wicked misanthrope referred to these traditions when he said, "And
man's first sleep became his last repose."

In Genesis (chap. iii., 22), "And the Lord God said, Behold, the man is
become as one of us, to know good and evil: and now, lest he put forth
his hand, and take also of the tree of life, and eat, and live forever:"
therefore God drove him out of the garden. In the Quiche legends we are
told, "The gods feared that they had made men too perfect, and they
breathed a cloud of mist over their vision."

When the ancestors of the Quiches migrated to America the Divinity
parted the sea for their passage, as the Red Sea was parted for the
Israelites.

The story of Samson is paralleled in the history of a hero named
Zipanca, told of in the "Popol Vuh," who, being captured by his enemies
and placed in a pit, pulled down the building in which his captors had
assembled, and killed four hundred of them.

"There were giants in those days," says the Bible. A great deal of the
Central American history is taken up with the doings of an ancient race
of giants called Quinames.

This parallelism runs through a hundred particulars:

Both the Jews and Mexicans worshipped toward the east.

Both called the south "the right hand of the world."

Both burnt incense toward the four corners of the earth.

Confession of sin and sacrifice of atonement were common to both peoples.

Both were punctilious about washings and ablutions.

Both believed in devils, and both were afflicted with leprosy.

Both considered women who died in childbirth as worthy of honor as
soldiers who fell in battle.

Both punished adultery with stoning to death.

As David leaped and danced before the ark of the Lord, so did the
Mexican monarchs before their idols.

Both had an ark, the abiding-place of an invisible god.

Both had a species of serpent-worship.

                        GREAT SERPENT MOUND, OHIO.

Compare our representation of the great serpent-mound in Adams County,
Ohio, with the following description of a great serpent-mound in
Scotland:

"Serpent-worship in the West.--Some additional light appears to have
been thrown upon ancient serpent-worship in the West by the recent
archaeological explorations of Mr. John S. Phene, F.G.S., F.R.G.S., in
Scotland. Mr. Phene has just investigated a curious earthen mound in
Glen Feechan, Argyleshire, referred to by him, at the late meeting of
the British Association in Edinburgh, as being in the form of a serpent
or saurian. The mound, says the Scotsman, is a most perfect one. The
head is a large cairn, and the body of the earthen reptile 300 feet
long; and in the centre of the bead there were evidences, when Mr. Phene
first visited it, of an altar having been placed there. The position
with regard to Ben Cruachan is most remarkable. The three peaks are seen
over the length of the reptile when a person is standing on the head, or
cairn. The shape can only be seen so as to be understood when looked
down upon from an elevation, as the outline cannot be understood unless
the whole of it can be seen. This is most perfect when the spectator is
on the bead of the animal form, or on the lofty rock to the west of it.
This mound corresponds almost entirely with one 700 feet long in
America, an account of which was lately published, after careful survey,
by Mr. Squier. The altar toward the head in each case agrees. In the
American mound three rivers (also objects of worship with the ancients)
were evidently identified. The number three was a sacred number in all
ancient mythologies. The sinuous winding and articulations of the
vertebral spinal arrangement are anatomically perfect in the Argyleshire
mound. The gentlemen present with Mr. Phene during his investigation
state that beneath the cairn forming the head of the animal was found a
megalithic chamber, in which was a quantity of charcoal and burnt earth
and charred nutshells, a flint instrument, beautifully and minutely
serrated at the edge, and burnt bones. The back or spine of the serpent,
which, as already stated, is 300 feet long, was found, beneath the peat
moss, to be formed by a careful adjustment of stones, the formation of
which probably prevented the structure from being obliterated by time
and weather." (Pall Mall Gazette.)

                  STONE IMPLEMENTS OF EUROPE AND AMERICA

We find a striking likeness between the works of the Stone Age in
America and Europe, as shown in the figures here given.

The same singular custom which is found among the Jews and the Hindoos,
for "a man to raise up seed for his deceased brother by marrying his
widow," was found among the Central American nations. (Las Casas, MS.
"Hist. Apoloq.," cap. ccxiii., ccxv. Torquemada, "Monarq. Ind.," tom.
ii., 377-8.)

No one but the Jewish high-priest might enter the Holy of Holies. A
similar custom obtained in Peru. Both ate the flesh of the sacrifices of
atonement; both poured the blood of the sacrifice on the earth; they
sprinkled it, they marked persons with it, they smeared it upon walls
and stones. The Mexican temple, like the Jewish, faced the east. "As
among the Jews the ark was a sort of portable temple, in which the Deity
was supposed to be continually present, so among the Mexicans, the
Cherokees, and the Indians of Michoacan and Honduras, an ark was held in
the highest veneration, and was considered an object too sacred to be
touched by any but the priests." (Kingsborough, "Mex. Antiq., "vol.
viii., p.258.)

The Peruvians believed that the rainbow was a sign that the earth would
not be again destroyed by a deluge. (Ibid., p. 25.)

The Jewish custom of laying the sins of the people upon the head of an
animal, and turning him out into the wilderness, had its counterpart
among the Mexicans, who, to cure a fever, formed a dog of maize paste
and left it by the roadside, saying the first passer-by would carry away
the illness. (Dorman, "Prim. Super.," p. 59.) Jacob's ladder had its
duplicate in the vine or tree of the Ojibbeways, which led from the
earth to heaven, up and down which the spirits passed. (Ibid., p. 67.)

Both Jews and Mexicans offered water to a stranger that be might wash
his feet; both ate dust in token of humility; both anointed with oil;
both sacrificed prisoners; both periodically separated the women, and
both agreed in the strong and universal idea of uncleanness connected
with that period.

Both believed in the occult power of water, and both practised baptism.

"Then the Mexican midwife gave the child to taste of the water, putting
her moistened fingers in its mouth, and said, 'Take this; by this thou
hast to live on the earth, to grow and to flourish; through this we get
all things that support existence on the earth; receive it.' Then with
moistened fingers she touched the breast of the child, and said, 'Behold
the pure water that washes and cleanses thy heart, that removes all
filthiness; receive it: may the goddess see good to purify And cleanse
thine heart.' Then the midwife poured water upon the head of the child,
saying, 'O my grandson--my son--take this water of the Lord of the
world, which is thy life, invigorating and refreshing, washing and
cleansing. I pray that this celestial water, blue and light blue, may
enter into thy body, and there live; I pray that it may destroy in thee
and put away from thee all the things evil and adverse that were given
thee before the beginning of the world. . . . Wheresoever thou art in
this child, O thou hurtful thing, begone! leave it, put thyself apart;
for now does it live anew, and anew is it born; now again is it purified
and cleansed; now again is it shaped and engendered by our mother, the
goddess of water." (Bancroft's "Native Races," vol. iii., p. 372.)

Here we find many resemblances to the Christian ordinance of baptism:
the pouring of the water on the head, the putting of the fingers in the
mouth, the touching of the breast, the new birth, and the washing away
of the original sin. The Christian rite, we know, was not a Christian
invention, but was borrowed from ancient times, from the great
storehouse of Asiatic traditions and beliefs.

The Mexicans hung up the heads of their sacrificed enemies; this was
also a Jewish custom:

"And the Lord said unto Moses, Take all the heads of the people, and
hang them up before the Lord against the sun, that the fierce anger of
the Lord may be turned away from Israel. And Moses said unto the judges
of Israel, Slay ye every one his men that were joined unto Baal-peor."
(Numb., xxv., 4, 5.)

The Scythians, Herodotus tells us, scalped their enemies, and carried
the scalp at the pommel of their saddles; the Jews probably scalped
their enemies:

"But God shall wound the head of his enemies, and the hairy scalp of
such a one as goeth on still in his trespasses." (Psa., lxviii., 21.)

The ancient Scandinavians practised scalping. When Harold Harefoot
seized his rival, Alfred, with six hundred followers, be "had them
maimed, blinded, hamstrung, scalped, or embowelled." (Taine's "Hist.
Eng. Lit.," p. 35.)

Herodotus describes the Scythian mode of taking the scalp: "He makes a
cut round the head near the ears, and shakes the skull out." This is
precisely the Indian custom. "The more scalps a man has," says
Herodotus, "the more highly he is esteemed among them."

The Indian scalp-lock is found on the Egyptian monuments as one of the
characteristics of the Japhetic Libyans, who shaved all the head except
one lock in the middle.

The Mantchoos of Tartary wear a scalp-lock, as do the modern Chinese.

Byron describes the heads of the dead Tartars under the walls of
Corinth, devoured by the wild dogs:

     "Crimson and green were the shawls of their wear,
     And each scalp had a single long tuft of hair,
     All the rest was shaven and bare."

These resemblances are so striking and so numerous that repeated
attempts have been made to prove that the inhabitants of America are the
descendants of the Jews; some have claimed that they represented "the
lost tribes" of that people. But the Jews were never a maritime or
emigrating people; they formed no colonies; and it is impossible to
believe (as has been asserted) that they left their flocks and herds,
marched across the whole face of Asia, took ships and sailed across the
greatest of the oceans to a continent of the existence of which they had
no knowledge.

If we seek the origin of these extraordinary coincidences in opinions
and habits, we must go far back of the time of the lost tribes. We must
seek it in the relationship of the Jews to the family of Noah, and in
the identity of the Noachic race destroyed in the Deluge with the people
of the drowned Atlantis.

Nor need it surprise us to find traditions perpetuated for thousands
upon thousands of years, especially among a people having a religious
priesthood.

The essence of religion is conservatism; little is invented; nothing
perishes; change comes from without; and even when one religion is
supplanted by another its gods live on as the demons of the new faith,
or they pass into the folk-lore and fairy stories of the people. We see
Votan, a hero in America, become the god Odin or Woden in Scandinavia;
and when his worship as a god dies out Odin survives (as Dr. Dasent has
proved) in the Wild Huntsman of the Hartz, and in the Robin Hood (Oodin)
of popular legend. The Hellequin of France becomes the Harlequin of our
pantomimes. William Tell never existed; he is a myth; a survival of the
sun-god Apollo, Indra, who was worshipped on the altars of Atlantis.

     "Nothing here but it doth change into something rich and
     strange."

The rite of circumcision dates back to the first days of Phoenicia,
Egypt, and the Cushites. It, too, was probably an Atlantean custom,
invented in the Stone Age. Tens of thousands of years have passed since
the Stone Age; the ages of copper, bronze, and iron bare intervened; and
yet to this day the Hebrew rabbi performs the ceremony of circumcision
with a stone knife.

Frothingham says, speaking of St. Peter's Cathedral, in Rome:

"Into what depths of antiquity the ceremonies carried me back! To the
mysteries of Eleusis; to the sacrificial rites of Phoenicia. The boys
swung the censors as censors had been swung in the adoration of Bacchus.
The girdle and cassock of the priests came from Persia; the veil and
tonsure were from Egypt; the alb and chasuble were prescribed by Numa
Pompilius; the stole was borrowed from the official who used to throw it
on the back of the victim that was to be sacrificed; the white surplice
was the same as described by Juvenal and Ovid."

Although it is evident that many thousands of years must have passed
since the men who wrote in Sanscrit, in Northwestern India, could have
dwelt in Europe, yet to this day they preserve among their ancient books
maps and descriptions of the western coast of Europe, and even of
England and Ireland; and we find among them a fuller knowledge of the
vexed question of the sources of the Nile than was possessed by any
nation in the world twenty-five years ago.

This perpetuation of forms and beliefs is illustrated in the fact that
the formulas used in the Middle Ages in Europe to exorcise evil spirits
were Assyrian words, imported probably thousands of years before from
the magicians of Chaldea. When the European conjurer cried out to the
demon, "Hilka, hilka, besha, besha," he had no idea that he was
repeating the very words of a people who had perished ages before, and
that they signified Go away, go away, evil one, evil one. (Lenormant,
"Anc. Hist. East," vol. i., p. 448.)

Our circle of 360 degrees; the division of a chord of the circle equal
to the radius into 60 equal parts, called degrees: the division of these
into 60 minutes, of the minute into 60 seconds, and the second into 60
thirds; the division of the day into 24 hours, each hour into 60
minutes, each minute into 60 seconds; the division of the week into
seven days, and the very order of the days--all have come down to us
from the Chaldeo-Assyrians; and these things will probably be
perpetuated among our posterity "to the last syllable of recorded time."

We need not be surprised, therefore, to find the same legends and
beliefs cropping out among the nations of Central America and the people
of Israel. Nay, it should teach us to regard the Book of Genesis with
increased veneration, as a relic dating from the most ancient days of
man's history on earth; its roots cross the great ocean; every line is
valuable; a word, a letter, an accent may throw light upon the gravest
problems of the birth of civilization.

The vital conviction which, during thousands of years, at all times
pressed home upon the Israelites, was that they were a "chosen people,"
selected out of all the multitude of the earth, to perpetuate the great
truth that there was but one God--an illimitable, omnipotent, paternal
spirit, who rewarded the good and punished the wicked--in
contradistinction from the multifarious, subordinate, animal and bestial
demi-gods of the other nations of the earth. This sublime monotheism
could only have been the outgrowth of a high civilization, for man's
first religion is necessarily a worship of "stocks and stones," and
history teaches us that the gods decrease in number as man increases in
intelligence. It was probably in Atlantis that monotheism was first
preached. The proverbs of "Ptah-hotep," the oldest book of the
Egyptians, show that this most ancient colony from Atlantis received the
pure faith from the mother-land at the very dawn of history: this book
preached the doctrine of one God, "the rewarder of the good and the
punisher of the wicked." (Reginald S. Poole, Contemporary Rev., Aug.,
1881, p. 38.) "In the early days the Egyptians worshipped one only God,
the maker of all things, without beginning and without end. To the last
the priests preserved this doctrine and taught it privately to a select
few." ("Amer. Encycl.," vol. vi., p. 463.) The Jews took up this great
truth where the Egyptians dropped it, and over the beads and over the
ruins of Egypt, Chaldea, Phoenicia, Greece, Rome, and India this handful
of poor shepherds--ignorant, debased, and despised--have carried down to
our own times a conception which could only have originated in the
highest possible state of human society.

And even skepticism must pause before the miracle of the continued
existence of this strange people, wading through the ages, bearing on
their shoulders the burden of their great trust, and pressing forward
under the force of a perpetual and irresistible impulse. The speech that
may be heard to-day in the synagogues of Chicago and Melbourne resounded
two thousand years ago in the streets of Rome; and, at a still earlier
period, it could be heard in the palaces of Babylon and the shops of
Thebes--in Tyre, in Sidon, in Gades, in Palmyra, in Nineveh. How many
nations have perished, how many languages have ceased to exist, how many
splendid civilizations have crumbled into ruin, bow many temples and
towers and towns have gone down to dust since the sublime frenzy of
monotheism first seized this extraordinary people! All their kindred
nomadic tribes are gone; their land of promise is in the hands of
strangers; but Judaism, with its offspring, Christianity, is taking
possession of the habitable world; and the continuous life of one
people--one poor, obscure, and wretched people--spans the tremendous
gulf between "Ptah-hotep" and this nineteenth century.

If the Spirit of which the universe is but an expression--of whose frame
the stars are the infinite molecules--can be supposed ever to interfere
with the laws of matter and reach down into the doings of men, would it
not be to save from the wreck and waste of time the most sublime fruit
of the civilization of the drowned Atlantis--a belief in the one, only,
just God, the father of all life, the imposer of all moral obligations?

CHAPTER VII.

THE ORIGIN OF OUR ALPHABET

One of the most marvellous inventions for the advancement of mankind is
the phonetic alphabet, or a system of signs representing the sounds of
human speech. Without it our present civilization could scarcely have
been possible.

No solution of the origin of our European alphabet has. yet been
obtained: we can trace it back from nation to nation, and form to form,
until we reach the Egyptians, and the archaic forms of the Phoenicians,
Hebrews, and Cushites, but. beyond this the light fails us.

The Egyptians spoke of their hieroglyphic system of writing not as their
own invention, but as "the language of the gods." (Lenormant and Cheval,
"Anc. Hist. of the East," vol. ii., p. 208.) "The gods" were, doubtless,
their highly civilized ancestors--the people of Atlantis--who, as we
shall hereafter see, became the gods of many of the Mediterranean races.

"According to the Phoenicians, the art of writing was invented by
Taautus, or Taut, 'whom the Egyptians call Thouth,' and the Egyptians
said it was invented by Thouth, or Thoth, otherwise called 'the first
Hermes,' in which we clearly see that both the Phoenicians and Egyptians
referred the invention to a period older than their own separate
political existence, and to an older nation, from which both peoples
received it." (Baldwin's "Prehistoric Nations," p. 91.)

The "first Hermes," here referred to (afterward called Mercury by the
Romans), was a son of Zeus and Maia, a daughter of Atlas. This is the
same Maia whom the Abbe Brasseur de Bourbourg identifies with the Maya
of Central America.

Sir William Drummond, in his "Origines," said:

"There seems to be no way of accounting either for the early use of
letters among so many different nations, or for the resemblance which
existed between some of the graphic systems employed by those nations,
than by supposing hieroglyphical writing, if I may be allowed the term,
to have been in use among the Tsabaists in the first ages after the
Flood, when Tsabaisin (planet-worship) was the religion of almost every
country that was yet inhabited."

Sir Henry Rawlinson says:

"So great is the analogy between the first principles of the Science of
writing, as it appears to have been pursued in Chaldea, and as we can
actually trace its progress in Egypt, that we can hardly hesitate to
assign the original invention to a period before the Hamitic race had
broken up and divided."

It is not to be believed that such an extraordinary system of
sound-signs could have been the invention of any one man or even of any
one age. Like all our other acquisitions, it must have been the slow
growth and accretion of ages; it must have risen step by step from
picture-writing through an intermediate condition like that of the
Chinese, where each word or thing was represented by a separate sign.
The fact that so old and enlightened a people as the Chinese have never
reached a phonetic alphabet, gives us some indication of the greatness
of the people among whom it was invented, and the lapse of time before
they attained to it.

Humboldt says:

"According to the views which, since Champollion's great discovery, have
been gradually adopted regarding the earlier condition of the
development of alphabetical writing, the Phoenician as well as the
Semitic characters are to be regarded as a phonetic alphabet that has
originated from pictorial writing; as one in which the ideal
signification of the symbols is wholly disregarded, and the characters
are regarded as mere signs for sounds." ("Cosmos," vol. ii., p. 129.)

Baldwin says (" Prehistoric Nations," p. 93):

"The nation that became mistress of the seas, established communication
with every shore, and monopolized the commerce of the known world, must
have substituted a phonetic alphabet for the hieroglyphics as it
gradually grew to this eminence; while isolated Egypt, less affected by
the practical wants and tendencies of commercial enterprise, retained
the hieroglyphic system, and carried it to a marvellous height of
perfection."

It must be remembered that some of the letters of our alphabet are
inventions of the later nations. In the oldest alphabets there was no c,
the g taking its place. The Romans converted the g into c; and then,
finding the necessity for a g Sign, made one by adding a tail-piece to
the c (C, G). The Greeks added to the ancient alphabet the upsilon,
shaped like our V or Y, the two forms being used at first indifferently:
they added the X sign; they converted the t of the Phoenicians into th,
or theta; z and s into signs for double consonants; they turned the
Phoenician y (yod) into i (iota). The Greeks converted the Phoenician
alphabet, which was partly consonantal, into one purely phonetic--"a
perfect instrument for the expression of spoken language." The w was
also added to the Phoenician alphabet. The Romans added the y. At first
i and j were both indicated by the same sound; a sign for j was
afterward added. We have also, in common with other European languages,
added a double U, that is, VV, or W, to represent the w sound.

The letters, then, which we owe to the Phoenicians, are A, B, C, D, E,
H, I, K, L, M, N, O, P, Q, R, S, T, Z. If we are to trace out
resemblances with the alphabet of any other country, it must be with
these signs.

Is there any other country to which we can turn which possessed a
phonetic alphabet in any respect kindred to this Phoenician alphabet? It
cannot be the Chinese alphabet, which has more signs than words; it
cannot be the cuneiform alphabet of Assyria, with its seven hundred
arrow-shaped characters, none of which bear the slightest affinity to
the Phoenician letters.

It is a surprising fact that we find in Central America a phonetic
alphabet. This is in the alphabet of the Mayas, the ancient people of
the peninsula of Yucatan, who claim that their civilization came to them
across the sea in ships from the east, that is, from the direction of
Atlantis. The Mayas succeeded to the Colhuas, whose era terminated one
thousand years before the time of Christ; from them they received their
alphabet. It has come to us through Bishop Landa, one of the early
missionary bishops, who confesses to having burnt a great number of Maya
books because they contained nothing but the works of the devil. He
fortunately, however, preserved for posterity the alphabet of this
people. We present it herewith.

                                  ###

       LANDA'S ALPHABET (From "North Amer. of Antiquity," p. 434.)

Diego de Landa was the first bishop of Yucatan. He wrote a history of
the Mayas and their country, which was preserved in manuscript at Madrid
in the library of the Royal Academy of History. . . . It contains a
description and explanation of the phonetic alphabet of the Mayas.
Landa's manuscript seems to have lain neglected in the library, for
little or nothing was heard of it until it was discovered by the French
priest Brasseur de Bourbourg, who, by means of it, has deciphered some
of the old American writings. he says, 'the alphabet and signs explained
by Landa have been to me a Rosetta stone.'" (Baldwin's "Ancient
America," p. 191.)

When we observe, in the table of alphabets of different European nations
which I give herewith, how greatly the forms of the Phoenician letters
have been modified, it would surprise us to find any resemblance between
the Maya alphabet of two or three centuries since and the ancient
European forms. It must, however, be remembered that the Mayas are one
of the most conservative peoples in the world. They still adhere with
striking pertinacity to the language they spoke when Columbus landed on
San Salvador; and it is believed that that language is the same as the
one inscribed on the most ancient monuments of their country. Senor
Pimental says of them, "The Indians have preserved this idiom with such
tenacity that they will speak no other; it is necessary for the whites
to address them in their own language to communicate with them." It is
therefore probable, as their alphabet did not pass from nation to
nation, as did the Phoenician, that it has not departed so widely from
the original forms received from the Colhuas.

                                  ###

                              The Alphabet

But when we consider the vast extent of time which has elapsed, and the
fact that we are probably without the intermediate stages of the
alphabet which preceded the archaic Phoenician, it will be astonishing
if we find resemblances between any of the Maya letters and the European
forms, even though we concede that they are related. If we find decided
affinities between two or three letters, we may reasonably presume that
similar coincidences existed as to many others which have disappeared
under the attrition of centuries.

The first thought that occurs to us on examining the Landa alphabet is
the complex and ornate character of the letters. Instead of the two or
three strokes with which we indicate a sign for a sound, we have here
rude pictures of objects. And we find that these are themselves
simplifications of older forms of a still more complex character. Take,
for instance, the letter pp in Landa's alphabet, ### : here are
evidently the traces of a face. The same appear, but not so plainly, in
the sign for x, which is ### . Now, if we turn to the ancient
hieroglyphics upon the monuments of Central America, we will find the
human face appearing in a great many of them, as in the following, which
we copy from the Tablet of the Cross at Palenque. We take the
hieroglyphs from the left-hand side of the inscription. Here it will be
seen that, out of seven hieroglyphical figures, six contain human faces.
And we find that in the whole inscription of the Tablet of the Cross
there are 33 figures out of 108 that are made up in part of the human
countenance.

###

We can see, therefore, in the Landa alphabet a tendency to
simplification. And this is what we would naturally expect. When the
emblems--which were probably first intended for religious inscriptions,
where they could be slowly and carefully elaborated--were placed in the
bands of a busy, active, commercial people, such as were the Atlanteans,
and afterward the Phoenicians, men with whom time was valuable, the
natural tendency would be to simplify and condense them; and when the
original meaning of the picture was lost, they would naturally slur it,
as we find in the letters pp and x of the Maya alphabet, where the
figure of the human face remains only in rude lines.

The same tendency is plainly shown in the two forms of the letter h, as
given in Landa's alphabet; the original form is more elaborate than the
variation of it. The original form is ### The variation is given as ###
. Now let us suppose this simplification to be carried a step farther:
we have seen the upper and lower parts of the first form shrink into a
smaller and less elaborate shape; let us imagine that the same tendency
does away with them altogether; we would then have the letter H of the
Maya alphabet represented by this figure, ### ; now, as it takes less
time to make a single stroke than a double one, this would become in
time ### . We turn now to the archaic Greek and the old Hebrew, and we
find the letter h indicated by this sign, ### , precisely the Maya
letter h simplified. We turn to the archaic Hebrew, and we find ### .
Now it is known that the Phoenicians wrote from right to left, and just
as we in writing from left to right slope our letters to the right, so
did the Phoenicians slope their letters to the left. Hence the Maya sign
becomes in the archaic Phoenician this, ### . In some of the Phoenician
alphabets we even find the letter h made with the double strokes above
and below, as in the Maya h. The Egyptian hieroglyph for h is ### while
ch is ### . In time the Greeks carried the work of simplification still
farther, and eliminated the top lines, as we have supposed the
Atlanteans to have eliminated the double strokes, and they left the
letter as it has come down to us, H.

Now it may be said that all this is coincidence. If it is, it is
certainly remarkable. But let us go a step farther:

We have seen in Landa's alphabet that there are two forms of the letter
m. The first is ### . But we find also an m combined with the letter o,
a, or e, says Landa, in this form, ### . The m here is certainly
indicated by the central part of this combination, the figure ### ;
where does that come from? It is clearly taken from the heart of the
original figure wherein it appears. What does this prove? That the
Atlanteans, or Mayas, when they sought to simplify their letters and
combine them with others, took from the centre of the ornate
hieroglyphical figure some characteristic mark with which they
represented the whole figure. Now let us apply this rule:

We have seen in the table of alphabets that in every language, from our
own day to the time of the Phoenicians, o has been represented by a
circle or a circle within a circle. Now where did the Phoenicians get
it? Clearly from the Mayas. There are two figures for o in the Maya
alphabet; they are ### and ### ; now, if we apply the rule which we have
seen to exist in the case of the Maya m to these figures, the essential
characteristic found in each is the circle, in the first case pendant
from the hieroglyph; in the other, in the centre of the lower part of
it. And that this circle was withdrawn from the hieroglyph, and used
alone, as in the case of the m, is proved by the very sign used at the
foot of Landa's alphabet, which is, ### Landa calls this ma, me, or mo;
it is probably the latter, and in it we have the circle detached from
the hieroglyph.

We find the precise Maya o a circle in a circle, or a dot within a
circle, repeated in the Phoenician forms for o, thus, ### and ### , and
by exactly the same forms in the Egyptian hieroglyphics; in the Runic we
have the circle in the circle; in one form of the Greek o the dot was
placed along-side of the circle instead of below it, as in the Maya.

Are these another set of coincidences?

Take another letter:

The letter n of the Maya alphabet is represented by this sign, itself
probably a simplification of some more ornate form, ### . This is
something like our letter S, but quite unlike our N. But let us examine
into the pedigree of our n. We find in the archaic Ethiopian, a language
as old as the Egyptian, and which represents the Cushite branch of the
Atlantean stock, the sign for n (na) is ### ; in archaic Phoenician it
comes still closer to the S shape, thus, ### , or in this form, ### ; we
have but to curve these angles to approximate it very closely to the
Maya n; in Troy this form was found, ### . The Samaritan makes it ### ;
the old Hebrew ### ; the Moab stone inscription gives it ### ; the later
Phoenicians simplified the archaic form still further, until it became
### ; then it passed into ### : the archaic Greek form is ### ; the
later Greeks made ### , from which it passed into the present form, N.
All these forms seem to be representations of a serpent; we turn to the
valley of the Nile, and we find that the Egyptian hieroglyphic for n was
the serpent, ### ; the Pelasgian n was ### ; the Arcadian, ### ; the
Etruscan, ### .

Can anything be more significant than to find the serpent the sign for n
in Central America, and in all these Old World languages?

Now turn to the letter k. The Maya sign for k is ### . This does not
look much like our letter K; but let us examine it. Following the
precedent established for us by the Mayas in the case of the letter m,
let us see what is the distinguishing feature here; it is clearly the
figure of a serpent standing erect, with its tail doubled around its
middle, forming a circle. It has already been remarked by Savolini that
this erect serpent is very much like the Egyptian Uraeus, an erect
serpent with an enlarged body--a sacred emblem found in the hair of
their deities. We turn again to the valley of the Nile, and we find that
the Egyptian hieroglyphic for k was a serpent with a convolution or
protuberance in the middle, precisely as in the Maya, thus, ### ; this
was transformed into the Egyptian letter ### ; the serpent and the
protuberance reappear in one of the Phoenician forms of k, to wit, ### ;
while in the Punic we have these forms, ### and ### . Now suppose a busy
people trying to give this sign: instead of drawing the serpent in all
its details they would abbreviate it into something like this, ### ; now
we turn to the ancient Ethiopian sign for k (ka), and we have ### , or
the Himyaritic Arabian ### ; while in the Phoenician it becomes ### ; in
the archaic Greek, ### ; and in the later Greek, when they changed the
writing from left to right, ### . So that the two lines projecting from
the upright stroke of our English K are a reminiscence of the
convolution of the serpent in the Maya original and the Egyptian copy.

Turn now to the Maya sign for t: it is ### , . What is the distinctive
mark about this figure? It is the cross composed of two curved lines,
thus, ### . It is probable that in the Maya sign the cross is united at
the bottom, like a figure 8. Here again we turn to the valley of the
Nile, and we find that the Egyptian hieroglyph for t is ### and ### ;
and in the Syriac t it is ### . We even find the curved lines of the
Maya t which give it something of the appearance of the numeral 8,
repeated accurately in the Mediterranean alphabets; thus the Punic t
repeats the Maya form almost exactly as ### and ### . Now suppose a busy
people compelled to make this mark every day for a thousand years, and
generally in a hurry, and the cross would soon be made without curving
the lines; it would become X. But before it reached even that simplified
form it had crossed the Atlantic, and appeared in the archaic Ethiopian
sign for tsa, thus, ### . In the archaic Phoenician the sign for ### is
### and ### ; the oldest Greek form is ### or ### and the later Greeks
gave it to the Romans ### , and modified this into ### ; the old Hebrew
gave it as ### and ### ; the Moab stone as ### ; this became in time ###
and ### .

Take the letter a. In the Maya there are three forms given for this
letter. The first is ### ; the third is ### . The first looks very much
like the foot of a lion or tiger; the third is plainly a foot or boot.
If one were required to give hurriedly a rude outline of either of
these, would he not represent it thus, ### ; and can we not conceive
that this could have been in time modified into the Phoenician a, which
was ### ? The hieratic Egyptian a was ### ; the ancient Hebrew, which
was ### or ### ; the ancient Greek was the foot reversed, ### ; the
later Greek became our A.

Turn next to the Maya sign for q (ku): it is ### . Now what is the
peculiarity of this hieroglyph? The circle below is not significant, for
there are many circular figures in the Maya alphabet. Clearly, if one
was called upon to simplify this, he would retain the two small circles
joined side by side at the top, and would indicate the lower circle with
a line or dash. And when we turn to the Egyptian q we find it in this
shape, ### ; we turn to the Ethiopian q (khua), and we find it ### , as
qua, ### ; while the Phoenician comes still nearer the supposed Maya
form in ### ; the Moab stone was ### ; the Himyaritic Arabian form
became ### ; the Greek form was ### , which graduated into the Roman Q.
But a still more striking proof of the descent of the Phoenician
alphabet from the Maya is found in the other form of the q, the Maya cu,
which is ### . Now, if we apply the Maya rule to this, and discard the
outside circle, we have this left, ### . In time the curved line would
be made straight, and the figure would assume this form, ### ; the next
step would be to make the cross on the straight line, thus, ### . One of
the ancient Phoenician forms is ### . Can all this be accident?

The letter c or g (for the two probably gave the same sound as in the
Phoenician) is given in the Maya alphabet as follows, ### . This would
in time be simplified into a figure representing the two sides of a
triangle with the apex upward, thus, ### . This is precisely the form
found by Dr. Schliemann in the ruins of Troy, ### . What is the
Phoenician form for g as found on the Moab stone? It is ### . The
Carthaginian Phoenicians gave it more of a rounded form, thus, ### . The
hieratic Egyptian figure for g was ### ; in the earlier Greek form the
left limb of the figure was shortened, thus, ### ; the later Greeks
reversed it, and wrote it ### ; the Romans, changed this into ### and it
finally became C.

In the Maya we have one sign for p, and another for pp. The first
contains a curious figure, precisely like our r laid on its back ### ,
There is, apparently, no r in the Maya alphabet; and the Roman r grew
out of the later Phoenician r formed thus, ### ; it would appear that
the earliest Phoenician alphabet did not contain the letter r. But if we
now turn to the Phoenician alphabet, we will find one of the curious
forms of the p given thus, ### , a very fair representation of an r
lying upon its face. Is it not another remarkable coincidence that the
p, in both Maya and Phoenician, should contain this singular sign?

The form of pp in the Maya alphabet is this, ### . If we are asked, on
the principle already indicated, to reduce this to its elements, we
would use a figure like this, ### ; in time the tendency would be to
shorten one of these perpendicular lines, thus, and this we find is very
much like the Phoenician p, ### . The Greek ph is ### .

The letter l in the Maya is in two forms; one of these is ### , the
other is ### . Now, if we again apply the rule which we observed to hold
good with the letter m--that is, draw from the inside of the hieroglyph
some symbol that will briefly indicate the whole letter--we will have
one of two forms, either a right-angled figure formed thus, ### , or an
acute angle formed by joining the two lines which are unconnected, thus,
### ; and either of these forms brings us quite close to the letter l of
the Old World. We find l on the Moab stone thus formed, ### . The
archaic Phoenician form of l was ### , or ### ; the archaic Hebrew was
### and ### ; the hieratic Egyptian was ### ; the Greek form was ###
--the Roman L.

The Maya letter b is shaped thus, ### . Now, if we turn to the
Phoenician, we find that b is represented by the same crescent-like
figure which we find in the middle of this hieroglyph, but reversed in
the direction of the writing, thus, ### ; while in the archaic Hebrew we
have the same crescent figure as in the Maya, turned in the same
direction, but accompanied by a line drawn downward, and to the left,
thus, ### ; a similar form is also found in the Phoenician ### , and
this in the earliest Greek changed into ### , and in the later Greek
into B. One of the Etruscan signs for b was ### , while the Pelasgian b
was represented thus, ### ; the Chaldaic b was ### ; the Syriac sign for
b was ### ; the Illyrian b was ### .

The Maya e is ### ; this became in time ### ; then ### (we see this form
on the Maya monuments); the dots in time were indicated by strokes, and
we reach the hieratic Egyptian form, ### : we even find in some of the
ancient Phoenician inscriptions the original Maya circles preserved in
making the letter e, thus, ### ; then we find the old Greek form, ### ;
the old Hebrew, ### ; and the later Phoenician, ### : when the direction
of the writing was changed this became ### . Dr. Schliemann found a form
like this on inscriptions deep in the ruins of Troy, ### . This is
exactly the form found on the American monuments.

The Maya i is ### ; this became in time ### ; this developed into a
still simpler form, ### ; and this passed into the Phoenician form, ###
. The Samaritan i was formed thus, ### ; the Egyptian letter i is ### :
gradually in all these the left-hand line was dropped, and we come to
the figure used on the stone of Moab, ### and ### ; this in time became
the old Hebrew ### , or ### ; and this developed into the Greek ### .

We have seen the complicated symbol for m reduced by the Mayas
themselves into this figure, ### : if we attempt to write this rapidly,
we find it very difficult to always keep the base lines horizontal;
naturally we form something like this, ### : the distinctive figure
within the sign for m in the Maya is ### or ### . We see this repeated
in the Egyptian hieroglyphics for m, ### , and ### , and ### ; and in
the Chaldaic m, ### ; and in the Ethiopic ### . We find one form of the
Phoenician where the m is made thus, ### ; and in the Punic it appears
thus, ### ; and this is not unlike the m on the stone of Moab, ### , or
the ancient Phoenician forms ### , ### , and the old Greek ### , or the
ancient Hebrew ### , ### .

The ### , x, of the Maya alphabet is a hand pointing downward ### ,
this, reduced to its elements, would be expressed some thing like this,
### or ### ; and this is very much like the x of the archaic Phoenician,
### ; or the Moab stone, ### ; or the later Phoenician ### or the Hebrew
### , ### , or the old Greek, ### : the later Greek form was ### .

The Maya alphabet contains no sign for the letter s; there is, however,
a symbol called ca immediately above the letter k; it is probable that
the sign ca stands for the soft sound of c, as, in our words citron,
circle, civil, circus, etc. As it is written in the Maya alphabet ca,
and not k, it evidently represents a different sound. The sign ca is
this, ### . A somewhat similar sign is found in the body of the symbol
for k, thus, ### , this would appear to be a simplification of ca, but
turned downward. If now we turn to the Egyptian letters we find the sign
k represented by this figure ### , simplified again into ### ; while the
sign for k in the Phoenician inscription on the stone of Moab is ### .
If now we turn to the s sound, indicated by the Maya sign ca, ### , we
find the resemblance still more striking to kindred European letters.
The Phoenician s is ### ; in the Greek this becomes ### ### ; the Hebrew
is ### ### ; the Samaritan, ### . The Egyptian hieroglyph for s is ### ;
the Egyptian letter s is ### ; the Ethiopic, ### ; the Chaldaic, ### ;
and the Illyrian s c is ### .

We have thus traced back the forms of eighteen of the ancient letters to
the Maya alphabet. In some cases the pedigree, is so plain as to be
indisputable.

For instance, take the h:

Maya, ### ; old Greek, ### ; old Hebrew, ### ; Phoenician, ### .

Or take the letter o:

Maya, ### ; old Greek, ### ; old Hebrew, ### ; Phoenician, ### .

Or take the letter t:

Maya, ### ; old Greek, ### ; old Phoenician, ### and ### .

Or take the letter q:

Maya, ### ; old Phoenician, ### and ### ; Greek, ### .

Or take the letter k:

Maya, ### ; Egyptian, ### ; Ethiopian, ### ; Phoenician, ### .

Or take the letter n:

Maya, ### ; Egyptian, ### ; Pelasgian ### , Arcadian, ### ; Phoenician,
### .

Surely all this cannot be accident!

But we find another singular proof of the truth of this theory: It will
be seen that the Maya alphabet lacks the letter d and the letter r. The
Mexican alphabet possessed a d. The sounds d and t were probably
indicated in the Maya tongue by the same sign, called t in the Landa
alphabet. The Finns and Lapps do not distinguish between these two
sounds. In the oldest known form of the Phoenician alphabet, that found
on the Moab stone, we find in the same way but one sign to express the d
and t. D does not occur on the Etruscan monuments, t being used in its
place. It would, therefore, appear that after the Maya alphabet passed
to the Phoenicians they added two new signs for the letters d and r; and
it is a singular fact that their poverty of invention seems to have been
such that they used to express both d and r, the same sign, with very
little modification, which they had already obtained from the Maya
alphabet as the symbol for b. To illustrate this we place the signs side
by side:

                                   ###

It thus appears that the very signs d and r, in the Phoenician, early
Greek, and ancient Hebrew, which are lacking in the Maya, were supplied
by imitating the Maya sign for b; and it is a curious fact that while
the Phoenician legends claim that Taaut invented the art of writing, yet
they tell us that Taaut made records, and "delivered them to his
successors and to foreigners, of whom one was Isiris (Osiris, the
Egyptian god), the inventor of the three letters." Did these three
letters include the d and r, which they did not receive from the
Atlantean alphabet, as represented to us by the Maya alphabet?

In the alphabetical table which we herewith append we have represented
the sign V, or vau, or f, by the Maya sign for U. "In the present
so-called Hebrew, as in the Syriac, Sabaeic, Palmyrenic, and some other
kindred writings, the vau takes the place of F, and indicates the sounds
of v and u. F occurs in the same place also on the Idalian tablet of
Cyprus, in Lycian, also in Tuarik (Berber), and some other writings."
("American Cyclopaedia," art. F.)

Since writing the above, I find in the "Proceedings of the American
Philosophical Society" for December, 1880, p. 154, an interesting
article pointing out other resemblances between the Maya alphabet and
the Egyptian. I quote:

It is astonishing to notice that while Landa's first B is, according to
Valentini, represented by a footprint, and that path and footprint are
pronounced Be in the Maya dictionary, the Egyptian sign for B was the
human leg.

"Still more surprising is it that the H of Landa's alphabet is a tie of
cord, while the Egyptian H is a twisted cord. . . . But the most
striking coincidence of all occurs in the coiled or curled line
representing Landa's U; for it is absolutely identical with the Egyptian
curled U. The Mayan word for to wind or bend is Uuc; but why should
Egyptians, confined as they were to the valley of the Nile, and
abhorring as they did the sea and sailors, write their U precisely like
Landa's alphabet U in Central America? There is one other remarkable
coincidence between Landa's and the Egyptian alphabets; and, by-the-way,
the English and other Teutonic dialects have a curious share in it.
Landa's D (T) is a disk with lines inside the four quarters, the allowed
Mexican symbol for a day or sun. So far as sound is concerned, the
English day represents it; so far as the form is concerned, the Egyptian
'cake,' ideograph for (1) country and (2) the sun's orbit is essentially
the same."

It would appear as if both the Phoenicians and Egyptians drew their
alphabet from a common source, of which the Maya is a survival, but did
not borrow from one another. They followed out different characteristics
in the same original hieroglyph, as, for instance, in the letter b. And
yet I have shown that the closest resemblances exist between the Maya
alphabet and the Egyptian signs--in the c, h, t, i, k, m, n, o, q, and
s--eleven letters in all; in some cases, as in the n and k, the signs
are identical; the k, in both alphabets, is not only a serpent, but a
serpent with a protuberance or convolution in the middle! If we add to
the above the b and u, referred to in the "Proceedings of the American
Philosophical Society," we have thirteen letters out of sixteen in the
Maya and Egyptian related to each other. Can any theory of accidental
coincidences account for all this? And it must be remembered that these
resemblances are found between the only two phonetic systems of alphabet
in the world.

Let us suppose that two men agree that each shall construct apart from
the other a phonetic alphabet of sixteen letters; that they shall employ
only simple forms--combinations of straight or curved lines--and that
their signs shall not in anywise resemble the letters now in use. They
go to work apart; they have a multitudinous array of forms to draw from
the thousand possible combinations of lines, angles, circles, and
curves; when they have finished, they bring their alphabets together for
comparison. Under such circumstances it is possible that out of the
sixteen signs one sign might appear in both alphabets; there is one
chance in one hundred that such might be the case; but there is not one
chance in five hundred that this sign should in both cases represent the
same sound. It is barely possible that two men working thus apart should
bit upon two or three identical forms, but altogether impossible that
these forms should have the same significance; and by no stretch of the
imagination can it be supposed that in these alphabets so created,
without correspondence, thirteen out of sixteen signs should be the same
in form and the same in meaning.

It is probable that a full study of the Central American monuments may
throw stronger light upon the connection between the Maya and the
European alphabets, and that further discoveries of inscriptions in
Europe may approximate the alphabets of the New and Old World still more
closely by supplying intermediate forms.

We find in the American hieroglyphs peculiar signs which take the place
of pictures, and which probably, like the hieratic symbols mingled with
the hieroglyphics of Egypt, represent alphabetical sounds. For instance,
we find this sign on the walls of the palace of Palenque, ### ; this is
not unlike the form of the Phoenician t used in writing, ### and ### ;
we find also upon these monuments the letter o represented by a small
circle, and entering into many of the hieroglyphs; we also find the tau
sign (thus ### ) often repeated; also the sign which we have supposed to
represent b, ### ; also this sign, ### , which we think is the
simplification of the letter k; also this sign, which we suppose to
represent e, ### ; also this figure, ### ; and this ### . There is an
evident tendency to reduce the complex figures to simple signs whenever
the writers proceed to form words.

Although it has so far been found difficult, if not impossible, to
translate the compound words formed from the Maya alphabet, yet we can
go far enough to see that they used the system of simpler sounds for the
whole hieroglyph to which we have referred.

Bishop Landa gives us, in addition to the alphabet, the signs which
represent the days and months, and which are evidently compounds of the
Maya letters. For instance, we have this figure as the representative of
the month Mol ### . Here we see very plainly the letter ### for m, the
sign ### for o; and we will possibly find the sign for l in the right
angle to the right of the m sign, and which is derived from the figure
in the second sign for l in the Maya alphabet.

One of the most ancient races of Central America is the Chiapenec, a
branch of the Mayas. They claim to be the first settlers of the country.
They came, their legends tell us, from the East, from beyond the sea.

And even after the lapse of so many thousand years most remarkable
resemblances have been found to exist between the Chiapenec language and
the Hebrew, the living representative of the Phoenician tongue.

The Mexican scholar, Senor Melgar ("North Americans of Antiquity," p.
475) gives the following list of words taken from the Chiapenec and the
Hebrew:

            +----------------------+------------+-----------+
            | English.             | Chiapenec. | Hebrew.   |
            +----------------------+------------+-----------+
            | Son                  | Been       | Ben.      |
            +----------------------+------------+-----------+
            | Daughter             | Batz       | Bath.     |
            +----------------------+------------+-----------+
            | Father               | Abagh      | Abba.     |
            +----------------------+------------+-----------+
            | Star in Zodiac       | Chimax     | Chimah.   |
            +----------------------+------------+-----------+
            | King                 | Molo       | Maloc.    |
            +----------------------+------------+-----------+
            | Name applied to Adam | Abagh      | Abah.     |
            +----------------------+------------+-----------+
            | Afflicted            | Chanam     | Chanan.   |
            +----------------------+------------+-----------+
            | God                  | Elab       | Elab.     |
            +----------------------+------------+-----------+
            | September            | Tsiquin    | Tischiri. |
            +----------------------+------------+-----------+
            | More                 | Chic       | Chi.      |
            +----------------------+------------+-----------+
            | Rich                 | Chabin     | Chabic.   |
            +----------------------+------------+-----------+
            | Son of Seth          | Enot       | Enos.     |
            +----------------------+------------+-----------+
            | To give              | Votan      | Votan.    |
            +----------------------+------------+-----------+

Thus, while we find such extraordinary resemblances between the Maya
alphabet and the Phoenician alphabet, we find equally surprising
coincidences between the Chiapenec tongue, a branch of the Mayas, and
the Hebrew, a branch of the Phoenician.

Attempts have been repeatedly made by European scholars to trace the
letters of the Phoenician alphabet back to the elaborate hieroglyphics
from which all authorities agree they must have been developed, but all
such attempts have been failures. But here, in the Maya alphabet, we are
not only able to extract from the heart of the hieroglyphic the typical
sign for the sound, but we are able to go a step farther, and, by means
of the inscriptions upon the monuments of Copan and Palenque, deduce the
alphabetical hieroglyph itself from an older and more ornate figure; we
thus not Only discover the relationship of the European alphabet to the
American, but we trace its descent in the very mode in which reason
tells us it must have been developed. All this proves that the
similarities in question did not come from Phoenicians having
accidentally visited the shores of America, but that we have before us
the origin, the source, the very matrix in which the Phoenician alphabet
was formed. In the light of such a discovery the inscriptions upon the
monuments of Central America assume incalculable importance; they take
us back to a civilization far anterior to the oldest known in Europe;
they represent the language of antediluvian times.

It may be said that it is improbable that the use of an alphabet could
have ascended to antediluvian times, or to that prehistoric age when
intercourse existed between ancient Europe and America; but it must be
remembered that if the Flood legends of Europe and Asia are worth
anything they prove that the art of writing existed at the date of the
Deluge, and that records of antediluvian learning were preserved by
those who escaped the Flood; while Plato tells us that the people of
Atlantis engraved their laws upon columns of bronze and plates of gold.

There was a general belief among the ancient nations that the art of
writing was known to the antediluvians. The Druids believed in books
more ancient than the Flood. They styled them "the books of Pheryllt,"
and "the writings of Pridian or Hu." "Ceridwen consults them before she
prepares the mysterious caldron which shadows out the awful catastrophe
of the Deluge." (Faber's "Pagan Idolatry," vol. ii., pp. 150, 151.) In
the first Avatar of Vishnu we are told that "the divine ordinances were
stolen by the demon Haya-Griva. Vishnu became a fish; and after the
Deluge, when the waters had subsided, he recovered the holy books from
the bottom of the ocean." Berosus, speaking of the time before the
Deluge, says: "Oannes wrote concerning the generations of mankind and
their civil polity." The Hebrew commentators on Genesis say, "Our
rabbins assert that Adam, our father of blessed memory, composed a book
of precepts, which were delivered to him by God in Paradise." (Smith's
"Sacred Annals," p. 49.) That is to say, the Hebrews preserved a
tradition that the Ad-ami, the people of Ad, or Adlantis, possessed,
while yet dwelling in Paradise, the art of writing. It has been
suggested that without the use of letters it would have been impossible
to preserve the many details as to dates, ages, and measurements, as of
the ark, handed down to us in Genesis. Josephus, quoting Jewish
traditions, says, "The births and deaths of illustrious men, between
Adam and Noah, were noted down at the time with great accuracy." (Ant.,
lib. 1, cap. iii., see. 3.) Suidas, a Greek lexicographer of the
eleventh century, expresses tradition when he says, "Adam was the author
of arts and letters." The Egyptians said that their god Anubis was an
antediluvian, and it "wrote annals before the Flood." The Chinese have
traditions that the earliest race of their nation, prior to history,
"taught all the arts of life and wrote books." "The Goths always had the
use of letters;" and Le Grand affirms that before or soon after the
Flood "there were found the acts of great men engraved in letters on
large stones." (Fosbroke's "Encyclopaedia of Antiquity," vol. i., p.
355.) Pliny says, "Letters were always in use." Strabo says, "The
inhabitants of Spain possessed records written before the Deluge."
(Jackson's "Chronicles of Antiquity," vol. iii., p. 85.) Mitford
("History of Greece," vol. i, p. 121) says, "Nothing appears to us so
probable as that it (the alphabet) was derived from the antediluvian
world."

CHAPTER VIII.

THE BRONZE AGE IN EUROPE.

There exist in Europe the evidences of three different ages of human
development:

1. The Stone Age, which dates back to a vast antiquity. It is subdivided
into two periods: an age of rough stone implements; and a later age,
when these implements were ground smooth and made in improved forms.

2. The Bronze Age, when the great mass of implements were manufactured
of a compound metal, consisting of about nine parts of copper and one
part of tin.

3. An age when iron superseded bronze for weapons and cutting tools,
although bronze still remained in use for ornaments. This age continued
down to what we call the Historical Period, and embraces our present
civilization; its more ancient remains are mixed with coins of the
Gauls, Greeks, and Romans.

The Bronze Period has been one of the perplexing problems of European
scientists. Articles of bronze are found over nearly all that continent,
but in especial abundance in Ireland and Scandinavia. They indicate very
considerable refinement and civilization upon the part of the people who
made them; and a wide diversity of opinion has prevailed as to who that
people were and where they dwelt.

In the first place, it was observed that the age of bronze (a compound
of copper and tin) must, in the natural order of things, have been
preceded by an age when copper and tin were used separately, before the
ancient metallurgists had discovered the art of combining them, and yet
in Europe the remains of no such age have been found. Sir John Lubbock
says ("Prehistoric Times," p. 59), "The absence of implements made
either of copper or tin seems to me to indicate that the art of making
bronze was introduced into, not invented in, Europe." The absence of
articles of copper is especially marked, nearly all the European
specimens of copper implements have been found in Ireland; and yet out
of twelve hundred and eighty-three articles of the Bronze Age, in the
great museum at Dublin, only thirty celts and one sword-blade are said
to be made of pure copper; and even as to some of these there seems to
be a question.

Where on the face of the earth are we to find a Copper Age? Is it in the
barbaric depths of that Asia out of whose uncivilized tribes all
civilization is said to have issued? By no means. Again we are compelled
to turn to the West. In America, from Bolivia to Lake Superior, we find
everywhere the traces of a long-enduring Copper Age; bronze existed, it
is true, in Mexico, but it held the same relation to the copper as the
copper held to the bronze in Europe--it was the exception as against the
rule. And among the Chippeways of the shores of Lake Superior, and among
them alone, we find any traditions of the origin of the manufacture of
copper implements; and on the shores of that lake we find pure copper,
out of which the first metal tools were probably hammered before man had
learned to reduce the ore or run the metal into moulds. And on the
shores of this same American lake we find the ancient mines from which
some people, thousands of years ago, derived their supplies of copper.

                IMPLEMENTS AND ORNAMENTS OF THE BRONZE AGE

Sir W. R. Wilde says, "It is remarkable that so few antique copper
implements have been found (in Europe), although a knowledge of that
metal must have been the preliminary stage in the manufacture of
bronze." He thinks that this may be accounted for by supposing that "but
a short time elapsed between the knowledge of smelting and casting
copper ore and the introduction of tin, and the subsequent manufacture
and use of bronze."

But here we have in America the evidence that thousands of years must
have elapsed during which copper was used alone, before it was
discovered that by adding one-tenth part of tin it gave a harder edge,
and produced a superior metal.

The Bronze Age cannot be attributed to the Roman civilization. Sir John
Lubbock shows ("Prehistoric Times," p. 21) that bronze weapons have
never been found associated with Roman coins or pottery, or other
remains of the Roman Period; that bronze articles have been found in the
greatest abundance in countries like Ireland and Denmark, which were
never invaded by Roman armies; and that the character of the
ornamentation of the works of bronze is not Roman in character, and that
the Roman bronze contained a large proportion of lead, which is never
the case in that of the Bronze Age.

It has been customary to assume that the Bronze Age was due to the
Phoenicians, but of late the highest authorities have taken issue with
this opinion. Sir John Lubbock (Ibid., p. 73) gives the following
reasons why the Phoenicians could not have been the authors of the
Bronze Age: First, the ornamentation is different. In the Bronze Age
"this always consists of geometrical figures, and we rarely, if ever,
find upon them representations of animals and plants, while on the
ornamented shields, etc., described by Homer, as well as in the
decoration of Solomon's Temple, animals and plants were abundantly
represented." The cuts on p. 242 will show the character of the
ornamentation of the Bronze Age. In the next place, the form of burial
is different in the Bronze Age from that of the Phoenicians. "In the
third place, the Phoenicians, so far as we know them, were well
acquainted with the use of iron; in Homer we find the warriors already
armed with iron weapons, and the tools used in preparing the materials
for Solomon's Temple were of this metal."

This view is also held by M. de Fallenberg, in the "Bulletin de la
Societe des Sciences" of Berne. (See "Smithsonian Rep.," 1865-66, p.
383.) He says,

                       ORNAMENTS OF THE BRONZE AGE

"It seems surprising that the nearest neighbors of the Phoenicians--the
Greeks, the Egyptians, the Etruscans, and the Romans--should have
manufactured plumbiferous bronzes, while the Phoenicians carried to the
people of the North only pure bronzes without the alloy of lead. If the
civilized people of the Mediterranean added lead to their bronzes, it
can scarcely be doubted that the calculating Phoenicians would have done
as much, and, at least, with distant and half-civilized tribes, have
replaced the more costly tin by the cheaper metal. . . . On the whole,
then, I consider that the first knowledge of bronze may have been
conveyed to the populations of the period tinder review not only by the
Phoenicians, but by other civilized people dwelling more to the
south-east."

Professor E. Desor, in his work on the "Lacustrian Constructions of the
Lake of Neuchatel," says,

"The Phoenicians certainly knew the use of iron, and it can scarcely be
conceived why they should have excluded it from their commerce on the
Scandinavian coasts. . . . The Etruscans, moreover, were acquainted with
the use of iron as well as the Phoenicians, and it has already been seen
that the composition of their bronzes is different, since it contains
lead, which is entirely a stranger to our bronze epoch. . . . We must
look, then, beyond both the Etruscans and Phoenicians in attempting to
identify the commerce of the Bronze Age of our palafittes. It will be
the province of the historian to inquire whether, exclusive of
Phoenicians and Carthaginians, there may not have been some maritime and
commercial people who carried on a traffic through the ports of Liguria
with the populations of the age of bronze of the lakes of Italy before
the discovery of iron. We may remark, in passing, that there is nothing
to prove that the Phoenicians were the first navigators. History, on the
Contrary, positively mentions prisoners, under the name of Tokhari, who
were vanquished in a naval battle fought by Rhamses III. in the
thirteenth century before our era, and whose physiognomy, according to
Morton, would indicate the Celtic type. Now there is room to suppose
that if these Tokhari were energetic enough to measure their strength on
the sea with one of the powerful kings of Egypt, they must, with
stronger reason, have been in a condition to carry on a commerce along
the coasts of the Mediterranean, and perhaps of the Atlantic. If such a
commerce really existed before the time of the Phoenicians, it would not
be limited to the southern slope of the Alps; it would have extended
also to the people of the age of bronze in Switzerland. The introduction
of bronze would thus ascend to a very high antiquity, doubtless beyond
the limits of the most ancient European races."

For the merchants of the Bronze Age we must look beyond even the
Tokhari, who were contemporaries of the Phoenicians.

The Tokhari, we have seen, are represented as taken prisoners, in a
sea-fight with Rhamses III., of the twentieth dynasty, about the
thirteenth century B.C. They are probably the Tochari of Strabo. The
accompanying figure represents one of these people as they appear upon
the Egyptian monuments. (See Nott and Gliddon's "Types of Mankind," p.
108.) Here we have, not an inhabitant of Atlantis, but probably a
representative of one of the mixed races that sprung from its colonies.

Dr. Morton thinks these people, as painted on the Egyptian monuments, to
have "strong Celtic features. Those familiar with the Scotch Highlanders
may recognize a speaking likeness."

It is at least interesting to have a portrait of one of the daring race
who more than three thousand years ago left the west of Europe in their
ships to attack the mighty power of Egypt.

They were troublesome to the nations of the East for many centuries; for
in 700 B.C. we find them depicted on the Assyrian monuments. This figure
represents one of the Tokhari of the time of Sennacherib. It will be
observed that the headdress (apparently of feathers) is the same in both
portraits, al, though separated by a period of six hundred years.

It is more reasonable to suppose that the authors of the bronze Age of
Europe were the people described by Plato, who were workers in metal,
who were highly civilized, who preceded in time all the nations which we
call ancient. It was this people who passed through an age of copper
before they reached the age of bronze, and whose colonies in America
represented this older form of metallurgy as it existed for many
generations.

Professor Desor says:

"We are asked if the preparation of bronze was not an indigenous
invention which had originated on the slopes of the Alps? . . . In this
idea we acquiesced for a moment. But we are met by the objection that,
if this were so, the natives, like the ancient tribes of America, would
have commenced by manufacturing utensils of copper; yet thus far no
utensils of this metal have been found except a few in the strand of
Lake Garda. The great majority of metallic objects is of bronze, which
necessitated the employment of tin, and this could not be obtained
except by commerce, inasmuch as it is a stranger to the Alps. It would
appear, therefore, more natural to admit that the art of combining tin
with copper--in other words, that the manufacture of bronze--was of
foreign importation." He then shows that, although copper ores are found
in the Alps, the probability is that even "the copper also was of
foreign importation. Now, in view of the prodigious quantity of bronze
manufactured at that epoch, this single branch of commerce must itself
have necessitated the most incessant commercial communications."

And as this commerce could not, as we have seen, have been carried on by
the Romans, Greeks, Etruscans, or Phoenicians, because their
civilizations flourished during the Iron Age, to which this age of
bronze was anterior, where then are we to look for a great maritime and
commercial people, who carried vast quantities of copper, tin, and
bronze (unalloyed by the lead of the south of Europe) to Denmark,
Norway, Sweden, Ireland, England, France, Spain, Switzerland, and Italy?
Where can we find them save in that people of Atlantis, whose ships,
docks, canals, and commerce provoked the astonishment of the ancient
Egyptians, as recorded by Plato. The Toltec root for water is Atl; the
Peruvian word for copper is Anti (from which, probably, the Andes
derived their name, as there was a province of Anti on their slopes):
may it not be that the name of Atlantis is derived from these originals,
and signified the copper island, or the copper mountains in the sea? And
from these came the thousands of tons of copper and tin that must,
during the Bronze Age, have been introduced into Europe? There are no
ancient works to indicate that the tin mines of Cornwall were worked for
any length of time in the early days (see "Prehistoric Times," p. 74).
Morlot has pointed out that the bronze implements of Hallstadt, in
Austria, were of foreign origin, because they contain no lead or silver.

Or, if we are to seek for the source of the vast amount of copper
brought into Europe somewhere else than in Atlantis, may it not be that
these supplies were drawn in large part from the shores of Lake Superior
in America? The mining operations of some ancient people were there
carried on upon a gigantic scale, not only along the shores of the lake
but even far out upon its islands. At Isle Royale vast works were found,
reaching to a depth of sixty feet; great intelligence was shown in
following up the richest veins even when interrupted; the excavations
were drained by underground drains. On three sections of land on this
island the amount of mining exceeded that mined in twenty years in one
of our largest mines, with a numerous force constantly employed. In one
place the excavations extended in a nearly continuous line for two
miles. No remains of the dead and no mounds are found near these mines:
it would seem, therefore, that the miners came from a distance, and
carried their dead back with them. Henry Gillman ("Smithsonian Rep.,"
1873, p. 387) supposes that the curious so-called "Garden Beds" of
Michigan were the fields from which they drew their supplies of food. He
adds,

"The discoveries in Isle Royale throw a new light on the character of
the 'Mound Builders,' giving us a totally distinct conception of them,
and dignifying them with something of the prowess and spirit of
adventure which we associate with the higher races. The copper, the
result of their mining, to be available, must, in all probability, have
been conveyed in vessels, great or small, across a treacherous and
stormy sea, whose dangers are formidable to us now, being dreaded even
by our largest craft, and often proving their destruction. Leaving their
homes, those men dared to face the unknown, to brave the hardships and
perils of the deep and of the wilderness, actuated by an ambition which
we to-day would not be ashamed to acknowledge."

Such vast works in so remote a land must have been inspired by the
commercial necessities of some great civilization; and why not by that
ancient and mighty people who covered Europe, Asia, and Africa with
their manufactures of bronze-and who possessed, as Plato tells us,
enormous fleets trading to all parts of the inhabited world-whose cities
roared with the continual tumult of traffic, whose dominion extended to
Italy and Egypt, and who held parts of "the great opposite continent" of
America under their control? A continuous water-way led, from the island
of Atlantis to the Gulf of Mexico, and thence up the Mississippi River
and its tributaries almost to these very mines of Lake Superior.

Arthur Mitchell says ("The Past in the Present," p. 132),

"The discovery of bronze, and the knowledge of how to make it, may, as a
mere intellectual effort, be regarded as rather above than below the
effort which is involved in the discovery and use of iron. As regards
bronze, there is first the discovery of copper, and the way of getting
it from its ore; then the discovery of tin, and the way to get it from
its ore; and then the further discovery that, by an admixture of tin
with copper in proper proportions, an alloy with the qualities of a hard
metal can be produced. It is surely no mistake to say that there goes
quite as much thinking to this as to the getting of iron from its ore,
and the conversion of that iron into steel. There is a considerable leap
from stone to bronze, but the leap from bronze to iron is comparatively
small. . . . It seems highly improbable, if not altogether absurd, that
the human mind, at some particular stage of its development, should
here, there, and everywhere--independently, and as the result of
reaching that stage--discover that an alloy of copper and tin yields a
hard metal useful in the manufacture of tools and weapons. There is
nothing analogous to such an occurrence in the known history of human
progress. It is infinitely more probable that bronze was discovered in
one or more centres by one or more men, and that its first use was
solely in such centre or centres. That the invention should then be
perfected, and its various applications found out, and that it should
thereafter spread more or less broadly over the face of the earth, is a
thing easily understood."

We will find the knowledge of bronze wherever the colonies of Atlantis
extended, and nowhere else; and Plato tells us that the people of
Atlantis possessed and used that metal.

The indications are that the Bronze Age represents the coming in of a
new people--a civilized people. With that era, it is believed, appears
in Europe for the first time the domesticated animals-the horse, the ox,
the sheep, the goat, and the hog. (Morlot, "Smithsonian Rep.," 1860, p.
311.) It was a small race, with very small hands; this is shown in the
size of the sword-hilts: they are not large enough to be used by the
present races of Europe. They were a race with long skulls, as
contradistinguished. from the round heads of the Stone Period. The
drawings on the following page represent the types of the two races.

                   SKULLS OF THE AGE OF STONE, DENMARK

This people must have sent out colonies to the shores of France, Spain,
Italy, Ireland, Denmark, and Norway, who bore with them the arts and
implements of civilized life. They raised crops of grain, as is proved
by the bronze sickles found in different parts of Europe.

It is not even certain that their explorations did not reach to Iceland.
Says Humboldt,

"When the Northmen first landed in Iceland (A.D. 875), although the
country was uninhabited, they found there Irish books, mass-bells, and
other objects which had been left behind by earlier visitors, called
Papar; these papae (fathers) were the clerici of Dicuil. If, then, as we
may suppose from the testimony here referred to, these objects belonged
to Irish monks (papar), who had come from the Faroe Islands, why should
they have been termed in the native sagas 'West men' (Vestmen), 'who had
come over the sea from the westward' (kommer til vestan um haf)?"
(Humboldt's "Cosmos," vol. ii., 238.)

If they came "from the West" they could not have come from Ireland; and
the Scandinavians may easily have mistaken Atlantean books and bells for
Irish books and mass-bells. They do not say that there were any
evidences that these relics belonged to a people who had recently
visited the island; and, as they found the island uninhabited, it would
be impossible for them to tell how many years or centuries had elapsed
since the books and bells were left there.

The fact that the implements of the Bronze Age came from some common
centre, and did not originate independently in different countries, is
proved by the striking similarity which exists between the bronze
implements of regions as widely separated as Switzerland, Ireland,
Denmark, and Africa. It is not to be supposed that any overland
communication existed in that early age between these countries; and the
coincidence of design which we find to exist can only be accounted for
by the fact that the articles of bronze were obtained from some
sea-going people, who carried on a commerce at the same time with all
these regions.

                                  CELTS

Compare, for instance, these two decorated bronze celts. the first from
Ireland, the second from Denmark; and then compare both these with a
stone celt found in a mound in Tennessee, given below. Here we have the
same form precisely.

                        LEAF SHAPED BRONZE SWORDS

Compare the bronze swords in the four preceding illustrations-from
Ireland, Sweden, Switzerland, and Denmark-and then observe the same very
peculiar shape--the leaf-shape, as it is called--in the stone sword from
Big Harpeth River, Tennessee.

We shall find, as we proceed, that the Phoenicians were unquestionably
identified with Atlantis, and that it was probably from Atlantis they
derived their god Baal, or Bel, or El, whose name crops out in the Bel
of the Babylonians, the Elohim, and the Beelzebub of the Jews, and the
Allah of the Arabians, And we find that this great deity, whose worship
extended so widely among the Mediterranean races, was known and adored
also upon the northern and western coasts of Europe. Professor Nilsson
finds traces of Baal worship in Scandinavia; he tells us that the
festival of Baal, or Balder, was celebrated on midsummer's night in
Scania, and far up into Norway, almost to the Loffoden Islands, until
within the last fifty years. The feast of Baal, or Beltinne, was
celebrated in Ireland to a late period. I argue from these facts, not
that the worship of Baal came to Ireland and Norway from Assyria or
Arabia, but that the same great parent-race which carried the knowledge
of Baal to the Mediterranean brought it also to the western coasts of
Europe, and with the adoration of Baal they imported also the implements
of bronze now found in such abundance in those regions.

The same similarity of form exists in the bronze knives from Denmark and
Switzerland, as represented in the illustrations on p. 254.

In the central figure we have a representation of an Egyptian-looking
man holding a cup before him. We shall see, as we proceed, that the
magnetic needle, or "mariner's compass," dates back to the days of
Hercules, and that it consisted of a bar of magnetized iron floating
upon a piece of wood in a cup. It is possible that in this ancient relic
of the Bronze Age we have a representation of the magnetic cup. The
magnetic needle must certainly have been an object of great interest to
a people who, through its agency, were able to carry on commerce on all
the shores of Europe, from the Mediterranean to the Baltic. The second
knife represented above has upon its handle a wheel, or cross surrounded
by a ring, which, we shall see here after, was pre-eminently the symbol
of Atlantis.

If we are satisfied that these implements of bronze were the work of the
artisans of Atlantis--of the antediluvians--they must acquire additional
and extraordinary interest in our eyes, and we turn to them to earn
something of the habits and customs of "that great, original,
broad-eyed, sunken race."

We find among the relies of the Bronze Age an urn, which probably gives
us some idea of the houses of the Atlanteans: it is evidently made to
represent a house, and shows us even the rude fashion in which they
fastened their doors. The Mandan Indiana built round houses very much of
this appearance.

The museum at Munich contains a very interesting piece of pottery, which
is supposed to represent one of the lake villages or hamlets of the era
when the people of Switzerland dwelt in houses erected on piles driven
into the bottom of the lakes of that country. The accompanying
illustration represents it. The double spiral ornament upon it shows
that it belongs to the Bronze Age.

Among the curious relies of the Bronze Age are a number of razor-like
knives; from which we may conclude that the habit of shaving the whole
or some part of the face or head dates back to a great antiquity. The
illustrations below represent them.

These knives were found in Denmark. The figures upon them represent
ships, and it is not impossible that their curious appendages may have
been a primitive kind of sails.

                          BRONZE RAZOR-KNIVES.

An examination of the second of these bronze knives reveals a singular
feature: Upon the handle of the razor there are ten series of lines; the
stars in the sky are ten in number; and there were probably ten rings at
the left-hand side of the figure, two being obliterated. There were, we
are told, ten sub-kingdoms in Atlantis; and precisely as the thirteen
stripes on the American flag symbolize the thirteen original States of
the Union, so the recurrence of the figure ten in the emblems upon this
bronze implement may have reference to the ten subdivisions of Atlantis.
The large object in the middle of this ship may be intended to represent
a palm-tree-the symbol, as we shall see, in America, of Aztlan, or
Atlantis. We have but to compare the pictures of the ships upon these
ancient razor-knives with the accompanying representations of a Roman
galley and a ship of William the Conqueror's time, to see that there can
be no question that they represented the galleys of that remote age.
They are doubtless faithful portraits of the great vessels which Plato
described as filling the harbors of Atlantis.

                      SHIP OF WILLIAM THE CONQUERER.

We give on page 258 a representation of a bronze dagger found in
Ireland, a strongly-made weapon. The cut below it represents the only
implement of the Bronze Age yet found containing an inscription. It has
been impossible to decipher it, or even to tell to what group of
languages its alphabet belongs.

It is proper to note, in connection with a discussion of the Bronze Age,
that our word bronze is derived from the Basque, or Iberian broncea,
from which the Spanish derive bronce, and the Italians bronzo. The
copper mines of the Basques were extensively worked at a very early age
of the world, either by the people of Atlantis or by the Basques
themselves, a colony from Atlantis. The probabilities are that the name
for bronze, as well as the metal itself, dates back to Plato's island.

I give some illustrations on pages 239 and 242 of ornaments and
implements of the Bronze Age, which may serve to throw light upon the
habits of the ancient people. It will be seen that they had reached a
considerable degree of civilization; that they raised crops of grain,
and cut them with sickles; that their women ornamented themselves with
bracelets, armlets, earrings, finger-rings, hair-pins, and amulets; that
their mechanics used hammers, adzes, and chisels; and that they
possessed very fair specimens of pottery. Sir John Lubbock argues
("Prehistoric Times," pp. 14, 16, etc.):

"A new civilization is indicated not only by the mere presence of bronze
but by the beauty and variety of the articles made from it. We find not
only, as before, during the Stone Age, axes, arrows, and knives, but, in
addition, swords, lances, sickles, fish-hooks, ear-rings, bracelets,
pins, rings, and a variety of other articles."

If the bronze implements of Europe had been derived from the
Phoenicians, Greeks, Etruscans, or Romans, the nearer we approached the
site of those nations the greater should be the number of bronze weapons
we would find; but the reverse is the case. Sir John Lubbock
("Prehistoric Times," p. 20) shows that more than three hundred and
fifty bronze swords have been found in Denmark, and that the Dublin
Museum contains twelve hundred and eighty-three bronze weapons found in
Ireland; "while," he says, "I have only been able to hear of six bronze
swords in all Italy." This state of things is inexplicable unless we
suppose that Ireland and Denmark received their bronze implements
directly from some maritime nation whose site was practically as near
their shores as it was to the shores of the Mediterranean. We have but
to look at our map on page 43, ante, to see that Atlantis was
considerably nearer to Ireland than it was to Italy.

The striking resemblance between the bronze implements found in the
different portions of Europe is another proof that they were derived
from one and the same source-from some great mercantile people who
carried on their commerce at the same time with Denmark, Norway,
Ireland, Spain, Greece, Italy, Egypt, Switzerland, and Hungary. Mr.
Wright ("Essays on Archaeology," p. 120) says, "Whenever we find the
bronze swords or celts,

              VASES FROM MOUNDS IN THE MISSISSIPPI VALLEY.

whether in Ireland, in the far west, in Scotland, in distant
Scandinavia, in Germany, or still farther east, in the Sclavonic
countries, they are the same--not similar in character, but identical."
Says Sir John Lubbock ("Prehistoric Times," p. 59), "Not only are the
several varieties of celts found throughout Europe alike, but some of
the swords, knives, daggers, etc., are so similar that they seem as if
they must have been cast by the same maker."

What race was there, other than the people of Atlantis, that existed
before the Iron Age-before the Greek, Roman, Etruscan, and
Phoenician--that was civilized, that worked in metals, that carried on a
commerce with all parts of Europe? Does history or tradition make
mention of any such?

We find a great resemblance between the pottery of the Bronze Age in
Europe and the pottery of the ancient inhabitants of America. The two
figures on page 260 represent vases from one of the mounds of the
Mississippi Valley. Compare them with the following from the lake
dwellings of Switzerland:

                         VASES FROM SWITZERLAND.

It will be seen that these vases could scarcely stand upright
unsupported; and we find that the ancient inhabitants of Switzerland had
circles or rings of baked earth in which they placed them when in use,
as in the annexed figure. The Mound Builders used the same contrivance.

The illustrations of discoidal stones on page 263 are from the "North
Americans of Antiquity," p. 77. The objects represented were taken from
an ancient mound in Illinois. It would be indeed surprising if two
distinct peoples, living in two different continents, thousands of miles
apart, should, without any intercourse with each other, not only form
their vases in the same inconvenient form, but should hit upon the same
expedient as a remedy.

We observe, in the American spear-head and the Swiss hatchets, on the
opposite page, the same overlapping of the metal around the staff, or
handle--a very peculiar mode of uniting them together, which has now
passed out of use.

A favorite design of the men of the Bronze Age in Europe is the spiral
or double-spiral form. It appears on the face of the urn in the shape of
a lake dwelling, which is given on p. 255; it also appears in the rock
sculptures of Argyleshire, Scotland, here shown.

We find the same figure in an ancient fragment of pottery from the
Little Colorado, as given in the "United States Pacific Railroad Survey
Report," vol. iii., p. 49, art. Pottery. It was part of a large vessel.
The annexed illustration represents this.

                       DISCOIDAL STONES, ILLINOIS.

                    COPPER SPEAR-HEAD, LAKE SUPERIOR.

                      BRONZE HATCHETS, SWITZERLAND.

The same design is also found in ancient rock etchings of the Zunis of
New Mexico, of which the cut on p. 265 is an illustration.

We also find this figure repeated upon vase from a Mississippi Valley
mound, which we give elsewhere. (See p. 260.)

It is found upon many of the monuments of Central America. In the
Treasure House of Atreus, at Mycenae, Greece, a fragment of a pillar was
found which is literally covered with this double spiral design. (See
"Rosengarten's Architectural Styles," p, 59.)

This Treasure House of Atreus is one of the oldest buildings in Greece.

We find the double-spiral figure upon a shell ornament found on the
breast of a skeleton, in a carefully constructed stone coffin, in a
mound near Nashville, Tennessee.

Lenormant remarks ("Anc. Civil.," vol. ii., p. 158) that the bronze
implements found in Egypt, near Memphis, had been buried for six
thousand years; and that at that time, as the Egyptians had a horror of
the sea, some commercial nation must have brought the tin, of which the
bronze was in part composed, from India, the Caucasus, or Spain, the
nearest points to Egypt in which tin is found.

Heer has shown that the civilized plants of the lake dwellings are not
of Asiatic, but of African, and, to a great extent, of Egyptian origin.
Their stone axes are made largely of jade or nephrite, "a mineral which,
strange to say, geologists have not found in place on the continent of
Europe." (Foster's "Prehistoric Races," p. 44.)

Compare this picture of a copper axe from a mound near Laporte, Indiana,
with this representation of a copper axe of the Bronze Age, found near
Waterford, Ireland. Professor Foster pronounces them almost identical.

Compare this specimen of pottery from the lake dwellings of Switzerland
with the following specimen from San Jose, Mexico. Professor Foster
calls attention to the striking resemblance in the designs of these two
widely separated works of art, one belonging to the Bronze Age of
Europe, the other to the Copper Age of America.

+-------------------------------------+---------------------------------+
| FRAGMENT OF POTTERY, LAKE           | FRAGMENT OF POTTERY, SAN JOSE,  |
| NEUFCHATEL, SWITZERLAND.            | MEXICO.                         |
+-------------------------------------+---------------------------------+

These, then, in conclusion, are our reasons for believing that the
Bronze Age of Europe has relation to Atlantis:

1. The admitted fact that it is anterior in time to the Iron Age
relegates it to a great antiquity.

2. The fact that it is anterior in time to the Iron Age is conclusive
that it is not due to any of the known European or Asiatic nations, all
of which belong to the Iron Age.

3. The fact that there war. in Europe, Asia, or Africa no copper or tin
age prior to the Bronze Age, is conclusive testimony that the
manufacture of bronze was an importation into those continents from some
foreign country.

4. The fact that in America alone of all the world is found the Copper
Age, which must necessarily have preceded the Bronze Age, teaches us to
look to the westward of Europe and beyond the sea for that foreign
country.

5. We find many similarities in forms of implements between the Bronze
Age of Europe and the Copper Age of America.

6. if Plato told the truth, the Atlanteans were a great commercial
nation, trading to America and Europe, and, at the same time, they
possessed bronze, and were great workers in the other metals.

7. We shall see hereafter that the mythological traditions of Greece
referred to a Bronze Age which preceded an Iron Age, and placed this in
the land of the gods, which was an island in the Atlantic Ocean, beyond
the Pillars of Hercules; and this land was, as we shall see, clearly
Atlantis.

8. As we find but a small development of the Bronze Age in America, it
is reasonable to suppose that there must have been some intermediate
station between America and Europe, where, during a long period of time,
the Bronze Age was developed out of the Copper Age, and immense
quantities of bronze implements were manufactured and carried to Europe.

CHAPTER IX.

ARTIFICIAL DEFORMATION OF THE SKULL.

An examination of the American monuments shows (see figure on page 269)
that the people represented were in the habit of flattening the skull by
artificial means. The Greek and Roman writers had mentioned this
practice, but it was long totally forgotten by the civilized world,
until it was discovered, as an unheard-of wonder, to be the usage among
the Carib Islanders, and several Indian tribes in North America. It was
afterward found that the ancient Peruvians and Mexicans practised this
art: several flattened Peruvian skulls are depicted in Morton's "Crania
Americana." It is still in use among the Flat-head Indians of the
north-western part of the United States.

In 1849 a remarkable memoir appeared from the pen of M. Rathke, showing
that similar skulls had been found near Kertsch, in the Crimea, and
calling attention to the book of Hippocrates, "De Aeris, Aquis et Locu,"
lib. iv., and a passage of Strabo, which speaks of the practice among
the Scythians. In 1854 Dr. Fitzinger published a learned memoir on the
skulls of the Avars, a branch of the Uralian race of Turks. He shows
that the practice of flattening the head had existed from an early date
throughout the East, and described an ancient skull, greatly distorted
by artificial means, which had lately been found in Lower Austria.
Skulls similarly flattened have been found in Switzerland and Savoy. The
Huns under Attila had the same practice of flattening the heads.
Professor Anders Retzius proved (see "Smithsonian Report," 1859) that
the custom still exists in the south of France, and in parts of Turkey.
"Not long since a French physician surprised the world by the fact that
nurses in Normandy were still giving the children's heads a sugar-loaf
shape by bandages and a tight cap,

              STUCCO BAS-RELIEF IN THE PALACE OF PALENQUE.

while in Brittany they preferred to press it round. No doubt they are
doing so to this day." (Tylor's "Anthropology," p. 241.)

Professor Wilson remarks:

"Trifling as it may appear, it is not without interest to have the fact
brought under our notice, by the disclosures of ancient barrows and
cysts, that the same practice of nursing the child and carrying it
about, bound to a flat cradle-board, prevailed in Britain and the north
of Europe long before the first notices of written history reveal the
presence of man beyond the Baltic or the English Channel, and that in
all probability the same custom prevailed continuously from the shores
of the German Ocean to Behring's Strait." ("Smithsonian Report," 1862,
p. 286.)

Dr. L. A. Gosse testifies to the prevalence of the same custom among the
Caledonians and Scandinavians in the earliest times; and Dr. Thurman has
treated of the same peculiarity among the Anglo-Saxons. ("Crania
Britannica," chap. iv., p. 38.)

                             PERUVIAN SKULL.

                    CHINOOK (FLAT-HEAD), AFTER CATLIN.

Here, then, is an extraordinary and unnatural practice which has existed
from the highest antiquity, over vast regions of country, on both sides
of the Atlantic, and which is perpetuated unto this day in races as
widely separated as the Turks, the French, and the Flat-head Indians. Is
it possible to explain this except by supposing that it originated from
some common centre?

The annexed out represents an ancient Swiss skull, from a cemetery near
Lausanne, from a drawing of Frederick Troyon. Compare this with the
illustration given on page 271, which represents a Peruvian flat-head,
copied from Morton's "Ethnography and Archaeology of the American
Aborigines," 1846. This skull is shockingly distorted. The dotted lines
indicate the course of the bandages by which the skull was deformed.

The following heads are from Del Rio's "Account of Palenque," copied
into Nott and Gliddon's "Types of Mankind," p. 440. They show that the
receding forehead was a natural characteristic of the ancient people of
Central America. The same form of head has been found even in fossil
skulls. We may therefore conclude that the skull-flattening, which we
find to have been practised in both the Old and New Worlds, was an
attempt of other races to imitate the form of skull of a people whose
likenesses are found on the monuments of Egypt and of America. It has
been shown that this peculiar form of the head was present even in the
foetus of the Peruvian mummies.

Hippocrates tells us that the practice among the Scythians was for the
purpose of giving a certain aristocratic distinction.

                          HEADS FROM PALENQUE.

Amedee Thierry, in his "History of Attila," says the Huns used it for
the same reason; and the same purpose influences the Indians of Oregon.

Dr. Lund, a Swedish naturalist, found in the bone caves of Minas-Geraes,
Brazil, ancient human bones associated with the remains of extinct
quadrupeds. "These skulls," says Lund, "show not only the peculiarity of
the American race but in an excessive degree, even to the entire
disappearance of the forehead." Sir Robert Schomburgh found on some of
the affluents of the Orinoco a tribe known as Frog Indians, whose heads
were flattened by Nature, as shown in newly-born children.

In the accompanying plate we show the difference in the conformation of
the forehead in various races. The upper dotted line, A, represents the
shape of the European forehead; the next line, B, that of the
Australian; the next, C, that of the Mound Builder of the United States;
the next, D, that of the Guanche of the Canary Islands; and the next, E,
that of a skull from the Inca cemetery of Peru. We have but to compare
these lines with the skulls of the Egyptians, Kurds, and the heroic type
of heads in the statues of the gods of Greece, to see that there was
formerly an ancient race marked by a receding forehead; and that the
practice of flattening the skull was probably an attempt to approximate
the shape of the bead to this standard of an early civilized and
dominant people.

Not only do we find the same receding forehead in the skulls of the
ancient races of Europe and America, and the same attempt to imitate
this natural and peculiar conformation by artificial flattening of the
head, but it has been found (see Henry Gillman's "Ancient Man in
Michigan," "Smithsonian Report," 1875, p. 242) that the Mound Builders
and Peruvians of America, and the Neolithic people of France and the
Canary Islands, had alike an extraordinary custom of boring a circular
bole in the top of the skulls of their dead, so that the soul might
readily pass in and out. More than this, it has been found that in all
these ancient populations the skeletons exhibit a remarkable degree of
platicnemism, or flattening of the tibiae or leg bones. (Ibid., 1873,
p.367.) In this respect the Mound Builders of Michigan were identical
with the man of Cro Magnon and the ancient inhabitants of Wales.

The annexed ancient Egyptian heads, copied from the monuments, indicate
either that the people of the Nile deformed their beads by pressure upon
the front of the skull, or that

                             EGYPTIAN HEADS.

there was some race characteristic which gave this appearance to their
heads. These heads are all the heads of priests, and therefore
represented the aristocratic class.

The first illustration below is taken from a stucco relief found in a
temple at Palenque, Central America. The second is from an Egyptian
monument of the time of Rameses IV.

The outline drawing on the following page shows the form of the skull of
the royal Inca line: the receding forehead here seems to be natural, and
not the result of artificial compression.

Both illustrations at the bottom of the preceding page show the same
receding form of the forehead, due to either artificial deformation of
the skull or to a common race characteristic.

We must add the fact that the extraordinary practice of deforming the
skull was found all over Europe and America to the catalogue of other
proofs that the people of both continents were originally united in
blood and race. With the couvade, the practice of circumcision, unity of
religious beliefs and customs, folk-lore, and alphabetical signs,
language and flood legends, we array together a mass of unanswerable
proofs of prehistoric identity of race.

PART IV.

THE MYTHOLOGIES OF THE OLD WORLD A RECOLLECTION OF ATLANTIS.

CHAPTER I. TRADITIONS OF ATLANTIS.

We find allusions to the Atlanteans in the most ancient traditions of
many different races.

The great antediluvian king of the Mussulman was Shedd-Ad-Ben-Ad, or
Shed-Ad, the son of Ad, or Atlantis.

Among the Arabians the first inhabitants of that country are known as
the Adites, from their progenitor, who is called Ad, the grandson of
Ham. These Adites were probably the people of Atlantis or Ad-lantis.
"They are personified by a monarch to whom everything is ascribed, and
to whom is assigned several centuries of life." ("Ancient History of the
East," Lenormant and Chevallier, vol. ii., p. 295.), Ad came from the
northeast. "He married a thousand wives, had four thousand sons, and
lived twelve hundred years. His descendants multiplied considerably.
After his death his sons Shadid and Shedad reigned in succession over
the Adites. In the time of the latter the people of Ad were a thousand
tribes, each composed of several thousands of men. Great conquests are
attributed to Shedad; he subdued, it is said, all Arabia and Irak. The
migration of the Canaanites, their establishment in Syria, and the
Shepherd invasion of Egypt are, by many Arab writers, attributed to an
expedition of Shedad." (Ibid., p. 296.)

Shedad built a palace ornamented with superb columns, and surrounded by
a magnificent garden. It was called Irem. "It was a paradise that Shedad
had built in imitation of the celestial Paradise, of whose delights he
had heard." ("Ancient History of the East," p. 296.) In other words, an
ancient, sun-worshipping, powerful, and conquering race overran Arabia
at the very dawn of history; they were the sons of Adlantis: their king
tried to create a palace and garden of Eden like that of Atlantis.

The Adites are remembered by the Arabians as a great and civilized race.
"They are depicted as men of gigantic stature; their strength was equal
to their size, and they easily moved enormous blocks of stone." (Ibid.)
They were architects and builders. They raised many monuments of their
power; and hence, among the Arabs, arose the custom of calling great
ruins "buildings of the Adites." To this day the Arabs say "as old as
Ad." In the Koran allusion is made to the edifices they built on "high
places for vain uses;" expressions proving that their "idolatry was
considered to have been tainted with Sabaeism or star-worship." (Ibid.)
"In these legends," says Lenormant, "we find traces of a wealthy nation,
constructors of great buildings, with an advanced civilization,
analogous to that of Chaldea, professing a religion similar to the
Babylonian; a nation, in short, with whom material progress was allied
to great moral depravity and obscene rites. These facts must be true and
strictly historical, for they are everywhere met with among the
Cushites, as among the Canaanites, their brothers by origin."

Nor is there wanting a great catastrophe which destroys the whole Adite
nation, except a very few who escape because they had renounced
idolatry. A black cloud assails their country, from which proceeds a
terrible hurricane (the water-spout?) which sweeps away everything.

The first Adites were followed by a second Adite race; probably the
colonists who had escaped the Deluge. The centre of its power was the
country of Sheba proper. This empire endured for a thousand years. The
Adites are represented upon the Egyptian monuments as very much like the
Egyptians themselves; in other words, they were a red or sunburnt race:
their great temples were pyramidal, surmounted by buildings. ("Ancient
History of the East," p. 321.) "The Sabaeans," says Agatharchides ("De
Mari Erythraeo," p. 102), "have in their houses an incredible number of
vases, and utensils of all sorts, of gold and silver, beds and tripods
of silver, and all the furniture of astonishing richness. Their
buildings have porticos with columns sheathed with gold, or surmounted
by capitals of silver. On the friezes, ornaments, and the framework of
the doors they place plates of gold incrusted with precious stones."

All this reminds one of the descriptions given by the Spaniards of the
temples of the sun in Peru.

The Adites worshipped the gods of the Phoenicians under names but
slightly changed; "their religion was especially solar... It was
originally a religion without images, without idolatry, and without a
priesthood." (Ibid., p. 325.) They "worshipped the sun from the tops of
pyramids." (Ibid.) They believed in the immortality of the soul.

In all these things we see resemblances to the Atlanteans.

The great Ethiopian or Cushite Empire, which in the earliest ages
prevailed, as Mr. Rawlinson says, "from the Caucasus to the Indian
Ocean, from the shores of the Mediterranean to the mouth of the Ganges,"
was the empire of Dionysos, the empire of "Ad," the empire of Atlantis.
El Eldrisi called the language spoken to this day by the Arabs of
Mahrah, in Eastern Arabia, "the language of the people of Ad," and Dr.
J. H. Carter, in the Bombay Journal of July, 1847, says, "It is the
softest and sweetest language I have ever heard." It would be
interesting to compare this primitive tongue with the languages of
Central America.

The god Thoth of the Egyptians, who was the god of a foreign country,
and who invented letters, was called At-hothes.

We turn now to another ancient race, the Indo-European family--the Aryan
race.

In Sanscrit Adim, means first. Among the Hindoos the first man was
Ad-ima, his wife was Heva. They dwelt upon an island, said to be Ceylon;
they left the island and reached the main-land, when, by a great
convulsion of nature, their communication with the parent land was
forever cut off. (See "Bible in India.")

Here we seem to have a recollection of the destruction of Atlantis.

Mr. Bryant says, "Ad and Ada signify the first." The Persians called the
first man "Ad-amah." "Adon" was one of the names of the Supreme God of
the Phoenicians; from it was derived the name of the Greek god
"Ad-onis." The Arv-ad of Genesis was the Ar-Ad of the Cushites; it is
now known as Ru-Ad. It is a series of connected cities twelve miles in
length, along the coast, full of the most massive and gigantic ruins.

Sir William Jones gives the tradition of the Persians as to the earliest
ages. He says: "Moshan assures us that in the opinion of the best
informed Persians the first monarch of Iran, and of the whole earth, was
Mashab-Ad; that he received from the Creator, and promulgated among men
a sacred book, in a heavenly language, to which the Mussulman author
gives the Arabic title of 'Desatir,' or 'Regulations.' Mashab-Ad was, in
the opinion of the ancient Persians, the person left at the end of the
last great cycle, and consequently the father of the present world. He
and his wife having survived the former cycle, were blessed with a
numerous progeny; he planted gardens, invented ornaments, forged
weapons, taught men to take the fleece from sheep and make clothing; he
built cities, constructed palaces, fortified towns, and introduced arts
and commerce."

We have already seen that the primal gods of this people are identical
with the gods of the Greek mythology, and were originally kings of
Atlantis. But it seems that these ancient divinities are grouped
together as "the Aditya;" and in this name "Ad-itya" we find a strong
likeness to the Semitic "Adites," and another reminiscence of Atlantis,
or Adlantis. In corroboration of this view we find,

1. The gods who are grouped together as the Aditya are the most ancient
in the Hindoo mythology.

2. They are all gods of light, or solar gods. (Whitney's Oriental and
Linguistic Studies," p. 39.)

3. There are twelve of them. (Ibid.)

4. These twelve gods presided over twelve months in the year.

5. They are a dim recollection of a very remote past. Says Whitney, "It
seems as if here was an attempt on the part of the Indian religion to
take a new development in a moral direction, which a change in the
character and circumstances of the people has caused to fail in the
midst, and fall back again into forgetfulness, while yet half finished
and indistinct." (Ibid.)

6. These gods are called "the sons of Aditi," just as in the Bible we
have allusions to "the sons of Adab," who were the first metallurgists
and musicians. "Aditi is not a goddess. She is addressed as a queen's
daughter, she of fair children."

7. The Aditya "are elevated above all imperfections; they do not sleep
or wink." The Greeks represented their gods as equally wakeful and
omniscient. "Their character is all truth; they hate and punish guilt."
We have seen the same traits ascribed by the Greeks to the Atlantean
kings.

8. The sun is sometimes addressed as an Aditya.

9. Among the Aditya is Varuna, the equivalent of Uranos, whose
identification with Atlantis I have shown. In the vedas Varuna is "the
god of the ocean."

10. The Aditya represent an earlier and purer form of religion: "While
in hymns to the other deities long: life, wealth, power, are the objects
commonly prayed for, of the Aditya is craved purity, forgiveness of sin,
freedom from guilt, and repentance." ("Oriental and Linguistic Studies,"
p. 43.)

11. The Aditya, like the Adites, are identified with the doctrine of the
immortality of the soul. Yama is the god of the abode beyond the grave.
In the Persian story he appears as Yima, and "is made ruler of the
golden age and founder of the Paradise." (Ibid., p. 45.) (See "Zamna,"
p. 167 ante.)

In view of all these facts, one cannot doubt that the legends of the
"sons of Ad," "the Adites," and "the Aditya," all refer to Atlantis.

Mr. George Smith, in the Chaldean account of the Creation (p. 78),
deciphered from the Babylonian tablets, shows that there was an original
race of men at the beginning of Chaldean history, a dark race, the
Zalmat-qaqadi, who were called Ad-mi, or Ad-ami; they were the race "who
had fallen," and were contradistinguished from "the Sarku, or light
race." The "fall" probably refers to their destruction by a deluge, in
consequence of their moral degradation and the indignation of the gods.
The name Adam is used in these legends, but as the name of a race, not
of a man.

Genesis (chap. v., 2) distinctly says that God created man male and
female, and "called their name Adam." That is to say, the people were
the Ad-ami, the people of "Ad," or Atlantis. "The author of the Book of
Genesis," says M. Schoebel, "in speaking of the men who were swallowed
up by the Deluge, always describes them as 'Haadam,' 'Adamite
humanity.'" The race of Cain lived and multiplied far away from the land
of Seth; in other words, far from the land destroyed by the Deluge.
Josephus, who gives us the primitive traditions of the Jews, tells us
(chap. ii., p. 42) that "Cain travelled over many countries" before he
came to the land of Nod. The Bible does not tell us that the race of
Cain perished in the Deluge. "Cain went out from the presence of
Jehovah;" he did not call on his name; the people that were destroyed
were the "sons of Jehovah." All this indicates that large colonies had
been sent out by the mother-land before it sunk in the sea.

Across the ocean we find the people of Guatemala claiming their descent
from a goddess called At-tit, or grandmother, who lived for four hundred
years, and first taught the worship of the true God, which they
afterward forgot. (Bancroft's "Native Races," vol. iii., p. 75.) While
the famous Mexican calendar stone shows that the sun was commonly called
tonatiuh but when it was referred to as the god of the Deluge it was
then called Atl-tona-ti-uh, or At-onatiuh. (Valentini's "Mexican
Calendar Stone," art. Maya Archaeology, p. 15.)

We thus find the sons of Ad at the base of all the most ancient races of
men, to wit, the Hebrews, the Arabians, the Chaldeans, the Hindoos, the
Persians, the Egyptians, the Ethiopians, the Mexicans, and the Central
Americans; testimony that all these races traced their beginning back to
a dimly remembered Ad-lantis.

CHAPTER II

THE KINGS OF ATLANTIS BECOME THE GODS OF THE GREEKS.

Lord Bacon said:

"The mythology of the Greeks, which their oldest writers do not pretend
to have invented, was no more than a light air, which had passed from a
more ancient people into the flutes of the Greeks, which they modulated
to such descants as best suited their fancies."

This profoundly wise and great man, who has illuminated every subject
which he has touched, guessed very close to the truth in this utterance.

The Hon. W. E. Gladstone has had quite a debate of late with Mr. Cox as
to whether the Greek mythology was underlaid by a nature worship, or a
planetary or solar worship.

Peru, worshipping the sun and moon and planets, probably represents very
closely the simple and primitive religion of Atlantis, with its
sacrifices of fruits and flowers. This passed directly to their colony
in Egypt. We find the Egyptians in their early ages sun and planet
worshippers. Ptah was the object of their highest adoration. He is the
father of the god of the sun, the ruler of the region of light. Ra was
the sun-god. He was the supreme divinity at On, or Heliopolis, near
Memphis. His symbol was the solar disk, supported by two rings. He
created all that exists below the heavens.

The Babylonian trinity was composed of Idea, Anu, and Bel. Bel
represented the sun, and was the favorite god. Sin was the goddess of
the moon.

The Phoenicians were also sun-worshippers. The sun was represented by
Baal-Samin, the great god, the god of light and the heavens, the creator
and rejuvenator.

"The attributes of both Baal and Moloch (the good and bad powers of the
sun) were united in the Phoenician god Melkart, "king of the city," whom
the inhabitants of Tyre considered their special patron. The Greeks
called him "Melicertes," and identified him with Hercules. By his great
strength and power he turned evil into good, brought life out of
destruction, pulled back the sun to the earth at the time of the
solstices, lessened excessive beat and cold, and rectified the evil
signs of the zodiac. In Phoenician legends he conquers the savage races
of distant coasts, founds the ancient settlements on the Mediterranean,
and plants the rocks in the Straits of Gibraltar." ("American
Cyclopaedia," art. Mythology.)

The Egyptians worshipped the sun under the name of Ra; the Hindoos
worshipped the sun under the name of Rama; while the great festival of
the sun, of the Peruvians, was called Ray-mi.

Sun-worship, as the ancient religion of Atlantis, underlies all the
superstitions of the colonies of that country. The Samoyed woman says to
the sun, "When thou, god, risest, I too rise from my bed." Every morning
even now the Brahmans stand on one foot, with their hands held out
before them and their faces turned to the east, adoring the sun. "In
Germany or France one may still see the peasant take off his hat to the
rising sun." ("Anthropology," p. 361.) The Romans, even, in later times,
worshipped the sun at Emesa, under the name of Elagabalus, "typified in
the form of a black conical stone, which it was believed had fallen from
heaven." The conical stone was the emblem of Bel. Did it have relation
to the mounds and pyramids?

Sun-worship was the primitive religion of the red men of America. It was
found among all the tribes. (Dorman, "Origin of Primitive Superstitions,
p. 338.) The Chichimecs called the sun their father. The Comanches have
a similar belief.

But, compared with such ancient nations as the Egyptians and
Babylonians, the Greeks were children. A priest of Sais said to Solon,

"You Greeks are novices in knowledge of antiquity. You are ignorant of
what passed either here or among yourselves in days of old. The history
of eight thousand years is deposited in our sacred books; but I can
ascend to a much higher antiquity, and tell you what our fathers have
done for nine thousand years; I mean their institutions, their laws, and
their most brilliant achievements."

The Greeks, too young to have shared in the religion of Atlantis, but
preserving some memory of that great country and its history, proceeded
to convert its kings into gods, and to depict Atlantis itself as the
heaven of the human race. Thus we find a great solar or nature worship
in the elder nations, while Greece has nothing but an incongruous jumble
of gods and goddesses, who are born and eat and drink and make love and
ravish and steal and die; and who are worshipped as immortal in presence
of the very monuments that testify to their death.

"These deities, to whom the affairs of the world were in trusted, were,
it is believed, immortal, though not eternal in their existence. In
Crete there was even a story of the death of Zeus, his tomb being
pointed out." (Murray's "Mythology," p. 2.)

The history of Atlantis is the key of the Greek mythology. There can be
no question that these gods of Greece were human beings. The tendency to
attach divine attributes to great earthly rulers is one deeply implanted
in human nature. The savages who killed Captain Cook firmly believed
that he was immortal, that he was yet alive, and would return to punish
them. The highly civilized Romans made gods out of their dead emperors.
Dr. Livingstone mentions that on one occasion, after talking to a
Bushman for some time about the Deity, he found that the savage thought
he was speaking of Sekomi, the principal chief of the district.

We find the barbarians of the coast of the Mediterranean regarding the
civilized people of Atlantis with awe and wonder: "Their physical
strength was extraordinary, the earth shaking sometimes under their
tread. Whatever they did was done speedily. They moved through space
almost without the loss of a moment of time." This probably alluded to
the rapid motion of their sailing-vessels. "They were wise, and
communicated their wisdom to men." That is to say, they civilized the
people they came in contact with. 'They had a strict sense of justice,
and punished crime rigorously, and rewarded noble actions, though it is
true they were less conspicuous for the latter." (Murray's "Mythology,"
p. 4.) We should understand this to mean that where they colonized they
established a government of law, as contradistinguished from the anarchy
of barbarism.

"There were tales of personal visits and adventures of the gods among
men, taking part in battles and appearing in dreams. They were conceived
to possess the form of human beings, and to be, like men, subject to
love and pain, but always characterized by the highest qualities and
grandest forms that could be imagined." (Ibid.)

Another proof that the gods of the Greeks were but the deified kings of
Atlantis is found in the fact that "the gods were not looked upon as
having created the world." They succeeded to the management of a world
already in existence.

The gods dwelt on Olympus. They lived together like human beings; they
possessed palaces, storehouses, stables, horses, etc.; "they dwelt in a
social state which was but a magnified reflection of the social system
on earth. Quarrels, love passages, mutual assistance, and such instances
as characterize human life, were ascribed to them." (Ibid., p. 10.)

Where was Olympus? It was in Atlantis. "The ocean encircled the earth
with a great stream, and was a region of wonders of all kinds." (Ibid.,
p. 23.) It was a great island, the then civilized world. The encircling
ocean "was spoken of in all the ancient legends. Okeanos lived there
with his wife Tethys: these were the Islands of the Blessed, the garden
of the gods, the sources of the nectar and ambrosia on which the gods
lived." (Murray's "Mythology," p. 23.) Nectar was probably a fermented
intoxicating liquor, and ambrosia bread made from wheat. Soma was a kind
of whiskey, and the Hindoos deified it. "The gods lived on nectar and
ambrosia" simply meant that the inhabitants of these blessed islands
were civilized, and possessed a liquor of some kind and a species of
food superior to anything in use among the barbarous tribes with whom
they came in contact.

This blessed land answers to the description of Atlantis. It was an
island full of wonders. It lay spread out in the ocean "like a disk,
with the mountains rising from it." (Ibid.) On the highest point of this
mountain dwelt Zeus (the king), "while the mansions of the other deities
were arranged upon plateaus, or in ravines lower down the mountain.
These deities, including Zeus, were twelve in number: Zeus (or Jupiter),
Hera (or Juno), Poseidon (or Neptune), Demeter (or Ceres), Apollo,
Artemis (or Diana), Hephaestos (or Vulcan), Pallas Athena (or Minerva),
Ares (or Mars), Aphrodite (or Venus), Hermes (or Mercury), and Hestia
(or Vesta)." These were doubtless the twelve gods from whom the
Egyptians derived their kings. Where two names are given to a deity in
the above list, the first name is that bestowed by the Greeks, the last
that given by the Romans.

It is not impossible that our division of the year into twelve parts is
a reminiscence of the twelve gods of Atlantis. Diodorus Siculus tells us
that among the Babylonians there were twelve gods of the heavens, each
personified by one of the signs of the zodiac, and worshipped in a
certain month of the year. The Hindoos had twelve primal gods, "the
Aditya." Moses erected twelve pillars at Sinai. The Mandan Indians
celebrated the Flood with twelve typical characters, who danced around
the ark. The Scandinavians believed in the twelve gods, the Aesir, who
dwelt on Asgard, the Norse Olympus. Diligent investigation may yet
reveal that the number of a modern jury, twelve, is a survival of the
ancient council of Asgard.

"According to the traditions of the Phoenicians, the Gardens of the
Hesperides were in the remote west." (Murray's "Manual of Mythology," p.
258.) Atlas lived in these gardens. (Ibid., p. 259.) Atlas, we have
seen, was king of Atlantis. "The Elysian Fields (the happy islands) were
commonly placed in the remote west. They were ruled over by Chronos."
(Ibid., p. 60.) Tartarus, the region of Hades, the gloomy home of the
dead, was also located "under the mountains of an island in the midst of
the ocean in the remote west." (Ibid., p. 58.) Atlas was described in
Greek mythology as "an enormous giant, who stood upon the western
confines of the earth, and supported the heavens on his shoulders, in a
region of the west where the sun continued to shine after he had set
upon Greece." (Ibid., p. 156.)

Greek tradition located the island in which Olympus was situated "in the
far west," "in the ocean beyond Africa," "on the western boundary of the
known world," "where the sun shone when it had ceased to shine on
Greece," and where the mighty Atlas "held up the heavens." And Plato
tells us that the land where Poseidon and Atlas ruled was Atlantis.

"The Garden of the Hesperides" (another name for the dwelling-place of
the gods) "was situated at the extreme limit of Africa. Atlas was said
to have surrounded it on every side with high mountains." (Smith's
"Sacred Annals, Patriarchal Age," p. 131.) Here were found the golden
apples.

This is very much like the description which Plato gives of the great
plain of Atlantis, covered with fruit of every kind, and surrounded by
precipitous mountains descending to the sea.

The Greek mythology, in speaking of the Garden of the Hesperides, tells
us that "the outer edge of the garden was slightly raised, so that the
water might not run in and overflow the land." Another reminiscence of
the surrounding mountains of Atlantis as described by Plato, and as
revealed by the deep-sea soundings of modern times.

Chronos, or Saturn, Dionysos, Hyperion, Atlas, Hercules, were all
connected with "a great Saturnian continent;" they were kings that ruled
over countries on the western shores of the Mediterranean, Africa and
Spain. One account says:

"Hyperion, Atlas, and Saturn, or Chronos, were sons of Uranos, who
reigned over a great kingdom composed of countries around the western
part of the Mediterranean, with certain islands in the Atlantic.
Hyperion succeeded his father, and was then killed by the Titans. The
kingdom was then divided between Atlas and Saturn--Atlas taking Northern
Africa, with the Atlantic islands, and Saturn the countries on the
opposite shore of the Mediterranean to Italy and Sicily." (Baldwin's
"Prehistoric Nations," p. 357.)

Plato says, speaking of the traditions of the Greeks ("Dialogues, Laws,"
c. iv., p. 713), "There is a tradition of the happy life of mankind in
the days when all things were spontaneous and abundant. . . . In like
manner God in his love of mankind placed over us the demons, who are a
superior race, and they, with great care and pleasure to themselves and
no less to us, taking care of us and giving us place and reverence and
order and justice never failing, made the tribes of men happy and
peaceful . . . for Cronos knew that no human nature, invested with
supreme power, is able to order human affairs and not overflow with
insolence and wrong."

In other words, this tradition refers to an ancient time when the
forefathers of the Greeks were governed by Chronos, of the Cronian Sea
(the Atlantic), king of Atlantis, through civilized Atlantean governors,
who by their wisdom preserved peace and created a golden age for all the
populations under their control--they were the demons, that is, "the
knowing ones," the civilized.

Plato puts into the mouth of Socrates these words ("Dialogues,
Cratylus," p. 397): "My notion would be that the sun, moon, and stars,
earth, and heaven, which are still the gods of many barbarians, were the
only gods known to the aboriginal Hellenes. . . . What shall follow the
gods? Must not demons and heroes and men come next? . . . Consider the
real meaning of the word demons. You know Hesiod uses the word. He
speaks of 'a golden race of men' who came first. He says of them,

     But now that fate has closed over this race,
     They are holy demons upon earth,
     Beneficent averters of ills, guardians of mortal men.'

He means by the golden men not men literally made of gold, but good and
noble men; he says we are of the 'age of iron.' He called them demons
because they were dah'mones (knowing or wise)."

This is made the more evident when we read that this region of the gods,
of Chronos and Uranos and Zeus, passed through, first, a Golden Age,
then a Silver Age--these constituting a great period of peace and
happiness; then it reached a Bronze Age; then an Iron Age, and finally
perished by a great flood, sent upon these people by Zeus as a
punishment for their sins. We read:

"Men were rich then (in the Silver Age), as in the Golden Age of
Chronos, and lived in plenty; but still they wanted the innocence and
contentment which were the true sources of bu man happiness in the
former age; and accordingly, while living in luxury and delicacy, they
became overbearing in their manners to the highest degree, were never
satisfied, and forgot the gods, to whom, in their confidence of
prosperity and com fort, they denied the reverence they owed. . . . Then
followed the Bronze Age, a period of constant quarrelling and deeds of
violence. Instead of cultivated lands, and a life of peaceful
occupations and orderly habits, there came a day when every where might
was right, and men, big and powerful as they were, became physically
worn out. . . . Finally came the Iron Age, in which enfeebled mankind
had to toil for bread with their hands, and, bent on gain, did their
best to overreach each other. Dike, or Astraea, the goddess of justice
and good faith, modesty and truth, turned her back on such scenes, and
retired to Olympus, while Zeus determined to destroy the human race by a
great flood. The whole of Greece lay under water, and none but Deucalion
and his wife Pyrrha were saved." (Murray's "Mythology" p. 44.)

It is remarkable that we find here the same succession of the Iron Age
after the Bronze Age that has been revealed to scientific men by the
patient examination of the relies of antiquity in Europe. And this
identification of the land that was destroyed by a flood--the land of
Chronos and Poseidon and Zeus--with the Bronze Age, confirms the view
expressed in Chapter VIII. (page 237, ante), that the bronze implements
and weapons of Europe were mainly imported from Atlantis.

And here we find that the Flood that destroyed this land of the gods was
the Flood of Deucalion, and the Flood of Deucalion was the Flood of the
Bible, and this, as we have shown, was "the last great Deluge of all,"
according to the Egyptians, which destroyed Atlantis.

The foregoing description of the Golden Age of Chronos, when "men were
rich and lived in plenty," reminds us of Plato's description of the
happy age of Atlantis, when "men despised everything but virtue, not
caring for their present state of life, and thinking lightly of the
possession of gold and other property;" a time when, as the chants of
the Delaware Indians stated it (page 109, ante), "all were willingly
pleased, all were well-happified." While the description given by Murray
in the above extract of the degeneracy of mankind in the land of the
gods, "a period of constant quarrelling and deeds of violence, when
might was right," agrees with Plato's account of the Atlanteans, when
they became "aggressive," "unable to bear their fortune," "unseemly,"
"base," "filled with unrighteous avarice and power,"--and "in a most
wretched state." And here again I might quote from the chant of the
Delaware Indians--"they became troubled, hating each other; both were
fighting, both were spoiling, both were never peaceful." And in all
three instances the gods punished the depravity of mankind by a great
deluge. Can all these precise coincidences be the result of accident?

May we not even suppose that the very word "Olympus" is a transformation
from "Atlantis" in accordance with the laws that regulate the changes of
letters of the same class into each other? Olympus was written by the
Greeks "Olumpos." The letter a in Atlantis was sounded by the ancient
world broad and full, like the a in our words all or altar; in these
words it approximates very closely to the sound of o. It is not far to
go to convert Otlontis into Oluntos, and this into Olumpos. We may,
therefore, suppose that when the Greeks said that their gods dwelt in
"Olympus," it was the same as if they said that they dwelt in "Atlantis."

Nearly all the gods of Greece are connected with Atlantis. We have seen
the twelve principal gods all dwelling on the mountain of Olympus, in
the midst of an island in the ocean in the far west, which was
subsequently destroyed by a deluge on account of the wickedness of its
people. And when we turn to Plato's description of Atlantis (p. 13,
ante) we find that Poseidon and Atlas dwelt upon a mountain in the midst
of the island; and on this mountain were their magnificent temples and
palaces, where they lived, separated by great walls from their subjects.

It may be urged that Mount Olympus could not have referred to any
mountain in Atlantis, because the Greeks gave that name to a group of
mountains partly in Macedonia and partly in Thessaly. But in Mysia,
Lycia, Cyprus, and elsewhere there were mountains called Olympus; and on
the plain of Olympia, in Elis, there was an eminence bearing the same
designation. There is a natural tendency among uncivilized peoples to
give a "local habitation" to every general tradition.

"Many of the oldest myths," says Baldwin (" Prehistoric Nations," p.
376), "relate to Spain, North-western Africa, and other regions on the
Atlantic, such as those concerning Hercules, the Cronidae, the
Hyperboreans, the Hesperides, and the Islands of the Blessed. Homer
described the Atlantic region of Europe in his account of the wanderings
of Ulysses. . . . In the ages previous to the decline of Phoenician
influence in Greece and around the AEgean Sea, the people of those
regions must have had a much better knowledge of Western Europe than
prevailed there during the Ionian or Hellenic period."

The mythology of Greece is really a history of the kings of Atlantis.
The Greek heaven was Atlantis. Hence the references to statues, swords,
etc., that fell from heaven, and were preserved in the temples of the
different states along the shores of the Mediterranean from a vast
antiquity, and which were regarded as the most precious possessions of
the people. They were relics of the lost race received in the early
ages. Thus we read of the brazen or bronze anvil that was preserved in
one city, which fell from heaven, and was nine days and nine nights in
falling; in other words, it took nine days and nights of a
sailing-voyage to bring it from Atlantis.

The modern theory that the gods of Greece never had any personal
existence, but represented atmospheric and meteorological myths, the
movements of clouds, planets, and the sun, is absurd. Rude nations
repeat, they do not invent; to suppose a barbarous people creating their
deities out of clouds and sunsets is to reverse nature. Men first
worship stones, then other men, then spirits. Resemblances of names
prove nothing; it is as if one would show that the name of the great
Napoleon meant "the lion of the desert" (Napo-leon), and should thence
argue that Napoleon never existed, that he was a myth, that he
represented power in solitude, or some such stuff. When we read that
Jove whipped his wife, and threw her son out of the window, the
inference is that Jove was a man, and actually did something like the
thing described; certainly gods, sublimated spirits, aerial sprites, do
not act after this fashion; and it would puzzle the mythmakers to prove
that the sun, moon, or stars whipped their wives or flung recalcitrant
young men out of windows. The history of Atlantis could be in part
reconstructed out of the mythology of Greece; it is a history of kings,
queens, and princes; of love-making, adulteries, rebellions, wars,
murders, sea-voyages, and colonizations; of palaces, temples, workshops,
and forges; of sword-making, engraving and metallurgy; of wine, barley,
wheat, cattle, sheep, horses, and agriculture generally. Who can doubt
that it represents the history of a real people?

Uranos was the first god; that is to say, the first king of the great
race. As he was at the commencement of all things, his symbol was the
sky. He probably represented the race previous even to the settlement of
Atlantis. He was a son of Gaea (the earth). He seems to have been the
parent of three races--the Titans, the Hekatoncheires, and the Kyklopes
or Cyclops.

I incline to the belief that these were civilized races, and that the
peculiarities ascribed to the last two refer to the vessels in which
they visited the shores of the barbarians.

                         THE EMPIRE OF ATLANTIS.

The empire of the Titans was clearly the empire of Atlantis. "The most
judicious among our mythologists" (says Dr. Rees, "New British
Cyclopaedia," art. Titans)--"such as Gerard Vossius, Marsham, Bochart,
and Father Thomassin--are of opinion that the partition of the world
among the sons of Noah-Shem, Ham, and Japheth--was the original of the
tradition of the same partition among Jupiter, Neptune, and Pluto," upon
the breaking up of the great empire of the Titans. "The learned Pezron
contends that the division which was made of this vast empire came, in
after-times, to be taken for the partition of the whole world; that Asia
remaining in the hands of Jupiter (Zeus), the most potent of the three
brothers, made him looked upon as the god of Olympus; that the sea and
islands which fell to Neptune occasioned their giving him the title of
'god of the sea;' and that Spain, the extremity of the then known world,
thought to be a very low country in respect of Asia, and famous for its
excellent mines of gold and silver, failing to Pluto, occasioned him to
be taken for the 'god of the infernal regions.'" We should suppose that
Pluto possibly ruled over the transatlantic possessions of Atlantis in
America, over those "portions of the opposite continent" which Plato
tells us were dominated by Atlas and his posterity, and which, being far
beyond or below sunset, were the "under-world" of the ancients; while
Atlantis, the Canaries, etc., constituted the island division with
Western Africa and Spain. Murray tells us ("Mythology," p. 58) that
Pluto's share of the kingdom was supposed to lie "in the remote west."
The under-world of the dead was simply the world below the western
horizon; "the home of the dead has to do with that far west region where
the sun dies at night." ("Anthropology," p. 350.) "On the coast of
Brittany, where Cape Raz stands out westward into the ocean, there is
'the Bay of Souls,' the launching-place where the departed spirits sail
off across the sea." (Ibid.) In like manner, Odysseus found the land of
the dead in the ocean beyond the Pillars of Hercules. There, indeed, was
the land of the mighty dead, the grave of the drowned Atlanteans.

"However this be," continues F. Pezron, "the empire of the Titans,
according to the ancients, was very extensive; they possessed Phrygia,
Thrace, a part of Greece, the island of Crete, and several other
provinces to the inmost recesses of Spain. To these Sanchoniathon seems
to join Syria; and Diodorus adds a part of Africa, and the kingdoms of
Mauritania." The kingdoms of Mauritania embraced all that north-western
region of Africa nearest to Atlantis in which are the Atlas Mountains,
and in which, in the days of Herodotus, dwelt the Atlantes.

Neptune, or Poseidon, says, in answer to a message from Jupiter,

     No vassal god, nor of his train am I.
     Three brothers, deities, from Saturn came,
     And ancient Rhea, earth's immortal dame;
     Assigned by lot our triple rule we know;
     Infernal Pluto sways the shades below:
     O'er the wide clouds, and o'er the starry plain
     Ethereal Jove extends his high domain;
     My court beneath the hoary waves I keep,
     And hush the roaring of the sacred deep.

     Iliad, book xviii.

Homer alludes to Poseidon as

     "The god whose liquid arms are hurled
     Around the globs, whose earthquakes rock the world."

Mythology tells us that when the Titans were defeated by Saturn they
retreated into the interior of Spain; Jupiter followed them up, and beat
them for the last time near Tartessus, and thus terminated a ten-years'
war. Here we have a real battle on an actual battle-field.

If we needed any further proof that the empire of the Titans was the
empire of Atlantis, we would find it in the names of the Titans: among
these were Oceanus, Saturn or Chronos, and Atlas; they were all the sons
of Uranos. Oceanus was at the base of the Greek mythology. Plato says
("Dialogues," Timaeus, vol. ii., p. 533): "Oceanus and Tethys were the
children of Earth and Heaven, and from these sprung Phorcys, and
Chronos, and Rhea, and many more with them; and from Chronos and Rhea
sprung Zeus and Hera, and all those whom we know as their brethren, and
others who were their children." In other words, all their gods came out
of the ocean; they were rulers over some ocean realm; Chronos was the
son of Oceanus, and Chronos was an Atlantean god, and from him the
Atlantic Ocean was called by tho ancients "the Chronian Sea." The elder
Minos was called "the Son of the Ocean:" he first gave civilization to
the Cretans; he engraved his laws on brass, precisely as Plato tells us
the laws of Atlantis were engraved on pillars of brass.

The wanderings of Ulysses, as detailed in the "Odyssey" of Homer, are
strangely connected with the Atlantic Ocean. The islands of the
Phoenicians were apparently in mid-ocean:

     We dwell apart, afar
     Within the unmeasured deep, amid its waves
     The most remote of men; no other race
     Hath commerce with us.--Odyssey, book vi.

The description of the Phaeacian walls, harbors, cities, palaces, ships,
etc., seems like a recollection of Atlantis. The island of Calypso
appears also to have been in the Atlantic Ocean, twenty days' sail from
the Phaeacian isles; and when Ulysses goes to the land of Pluto, "the
under-world," the home of the dead, he

     "Reached the far confines of Oceanus,"

beyond the Pillars of Hercules. It would be curious to inquire how far
the poems of Homer are Atlantean in their relations and inspiration.
Ulysses's wanderings were a prolonged struggle with Poseidon, the
founder and god of Atlantis.

"The Hekatoncheires, or Cetimaeni, beings each with a hundred hands,
were three in number--Kottos, Gyges or Gyes, and Briareus--and
represented the frightful crashing of waves, and its resemblance to the
convulsions of earthquakes." (Murray's "Mythology," p. 26.) Are not
these hundred arms the oars of the galleys, and the frightful crashing
of the waves their movements in the water?

"The Kyklopes also were three in number--Brontes, with his thunder;
Steropes, with his lightning; and Arges, with his stream of light. They
were represented as having only one eye, which was placed at the
juncture between the nose and brow. It was, however, a large, flashing
eye, as became beings who were personifications of the storm-cloud, with
its flashes of destructive lightning and peals of thunder."

We shall show hereafter that the invention of gunpowder dates back to
the days of the Phoenicians, and may have been derived by them from
Atlantis. It is not impossible that in this picture of the Kyklopes we
see a tradition of sea-going ships, with a light burning at the prow,
and armed with some explosive preparation, which, with a roar like
thunder, and a flash like lightning, destroyed those against whom it was
employed? It at least requires less strain upon our credulity to suppose
these monsters were a barbarian's memory of great ships than to believe
that human beings ever existed with a hundred arms, and with one eye in
the middle of the forehead, and giving out thunder and lightning.

The natives of the West India Islands regarded the ships of Columbus as
living creatures, and that their sails were wings.

Berosus tells us, speaking of the ancient days of Chaldea, "In the first
year there appeared, from that part of the Erythraean Sea which borders
upon Babylonia, an animal endowed with reason, by name Oannes, whose
whole body (according to the account of Apollodorus) was that of a fish;
that under the fish's head he had another head, with feet also below,
similar to those of a man, subjoined to the fish's tail. His. voice too
and language was articulate and human, and a representation of him is
preserved even unto this day. This being was accustomed to pass the day
among men, but took no food at that season, and he gave them an insight
into letters and arts of all kinds. He taught them to construct cities,
to found temples, to compile laws, and explained to them the principles
of geometrical knowledge. He made them distinguish the seeds of the
earth, and showed them how to collect the fruits; in short, be
instructed them in everything which could tend to soften manners and
humanize their laws. From that time nothing material has been added by
way of improvement to his instructions. And when the sun set, this
being, Oannes, retired again into the sea, and passed the night in the
deep, for he was amphibious. After this there appeared other animals
like Oannes."

This is clearly the tradition preserved by a barbarous people of the
great ships of a civilized nation, who colonized their coast and
introduced the arts and sciences among them. And here we see the same
tendency to represent the ship as a living thing, which converted the
war-vessels of the Atlanteans (the Kyklopes) into men with one blazing
eye in the middle of the forehead.

Uranos was deposed from the throne, and succeeded by his son Chronos. He
was called "the ripener, the harvest-god," and was probably identified
with the beginning of the Agricultural Period. He married his sister
Rhea, who bore him Pluto, Poseidon, Zeus, Hestia, Demeter, and Hera. He
anticipated that his sons would dethrone him, as he had dethroned his
father, Uranos, and he swallowed his first five children, and would have
swallowed the sixth child, Zeus, but that his wife Rhea deceived him
with a stone image of the child; and Zeus was conveyed to the island of
Crete, and there concealed in a cave and raised to manhood. Subsequently
Chronos "yielded back to the light the children he had swallowed." This
myth probably means that Chronos had his children raised in some secret
place, where they could not be used by his enemies as the instruments of
a rebellion against his throne; and the stone image of Zeus, palmed off
upon him by Rhea, was probably some other child substituted for his own.
His precautions seem to have been wise; for as soon as the children
returned to the light they commenced a rebellion, and drove the old
gentleman from his throne. A rebellion of the Titans followed. The
struggle was a tremendous one, and seems to have been decided at last by
the use of gunpowder, as I shall show farther on.

We have seen Chronos identified with the Atlantic, called by the Romans
the "Chronian Sea." He was known to the Romans under the name of Saturn,
and ruled over "a great Saturnian continent" in the Western Ocean.
Saturn, or Chronos, came to Italy: he presented himself to the king,
Janus, "and proceeded to instruct the subjects of the latter in
agriculture, gardening, and many other arts then quite unknown to them;
as, for example, how to tend and cultivate the vine. By such means he at
length raised the people from a rude and comparatively barbarous
condition to one of order and peaceful occupations, in consequence of
which he was everywhere held in high esteem, and, in course of time, was
selected by Janus to share with him the government of the country, which
thereupon assumed the name of Saturnia--'a land of seed and fruit.' The
period of Saturn's government was sung in later days by poets as a happy
time, when sorrows were unknown, when innocence, freedom, and gladness
reigned throughout the land in such a degree as to deserve the title of
the Golden Age." (Murray's "Mythology," p. 32.)

All this accords with Plato's story. He tells us that the rule of the
Atlanteans extended to Italy; that they were a civilized, agricultural,
and commercial people. The civilization of Rome was therefore an
outgrowth directly from the civilization of Atlantis.

The Roman Saturnalia was a remembrance of the Atlantean colonization. It
was a period of joy and festivity; master and slave met as equals; the
distinctions of poverty and wealth were forgotten; no punishments for
crime were inflicted; servants and slaves went about dressed in the
clothes of their masters; and children received presents from their
parents or relatives. It was a time of jollity and mirth, a recollection
of the Golden Age. We find a reminiscence of it in the Roman "Carnival."

The third and last on the throne of the highest god was Zeus. We shall
see him, a little farther on, by the aid of some mysterious engine
overthrowing the rebels, the Titans, who rose against his power, amid
the flash of lightning and the roar of thunder. He was called "the
thunderer," and "the mighty thunderer." He was represented with
thunder-bolts in his hand and an eagle at his feet.

During the time of Zeus Atlantis seems to have reached its greatest
height of power. He was recognized as the father of the whole world; he
everywhere rewarded uprightness, truth, faithfulness, and kindness; be
was merciful to the poor, and punished the cruel. To illustrate his rule
on earth the following story is told:

"Philemon and Baukis, an aged couple of the poorer class, were living
peacefully and full of piety toward the gods in their cottage in
Phrygia, when Zeus, who often visited the earth, disguised, to inquire
into the behavior of men, paid a visit, in passing through Phrygia on
such a journey, to these poor old people, and was received by them very
kindly as a weary traveller, which he pretended to be. Bidding him
welcome to the house, they set about preparing for their guest, who was
accompanied by Hermes, as excellent a meal as they could afford, and for
this purpose were about to kill the only goose they had left, when Zeus
interfered; for he was touched by their kindliness and genuine piety,
and that all the more because be had observed among the other
inhabitants of the district nothing but cruelty of disposition and a
habit of reproaching and despising the gods. To punish this conduct he
determined to visit the country with a flood, but to save from it
Philemon and Baukis, the good aged couple, and to reward them in a
striking manner. To this end he revealed himself to them before opening
the gates of the great flood, transformed their poor cottage on the hill
into a splendid temple, installed the aged pair as his priest and
priestess, and granted their prayer that they might both die together.
When, after many years, death overtook them, they were changed into two
trees, that side by side in the neighborhood--an oak and a linden."
(Murray's "Mythology," p. 38.)

Here we have another reference to the Flood, and another identification
with Atlantis.

Zeus was a kind of Henry VIII., and took to himself a number of wives.
By Demeter (Ceres) he had Persephone (Proserpine); by Leto, Apollo and
Artemis (Diana); by Dione, Aphrodite (Venus); by Semele, Dionysos
(Bacchus); by Maia, Hermes (Mercury); by Alkmene, Hercules, etc., etc.

We have thus the whole family of gods and goddesses traced back to
Atlantis.

Hera, or Juno, was the first and principal wife of Zeus. There were
numerous conjugal rows between the royal pair, in which, say the poets,
Juno was generally to blame. She was naturally jealous of the other
wives of Zeus. Zeus on one occasion beat her, and threw her son
Hephaestos out of Olympus; on another occasion he hung her out of
Olympus with her arms tied and two great weights attached to her feet--a
very brutal and ungentlemanly trick--but the Greeks transposed this into
a beautiful symbol: the two weights, they say, represent the earth and
sea, "an illustration of how all the phenomena of the visible sky were
supposed to hang dependent on the highest god of heaven!" (Ibid., p.
47.) Juno probably regarded the transaction in an altogether different
light; and she therefore United with Poseidon, the king's brother, and
his daughter Athena, in a rebellion to put the old fellow in a
strait-jacket, "and would have succeeded had not Thetis brought to his
aid the sea-giant AEgaeon," probably a war-ship. She seems in the main,
however, to have been a good wife, and was the type of all the womanly
virtues.

Poseidon, the first king of Atlantis, according to Plato, was, according
to Greek mythology, a brother of Zeus, and a son of Chronos. In the
division of the kingdom he fell heir to the ocean and its islands, and
to the navigable rivers; in other words, he was king of a maritime and
commercial people. His symbol was the horse. "He was the first to train
and employ horses;" that is to say, his people first domesticated the
horse. This agrees with what Plato tells us of the importance attached
to the horse in Atlantis, and of the baths and race-courses provided for
him. He was worshipped in the island of Tenos "in the character of a
physician," showing that he represented an advanced civilization. He was
also master of an agricultural people; "the ram with the golden fleece
for which the Argonauts sailed was the offspring of Poseidon." He
carried in his hand a three-pronged symbol, the trident, doubtless an
emblem of the three continents that were embraced in the empire of
Atlantis. He founded many colonies along the shores of the
Mediterranean; "he helped to build the walls of Troy;" the tradition
thus tracing the Trojan civilization to an Atlantean source. He settled
Attica and founded Athens, named after his niece Athena, daughter of
Zeus, who had no mother, but had sprung from the bead of Zeus, which
probably signified that her mother's name was not known--she was a
foundling. Athena caused the first olive-tree to grow on the Acropolis
of Athens, parent of all the olive-trees of Greece. Poseidon seems to
have had settlements at Corinth, AEgina, Naxos, and Delphi. Temples were
erected to his honor in nearly all the seaport towns Of Greece. He sent
a sea-monster, to wit, a slip, to ravage part of the Trojan territory.

In the "Iliad" Poseidon appears "as ruler of the sea, inhabiting a
brilliant palace in its depths, traversing its surface in a chariot, or
stirring the powerful billows until the earth shakes as they crash upon
the shores. . . . He is also associated with well-watered plains and
valleys." (Murray's "Mythology," p, 51.) The palace in the depths of the
sea was the palace upon Olympus in Atlantis; the traversing of the sea
referred to the movements of a mercantile race; the shaking of

                          POSEIDON, OR NEPTUNE.

the earth was an association with earthquakes; the "well-watered plains
and valleys" remind us of the great plain of Atlantis described by Plato.

All the traditions of the coming of civilization into Europe point to
Atlantis.

For instance, Keleos, who lived at Eleusis, near Athens, hospitably
received Demeter, the Greek Ceres, the daughter of Poseidon, when she
landed; and in return she taught him the use of the plough, and
presented his son with the seed of barley, and sent him out to teach
mankind bow to sow and utilize that grain. Dionysos, grandson of
Poseidon, travelled "through all the known world, even into the remotest
parts of India, instructing the people, as be proceeded, how to tend the
vine, and how to practise many other arts of peace, besides teaching
them the value of just and honorable dealings." (Murray's "Mythology,"
p. 119.) The Greeks celebrated great festivals in his honor down to the
coming of Christianity.

"The Nymphs of Grecian mythology were a kind of middle beings between
the gods and men, communicating with both, loved and respected by both;
. . . living like the gods on ambrosia. In extraordinary cases they were
summoned, it was believed, to the councils of the Olympian gods; but
they usually remained in their particular spheres, in secluded grottoes
and peaceful valleys, occupied in spinning, weaving, bathing, singing
sweet songs, dancing, sporting, or accompanying deities who passed
through their territories--hunting with Artemis (Diana), rushing about
with Dionysos (Bacchus), making merry with Apollo or Hermes (Mercury),
but always in a hostile attitude toward the wanton and excited Satyrs."

The Nymphs were plainly the female inhabitants of Atlantis dwelling on
the plains, while the aristocracy lived on the higher lands. And this is
confirmed by the fact that part of them were called Atlantids, offspring
of Atlantis. The Hesperides were also "daughters of Atlas;" their mother
was Hesperis, a personification of "the region of the West." Their home
was "an island in the ocean," Off the north or west coast of Africa.

And here we find a tradition which not only points to Atlantis, but also
shows some kinship to the legend in Genesis of the tree and the serpent.

Titaea, "a goddess of the earth," gave Zeus a tree bearing golden apples
on it. This tree was put in the care of the Hesperides, but they could
not resist the temptation to pluck and eat its fruit; thereupon a
serpent named Ladon was put to watch the tree. Hercules slew the
serpent, and gave the apples to the Hesperides.

Heracles (Hercules), we have seen, was a son of Zeus, king of Atlantis.
One of his twelve labors (the tenth) was the carrying off the cattle of
Geryon. The meaning of Geryon is "the red glow of the sunset." He dwelt
on the island of "Erythea, in the remote west, beyond the Pillars of
Hercules." Hercules took a ship, and after encountering a storm, reached
the island and placed himself on Mount Abas. Hercules killed Geryon,
stole the cattle, put them on the ship, and landed them safely, driving
them "through Iberia, Gaul, and over the Alps down into Italy."
(Murray's "Mythology," p. 257.) This was simply the memory of a cattle
raid made by an uncivilized race upon the civilized, cattle-raising
people of Atlantis.

It is not necessary to pursue the study of the gods of Greece any
farther. They were simply barbarian recollections of the rulers of a
great civilized people who in early days visited their shores, and
brought with them the arts of peace.

Here then, in conclusion, are the proofs of our proposition that the
gods of Greece had been the kings of Atlantis:

1. They were not the makers, but the rulers of the world.

2. They were human in their attributes; they loved, sinned, and fought
battles, the very sites of which are given; they founded cities, and
civilized the people of the shores of the Mediterranean.

3. They dwelt upon an island in the Atlantic," in the remote west. . . .
where the sun shines after it has ceased to shine on Greece."

4. Their land was destroyed in a deluge.

5. They were ruled over by Poseidon and Atlas.

6. Their empire extended to Egypt and Italy and the shores of Africa,
precisely as stated by Plato.

7. They existed during the Bronze Age and at the beginning of the Iron
Age.

The entire Greek mythology is the recollection, by a degenerate race, of
a vast, mighty, and highly civilized empire, which in a remote past
covered large parts of Europe, Asia, Africa, and America.

CHAPTER III.

THE GODS OF THE PHOENICIANS ALSO KINGS OF ATLANTIS.

Not alone were the gods of the Greeks the deified kings of Atlantis, but
we find that the mythology of the Phoenicians was drawn from the same
source.

For instance, we find in the Phoenician cosmogony that the Titans
(Rephaim) derive their origin from the Phoenician gods Agrus and
Agrotus. This connects the Phoenicians with that island in the remote
west, in the midst of ocean, where, according to the Greeks, the Titans
dwelt.

According to Sanchoniathon, Ouranos was the son of Autochthon, and,
according to Plato, Autochthon was one of the ten kings of Atlantis. He
married his sister Ge. He is the Uranos of the Greeks, who was the son
of Gaea (the earth), whom he married. The Phoenicians tell us, "Ouranos
had by Ge four sons: Ilus (El), who is called Chronos, and Betylus
(Beth-El), and Dagon, which signifies bread-corn, and Atlas (Tammuz?)."
Here, again, we have the names of two other kings of Atlantis. These
four sons probably represented four races, the offspring of the earth.
The Greek Uranos was the father of Chronos, and the ancestor of Atlas.
The Phoenician god Ouranos had a great many other wives: his wife Ge was
jealous; they quarrelled, and he attempted to kill the children he had
by her. This is the legend which the Greeks told of Zeus and Juno. In
the Phoenician mythology Chronos raised a rebellion against Ouranos,
and, after a great battle, dethroned him. In the Greek legends it is
Zeus who attacks and overthrows his father, Chronos. Ouranos had a
daughter called Astarte (Ashtoreth), another called Rhea. "And Dagon,
after he had found out bread-corn and the plough, was called
Zeus-Arotrius."

We find also, in the Phoenician legends, mention made of Poseidon,
founder and king of Atlantis.

Chronos gave Attica to his daughter Athena, as in the Greek legends. In
a time of plague be sacrificed his son to Ouranos, and "circumcised
himself, and compelled his allies to do the same thing." It would thus
appear that this singular rite, practised as we have seen by the
Atlantidae of the Old and New Worlds, the Egyptians, the Phoenicians,
the Hebrews, the Ethiopians, the Mexicans, and the red men of America,
dates back, as we might have expected, to Atlantis.

"Chronos visits the different regions of the habitable world."

He gave Egypt as a kingdom to the god Taaut, who had invented the
alphabet. The Egyptians called him Thoth, and he was represented among
them as "the god of letters, the clerk of the under-world," bearing a
tablet, pen, and palm-branch.

This not only connects the Phoenicians with Atlantis, but shows the
relations of Egyptian civilization to both Atlantis and the Phoenicians.

There can be no doubt that the royal personages who formed the gods of
Greece were also the gods of the Phoenicians. We have seen the
Autochthon of Plato reappearing in the Autochthon of the Phoenicians;
the Atlas of Plato in the Atlas of the Phoenicians; the Poseidon of
Plato in the Poseidon of the Phoenicians; while the kings Mestor and
Mneseus of Plato are probably the gods Misor and Amynus of the
Phoenicians.

Sanchoniathon tells us, after narrating all the discoveries by which the
people advanced to civilization, that the Cabiri set down their records
of the past by the command of the god Taaut, "and they delivered them to
their successors and to foreigners, of whom one was Isiris (Osiris), the
inventor of the three letters, the brother of Chua, who is called the
first Phoenician." (Lenormant and Chevallier, "Ancient History of the
East," vol. ii., p. 228.)

This would show that the first Phoenician came long after this line of
the kings or gods, and that he was a foreigner, as compared with them;
and, therefore, that it could not have been the Phoenicians proper who
made the several inventions narrated by Sanchoniathon, but some other
race, from whom the Phoenicians might have been descended.

And in the delivery of their records to the foreigner Osiris, the god of
Egypt, we have another evidence that Egypt derived her civilization from
Atlantis.

Max Mueller says:

"The Semitic languages also are all varieties of one form of speech.
Though we do not know that primitive language from which the Semitic
dialects diverged, yet we know that at one time such language must have
existed. . . . We cannot derive Hebrew from Sanscrit, or Sanscrit from
Hebrew; but we can well understand bow both may have proceeded from one
common source. They are both channels supplied from one river, and they
carry, though not always on the surface, floating materials of language
which challenge comparison, and have already yielded satisfactory
results to careful analyzers." ("Outlines of Philosophy of History,"
vol. i., p. 475.)

There was an ancient tradition among the Persians that the Phoenicians
migrated from the shores of the Erythraean Sea, and this has been
supposed to mean the Persian Gulf; but there was a very old city of
Erythia, in utter ruin in the time of Strabo, which was built in some
ancient age, long before the founding of Gades, near the site of that
town, on the Atlantic coast of Spain. May not this town of Erythia have
given its name to the adjacent sea? And this may have been the
starting-point of the Phoenicians in their European migrations. It would
even appear that there was an island of Erythea. In the Greek mythology
the tenth labor of Hercules consisted in driving away the cattle of
Geryon, who lived in the island of Erythea, "an island somewhere in the
remote west, beyond the Pillars of Hercules." (Murray's "Mythology," p.
257.) Hercules stole the cattle from this remote oceanic island, and,
returning drove them "through Iberia, Gaul, over the Alps, and through
Italy." (Ibid.) It is probable that a people emigrating from the
Erythraean Sea, that is, from the Atlantic, first gave their name to a
town on the coast of Spain, and at a later date to the Persian Gulf--as
we have seen the name of York carried from England to the banks of the
Hudson, and then to the Arctic Circle.

The builders of the Central American cities are reported to have been a
bearded race. The Phoenicians, in common with the Indians, practised
human sacrifices to a great extent; they worshipped fire and water,
adopted the names of the animals whose skins they wore--that is to say,
they had the totemic system--telegraphed by means of fires, poisoned
their arrows, offered peace before beginning battle, and used drums.
(Bancroft's "Native Races," vol. v., p. 77.)

The extent of country covered by the commerce of the Phoenicians
represents to some degree the area of the old Atlantean Empire. Their
colonies and trading-posts extended east and west from the shores of the
Black Sea, through the Mediterranean to the west coast of Africa and of
Spain, and around to Ireland and England; while from north to south they
ranged from the Baltic to the Persian Gulf. They touched every point
where civilization in later ages made its appearance. Strabo estimated
that they had three hundred cities along the west coast of Africa. When
Columbus sailed to discover a new world, or re-discover an old one, he
took his departure from a Phoenician seaport, founded by that great race
two thousand five hundred years previously. This Atlantean sailor, with
his Phoenician features, sailing from an Atlantean port, simply
re-opened the path of commerce and colonization which had been closed
when Plato's island sunk in the sea. And it is a curious fact that
Columbus had the antediluvian world in his mind's eye even then, for
when he reached the mouth of the Orinoco he thought it was the river
Gihon, that flowed out of Paradise, and he wrote home to Spain, "There
are here great indications suggesting the proximity of the earthly
Paradise, for not only does it correspond in mathematical position with
the opinions of the holy and learned theologians, but all other signs
concur to make it probable."

Sanchoniathon claims that the learning of Egypt, Greece, and Judaea was
derived from the Phoenicians. It would appear probable that, while other
races represent the conquests or colonizations of Atlantis, the
Phoenicians succeeded to their arts, sciences, and especially their
commercial supremacy; and hence the close resemblances which we have
found to exist between the Hebrews, a branch of the Phoenician stock,
and the people of America.

     Upon the Syrian sea the people live
     Who style themselves Phoenicians. . . .
     These were the first great founders of the world--
     Founders of cities and of mighty states--
     Who showed a path through seas before unknown.
     In the first ages, when the sons of men
     Knew not which way to turn them, they assigned
     To each his first department; they bestowed
     Of land a portion and of sea a lot,
     And sent each wandering tribe far off to share
     A different soil and climate. Hence arose
     The great diversity, so plainly seen,
     'Mid nations widely severed.

     Dyonysius of Susiana, A.D. 3,

CHAPTER IV.

THE GOD ODIN, WODEN, OR WOTAN.

In the Scandinavian mythology the chief god was Odin, the Woden, Wotan,
or Wuotan of the Germans. He is represented with many of the attributes
of the Greek god Zeus, and is supposed by some to be identical with him.
He dwelt with the twelve AEsir, or gods, upon Asgard, the Norse Olympus,
which arose out of Midgard, a land half-way between the regions of frost
and fire (to wit, in a temperate climate). The Scandinavian Olympus was
probably Atlantis. Odin is represented as a grave-looking elderly man
with a long beard, carrying in his hand a spear, and accompanied by two
dogs and two ravens. He was the father of poetry, and the inventor of
Runic writing.

The Chiapenese of Central America (the people whose language we have
seen furnishing such remarkable resemblances to Hebrew) claim to have
been the first people of the New World. Clavigero tells us ("Hist.
Antiq. del Messico," Eng. trans., 1807, vol. i.) that according to the
traditions of the Chiapenese there was a Votan who was the grandson of
the man who built the ark to save himself and family from the Deluge; he
was one of those who undertook to build the tower that should reach to
heaven., The Lord ordered him to people America. "He came from the
East." He brought seven families with him. He had been preceded in
America by two others, Igh and Imox. He built a great city in America
called "Nachan," City of the Serpents (the serpent that tempted Eve was
Nahash), from his own race, which was named Chan, a serpent. This Nachan
is supposed to have been Palenque. The date of his journey is placed in
the legends in the year 3000 of the world, and in the tenth century B.C.
He also founded three tributary monarchies, whose capitals were Tulan,
Mayapan, and Chiquimala. He wrote a book containing a history of his
deeds, and proofs that he belonged to the tribe of Chanes (serpents). He
states that "he is the third of the Votans; that he conducted seven
families from Valum-Votan to this continent, and assigned lands to them;
that be determined to travel until he came to the root of heaven and
found his relations, the Culebres, and made himself known to them; that
he accordingly made four voyages to Chivim; that he arrived in Spain;
that he went to Rome; that he saw the house of God building; that be
went by the road which his brethren, the Culebres, had bored; that he
marked it, and that he passed by the houses of the thirteen Culebres. He
relates that, in returning from one of his voyages, he found seven other
families of the Tzequil nation who had joined the first inhabitants, and
recognized in them the same origin as his own, that is, of the Culebres;
he speaks of the place where they built the first town, which from its
founders received the name of Tzequil; he affirms that, having taught
them the refinement of manners in the use of the table, table-cloths,
dishes, basins, cups, and napkins, they taught him the knowledge of God
and his worship; his first ideas of a king, and obedience to him; that
he was chosen captain of all these united families."

It is probable that Spain and Rome are interpolations. Cabrera claims
that the Votanites were Carthaginians. He thinks the Chivim of Votan
were the Hivim, or Givim, who were descended of Heth, son of Canaan,
Phoenicians; they were the builders of Accaron, Azotus, Ascalon, and
Gaza. The Scriptures refer to them as Hivites (Givim) in Deuteronomy
(chap. ii., verse 32), and Joshua (chap. xiii., verse 4). He claims that
Cadmus and his wife Hermione were of this stock; and according to Ovid
they were metamorphosed into snakes (Culebres). The name Hivites in
Phoenician signifies a snake.

Votan may not, possibly, have passed into Europe; be may have travelled
altogether in Africa. His singular allusion to "a way which the Culebres
had bored" seems at first inexplicable; but Dr. Livingstone's last
letters, published 8th November, 1869, in the "Proceedings of the Royal
Geographical Society," mention that "tribes live in underground houses
in Rua. Some excavations are said to be thirty miles long, and have
running rills in them; a whole district can stand a siege in them. The
'writings' therein, I have been told by some of the people, are drawings
of animals, and not letters; otherwise I should have gone to see them.
People very dark, well made, and outer angle of eyes slanting inward."

And Captain Grant, who accompanied Captain Speke in his famous
exploration of the sources of the Nile, tells of a tunnel or subway
under the river Kaoma, on the highway between Loowemba and Marunga, near
Lake Tanganyika. His guide Manua describes it to him:

"I asked Manua if he had ever seen any country resembling it. His reply
was, 'This country reminds me of what I saw in the country to the south
of the Lake Tanganyika, when travelling with an Arab's caravan from
Unjanyembeh. There is a river there called the Kaoma, running into the
lake, the sides of which are similar in precipitousness to the rocks
before us.' I then asked, 'Do the people cross this river in boats?'
'No; they have no boats; and even if they had, the people could not
land, as the sides are too steep: they pass underneath the river by a
natural tunnel, or subway.' He and all his party went through it on
their way from Loowemba to Ooroongoo, and returned by it. He described
its length as having taken them from sunrise till noon to pass through
it, and so high that, if mounted upon camels, they could not touch the
top. Tall reeds, the thickness of a walking-stick, grew inside, the road
was strewed with white pebbles, and so wide--four hundred yards--that
they could see their way tolerably well while passing through it. The
rocks looked as if they had been planed by artificial means. Water never
came through from the river overhead; it was procured by digging wells.
Manua added that the people of Wambweh take shelter in this tunnel, and
live there with their families and cattle, when molested by the Watuta,
a warlike race, descended from the Zooloo Kafirs.

But it is interesting to find in this book of Votan, however little
reliance we may place in its dates or details, evidence that there was
actual intercourse between the Old World and the New in remote ages.

Humboldt remarks:

"We have fixed the special attention of our readers upon this Votan, or
Wodan, an American who appears of the same family with the Wods or Odins
of the Goths and of the people of Celtic origin. Since, according to the
learned researches of Sir William Jones, Odin and Buddha are probably
the same person, it is curious to see the names of Bondvar, Wodansday,
and Votan designating in India, Scandinavia, and in Mexico the day of a
brief period." ("Vues des Cordilleras," p. 148, ed. 1810.)

There are many things to connect the mythology of the Gothic nations
with Atlantis; they had, as we have seen, flood legends; their gods
Krodo and Satar were the Chronos and Saturn of Atlantis; their Baal was
the Bel of the Phoenicians, who were closely connected with Poseidon and
Atlas; and, as we shall see hereafter, their language has a distinct
relationship with the tongues of the Arabians, Cushites, Chaldeans, and
Phoenicians.

CHAPTER V.

THE PYRAMID, THE CROSS, AND THE GARDEN OF EDEN.

No fact is better established than the reverence shown to the sign of
the Cross in all the ages prior to Christianity. We cannot do better
than quote from an able article in the Edinburgh Review of July, 1870,
upon this question:

"From the dawn of organized Paganism in the Eastern world to the final
establishment of Christianity in the Western, the Cross was undoubtedly
one of the commonest and most sacred of symbolical monuments; and, to a
remarkable extent, it is so still in almost every land where that of
Calvary is unrecognized or unknown. Apart from any distinctions of
social or intellectual superiority, of caste, color, nationality, or
location in either hemisphere, it appears to have been the aboriginal
possession of every people in antiquity--the elastic girdle, so to say,
which embraced the most widely separated heathen communities--the most
significant token of a universal brotherhood, to which all the families
of mankind were severally and irresistibly drawn, and by which their
common descent was emphatically expressed, or by means of which each and
all preserved, amid every vicissitude of fortune, a knowledge of the
primeval happiness and dignity of their species. Where authentic history
is silent on the subject, the material relics of past and long since
forgotten races are not wanting to confirm and strengthen this
supposition. Diversified forms of the symbol are delineated more or less
artistically, according to the progress achieved in civilization at the
period, on the ruined walls of temples and palaces, on natural rocks and
sepulchral galleries, on the hoariest monoliths and the rudest statuary;
on coins, medals, and vases of every description; and, in not a few
instances, are preserved in the architectural proportions of
subterranean as well as superterranean structures, of tumuli as well as
fanes. The extraordinary sanctity attaching to the symbol, in every age
and under every variety of circumstance, justified any expenditure
incurred in its fabrication or embellishment; hence the most persistent
labor, the most consummate ingenuity, were lavished upon it. Populations
of essentially different culture, tastes, and pursuits--the
highly-civilized and the demi-civilized, the settled and nomadic--vied
with each other in their efforts to extend the knowledge of its
exceptional import and virtue among their latest posterities. The
marvellous rock-hewn caves of Elephanta and Ellora, and the stately
temples of Mathura and Terputty, in the East, may be cited as
characteristic examples of one laborious method of exhibiting it; and
the megalithic structures of Callernish and Newgrange, in the West, of
another; while a third may be instanced. in the great temple at Mitzla,
'the City of the Moon,' in Ojaaca, Central America. also excavated in
the living rock, and manifesting the same stupendous labor and ingenuity
as are observable in the cognate caverns of Salsette--of endeavors, we
repeat, made by peoples as intellectually as geographically distinct,
and followers withal of independent and unassociated deities, to magnify
and perpetuate some grand primeval symbol. . . .

"Of the several varieties of the Cross still in vogue, as national or
ecclesiastical emblems, in this and other European states, and
distinguished by the familiar appellations of St. George, St. Andrew,
the Maltese, the Greek, the Latin, etc., etc., there is not one among
them the existence of which may not be traced to the remotest antiquity.
They were the common property of the Eastern nations. No revolution or
other casualty has wrought any perceptible difference in their several
forms or delineations; they have passed from one hemisphere to the other
intact; have survived dynasties, empires, and races; have been borne on
the crest of each successive wave of Aryan population in its course
toward the West; and, having been reconsecrated in later times by their
lineal descendants, are still recognized as military and national badges
of distinction. . . .

Among the earliest known types is the crux ansata, vulgarly called 'the
key of the Nile,' because of its being found sculptured or otherwise
represented so frequently upon Egyptian and Coptic monuments. It has,
however, a very much older and more sacred signification than this. It
was the symbol of symbols, the mystical Tau, 'the bidden wisdom,' not
only of the ancient Egyptians but also of the Chaldeans, Phoenicians,
Mexicans, Peruvians, and of every other ancient people commemorated in
history, in either hemisphere, and is formed very similarly to our
letter T, with a roundlet, or oval, placed immediately above it. Thus it
was figured on the gigantic emerald or glass statue of Serapis, which
was transported (293 B.C.) by order of Ptolemy Soter from Sinope, on the
southern shores of the Black Sea, re-erected within that famous
labyrinth which encompassed the banks of Lake Moeris, and destroyed by
the victorious army of Theodosius (A.D. 389), despite the earnest
entreaties of the Egyptian priesthood to spare it, because it was the
emblem of their god and of 'the life to come.' Sometimes, as may be seen
on the breast of an Egyptian mummy in the museum of the London
University, the simple T only is planted on the frustum of a cone; and
sometimes it is represented as springing from a heart; in the first
instance signifying goodness; in the second, hope or expectation of
reward. As in the oldest temples and catacombs of Egypt, so this type
likewise abounds in the ruined cities of Mexico and Central America,
graven as well upon the most ancient cyclopean and polygonal walls as
upon the more modern and perfect examples of masonry; and is displayed
in an equally conspicuous manner upon the breasts of innumerable bronze
statuettes which have been recently disinterred from the cemetery of
Juigalpa (of unknown antiquity) in Nicaragua."

When the Spanish missionaries first set foot upon the soil of America,
in the fifteenth century, they were amazed to find the Cross was as
devoutly worshipped by the red Indians as by themselves, and were in
doubt whether to ascribe the fact to the pious labors of St. Thomas or
to the cunning device of the Evil One. The hallowed symbol challenged
their attention on every hand and in almost every variety of form. It
appeared on the bass-reliefs of ruined and deserted as well as on those
of inhabited palaces, and was the most conspicuous ornament in the great
temple of Gozumel, off the coast of Yucatan. According to the particular
locality, and the purpose which it served, it was formed of various
materials--of marble and gypsum in the open spaces of cities and by the
way-side; of wood in the teocallis or chapels on pyramidal summits and
in subterranean sanctuaries; and of emerald or jasper in the palaces of
kings and nobles.

When we ask the question how it comes that the sign of the Cross has
thus been reverenced. from the highest antiquity by the races of the Old
and New Worlds, we learn that it is a reminiscence of the Garden of
Eden, in other words, of Atlantis.

Professor Hardwicke says:

"All these and similar traditions are but mocking satires of the old
Hebrew story--jarred and broken notes of the same strain; but with all
their exaggerations they intimate how in the background of man's vision
lay a paradise of holy joy--a paradise secured from every kind of
profanation, and made inaccessible to the guilty; a paradise full of
objects that were calculated to delight the senses and to elevate the
mind a paradise that granted to its tenant rich and rare immunities, and
that fed with its perennial streams the tree of life and immortality."

To quote again from the writer in the Edinburgh Review, already cited;

"Its undoubted antiquity, no less than its extraordinary diffusion,
evidences that it must have been, as it may be said to be still in
unchristianized lands, emblematical of some fundamental doctrine or
mystery. The reader will not have failed to observe that it is most
usually associated with water; it was 'the key of the Nile,' that
mystical instrument by means of which, in the popular judgment of his
Egyptian devotees, Osiris produced the annual revivifying inundations of
the sacred stream; it is discernible in that mysterious pitcher or vase
portrayed on the brazen table of Bembus, before-mentioned, with its four
lips discharging as many streams of water in opposite directions; it was
the emblem of the water-deities of the Babylonians in the East and of
the Gothic nations in the West, as well as that of the rain-deities
respectively of the mixed population in America. We have seen with what
peculiar rites the symbol was honored by those widely separated races in
the western hemisphere; and the monumental slabs of Nineveh, now in the
museums of London and Paris, show us how it was similarly honored by the
successors of the Chaldees in the eastern. . . .

              ANCIENT IRISH CROSS--PRE-CHRISTIAN--KILNABOY.

"In Egypt, Assyria, and Britain it was emblematical of creative power
and eternity; in India, China, and Scandinavia, of heaven and
immortality; in the two Americas, of rejuvenescence and freedom from
physical suffering; while in both hemispheres it was the common symbol
of the resurrection, or 'the sign of the life to come;' and, finally, in
all heathen communities, without exception, it was the emphatic type,
the sole enduring evidence, of the Divine Unity. This circumstance alone
determines its extreme antiquity--an antiquity, in all likelihood, long
antecedent to the foundation of either of the three great systems of
religion in the East. And, lastly, we have seen how, as a rule, it is
found in conjunction with a stream or streams of water, with exuberant
vegetation, and with a bill or a mountainous region--in a word, with a
land of beauty, fertility, and joy. Thus it was expressed upon those
circular and sacred cakes of the Egyptians, composed of the richest
materials-of flour, of honey, of milk--and with which the serpent and
bull, as well as other reptiles and beasts consecrated to the service of
Isis and their higher divinities, were daily fed; and upon certain
festivals were eaten with extraordinary ceremony by the people and their
priests. 'The cross-cake,' says Sir Gardner Wilkinson, 'was their
hieroglyph for civilized land;' obviously a land superior to their own,
as it was, indeed, to all other mundane territories; for it was that
distant, traditional country of sempiternal contentment and repose, of
exquisite delight and serenity, where Nature, unassisted by man,
produces all that is necessary for his sustentation."

And this land was the Garden of Eden of our race. This was the Olympus
of the Greeks, where

     "This same mild season gives the blooms to blow,
     The buds to harden and the fruits to grow."

In the midst of it was a sacred and glorious eminence--the umbilicus
orbis terrarum--"toward which the heathen in all parts of the world, and
in all ages, turned a wistful gaze in every act of devotion, and to
which they hoped to be admitted, or, rather, to be restored, at the
close of this transitory scene."

In this "glorious eminence" do we not see Plato's mountain in the middle
of Atlantis, as he describes it:

"Near the plain and in the centre of the island there was a mountain,
not very high on any side. In this mountain there dwelt one of the
earth-born primeval men of that country, whose name was Evenor, and he
had a wife named Leucippe, and they had an only daughter, who was named
Cleito. Poseidon married her. He enclosed the hill in which she dwelt
all around, making alternate zones of sea and land, larger and smaller,
encircling one another; there were two of land and three of water . . .
so that no man could get to the island. . . . He brought streams of
water under the earth to this mountain-island, and made all manner of
food to grow upon it. This island became the seat of Atlas, the
over-king of the whole island; upon it they built the great temple of
their nation; they continued to ornament it in successive generations,
every king surpassing the one who came before him to the utmost of his
power, until they made the building a marvel to behold for size and
beauty. . . . And they had such an amount of wealth as was never before
possessed by kings and potentates--as is not likely ever to be again."

The gardens of Alcinous and Laertes, of which we read in Homeric song,
and those of Babylon, were probably transcripts of Atlantis. "The sacred
eminence in the midst of a 'superabundant, happy region figures more or
less distinctly in almost every mythology, ancient or modern. It was the
Mesomphalos of the earlier Greeks, and the Omphalium of the Cretans,
dominating the Elysian fields, upon whose tops, bathed in pure,
brilliant, incomparable light, the gods passed their days in ceaseless
joys."

"The Buddhists and Brahmans, who together constitute nearly half the
population of the world, tell us that the decussated figure (the cross),
whether in a simple or a complex form, symbolizes the traditional happy
abode of their primeval ancestors--that 'Paradise of Eden toward the
East,' as we find expressed in the Hebrew. And, let us ask, what better
picture, or more significant characters, in the complicated alphabet of
symbolism, could have been selected for the purpose than a circle and a
cross: the one to denote a region of absolute purity and perpetual
felicity; the other, those four perennial streams that divided and
watered the several quarters of it?" (Edinburgh Review, January, 1870.)

And when we turn to the mythology of the Greeks, we find that the origin
of the world was ascribed to Okeanos, the ocean, The world was at first
an island surrounded by the ocean, as by a great stream:

"It was a region of wonders of all kinds; Okeanos lived there with his
wife Tethys: these were the Islands of the Blessed, the gardens of the
gods, the sources of nectar and ambrosia, on which the gods lived.
Within this circle of water the earth lay spread out like a disk, with
mountains rising from it, and the vault of heaven appearing to rest upon
its outer edge all around." (Murray's "Manual of Mythology," pp. 23, 24,
et seq.)

On the mountains dwelt the gods; they had palaces on these mountains,
with store-rooms, stabling, etc.

"The Gardens of the Hesperides, with their golden apples, were believed
to exist in some island of the ocean, or, as it was sometimes thought,
in the islands off the north or west coast of Africa. They were far
famed in antiquity; for it was there that springs of nectar flowed by
the couch of Zeus, and there that the earth displayed the rarest
blessings of the gods; it was another Eden." (Ibid., p. 156.)

Homer described it in these words:

     "Stern winter smiles on that auspicious clime,
     The fields are florid with unfading prime,
     From the bleak pole no winds inclement blow.
     Mould the round hail, or flake the fleecy snow;
     But from the breezy deep the blessed inhale
     The fragrant murmurs of the western gale."

"It was the sacred Asgard of the Scandinavians, springing from the
centre of a fruitful land, which was watered by four primeval rivers of
milk, severally flowing in the direction of the cardinal points, 'the
abode of happiness, and the height of bliss.' It is the Tien-Chan, 'the
celestial mountain-land, . . . the enchanted gardens' of the Chinese and
Tartars, watered by the four perennial fountains of Tychin, or
Immortality; it is the hill-encompassed Ila of the Singhalese and
Thibetians, 'the everlasting dwelling-place of the wise and just.' It is
the Sineru of the Buddhist, on the summit of which is Tawrutisa, the
habitation of Sekra, the supreme god, from which proceed the four sacred
streams, running in as many contrary directions.

It is the Slavratta, 'the celestial earth,' of the Hindoo, the summit of
his golden mountain Meru, the city of Brahma, in the centre of
Jambadwipa, and from the four sides of which gush forth the four
primeval rivers, reflecting in their passage the colorific glories of
their source, and severally flowing northward, southward, eastward, and
westward."

It is the Garden of Eden of the Hebrews:

"And the Lord God planted a garden eastward in Eden; and there he put
the man whom he had formed. And out of the ground made the Lord God to
grow every tree that is pleasant to the sight, and good for food; the
tree of life also in the midst of the garden, and the tree of knowledge
of good and evil. And a river went out of Eden to water the garden; and
from thence it was parted, and became into four heads. The name of the
first is Pison; that is it which compasseth the whole land of Havilah,
where there is gold; and the gold of that land is good: there is
bdellium and the onyx stone. And the name of the second river is Gihon:
the same is it that compasseth the whole land of Ethiopia. And the name
of the third river is Hiddekel: that is it which goeth toward the east
of Assyria. And the fourth river is Euphrates. And the Lord God took the
man and put him into the Garden of Eden to dress it and to keep it."
(Gen. ii., 8-1-5.)

As the four rivers named in Genesis are not branches of any one stream,
and head in very different regions, it is evident that there was an
attempt, on the part of the writer of the Book, to adapt an ancient
tradition concerning another country to the known features of the region
in which be dwelt.

Josephus tells us (chap. i., p. 41), "Now the garden (of Eden) was
watered by one river, which ran round about the whole earth, and was
parted into four parts." Here in the four parts we see the origin of the
Cross, while in the river running around the whole earth we have the
wonderful canal of Atlantis, described by Plato, which was "carried
around the whole of the plain," and received the streams which came down
from the mountains. The streams named by Josephus would seem to
represent the migrations of people from Atlantis to its colonies.
"Phison," he tells us, "denotes a multitude; it ran into India; the
Euphrates and Tigris go down into the Red Sea while the Geon runs
through Egypt."

We are further told (chap. ii., p. 42) that when Cain, after the murder
of. Abel, left the land of Adam, "he travelled over many countries"
before be reached the land of Nod; and the land of Nod was to the
eastward of Adam's home. In other words, the original seat of mankind
was in the West, that is to say, in the direction of Atlantis. Wilson
tells us that the Aryans of India believed that they originally came
"from the West." Thus the nations on the west of the Atlantic look to
the east for their place of origin; while on the east of the Atlantic
they look to the west: thus all the lines of tradition converge upon
Atlantis.

But here is the same testimony that in the Garden of Eden there were
four rivers radiating from one parent stream. And these four rivers, as
we have seen, we find in the Scandinavian traditions, and in the legends
of the Chinese, the Tartars, the Singhalese, the Thibetians, the
Buddhists, the Hebrews, and the Brahmans.

And not only do we find this tradition of the Garden of Eden in the Old
World, but it meets us also among the civilized races of America. The
elder Montezuma said to Cortez, "Our fathers dwelt in that happy and
prosperous place which they called Aztlan, which means whiteness. . . .
In this place there is a great mountain in the middle of the water which
is called Culhuacan, because it has the point somewhat turned over
toward the bottom; and for this cause it is called Culhuacan, which
means 'crooked mountain.'" He then proceeds to describe the charms of
this favored land, abounding in birds, game, fish, trees, "fountains
enclosed with elders and junipers, and alder-trees both large and
beautiful." The people planted "maize, red peppers, tomatoes, beans, and
all kinds of plants, in furrows."

Here we have the same mountain in the midst of the water which Plato
describes--the same mountain to which all the legends of the most
ancient races of Europe refer.

The inhabitants of Aztlan were boatmen. (Bancroft's "Native Races," vol.
v., p. 325.) E. G. Squier, in his "Notes on Central America," p. 349,
says, "It is a significant fact that in the map of their migrations,
presented by Gemelli, the place of the origin of the Aztecs is
designated by the sign of water, Atl standing for Atzlan, a pyramidal
temple with grades, and near these a palm-tree." This circumstance did
not escape the attention of Humboldt, who says, "I am astonished at
finding a palm-tree near this teocalli. This tree certainly does not
indicate a northern origin. . . . The possibility that an unskilful
artist should unintentionally represent a tree of which he had no
knowledge is so great, that any argument dependent on it hangs upon a
slender thread." ("North Americans of Antiquity," p. 266.)

The Miztecs, a tribe dwelling on the outskirts of Mexico, had a
tradition that the gods, "in the day of obscurity and darkness," built
"a sumptuous palace, a masterpiece of skill, in which they male their
abode upon a mountain. The rock was called 'The Place of Heaven;' there
the gods first abode on earth, living many years in great rest and
content, as in a happy and delicious land, though the world still lay in
obscurity and darkness. The children of these gods made to themselves a
garden, in which they put many trees, and fruit-trees, and flowers, and
roses, and odorous herbs. Subsequently there came a great deluge, in
which many of the sons and daughters of the gods perished." (Bancroft's
"Native Races," vol. iii., p. 71.) Here we have a distinct reference to
Olympus, the Garden of Plato, and the destruction of Atlantis.

And in Plato's account of Atlantis we have another description of the
Garden of Eden and the Golden Age of the world:

"Also, whatever fragrant things there are in the earth, whether roots,
or herbage, or woods, or distilling drops of flowers and fruits, grew
and thrived in that land; and again the cultivated fruits of the earth,
both the edible fruits and other species of food which we call by the
name of legumes, and the fruits having a hard rind, affording drinks and
meats and ointments . . . all these that sacred island, lying beneath
the sun, brought forth in abundance. . . . For many generations, as long
as the divine nature lasted in them, they were obedient to the laws, and
well affectioned toward the gods, who were their kinsmen; for they
possessed true and in every way great spirits, practising gentleness and
wisdom in the various chances of life, and in their intercourse with one
another. They despised everything but virtue, not caring for their
present state of life, and thinking lightly of the possession of gold
and other property, which seemed only a burden to them; neither were
they intoxicated by luxury; nor did wealth deprive them of their
self-control; but they were sober, and saw clearly that all these goods
were increased by virtuous friendship with one another, and that by
excessive zeal for them, and honor of them, the good of them is lost,
and friendship perishes with them."

All this cannot be a mere coincidence; it points to a common tradition
of a veritable land, where four rivers flowed down in opposite
directions from a central mountain-peak. And these four rivers, flowing
to the north, south, east, and west, constitute the origin of that sign
of the Cross which we have seen meeting us at every point among the
races who were either descended from the people of Atlantis, or who, by
commerce and colonization, received their opinions and civilization from
them.

Let us look at the question of the identity of the Garden of Eden with
Atlantis from another point of view:

If the alphabet of the Phoenicians is kindred with the Maya alphabet, as
I think is clear, then the Phoenicians were of the same race, or of some
race with which the Mayas were connected; in other words, they were from
Atlantis.

Now we know that the Phoenicians and Hebrews were of the same stock,
used the same alphabet, and spoke almost precisely the same language.

The Phoenicians preserved traditions, which have come down to us in the
writings, of Sanchoniathon, of all the great essential inventions or
discoveries which underlie civilization. The first two human beings,
they tell us, were Protogonos and Aion (Adam and 'Havath), who produce
Genos and Genea (Qen and Qenath), from whom again are descended three
brothers, named Phos, Phur, and Phlox (Light, Fire, and Flame), because
they "have discovered how to produce fire by the friction of two pieces
of wood, and have taught the use of this element." In another fragment,
at the origin of the human race we see in succession the fraternal
couples of Autochthon and Technites (Adam and Quen--Cain?), inventors of
the manufacture of bricks; Agros and Agrotes (Sade and Ced), fathers of
the agriculturists and hunters; then Amynos and Magos, "who taught to
dwell in villages and rear flocks."

The connection between these Atlantean traditions and the Bible record
is shown in many things. For instance, "the Greek text, in expressing
the invention of Amynos, uses the words kw'mas kai` poi'mnas, which are
precisely the same as the terms ohel umiqneh, which the Bible uses in
speaking of the dwellings of the descendants of Jabal (Gen., chap. iv.,
v. 20). In like manner Lamech, both in the signification of his name and
also iv the savage character attributed to him by the legend attached to
his memory, is a true synonyme of Agrotes."

"And the title of A?lh~tai, given to Agros and Agrotes in the Greek of
the Phoenician history, fits in wonderfully with the physiognomy of the
race of the Cainites in the Bible narrative, whether we take a?lh~tai
simply as a Hellenized transcription of the Semitic Elim, 'the strong,
the mighty,' or whether we take it in its Greek acceptation, 'the
wanderers;' for such is the destiny of Cain and his race according to
the very terms of the condemnation which was inflicted upon him after
his crime (Gen. iv., 14), and this is what is signified by the name of
his grandson 'Yirad. Only, in Sanchoniathon the genealogy does not end
with Amynos and Magos, as that of the Cainites in the Bible does with
the three sons of Lamech. These two personages are succeeded by Misor
and Sydyk, 'the released and the just,' as Sanchoniathon translates
them, but rather the 'upright and the just' (Mishor and Cuedueq), 'who
invent the use of salt.' To Misor is born Taautos (Taut), to whom we owe
letters; and to Sydyk the Cabiri or Corybantes, the institutors of
navigation." (Lenormant, "Genealogies between Adam and the Deluge."
Contemporary Review, April, 1880.)

We have, also, the fact that the Phoenician name for their goddess
Astynome (Ashtar No'ema), whom the Greeks called Nemaun, was the same as
the name of the sister of the three sons of Lamech, as given in
Genesis--Na'emah, or Na'amah.

If, then, the original seat of the Hebrews and Phoenicians was the
Garden of Eden, to the west of Europe, and if the Phoenicians are shown
to be connected, through their alphabets, with the Central Americans,
who looked to an island in the sea, to the eastward, as their
starting-point, the conclusion becomes irresistible that Atlantis and
the Garden of Eden were one and the same.

The Pyramid.--Not only are the Cross and the Garden of Eden identified
with Atlantis, but in Atlantis, the habitation of the gods, we find the
original model of all those pyramids which extend from India to Peru.

This singular architectural construction dates back far beyond the birth
of history. In the Puranas of the Hindoos we read of pyramids long
anterior in time to any which have survived to our day. Cheops was
preceded by a countless host of similar erections which have long since
mouldered into ruins.

If the reader will turn to page 104 of this work he will see, in the
midst of the picture of Aztlan, the starting-point of the Aztecs,
according to the Botturini pictured writing, a pyramid with worshippers
kneeling before it.

Fifty years ago Mr. Faber, in his "Origin of Pagan Idolatry," placed
artificial tumuli, pyramids, and pagodas in the same category,
conceiving that all were transcripts of the holy mountain which was
generally supposed to have stood in the centre of Eden; or, rather. as
intimated in more than one place by the Psalmist, the garden itself was
situated on an eminence. (Psalms, chap. iii., v. 4, and chap. lxviii.,
vs. 15, 16, 18.)

The pyramid is one of the marvellous features of that problem which
confronts us everywhere, and which is insoluble without Atlantis.

The Arabian traditions linked the pyramid with the Flood. In a
manuscript preserved in the Bodleian Library, and translated by Dr.
Sprenger, Abou Balkhi says:

"The wise men, previous to the Flood, foreseeing an impending Judgment
from heaven, either by submersion or fire, which would destroy every
created thing, built upon the tops of the mountains in Upper Egypt many
pyramids of stone, in order to have some refuge against the approaching
calamity. Two of these buildings exceeded the rest in height, being four
hundred cubits, high and as many broad and as many long. They were built
with large blocks of marble, and they were so well put together that the
joints were scarcely perceptible. Upon the exterior of the building
every charm and wonder of physic was inscribed."

This tradition locates these monster structures upon the mountains of
Upper Egypt, but there are no buildings of such dimensions to be found
anywhere in Egypt. Is it not probable that we have here another
reference to the great record preserved in the land of the Deluge? Were
not the pyramids of Egypt and America imitations of similar structures
in Atlantis? Might not the building of such a gigantic edifice have
given rise to the legends existing on both continents in regard to a
Tower of Babel?

How did the human mind hit upon this singular edifice--the pyramid? By
what process of development did it reach it? Why should these
extraordinary structures crop out on the banks of the Nile, and amid the
forests and plains of America? And why, in both countries, should they
stand with their sides square to the four cardinal points of the
compass? Are they in this, too, a reminiscence of the Cross, and of the
four rivers of Atlantis that ran to the north, south, east, and west?

"There is yet a third combination that demands a specific notice. The
decussated symbol is not unfrequently planted upon what Christian
archaeologists designate 'a calvary,' that is, upon a mount or a cone.
Thus it is represented in both hemispheres. The megalithic structure of
Callernish, in the island of Lewis before mentioned, is the most perfect
example of the practice extant in Europe. The mount is preserved to this
day. This, to be brief, was the recognized conventional mode of
expressing a particular primitive truth or mystery from the days of the
Chaldeans to those of the Gnostics, or from one extremity of the
civilized world to the other. It is seen in the treatment of the ash
Yggdrasill of the Scandinavians, as well as in that of the Bo-tree of
the Buddhists. The prototype was not the Egyptian, but the Babylonian
crux ansata, the lower member of which constitutes a conical support for
the oval or sphere above it. With the Gnostics, who occupied the
debatable ground between primitive Christianity and philosophic
paganism, and who inscribed it upon their tombs, the cone symbolized
death as well as life. In every heathen mythology it was the universal
emblem of the goddess or mother of heaven, by whatsoever name she was
addressed--whether as Mylitta, Astarte, Aphrodite, Isis, Mata, or Venus;
and the several eminences consecrated to her worship were, like those
upon which Jupiter was originally adored, of a conical or pyramidal
shape. This, too, is the ordinary form of the altars dedicated to the
Assyrian god of fertility. In exceptional instances the cone is
introduced upon one or the other of the sides, or is distinguishable in
the always accompanying mystical tree." (Edinburgh Review, July, 1870.)

If the reader will again turn to page 104 of this work he will see that
the tree appears on the top of the pyramid or mountain in both the Aztec
representations of Aztlan, the original island-home of the Central
American races.

The writer just quoted believes that Mr. Faber is correct in his opinion
that the pyramid is a transcript of the sacred mountain which stood in
the midst of Eden, the Olympus of Atlantis. He adds:

"Thomas Maurice, who is no mean authority, held the same view. He
conceived the use to which pyramids in particular were anciently applied
to have been threefold-namely, as tombs, temples, and observatories; and
this view he labors to establish in the third volume of his 'Indian
Antiquities.' Now, whatever may be their actual date, or with whatsoever
people they may have originated, whether in Africa or Asia, in the lower
valley of the Nile or in the plains of Chaldea, the pyramids of Egypt
were unquestionably destined to very opposite purposes. According, to
Herodotus, they were introduced by the Hyksos; and Proclus, the Platonic
philosopher, connects them with the science of astronomy--a science
which, he adds, the Egyptians derived from the Chaldeans. Hence we may
reasonably infer that they served as well for temples for planetary
worship as for observatories. Subsequently to the descent of the
shepherds, their hallowed precincts were invaded by royalty, from
motives of pride and superstition; and the principal chamber in each was
used as tombs."

The pyramidal imitations, dear to the hearts of colonists of the sacred
mountain upon which their gods dwelt, was devoted, as perhaps the
mountain itself was, to sun and fire worship. The same writer says:

"That Sabian worship once extensively prevailed in the New World is a
well-authenticated fact; it is yet practised to some extent by the
wandering tribes on the Northern continent, and was the national
religion of the Peruvians at the time of the Conquest. That it was also
the religion of their more highly civilized predecessors on the soil,
south of the equator more especially, is evidenced by the remains of
fire-altars, both round and square, scattered about the shores of lakes
Umayu and Titicaca, and which are the counterparts of the Gueber dokh
mehs overhanging the Caspian Sea. Accordingly, we find, among these and
other vestiges of antiquity that indissolubly connected those long-since
extinct populations in the New with the races of the Old World, the
well-defined symbol of the Maltese Cross. On the Mexican feroher before
alluded to, and which is most elaborately carved in bass-relief on a
massive piece of polygonous granite, constituting a portion of a
cyclopean wall, the cross is enclosed within the ring, and accompanying
it are four tassel-like ornaments, graved equally well. Those
accompaniments, however, are disposed without any particular regard to
order, but the four arms of the cross, nevertheless, severally and
accurately point to the cardinal quarters, The same regularity is
observable on a much smaller but not less curious monument, which was
discovered some time since in an ancient Peruvian huaca or
catacomb--namely, a syrinx or pandean pipe, cut out of a solid mass of
lapis ollaris, the sides of which are profusely ornamented, not only
with Maltese crosses, but also with other symbols very similar in style
to those inscribed on the obelisks of Egypt and on the monoliths of this
country. The like figure occurs on the equally ancient Otrusco black
pottery. But by far the most remarkable example of this form of the
Cross in the New World is that which appears on a second type of the
Mexican feroher, engraved on a tablet of gypsum, and which is described
at length by its discoverer, Captain du Paix, and depicted by his
friend, M. Baradere. Here the accompaniments--a shield, a hamlet, and a
couple of bead-annulets or rosaries--are, with a single exception,
identical in even the minutest particular with an Assyrian monument
emblematical of the Deity. . . .

"No country in the world can compare with India for the exposition of
the pyramidal cross. There the stupendous labors of Egypt are rivalled,
and sometimes surpassed. Indeed, but for the fact of such monuments of
patient industry and unexampled skill being still in existence, the
accounts of some others which have long since disappeared, having
succumbed to the ravages of time and the fury of the bigoted Mussulman,
would sound in our ears as incredible as the story of Porsenna's tomb,
which 'o'ertopped old Pelion,' and made 'Ossa like a wart.' Yet
something not very dissimilar in character to it was formerly the boast
of the ancient city of Benares, on the banks of the Ganges. We allude to
the great temple of Bindh Madhu, which was demolished in the seventeenth
century by the Emperor Aurungzebe. Tavernier, the French baron, who
travelled thither about the year 1680, has preserved a brief description
of it. The body of the temple was constructed in the figure of a
colossal cross (i. e., a St. Andrew's Cross), with a lofty dome at the
centre, above which rose a massive structure of a pyramidal form. At the
four extremities of the cross there were four other pyramids of
proportionate dimensions, and which were ascended from the outside by
steps, with balconies at stated distances for places of rest, reminding
us of the temple of Belus, as described in the pages of Herodotus. The
remains of a similar building are found at Mhuttra, on the banks of the
Jumna. This and many others, including the subterranean temple at
Elephanta and the caverns of Ellora and Salsette, are described at
length in the well-known work by Maurice; who adds that, besides these,
there was yet another device in which the Hindoo displayed the
all-pervading sign; this was by pyramidal towers placed crosswise. At
the famous temple of Chillambrum, on the Coromandel coast, there were
seven lofty walls, one within the other, round the central quadrangle,
and as many pyramidal gate-ways in the midst of each side which forms
the limbs of a vast cross."

In Mexico pyramids were found everywhere. Cortez, in a letter to Charles
V., states that he counted four hundred of them at Cholula. Their
temples were on those "high-places." The most ancient pyramids in Mexico
are at Teotihuacan, eight leagues from the city of Mexico; the two
largest were dedicated to the sun and moon respectively, each built of
cut stone, with a level area at the summit, and four stages leading up
to it. The larger one is 680 feet square at the base, about 200 feet
high, and covers an area of eleven acres. The Pyramid of Cholula,
measured by Humboldt, is 160 feet high, 1400 feet square at the base,
and covers forty five acres! The great pyramid of Egypt, Cheops, is 746
feet square, 450 feet high, and covers between twelve and thirteen
acres. So that it appears that the base of the Teotihuacan structure is
nearly as large as that of Cheops, while that of Cholula covers nearly
four times as much space. The Cheops pyramid, however, exceeds very much
in height both the American structures.

Senor Garcia y Cubas thinks the pyramids of Teotihuacan (Mexico) were
built for the same purpose as those of Egypt. He considers the analogy
established in eleven particulars, as follows: 1, the site chosen is the
same; 2, the structures are orientated with slight variation; 3, the
line through the centres of the structures is in the astronomical
meridian; 4, the construction in grades and steps is the same; 5, in
both cases the larger pyramids are dedicated to the sun; 6, the Nile has
"a valley of the dead," as in Teotihuacan there is "a street of the
dead;" 7, some monuments in each class have the nature of
fortifications; 8, the smaller mounds are of the same nature and for the
same purpose; 9, both pyramids have a small mound joined to one of their
faces; 10, the openings discovered in the Pyramid of the Moon are also
found in some Egyptian pyramids; 11, the interior arrangements of the
pyramids are analogous. ("Ensayo de un Estudio.")

It is objected that the American edifices are different in form from the
Egyptian, in that they are truncated, or flattened at the top; but this
is not an universal rule.

"In many of the ruined cities of Yucatan one or more pyramids have been
found upon the summit of which no traces of any building could be
discovered, although upon surrounding pyramids such structures could be
found. There is also some reason to believe that perfect pyramids have
been found in America. Waldeck found near Palenque two pyramids in a
state of perfect preservation, square at the base, pointed at the top,
and thirty-one feet high, their sides forming equilateral triangles."
(Bancroft's "Native Races," vol. v., p. 58.)

Bradford thinks that "some of the Egyptian pyramids, and those which
with some reason it has been supposed are the most ancient, are
precisely similar to the Mexican teocalli." ("North Americans of
Antiquity" p. 423.)

And there is in Egypt another form of pyramid called the mastaba, which,
like the Mexican, was flattened on the top; while in Assyria structures
flattened like the Mexican are found. "In fact," says one writer, "this
form of temple (the flat-topped) has been found from Mesopotamia to the
Pacific Ocean." The Phoenicians also built pyramids. In the thirteenth
century the Dominican Brocard visited the ruins of the Phoenician city
of Mrith or Marathos, and speaks in the strongest terms of admiration of
those pyramids of surprising grandeur, constructed of blocks of stone
from twenty-six to twenty eight feet long, whose thickness exceeded the
stature of a tall man. ("Prehistoric Nations," p. 144.)

"If," says Ferguson, "we still hesitate to pronounce that there was any
connection between the builders of the pyramids of Suku and Oajaca, or
the temples of Xochialco and Boro Buddor, we must at least allow that
the likeness is startling, and difficult to account for on the theory of
mere accidental coincidence."

                            PYRAMIDS OF EGYPT.

The Egyptian pyramids all stand with their sides to the cardinal points,
while many of the Mexican pyramids do likewise. The Egyptian pyramids
were penetrated by small passage-ways; so were the Mexican. The Pyramid
of Teotihuacan, according to Almarez, has, at a point sixty-nine feet
from the base, a gallery large enough to admit a man crawling on hands
and knees, which extends, inward, on an incline, a distance of twenty
feet, and terminates in two square wells or chambers, each five feet
square and one of them fifteen feet deep. Mr. Lowenstern states,

                        PYRAMIDS OF TEOTIHUACAN.

according to Mr. Bancroft ("Native Races," vol. iv., p. 533), that "the
gallery is one hundred and fifty-seven feet long, increasing in height
to over six feet and a half as it penetrates the pyramid; that the well
is over six feet square, extending (apparently) down to the base and up
to the summit; and that other cross-galleries are blocked up by debris."
In the Pyramid of Cheops there is a similar opening or passage-way
forty-nine feet above the base; it is three feet eleven inches high, and
three feet five and a half inches wide; it leads down a slope to a
sepulchral chamber or well, and connects with other passage-ways leading
up into the body of the pyramid.

                 THE GREAT MOUND, NEAR MIAMISBURG, OHIO.

In both the Egyptian the American pyramids the outside of the structures
was covered with a thick coating of smooth, shining cement.

Humboldt considered the Pyramid of Cholula of the same type as the
Temple of Jupiter Belus, the pyramids of Meidoun Dachhour, and the group
of Sakkarah, in Egypt.

                         GREAT PYRAMID OF XCOCH.

In both America and Egypt the pyramids were used as places of sepulture;
and it is a remarkable fact that the system of earthworks and mounds,
kindred to the pyramids, is found even in England. Silsbury Hill, at
Avebury, is an artificial mound one hundred and seventy feet high. It is
connected with ramparts, avenues (fourteen hundred and eighty yards
long), circular ditches, and stone circles, almost identical with those
found in the valley of the Mississippi. In Ireland the dead were buried
in vaults of stone, and the earth raised over them in pyramids flattened
on the top. They were called "moats" by the people. We have found the
stone vaults at the base of similar truncated pyramids in Ohio. There
can be no doubt that the pyramid was a developed and perfected mound,
and that the parent form of these curious structures is to be found in
Silsbury Hill, and in the mounds of earth of Central America and the
Mississippi Valley.

We find the emblem of the Cross in pre-Christian times venerated as a
holy symbol on both sides of the Atlantic; and we find it explained as a
type of the four rivers of the happy island where the civilization of
the race originated.

We find everywhere among the European and American nations the memory of
an Eden of the race, where the first men dwelt in primeval peace and
happiness, and which was afterward destroyed by water.

We find the pyramid on both sides of the Atlantic, with its four sides
pointing, like the arms of the Cross, to the four cardinal points-a
reminiscence of Olympus; and in the Aztec representation of Olympos
(Aztlan) we find the pyramid as the central and typical figure.

Is it possible to suppose all these extraordinary coincidences to be the
result of accident? We might just as well say that the similarities
between the American and English forms of government were not the result
of relationship or descent, but that men placed in similar circumstances
had spontaneously and necessarily reached the same results.

CHAPTER VI.

GOLD AND SILVER THE SACRED METALS OF ATLANTIS.

Money is the instrumentality by which man is lifted above the
limitations of barter. Baron Storch terms it "the marvellous instrument
to which we are indebted for our wealth and civilization."

It is interesting to inquire into the various articles which have been
used in different countries and ages as money. The following is a table
of some of them:

Articles of Utility.

      +-----------------------------+-----------------------------+
      | India                       | Cakes of tea.               |
      +-----------------------------+-----------------------------+
      | China                       | Pieces of silk.             |
      +-----------------------------+-----------------------------+
      | Abyssinia                   | Salt.                       |
      +-----------------------------+-----------------------------+
      | Iceland and Newfoundland    | Codfish.                    |
      +-----------------------------+-----------------------------+
      | Illinois (in early days)    | Coon-skins.                 |
      +-----------------------------+-----------------------------+
      | Bornoo (Africa)             | Cotton shirts.              |
      +-----------------------------+-----------------------------+
      | Ancient Russia              | Skins of wild animals.      |
      +-----------------------------+-----------------------------+
      | West India Islands (1500)   | Cocoa-nuts.                 |
      +-----------------------------+-----------------------------+
      | Massachusetts Indians       | Wampum and musket-balls.    |
      +-----------------------------+-----------------------------+
      | Virginia (1700)             | Tobacco.                    |
      +-----------------------------+-----------------------------+
      | British West India Islands  | Pins, snuff, and whiskey.   |
      +-----------------------------+-----------------------------+
      | Central South America       | Soap, chocolate, and eggs.  |
      +-----------------------------+-----------------------------+
      | Ancient Romans              | Cattle.                     |
      +-----------------------------+-----------------------------+
      | Ancient Greece              | Nails of copper and iron.   |
      +-----------------------------+-----------------------------+
      | The Lacedemonians           | Iron.                       |
      +-----------------------------+-----------------------------+
      | The Burman Empire           | Lead.                       |
      +-----------------------------+-----------------------------+
      | Russia (1828 to 1845)       | Platinum.                   |
      +-----------------------------+-----------------------------+
      | Rome (under Numa Pompilius) | Wood and leather.           |
      +-----------------------------+-----------------------------+
      | Rome (under the Caesars)    | Land.                       |
      +-----------------------------+-----------------------------+
      | Carthaginians               | Leather.                    |
      +-----------------------------+-----------------------------+
      | Ancient Britons Cattle,     | slaves, brass, and iron.    |
      +-----------------------------+-----------------------------+
      | England (under James II.)   | Tin, gun-metal, and pewter. |
      +-----------------------------+-----------------------------+
      | South Sea Islands           | Axes and hammers.           |
      +-----------------------------+-----------------------------+

Articles of Ornament.

            +-------------------------------+----------------+
            | Ancient Jews                  | Jewels.        |
            +-------------------------------+----------------+
            | The Indian Islands and Africa | Cowrie shells, |
            +-------------------------------+----------------+

Conventional Signs.

             +----------------+----------------------------+
             | Holland (1574) | Pieces of pasteboard.      |
             +----------------+----------------------------+
             | China (1200)   | Bark of the mulberry-tree. |
             +----------------+----------------------------+

It is evident that every primitive people uses as money those articles
upon which they set the highest value--as cattle, jewels, slaves, salt,
musket-balls, pins, snuff, whiskey, cotton shirts, leather, axes, and
hammers; or those articles for which there was a foreign demand, and
which they could trade off to the merchants for articles of
necessity--as tea, silk, codfish, coonskins, cocoa-nuts, and tobacco.
Then there is a later stage, when the stamp of the government is
impressed upon paper, wood, pasteboard, or the bark of trees, and these
articles are given a legal-tender character.

When a civilized nation comes in contact with a barbarous people they
seek to trade with them for those things which they need; a
metal-working people, manufacturing weapons of iron or copper, will seek
for the useful metals, and hence we find iron, copper, tin, and lead
coming into use as a standard of values--as money; for they can always
be converted into articles of use and weapons of war. But when we ask
bow it chanced that gold and silver came to be used as money, and why it
is that gold is regarded as so much more valuable than silver, no answer
presents itself. It was impossible to make either of them into pots or
pans, swords or spears; they were not necessarily more beautiful than
glass or the combinations of tin and copper. Nothing astonished the
American races more than the extraordinary value set upon gold and
silver by the Spaniards; they could not understand it. A West Indian
savage traded a handful of gold-dust with one of the sailors
accompanying Columbus for some tool, and then ran for his life to the
woods lest the sailor should repent his bargain and call him back. The
Mexicans had coins of tin shaped like a letter T. We can understand
this, for tin was necessary to them in hardening their bronze
implements, and it may have been the highest type of metallic value
among them. A round copper coin with a serpent stamped on it was found
at Palenque, and T-shaped copper coins are very abundant in the ruins of
Central America. This too we can understand, for copper was necessary in
every work of art or utility.

All these nations were familiar with gold and silver, but they used them
as sacred metals for the adornment of the temples of the sun and moon.
The color of gold was something of the color of the sun's rays, while
the color of silver resembled the pale light of the moon, and hence they
were respectively sacred to the gods of the sun and moon. And this is
probably the origin of the comparative value of these metals: they
became the precious metals because they were the sacred metals, and gold
was more valuable than silver--just as the sun-god was the great god of
the nations, while the mild moon was simply an attendant upon the sun.

The Peruvians called gold "the tears wept by the sun." It was not used
among the people for ornament or money. The great temple of the sun at
Cuzco was called the "Place of Gold." It was, as I have shown, literally
a mine of gold. Walls, cornices, statuary, plate, ornaments, all were of
gold; the very ewers, pipes, and aqueducts--even the agricultural
implements used in the garden of the temple--were of gold and silver.
The value of the jewels which adorned the temple was equal to one
hundred and eighty millions of dollars! The riches of the kingdom can be
conceived when we remember that from a pyramid in Chimu a Spanish
explorer named Toledo took, in 1577, $4,450,284 in gold and silver.
("New American Cyclopaedia," art. American Antiquities.) The gold and
silver of Peru largely contributed to form the metallic currency upon
which Europe has carried on her commerce during the last three hundred
years.

Gold and silver were not valued in Peru for any intrinsic usefulness;
they were regarded as sacred because reserved for the two great gods of
the nation. As we find gold and silver mined and worked on both sides of
the Atlantic at the earliest periods of recorded history, we may fairly
conclude that they were known to the Atlanteans; and this view is
confirmed by the statements of Plato, who represents a condition of
things in Atlantis exactly like that which Pizarro found in Peru.
Doubtless the vast accumulations of gold and silver in both countries
were due to the fact that these metals were not permitted to be used by
the people. In Peru the annual taxes of the people were paid to the Inca
in part in gold and silver from the mines, and they were used to
ornament the temples; and thus the work of accumulating the sacred
metals went on from generation to generation. The same process doubtless
led to the vast accumulations in the temples of Atlantis, as described
by Plato.

Now, as the Atlanteans carried on an immense commerce with all the
countries of Europe and Western Asia, they doubtless inquired and traded
for gold and silver for the adornment of their temples, and they thus
produced a demand for and gave a value to the two metals otherwise
comparatively useless to man--a value higher than any other commodity
which the people could offer their civilized customers; and as the
reverence for the great burning orb of the sun, master of all the
manifestations of nature, was tenfold as great as the veneration for the
smaller, weaker, and variable goddess of the night, so was the demand
for the metal sacred to the sun ten times as great as for the metal
sacred to the moon. This view is confirmed by the fact that the root of
the word by which the Celts, the Greeks, and the Romans designated gold
was the Sanscrit word karat, which means, "the color of the sun." Among
the Assyrians gold and silver were respectively consecrated to the and
moon precisely as they were in Peru. A pyramid belonging to the palace
of Nineveh is referred to repeatedly in the inscriptions. It was
composed of seven stages, equal in height, and each one smaller in area
than the one beneath it; each stage was covered with stucco of different
colors, "a different color representing each of the heavenly bodies, the
least important being at the base: white (Venus); black (Saturn); purple
(Jupiter); blue (Mercury); vermillion (Mars); silver (the Moon); and
gold (the Sun)." (Lenormant's "Ancient History of the East," vol. i., p.
463.) "In England, to this day the new moon is saluted with a bow or a
courtesy, as well as the curious practice of 'turning one's silver,'
which seems a relic of the offering of the moon's proper metal."
(Tylor's "Anthropology", p. 361.) The custom of wishing, when one first
sees the new moon, is probably a survival of moon-worship; the wish
taking the place of the prayer.

And thus has it come to pass that, precisely as the physicians of
Europe, fifty years ago, practised bleeding, because for thousands of
years their savage ancestors had used it to draw away the evil spirits
out of the man, so the business of our modern civilization is dependent
upon the superstition of a past civilization, and the bankers of the
world are to-day perpetuating the adoration of "the tears wept by the
sun" which was commenced ages since on the island of Atlantis.

And it becomes a grave question--when we remember that the rapidly
increasing business of the world, consequent upon an increasing
population, and a civilization advancing with giant steps, is measured
by the standard of a currency limited by natural laws, decreasing
annually in production, and incapable of expanding proportionately to
the growth of the world--whether this Atlantean superstition may not yet
inflict more incalculable injuries on mankind than those which resulted
from the practice of phlebotomy.

PART V.

THE COLONIES OF ATLANTIS.

CHAPTER I.

THE CENTRAL AMERICAN AND MEXICAN COLONIES.

The western shores of Atlantis were not far distant from the West India
Islands; a people possessed of ships could readily pass from island to
island until they reached the continent. Columbus found the natives
making such voyages in open canoes. If, then, we will suppose that there
was no original connection between the inhabitants of the main-land and
of Atlantis, the commercial activity of the Atlanteans would soon reveal
to them the shores of the Gulf. Commerce implies the plantation of
colonies; the trading-post is always the nucleus of a settlement; we
have seen this illustrated in modern times in the case of the English
East India Company and the Hudson Bay Company. We can therefore readily
believe that commercial intercourse between Atlantis and Yucatan,
Honduras and Mexico, created colonies along the shores of the Gulf which
gradually spread into the interior, and to the high table-lands of
Mexico. And, accordingly, we find, as I have already shown, that all the
traditions of Central America and Mexico point to some country in the
East, and beyond the sea, as the source of their first civilized people;
and this region, known among them as "Aztlan," lived in the memory of
the people as a beautiful and happy land, where their ancestors had
dwelt in peace for many generations.

Dr. Le Plongeon, who spent four years exploring Yucatan, says:

"One-third of this tongue (the Maya) is pure Greek. Who brought the
dialect of Homer to America? or who took to Greece that of the Mayas?
Greek is the offspring of the Sanscrit. Is Maya? or are they coeval? . .
. The Maya is not devoid of words from the Assyrian."

That the population of Central America (and in this term I include
Mexico) was at one time very dense, and had attained to a high degree of
civilization, higher even than that of Europe in the time of Columbus,
there can be no question; and it is also probable, as I have shown, that
they originally belonged to the white race. Desire Charnay, who is now
exploring the ruins of Central America, says (North American Review,
January, 1881, p. 48), "The Toltecs were fair, robust, and bearded. I
have often seen Indians of pure blood with blue eyes." Quetzalcoatl was
represented as large, "with a big head and a heavy beard." The same
author speaks (page 44) of "the ocean of ruins all around, not inferior
in size to those of Egypt" At Teotihuacan he measured one building two
thousand feet wide on each side, and fifteen pyramids, each nearly as
large in the base as Cheops. "The city is indeed of vast extent . . .
the whole ground, over a space of five or six miles in diameter, is
covered with heaps of ruins--ruins which at first make no impression, so
complete is their dilapidation." He asserts the great antiquity of these
ruins, because be found the very highways of the ancient city to be
composed of broken bricks and pottery, the debris left by earlier
populations. "This continent," he says (page 43), "is the land of
mysteries; we here enter an infinity whose limits we cannot estimate. .
. . I shall soon have to quit work in this place. The long avenue on
which it stands is lined with ruins of public buildings and palaces,
forming continuous lines, as in the streets of modern cities. Still, all
these edifices and balls were as nothing compared with the vast
substructures which strengthened their foundations."

We find the strongest resemblances to the works of the ancient European
races: the masonry is similar; the cement is the same; the sculptures
are alike; both peoples used the arch; in both continents we find
bricks, glassware, and even porcelain (North American Review, December,
1880, pp. 524, 525), "with blue figures on a white ground;" also bronze
composed of the same elements of copper and tin in like proportions;
coins made of copper, round and T-shaped, and even metallic candlesticks.

Desire Charnay believes that he has found in the ruins of Tula the bones
of swine, sheep, oxen, and horses, in a fossil state, indicating an
immense antiquity. The Toltecs possessed a pure and simple religion,
like that of Atlantis, as described by Plato, with the same sacrifices
of fruits and flowers; they were farmers; they raised and wove cotton;
they cultivated fruits; they used the sign of the Cross extensively;
they cut and engraved precious stones; among their carvings have been
found representations of the elephant and the lion, both animals not
known in America. The forms of sepulture were the same as among the
ancient races of the Old World; they burnt the bodies of their great
men, and enclosed the dust in funeral urns; some of their dead were
buried in a sitting position, others reclined at full length, and many
were embalmed like the Egyptian mummies.

When we turn to Mexico, the same resemblances present themselves.

The government was an elective monarchy, like that of Poland, the king
being selected from the royal family by the votes of the nobles of the
kingdom. There was a royal family, an aristocracy, a privileged
priesthood, a judiciary, and a common people. Here we have all the
several estates into which society in Europe is divided.

There were thirty grand nobles in the kingdom, and the vastness of the
realm may be judged by the fact that each of these could muster one
hundred thousand vassals from their own estates, or a total of three
millions. And we have only to read of the vast hordes brought into the
field against Cortez to know that this was not an exaggeration.

They even possessed that which has been considered the crowning feature
of European society, the feudal system. The nobles held their lands upon
the tenure of military service.

But the most striking feature was the organization of the judiciary. The
judges were independent even of the king, and held their offices for
life. There were supreme judges for the larger divisions of the kingdom,
district judges in each of the provinces, and magistrates chosen by the
people throughout the country.

There was also a general legislative assembly, congress, or parliament,
held every eighty days, presided over by the king, consisting of all the
judges of the realm, to which the last appeal lay

"The rites of marriage," says Prescott, "were celebrated with as much
formality as in any Christian country; and the institution was held in
such reverence that a tribunal was instituted for the sole purpose of
determining questions relating to it. Divorces could not be obtained
until authorized by a sentence of the court, after a patient hearing of
the parties."

Slavery was tolerated, but the labors of the slave were light, his
rights carefully guarded, and his children were free. The slave could
own property, and even other slaves.

Their religion possessed so many features similar to those of the Old
World, that the Spanish priests declared the devil had given them a
bogus imitation of Christianity to destroy their souls. "The devil,"
said they, "stole all he could."

They had confessions, absolution of sins, and baptism. When their
children were named, they sprinkled their lips and bosoms with water,
and "the Lord was implored to permit the holy drops to wash away the sin
that was given it before the foundation of the world."

The priests were numerous and powerful. They practised fasts, vigils,
flagellations, and many of them lived in monastic seclusion.

The Aztecs, like the Egyptians, had progressed through all the three
different modes of writing--the picture-writing, the symbolical, and the
phonetic. They recorded all their laws, their tribute-rolls specifying
the various imposts, their mythology, astronomical calendars, and
rituals, their political annals and their chronology. They wrote on
cotton-cloth, on skins prepared like parchment, on a composition of silk
and gum, and on a species of paper, soft and beautiful, made from the
aloe. Their books were about the size and shape of our own, but the
leaves were long strips folded together in many folds.

They wrote poetry and cultivated oratory, and paid much attention to
rhetoric. They also had a species of theatrical performances.

Their proficiency in astronomy is thus spoken of by Prescott:

"That they should be capable of accurately adjusting their festivals by
the movements of the heavenly bodies, and should fix the true length of
the tropical year with a precision unknown to the great philosophers of
antiquity, could be the result only of a long series of nice and patient
observations, evincing no slight progress in civilization."

"Their women," says the same author, "are described by the Spaniards as
pretty, though with a serious and rather melancholy cast of countenance.
Their long, black hair might generally be seen wreathed with flowers,
or, among the richer people, with strings of precious stones and pearls
from the Gulf of California. They appear to have been treated with much
consideration by their husbands; and passed their time in indolent
tranquillity, or in such feminine occupations as spinning, embroidery,
and the like; while their maidens beguiled the hours by the rehearsal of
traditionary tales and ballads.

"Numerous attendants of both sexes waited at the banquets. The balls
were scented with perfumes, and the courts strewed with odoriferous
herbs and flowers, which were distributed in profusion among the guests
as they arrived. Cotton napkins and ewers of water were placed before
them as they took their seats at the board. Tobacco was them offered, in
pipes, mixed with aromatic substances, or in the form of cigars inserted
in tubes of tortoise-shell or silver. It is a curious fact that the
Aztecs also took the dried tobacco leaf in the pulverized form of snuff.

"The table was well supplied with substantial meats, especially game,
among which the most conspicuous was the turkey. Also, there were found
very delicious vegetables and. fruits of every variety native to the
continent. Their palate was still further regaled by confections and
pastry, for which their maize-flower and sugar furnished them ample
materials. The meats were kept warm with chafing-dishes. The table was
ornamented with vases of silver and sometimes gold of delicate
workmanship. The favorite beverage was chocolatl, flavored with vanilla
and different spices. The fermented juice of the maguey, with a mixture
of sweets and acids, supplied various agreeable drinks of different
degrees of strength."

It is not necessary to describe their great public works, their floating
gardens, their aqueducts, bridges, forts, temples,

                  COMMON FORM OF ARCH, CENTRAL AMERICA.

palaces, and gigantic pyramids, all ornamented with wonderful statuary.

            SECTION OF THE TREASURE-HOUSE OF ATREUS AT MYCENAE

We find a strong resemblance between the form of arch used in the
architecture of Central America and that of the oldest buildings of
Greece. The Palenque arch is made by the gradual overlapping of the
strata of the building, as shown in the accompanying cut from Baldwin's
"Ancient America," page 100. It was the custom of these ancient
architects to fill in the arch itself with masonry, as shown in the
picture

              ARCH OF LAS MONJAS, PALENQUE, CENTRAL AMERICA

on page 355 of the Arch of Las Monjas, Palenque. If now we took at the
representation of the "Treasure-house of Atreus" at Mycenae, on page
354-one of the oldest structures in Greece--we find precisely the same
form of arch, filled in in the same way.

Rosengarten ("Architectural Styles," p. 59) says:

"The base of these treasure-houses is circular, and the covering of a
dome shape; it does not, however, form an arch, but courses of stone are
laid horizontally over one another in such a way that each course
projects beyond the one below it, till the space at the highest course
becomes so narrow that a single stone covers it. Of all those that have
survived to the present day the treasure-house at Atreus is the most
venerable."

The same form of arch is found among the ruins of that interesting
people, the Etruscans.

"Etruscan vaults are of two kinds. The more curious and probably the
most ancient are false arches, formed of horizontal courses of stone,
each a little overlapping the other, and carried on until the aperture
at the top could be closed by a single superincumbent slab. Such is the
construction of the Regulini-Galassi vault, at Cervetere, the ancient
Caere." (Rawlinson's "Origin of Nations," p. 117.)

It is sufficient to say, in conclusion, that Mexico, under European
rule, or under her own leaders, has never again risen to her former
standard of refinement, wealth, prosperity, or civilization.

CHAPTER II.

THE EGYPTIAN COLONY.

What proofs have we that the Egyptians were a colony from Atlantis?

1. They claimed descent from "the twelve great gods," which must have
meant the twelve gods of Atlantis, to wit, Poseidon and Cleito and their
ten sons.

2. According to the traditions of the Phoenicians, the Egyptians derived
their civilization from them; and as the Egyptians far antedated the
rise of the Phoenician nations proper, this must have meant that Egypt
derived its civilization from the same country to which the Phoenicians
owed their own origin. The Phoenician legends show that Misor, from
whom, the Egyptians were descended, was the child of the Phoenician gods
Amynus and Magus. Misor gave birth to Taaut, the god of letters, the
inventor of the alphabet, and Taaut became Thoth, the god of history of
the Egyptians. Sanchoniathon tells us that "Chronos (king of Atlantis)
visited the South, and gave all Egypt to the god Taaut, that it might be
his kingdom." "Misor" is probably the king "Mestor" named by Plato.

3. According to the Bible, the Egyptians were descendants of Ham, who
was one of the three sons of Noah who escaped from the Deluge, to wit,
the destruction of Atlantis.

4. The great similarity between the Egyptian civilization and that of
the American nations.

5. The fact that the Egyptians claimed to be red men.

6. The religion of Egypt was pre-eminently sun-worship, and Ra was the
sun-god of Egypt, Rama, the sun of the Hindoos, Rana, a god of the
Toltecs, Raymi, the great festival of the sun of the Peruvians, and
Rayam, a god of Yemen.

7. The presence of pyramids in Egypt and America.

8. The Egyptians were the only people of antiquity who were
well-informed as to the history of Atlantis. The Egyptians were never a
maritime people, and the Atlanteans must have brought that knowledge to
them. They were not likely to send ships to Atlantis.

9. We find another proof of the descent of the Egyptians from Atlantis
in their belief as to the "under-world." This land of the dead was
situated in the West--hence the tombs were all placed, whenever
possible, on the west bank of the Nile. The constant cry of the mourners
as the funeral procession moved forward was, "To the west; to the west."
This under-world was beyond the water, hence the funeral procession
always crossed a body of water. "Where the tombs were, as in most cases,
on the west bank of the Nile, the Nile was crossed; where they were on
the eastern shore the procession passed over a sacred lake." (R. S.
Poole, Contemporary Review, August, 1881, p. 17.) In the procession was
"a sacred ark of the sun."

All this is very plain: the under-world in the West, the land of the
dead, was Atlantis, the drowned world, the world beneath the horizon,
beneath the sea, to which the peasants of Brittany looked from Cape Raz,
the most western cape projecting into the Atlantic. It was only to be
reached from Egypt by crossing the water, and it was associated with the
ark, the emblem of Atlantis in all lands.

The soul of the dead man was supposed to journey to the under-world by
"a water progress" (Ibid., p. 18), his destination was the Elysian
Fields, where mighty corn grew, and where he was expected to cultivate
the earth; "this task was of supreme importance." (Ibid., p. 19.) The
Elysian Fields were the "Elysion" of the Greeks, the abode of the
blessed, which we have seen was an island in the remote west. The
Egyptian belief referred to a real country; they described its cities,
mountains, and rivers; one of the latter was called Uranes, a name which
reminds us of the Atlantean god Uranos. In connection with all this we
must not forget that Plato described Atlantis as "that sacred island
lying beneath the sun." Everywhere in the ancient world we find the
minds of men looking to the west for the land of the dead. Poole says,
"How then can we account for this strong conviction? Surely it must be a
survival of an ancient belief which flowed in the very veins of the
race." (Contemporary Review, 1881, p. 19.) It was based on an universal
tradition that under "an immense ocean," in "the far west," there was an
"under-world," a world comprising millions of the dead, a mighty race,
that had been suddenly swallowed up in the greatest catastrophe known to
man since he had inhabited the globe.

10. There is no evidence that the civilization of Egypt was developed in
Egypt itself; it must have been transported there from some other
country. To use the words of a recent writer in Blackwood,

"Till lately it was believed that the use of the papyrus for writing was
introduced about the time of Alexander the Great; then Lepsius found the
hieroglyphic sign of the papyrus-roll on monuments of the twelfth
dynasty; afterward be found the same sign on monuments of the fourth
dynasty, which is getting back pretty close to Menes, the protomonarch;
and, indeed, little doubt is entertained that the art of writing on
papyrus was understood as early as the days of Menes himself. The fruits
of investigation in this, as m many other subjects, are truly most
marvellous. Instead of exhibiting the rise and progress of any branches
of knowledge, they tend to prove that nothing had any rise or progress,
but that everything is referable to the very earliest dates. The
experience of the Egyptologist must teach him to reverse the observation
of Topsy, and to '`spect that nothing growed,' but that as soon as men
were planted on the banks of the Nile they were already the cleverest
men that ever lived, endowed with more knowledge and more power than
their successors for centuries and centuries could attain to. Their
system of writing, also, is found to have been complete from the very
first. . . .

"But what are we to think when the antiquary, grubbing in the dust and
silt of five thousand years ago to discover some traces of infant
effort--some rude specimens of the ages of Magog and Mizraim, in which
we may admire the germ that has since developed into a wonderful
art--breaks his shins against an article so perfect that it equals if it
does not excel the supreme stretch of modern ability? How shall we
support the theory if it come to our knowledge that, before Noah was
cold in his grave, his descendants were adepts in construction and in
the fine arts, and that their achievements were for magnitude such as,
if we possess the requisite skill, we never attempt to emulate? . . .

"As we have not yet discovered any trace of the rude, savage Egypt, but
have seen her in her very earliest manifestations already skilful,
erudite, and strong, it is impossible to determine the order of her
inventions. Light may yet be thrown upon her rise and progress, but our
deepest researches have hitherto shown her to us as only the mother of a
most accomplished race. How they came by their knowledge is matter for
speculation; that they possessed it is matter of fact. We never find
them without the ability to organize labor, or shrinking from the very
boldest efforts in digging canals and irrigating, in quarrying rock, in
building, and in sculpture."

The explanation is simple: the waters of the Atlantic now flow over the
country where all this magnificence and power were developed by slow
stages from the rude beginnings of barbarism.

And how mighty must have been the parent nation of which this Egypt was
a colony!

Egypt was the magnificent, the golden bridge, ten thousand years long,
glorious with temples and pyramids, illuminated and illustrated by the
most complete and continuous records of human history, along which the
civilization of Atlantis, in a great procession of kings and priests,
philosophers and astronomers, artists and artisans, streamed forward to
Greece, to Rome, to Europe, to America. As far back in the ages as the
eye can penetrate, even where the perspective dwindles almost to a
point, we can still see the swarming multitudes, possessed of all the
arts of the highest civilization, pressing forward from out that other
and greater empire of which even this wonderworking Nile-land is but a
faint and imperfect copy.

Look at the record of Egyptian greatness as preserved in her works: The
pyramids, still in their ruins, are the marvel of mankind. The river
Nile was diverted from its course by monstrous embankments to make a
place for the city of Memphis. The artificial lake of Moeris was created
as a reservoir for the waters of the Nile: it was four hundred and fifty
miles in circumference and three hundred and fifty feet deep, with
subterranean channels, flood-gates, locks, and dams, by which the
wilderness was redeemed from sterility. Look at the magnificent
mason-work of this ancient people! Mr. Kenrick, speaking of the casing
of the Great Pyramid, says, "The joints are scarcely perceptible, and
not wider than the thickness of silver-paper, and the cement so
tenacious that fragments of the casing-stones still remain in their
original position, notwithstanding the lapse of so many centuries, and
the violence by which they were detached." Look at the ruins of the
Labyrinth, which aroused the astonishment of Herodotus; it had three
thousand chambers, half of them above ground and half below--a
combination of courts, chambers, colonnades, statues, and pyramids. Look
at the Temple of Karnac, covering a square each side of which is
eighteen hundred feet. Says a recent writer, "Travellers one and all
appear to have been unable to find words to express the feelings with
which these sublime remains inspired them. They have been astounded and
overcome by the magnificence and the prodigality of workmanship here to
be admired. Courts, halls, gate-ways, pillars, obelisks, monolithic
figures, sculptures, rows of sphinxes, are massed in such profusion that
the sight is too much for modern comprehension." Denon says, "It is
hardly possible to believe, after having seen it, in the reality of the
existence of so many buildings collected on a single point--in their
dimensions, in the resolute perseverance which their construction
required, and in the incalculable expense of so much magnificence." And
again, "It is necessary that the reader should fancy what is before him
to be a dream, as he who views the objects themselves occasionally
yields to the doubt whether he be perfectly awake." There were lakes and
mountains within the periphery of the sanctuary. "The cathedral of Notre
Dame at Paris could be set inside one of the halls of Karnac, and not
touch the walls! . . . The whole valley and delta of the Nile, from the
Catacombs to the sea, was covered with temples, palaces, tombs,
pyramids, and pillars." Every stone was covered with inscriptions.

The state of society in the early days of Egypt approximated very
closely to our modern civilization. Religion consisted in the worship of
one God and the practice of virtue; forty-two commandments prescribed
the duties of men to themselves, their neighbors, their country, and the
Deity; a heaven awaited the good and a hell the vicious; there was a
judgment-day when the hearts of men were weighed:

     "He is sifting out the hearts of men
     Before his judgment-seat."

Monogamy was the strict rule; not even the kings, in the early days,
were allowed to have more than one wife. The wife's rights of separate
property and her dower were protected by law; she was "the lady of the
house;" she could "buy, sell, and trade on her own account;" in case of
divorce her dowry was to be repaid to her, with interest at a high rate.
The marriage-ceremony embraced an oath not to contract any other
matrimonial alliance. The wife's status was as high in the earliest days
of Egypt as it is now in the most civilized nations of Europe or America.

Slavery was permitted, but the slaves were treated with the greatest
humanity. In the confessions, buried with the dead, the soul is made to
declare that "I have not incriminated the slave to his master," There
was also a clause in the commandments "which protected the laboring man
against the exaction of more than his day's labor." They were merciful
to the captives made in war; no picture represents torture inflicted
upon them; while the representation of a sea-fight shows them saving
their drowning enemies. Reginald Stuart Poole says (Contemporary Review,
August, 1881, p. 43):

"When we consider the high ideal of the Egyptians, as proved by their
portrayals of a just life, the principles they laid down as the basis of
ethics, the elevation of women among them, their humanity in war, we
must admit that their moral place ranks very high among the nations of
antiquity.

"The true comparison of Egyptian life is with that of modern nations.
This is far too difficult a task to be here undertaken. Enough has been
said, however, to show that we need not think that in all respects they
were far behind us."

Then look at the proficiency in art of this ancient people.

They were the first mathematicians of the Old World. Those Greeks whom
we regard as the fathers of mathematics were simply pupils of Egypt.
They were the first land-surveyors. They were the first astronomers,
calculating eclipses, and watching the periods of planets and
constellations. They knew the rotundity of the earth, which it was
supposed Columbus had discovered!

"The signs of the zodiac were certainly in use among the Egyptians 1722
years before Christ. One of the learned men of our day, who for fifty
years labored to decipher the hieroglyphics of the ancients, found upon
a mummy-case in the British Museum a delineation of the signs of the
zodiac, and the position of the planets; the date to which they pointed
was the autumnal equinox of the year 1722 B.C. Professor Mitchell, to
whom the fact was communicated, employed his assistants to ascertain the
exact position of the heavenly bodies belonging to our solar system on
the equinox of that year. This was done, and a diagram furnished by
parties ignorant of his object, which showed that on the 7th of October,
1722 B.C. the moon and planets occupied the exact point in the heavens
marked upon the coffin in the British Museum." (Goodrich's "Columbus,"
p. 22.)

They had clocks and dials for measuring time. They possessed gold and
silver money. They were the first agriculturists of the Old World,
raising all the cereals, cattle, horses, sheep, etc. They manufactured
linen of so fine a quality that in the days of King Amasis (600 years
B.C.) a single thread of a garment was composed of three hundred and
sixty-five minor threads. They worked in gold, silver, copper, bronze,
and iron; they tempered iron to the hardness of steel. They were the
first chemists. The word "chemistry" comes from chemi, and chemi means
Egypt. They manufactured glass and all kinds of pottery; they made boats
out of earthenware; and, precisely as we are now making railroad
car-wheels of paper, they manufactured vessels of paper. Their dentists
filled teeth with gold; their farmers hatched poultry by artificial
beat. They were the first musicians; they possessed guitars, single and
double pipes, cymbals, drums, lyres, harps, flutes, the sambric, ashur,
etc.; they had even castanets, such as are now used in Spain. In
medicine and surgery they had reached such a degree of perfection that
several hundred years B.C. the operation for the removal of cataract
from the eye was performed among them; one of the most delicate and
difficult feats of surgery, only attempted by us in the most recent
times. "The papyrus of Berlin" states that it was discovered, rolled up
in a case, under the feet of an Anubis in the town of Sekhem, in the
days of Tet (or Thoth), after whose death it was transmitted to King
Sent, and was then restored to the feet of the statue. King Sent
belonged to the second dynasty, which flourished 4751 B.C., and the
papyrus was old in his day. This papyrus is a medical treatise; there
are in it no incantations or charms; but it deals in reasonable
remedies, draughts, unguents and injections. The later medical papyri
contain a great deal of magic and incantations.

"Great and splendid as are the things which we know about oldest Egypt,
she is made a thousand times more sublime by our uncertainty as to the
limits of her accomplishments. She presents not a great, definite idea,
which, though hard to receive, is, when once acquired, comprehensible
and clear. Under the soil of the modern country are hid away thousands
and thousands of relics which may astonish the world for ages to come,
and change continually its conception of what Egypt was. The effect of
research seems to be to prove the objects of it to be much older than we
thought them to be--some things thought to be wholly modern having been
proved to be repetitions of things Egyptian, and other things known to
have been Egyptian being by every advance in knowledge carried back more
and more toward the very beginning of things. She shakes our most rooted
ideas concerning the world's history; she has not ceased to be a puzzle
and a lure: there is a spell over her still."

Renan says, "It has no archaic epoch." Osborn says, "It bursts upon us
at once in the flower of its highest perfection." Seiss says ("A,
Miracle in Stone," p. 40), "It suddenly takes its place in the world in
all its matchless magnificence, without father, without mother, and as
clean apart from all evolution as if it had dropped from the unknown
heavens." It had dropped from Atlantis.

Rawlinson says ("Origin of Nations," p. 13):

"Now, in Egypt, it is notorious that there is no indication of any early
period of savagery or barbarism. All the authorities agree that, however
far back we go, we find in Egypt no rude or uncivilized time out of
which civilization is developed. Menes, the first king, changes the
course of the Nile, makes a great reservoir, and builds the temple of
Phthah at Memphis. . . . We see no barbarous customs, not even the
habit, so slowly abandoned by all people, of wearing arms when not on
military service."

Tylor says (" Anthropology," p. 192):

"Among the ancient cultured nations of Egypt and Assyria handicrafts had
already come to a stage which could only have been reached by thousands
of years of progress. In museums still may be examined the work of their
joiners, stone-cutters, goldsmiths, wonderful in skill and finish, and
in putting to shame the modern artificer. . . . To see gold jewellery of
the highest order, the student should examine that of the ancients, such
as the Egyptian, Greek, and Etruscan."

The carpenters' and masons' tools of the ancient Egyptians were almost
identical with those used among us to-day.

There is a plate showing an Aztec priestess in Delafield's "Antiquities
of America," p. 61, which presents a head-dress strikingly Egyptian. In
the celebrated "tablet of the cross," at Palenque, we see a cross with a
bird perched upon it, to which (or to the cross) two priests are
offering sacrifice. In Mr. Stephens's representation from the Vocal
Memnon we find almost the same thing, the difference being that, instead
of an ornamented Latin cross, we have a crux commissa, and instead of
one bird there are two, not on the cross, but immediately above it. In
both cases the hieroglyphics, though the characters are of course
different, are disposed upon the stone in much the same manner.
(Bancroft's "Native Races," vol. v., p. 61.)

Even the obelisks of Egypt have their counterpart in America.

Quoting from Molina ("History of Chili," tom. i., p. 169), McCullough
writes, "Between the hills of Mendoza and La Punta is a pillar of stone
one hundred and fifty feet high, and twelve feet in diameter."
("Researches," pp. 171, 172.) The columns of Copan stand detached and
solitary, so do the obelisks of Egypt; both are square or four-sided,
and covered with sculpture. (Bancroft's "Native Races," vol. v., p. 60.)

In a letter by Jomard, quoted by Delafield, we read,

"I have recognized in your memoir on the division of time among the
Mexican nations, compared with those of Asia, some very striking
analogies between the Toltec characters and institutions observed on the
banks of the Nile. Among these analogies there is one which is worthy of
attention--it is the use of the vague year of three hundred and
sixty-five days, composed of equal months, and of five complementary
days, equally employed at Thebes and Mexico--a distance of three
thousand leagues. . . . In reality, the intercalation of the Mexicans
being thirteen days on each cycle of fifty-two years, comes to the same
thing as that of the Julian calendar, which is one day in four years;
and consequently supposes the duration of the year to be three hundred
and sixty-five days six hours. Now such was the length of the year among
the Egyptians--they intercalated an entire year of three hundred and
seventy-five days every one thousand four hundred and sixty years. ...
The fact of the intercalation (by the Mexicans) of thirteen days every
cycle that is, the use of a year of three hundred and sixty-five days
and a quarter--is a proof that it was borrowed from the Egyptians, or
that they had a common origin." ("Antiquities of America," pp. 52, 53.)

The Mexican century began on the 26th of February, and the 26th of
February was celebrated from the time of Nabonassor, 747 B.C., because
the Egyptian priests, conformably to their astronomical observations,
had fixed the beginning of the month Toth, and the commencement of their
year, at noon on that day. The five intercalated days to make up the
three hundred and sixty-five days were called by the Mexicans Nemontemi,
or useless, and on them they transacted no business; while the
Egyptians, during that epoch, celebrated the festival of the birth of
their gods, as attested by Plutarch and others.

It will be conceded that a considerable degree of astronomical knowledge
must have been necessary to reach the conclusion that the true year
consisted of three hundred and sixty-five days and six hours (modern
science has demonstrated that it consists of three hundred and
sixty-five days and five hours, less ten seconds); and a high degree of
civilization was requisite to insist that the year must be brought
around, by the intercalation of a certain number of days in a certain
period of time, to its true relation to the seasons. Both were the
outgrowth of a vast, ancient civilization of the highest order, which
transmitted some part of its astronomical knowledge to its colonies
through their respective priesthoods.

Can we, in the presence of such facts, doubt the statements of the
Egyptian priests to Solon, as to the glory and greatness of Atlantis,
its monuments, its sculpture, its laws, its religion, its civilization?

In Egypt we have the oldest of the Old World children of Atlantis; in
her magnificence we have a testimony to the development attained by the
parent country; by that country whose kings were the gods of succeeding
nations, and whose kingdom extended to the uttermost ends of the earth.

The Egyptian historian, Manetho, referred to a period of thirteen
thousand nine hundred years as "the reign of the gods," and placed this
period at the very beginning of Egyptian history. These thirteen
thousand nine hundred years were probably a recollection of Atlantis.
Such a lapse of time, vast as it may appear, is but as a day compared
with some of our recognized geological epochs.

CHAPTER III.

THE COLONIES OF THE MISSISSIPPI VALLEY

If we will suppose a civilized, maritime people to have planted
colonies, in the remote past, along the headlands and shores of the Gulf
of Mexico, spreading thence, in time, to the tablelands of Mexico and to
the plains and mountains of New Mexico and Colorado, what would be more
natural than that these adventurous navigators, passing around the
shores of the Gulf, should, sooner or later, discover the mouth of the
Mississippi River; and what more certain than that they would enter it,
explore it, and plant colonies along its shores, wherever they found a
fertile soil and a salubrious climate. Their outlying provinces would
penetrate even into regions where the severity of the climate would
prevent great density of population or development of civilization.

The results we have presupposed are precisely those which we find to
have existed at one time in the Mississippi Valley.

The Mound Builders of the United States were pre-eminently a river
people. Their densest settlements and greatest works were near the
Mississippi and its tributaries. Says Foster ("Prehistoric Races," p.
110), "The navigable streams were the great highways of the Mound
Builders."

Mr. Fontaine claims ("How the World was Peopled") that this ancient
people constructed "levees" to control and utilize the bayous of the
Mississippi for the purpose of agriculture and commerce. The Yazoo River
is called Yazoo-okhinnah--the River of Ancient Ruins. "There is no
evidence that they had reached the Atlantic coast; no authentic remains
of the Mound Builders are found in the New England States, nor even in
the State of New York." ("North Americans of Antiquity," p. 28.) This
would indicate that the civilization of this people advanced up the
Mississippi River and spread out over its tributaries, but did not cross
the Alleghany {sic} Mountains. They reached, however, far up the
Missouri and Yellowstone rivers, and thence into Oregon. The head-waters
of the Missouri became one of their great centres of population; but
their chief sites were upon the Mississippi and Ohio rivers. In
Wisconsin we find the northern central limit of their work; they seem to
have occupied the southern counties of the State, and the western shores
of Lake Michigan. Their circular mounds are found in Minnesota and Iowa,
and some very large ones in Dakota. Illinois and Indiana were densely
populated by them: it is believed that the vital centre of their
colonies was near the junction of the Ohio and Mississippi rivers.

The chief characteristic of the Mound Builders was that from which they
derived their name-the creation of great structures of earth or stone,
not unlike the pyramids of Mexico and Egypt. Between Alton and East St.
Louis is the great mound of Cahokia, which may be selected as a type of
their works: it rises ninety-seven feet high, while its square sides are
700 and 500 feet respectively. There was a terrace on the south side 160
by 300 feet, reached by a graded way; the summit of the pyramid is
flattened, affording a platform 200 by 450 feet. It will thus be seen
that the area covered by the mound of Cahokia is about as large as that
of the greatest pyramid of Egypt, Cheops, although its height is much
less.

The number of monuments left by the Mound Builders is extraordinarily
great. In Ohio alone there are more than ten thousand tumuli, and from
one thousand to fifteen hundred enclosures. Their mounds were not cones
but four-sided pyramids-their sides, like those of the Egyptian
pyramids, corresponding with the cardinal points. (Foster's "Prehistoric
Races," p. 112.)

The Mound Builders had attained a considerable degree of civilization;
they were able to form, in the construction of their works, perfect
circles and perfect squares of great accuracy, carried over the varying
surface of the country. One large enclosure comprises exactly forty
acres. At Hopetown, Ohio, are two walled figures--one a square, the
other a circle--each containing precisely twenty acres. They must have
possessed regular scales of measurement, and the means of determining
angles and of computing the area to be enclosed by the square and the
circle, so that the space enclosed by each might exactly correspond.

"The most skilful engineer of this day would find it difficult," says
Mr. Squier, "without the aid of instruments, to lay down an accurate
square of the great dimensions above represented, measuring, as they do,
more than four-fifths of a mile in circumference. . . . But we not only
find accurate squares and perfect circles, but also, as we have seen,
octagons of great dimensions."

They also possessed an accurate system of weights; bracelets of copper
on the arms of a skeleton have been found to be of uniform size,
measuring each two and nine-tenth inches, and each weighing precisely
four ounces.

They built great military works surrounded by walls and ditches, with
artificial lakes in the centre to supply water. One work, Fort Ancient,
on the Little Miami River, Ohio, has a circuit of between four and five
miles; the embankment was twenty feet high; the fort could have held a
garrison of sixty thousand men with their families and provisions.

Not only do we find pyramidal structures of earth in the Mississippi
Valley very much like the pyramids of Egypt, Mexico, and Peru, but a
very singular structure is repeated in Ohio and Peru: I refer to the
double walls or prolonged pyramids, if I may coin an expression, shown
in the cut page 375.

                      GRAND WAY NEAR PIKETON, OHIO.

The Mound Builders possessed chains of fortifications reaching from the
southern line of New York diagonally across the country, through Central
and Northern Ohio to the Wabash. It would appear probable, therefore,
that while they

                        WALLS AT GRAN-CHIMU, PERU.

advanced from the south it was from the north-east the savage races came
who drove them south or exterminated them.

At Marietta, Ohio, we find a combination of the cross and pyramid., (See
p. 334, ante.) At Newark, Ohio, are extensive

                      CROSS AND PYRAMID MOUND, OHIO.

and intricate works: they occupy an area two miles square, embraced
within embankments twelve miles long. One of the mounds is a threefold
symbol, like a bird's foot; the central mound is 155 feet long, and the
other two each 110 feet it length. Is this curious design a reminiscence
of Atlantis and the three-pronged trident of Poseidon? (See 4th fig., p,
242, ante.)

The Mound Builders made sun-dried brick mixed with rushes, as the
Egyptians made sun-dried bricks mixed with straw; they worked in copper,
silver, lead, and there are evidences, as we shall see, that they
wrought even in iron.

Copper implements are very numerous in the mounds. Copper axes,
spear-heads, hollow buttons, bosses for ornaments, bracelets, rings,
etc., are found in very many of them strikingly similar to those of the
Bronze Age in Europe. In one in Butler County, Ohio, was found a copper
fillet around the head of a skeleton, with strange devices marked upon
it.

Silver ornaments have also been found, but not in such great numbers.
They seem to have attached a high value to silver, and it is often found
in thin sheets, no thicker than paper, wrapped over copper or stone
ornaments so neatly as almost to escape detection. The great esteem in
which they held a metal so intrinsically valueless as silver, is another
evidence that they must have drawn their superstitions from the same
source as the European nations.

Copper is also often found in this manner plated over stone pipes,
presenting an unbroken metallic lustre, the overlapping edges so well
polished as to be scarcely discoverable. Beads and stars made of shells
have sometimes been found doubly plated, first with copper then with
silver.

The Mound Builders also understood the art of casting metals, or they
held intercourse with some race who did; a copper axe it "cast" has been
found in the State of New York. (See Lubbock's "Prehistoric Times," p.
254, note.) Professor Foster ("Prehistoric Races," p. 259) also proves
that the ancient people of the Mississippi Valley possessed this art,
and he gives us representations of various articles plainly showing the
marks of the mould upon them.

A rude article in the shape of an axe, composed of pure lead, weighing
about half a pound, was found in sinking a well within the trench of the
ancient works at Circleville. There can be no doubt it was the
production of the Mound Builders, as galena has often been found on the
altars in the mounds.

It has been generally thought, by Mr. Squier and others, that there were
no evidences that the Mound Builders were acquainted with the use of
iron, or that their plating was more than a simple overlaying of one
metal on another, or on some foreign substance.

Some years since, however, a mound was opened at Marietta, Ohio, which
seems to have refuted these opinions. Dr. S. P. Hildreth, in a letter to
the American Antiquarian Society, thus speaks of it:

"Lying immediately over or on the forehead of the body were found three
large circular bosses, or ornaments for a sword-belt or buckler; they
are composed of copper overlaid with a thick plate of silver. The fronts
are slightly convex, with a depression like a cup in the centre, and
they measure two inches and a quarter across the face of each. On the
back side, opposite the depressed portion, is a copper rivet or nail,
around which are two separate plates by which they were fastened to the
leather. Two small pieces of leather were found lying between the plates
of one of the bosses; they resemble the skin of a mummy, and seem to
have been preserved by the salts of copper. Near the side of the body
was found a plate of silver, which appears to have been the upper part
of a sword scabbard; it is six inches in length, two in breadth, and
weighs one ounce. It seems to have been fastened to the scabbard by
three or four rivets, the holes of which remain in the silver.

"Two or three pieces of copper tube were also found, filled with iron
rust. These pieces, from their appearance, composed the lower end of the
scabbard, near the point of the sword. No signs of the sword itself were
discovered, except the rust above mentioned.

"The mound had every appearance of being as old as any in the
neighborhood, and was at the first settlement of Marietta covered with
large trees. It seems to have been made for this single personage, as
this skeleton alone was discovered. The bones were very much decayed,
and many of them crumbled to dust upon exposure to the air."

Mr. Squier says, "These articles have been critically examined, and it
is beyond doubt that the copper bosses were absolutely plated, not
simply overlaid, with silver. Between the copper and the silver exists a
connection such as, it seems to me, could only be produced by heat; and
if it is admitted that. these are genuine relies of the Mound Builders,
it must, at the same time, be admitted that they possessed the difficult
art of plating one metal upon another. There is but one alternative,
viz., that they had occasional or constant intercourse with a people
advanced in the arts, from whom these articles were obtained. Again, if
Dr. Hildreth is not mistaken, oxydized iron or steel was also discovered
in connection with the above remains, from which also follows the
extraordinary conclusion that the Mound Builders were acquainted with
the use of iron, the conclusion being, of course, subject to the
improbable alternative already mentioned."

In connection with this subject, we would refer to the interesting
evidences that the copper mines of the shore of Lake Superior had been
at some very remote period worked by the Mound Builders. There were
found deep excavations, with rude ladders, huge masses of rock broken
off, also numerous stone tools, and all the evidences of extensive and
long-continued labor. It is even said that the great Ontonagon mass of
pure copper which is now in Washington was excavated by these ancient
miners, and that when first found its surface showed numerous marks of
their tools.

There seems to be no doubt, then, that the Mound Builders were familiar
with the use of copper, silver, and lead, and in all probability of
iron. They possessed various mechanical contrivances. They were very
probably acquainted with the lathe. Beads of shell have been found
looking very much like ivory, and showing the circular striae, identical
with those produced by turning in a lathe.

In a mound on the Scioto River was found around the neck of a skeleton
triple rows of beads, made of marine shells and the tusks of some
animal. "Several of these," says Squier, "still retain their polish, and
bear marks which seem to indicate that they were turned in some machine,
instead of being carved or rubbed into shape by hand."

"Not among the least interesting and remarkable relies," continues the
same author, "obtained from the mounds are the stone tubes. They are all
carved from fine-grained materials, capable of receiving a polish, and
being made ornamental as well as useful. The finest specimen yet
discovered, and which can scarcely be surpassed in the delicacy of its
workmanship, was found in a mound in the immediate vicinity of
Chillicothe. It is composed of a compact variety of slate. This stone
cuts with great clearness, and receives a fine though not glaring
polish. The tube under notice is thirteen inches long by one and
one-tenth in diameter; one end swells slightly, and the other terminates
in a broad, flattened, triangular mouth-piece of fine proportions, which
is carved with mathematical precision. It is drilled throughout; the
bore is seven-tenths of an inch in diameter at the cylindrical end of
the tube, and retains that calibre until it reaches the point where the
cylinder subsides into the mouth-piece, when it contracts gradually to
one-tenth of an inch. The inner surface of the tube is perfectly smooth
till within a short distance of the point of contraction. For the
remaining distance the circular striae, formed by the drill in boring,
are distinctly marked. The carving upon it is very fine."

That they possessed saws is proved by the fact that on some fossil teeth
found in one of the mounds the striae of the teeth of the saw could be
distinctly perceived.

When we consider that some of their porphyry carvings will turn the edge
of the best-tempered knife, we are forced to conclude that they
possessed that singular process, known to the Mexicans and Peruvians of
tempering copper to the hardness of steel.

We find in the mounds adzes similar in shape to our own, with the edges
bevelled from the inside.

Drills and gravers of copper have also been found, with chisel-shaped
edges or sharp points.

"It is not impossible," says Squier, "but, on the contrary, very
probable, from a close inspection of the mound pottery, that the ancient
people possessed the simple approximation toward the potter's wheel; and
the polish which some of the finer vessels possess is due to other
causes than vitrification."

Their sculptures show a considerable degree of progress. They consist of
figures of birds, animals, reptiles, and the faces of men, carved from
various kinds of stones, upon the bowls of pipes, upon toys, upon rings,
and in distinct and separate figures. We give the opinions of those who
have examined them.

Mr. Squier observes: "Various though not abundant specimens of their
skill have been recovered, which in elegance of model, delicacy, and
finish, as also in fineness of material, come fully up to the best
Peruvian specimens, to which they bear, in many respects, a close
resemblance. The bowls of most of the stone pipes are carved in
miniature figures of animals, birds, reptiles, etc. All of them are
executed with strict fidelity to nature, and with exquisite skill. Not
only are the features of the objects faithfully represented, but their
peculiarities and habits. are in some degree exhibited. . . . The two
heads here presented, intended to represent the eagle, are far superior
in point of finish, spirit, and truthfulness, to any miniature carvings,
ancient or modern, which have fallen under the notice of the authors.
The peculiar defiant expression of the king of birds is admirably
preserved in the carving, which in this respect, more than any other,
displays the skill of the artist."

                    FROM THE MOUNDS OF THE OHIO VALLEY

Traces of cloth with "doubled and twisted fibre" have been found in the
mounds; also matting; also shuttle-like tablets, used in weaving. There
have also been found numerous musical pipes, with mouth-pieces and
stops; lovers' pipes, curiously and delicately carved, reminding us of
Bryant's lines--

     "Till twilight came, and lovers walked and wooed
     In a forgotten language; and old tunes,
     From instruments of unremembered forms,
     Gave the soft winds a voice."

There is evidence which goes to prove that the Mound Builders had
relations with the people of a semi-tropical region in the direction of
Atlantis, Among their sculptures, in Ohio, we find accurate
representations of the lamantine, manatee, or sea-cow--found to-day on
the shores of Florida, Brazil, and Central America--and of the toucan, a
tropical and almost exclusively South American bird. Sea-shells from the
Gulf, pearls from the Atlantic, and obsidian from Mexico, have also been
found side by side in their mounds.

The antiquity of their works is now generally conceded. "From the ruins
of Nineveh and Babylon," says Mr. Gliddon, "we have bones of at least
two thousand five hundred years old; from the pyramids and the catacombs
of Egypt both mummied and unmummied crania have been taken, of still
higher antiquity, in perfect preservation; nevertheless, the skeletons
deposited in our Indian mounds, from the Lakes to the Gulf, are
crumbling into dust through age alone."

All the evidence points to the conclusion that civilized or
semi-civilized man has dwelt on the western continent from a vast
antiquity. Maize, tobacco, quinoa, and the mandico plants have been
cultivated so long that their wild originals have quite disappeared.

"The only species of palm cultivated by the South American Indians, that
known as the Gulielma speciosa, has lost through that culture its
original nut-like seed, and is dependent on the hands of its cultivators
for its life. Alluding to the above-named plants Dr. Brinton ("Myths of
the New World," p. 37) remarks, 'Several are sure to perish unless
fostered by human care. What numberless ages does this suggest? How many
centuries elapsed ere man thought of cultivating Indian corn? How many
more ere it had spread over nearly a hundred degrees of latitude and
lost all resemblance to its original form?' In the animal kingdom
certain animals were domesticated by the aborigines from so remote a
period that scarcely any of their species, as in the case of the lama of
Peru, were to be found in a state of unrestrained freedom at the advent
of the Spaniards." (Short's "North Americans of Antiquity," p. 11.)

The most ancient remains of man found in Europe are distinguished by a
flattening of the tibia; and this peculiarity is found to be present in
an exaggerated form in some of the American mounds. This also points to
a high antiquity.

"None of the works, mounds, or enclosures are found on the lowest formed
of the river terraces which mark the subsidence of the streams, and as
there is no good reason why their builders should have avoided erecting
them on that terrace while they raised them promiscuously on all the
others, it follows, not unreasonably, that this terrace has been formed
since the works were erected." (Baldwin's "Ancient America," p. 47.)

We have given some illustrations showing the similarity between the
works of the Mound Builders and those of the Stone and Bronze Age in
Europe. (See pp. 251, 260, 261, 262, 265, 266, ante.)

The Mound Builders retreated southward toward Mexico, and probably
arrived there some time between A.D. 29 and A.D. 231, under the name of
Nahuas. They called the region they left in the Mississippi Valley "Hue
Hue Tlapalan"--the old, old red land--in allusion, probably, to the
red-clay soil of part of the country.

In the mounds we find many works of copper but none of bronze. This may
indicate one of two things: either the colonies which settled the
Mississippi Valley may have left Atlantis prior to the discovery of the
art of manufacturing bronze, by mixing one part of tin with nine parts
of copper, or, which is more probable, the manufactures of the Mound
Builders may have been made on the spot; and as they had no tin within
their territory they used copper alone, except, it may be, for such
tools as were needed to carve stone, and these, perhaps, were hardened
with tin. It is known that the Mexicans possessed the art of
manufacturing true bronze; and the intercourse which evidently existed
between Mexico and the Mississippi Valley, as proved by the presence of
implements of obsidian in the mounds of Ohio, renders it probable that
the same commerce which brought them obsidian brought them also small
quantities of tin, or tin-hardened copper implements necessary for their
sculptures.

The proofs, then, of the connection of the Mound Builders with Atlantis
are:

1. Their race identity with the nations of Central America who possessed
Flood legends, and whose traditions all point to an eastern, over-sea
origin; while the many evidences of their race identity with the ancient
Peruvians indicate that they were part of one great movement of the
human race, extending from the Andes to Lake Superior, and, as I
believe, from Atlantis to India.

2. The similarity of their civilization, and their works of stone and
bronze, with the civilization of the Bronze Age in Europe.

3. The presence of great truncated mounds, kindred to the pyramids of
Central America, Mexico, Egypt, and India.

4. The representation of tropical animals, which point to an intercourse
with the regions around the Gulf of Mexico, where the Atlanteans were
colonized.

5. The fact that the settlements of the Mound Builders were confined to
the valley of the Mississippi, and were apparently densest at those
points where a population advancing up that, stream would first reach
high, healthy, and fertile lands.

6. The hostile nations which attacked them came from the north; and when
the Mound Builders could no longer hold the country, or when Atlantis
stink in the sea, they retreated in the direction whence they came, and
fell back upon their kindred races in Central America, as the Roman
troops in Gaul and Britain drew southward upon the destruction of Rome.

7. The Natchez Indians, who are supposed to have descended from the
Mound Builders, kept a perpetual fire burning before an altar, watched
by old men who were a sort of priesthood, as in Europe.

8. If the tablet said to have been found in a mound near Davenport,
Iowa, is genuine, which appears probable, the Mound Builders must either
have possessed an alphabet, or have held intercourse with some people
who did. (See "North Americans of Antiquity," p. 38.) This singular
relic exhibits what appears to be a sacrificial mound with a fire upon
it; over it are the sun, moon, and stars, and above these a mass of
hieroglyphics which bear some resemblance to the letters of European
alphabets, and especially to that unknown alphabet which appears upon
the inscribed bronze celt found near Rome. (See p. 258 of this work.)
For instance, one of the letters on the celt is this, ###; on the
Davenport tablet we find this sign, ###; on the celt we have ###; on the
tablet, ###; on the celt we have ###; on the tablet, ###.

CHAPTER IV.

THE IBERIAN COLONIES OF ATLANTIS

At the farthest point in the past to which human knowledge extends a
race called Iberian inhabited the entire peninsula of Spain, from the
Mediterranean to the Pyrenees. They also extended over the southern part
of Gaul as far as the Rhone.

"It is thought that the Iberians from Atlantis and the north-west part
of Africa," says Winchell, "settled in the Southwest of Europe at a
period earlier than the settlement of the Egyptians in the north-east of
Africa. The Iberians spread themselves over Spain, Gaul, and the British
Islands as early as 4000 or 5000 B.C. . . . The fourth dynasty (of the
Egyptians), according to Brugsch, dates from about 3500 B.C. At this
time the Iberians had become sufficiently powerful to attempt the
conquest of the known world." ("Preadamites," p. 443.)

"The Libyan-Amazons of Diodorus--that is to say, the Libyans of the
Iberian race--must be identified with the Libyans with brown and grizzly
skin, of whom Brugsch has already pointed out the representations
figured on the Egyptian monuments of the fourth dynasty." (Ibid.)

The Iberians, known as Sicanes, colonized Sicily in the ancient days.
They were the original settlers in Italy and Sardinia. They are probably
the source of the dark-haired stock in Norway and Sweden. Bodichon
claims that the Iberians embraced the Ligurians, Cantabrians, Asturians,
and Aquitanians. Strabo says, speaking of the Turduli and Turdetani,
"they are the most cultivated of all the Iberians; they employ the art
of writing, and have written books containing memorials of ancient
times, and also poems and laws set in verse, for which they claim an
antiquity of six thousand years." (Strabo, lib. iii., p. 139.)

The Iberians are represented to-day by the Basques.

The Basque are "of middle size, compactly built, robust and agile, of a
darker complexion than the Spaniards, with gray eyes and black hair.
They are simple but proud, impetuous, merry, and hospitable. The women
are beautiful, skilful in performing men's work, and remarkable for
their vivacity and grace. The Basques are much attached to dancing, and
are very fond of the music of the bagpipe." ("New American Cyclopaedia,"
art. Basques.)

"According to Paul Broca their language stands quite alone, or has mere
analogies with the American type. Of all Europeans, we must
provisionally hold the Basques to be the oldest inhabitants of our
quarter of the world." (Peschel, "Races of Men," p. 501.)

The Basque language--the Euscara--"has some common traits with the
Magyar, Osmanli, and other dialects of the Altai family, as, for
instance, with the Finnic on the old continent, as well as the
Algonquin-Lenape language and some others in America." ("New American
Cyclopaedia," art. Basques.)

Duponceau says of the Basque tongue:

"This language, preserved in a corner of Europe by a few thousand
mountaineers, is the sole remaining fragment of, perhaps, a hundred
dialects constructed on the same plan, which probably existed and were
universally spoken at a remote period in that quarter of the world. Like
the bones of the mammoth, it remains a monument of the destruction
produced by a succession of ages. It stands single and alone of its
kind, Surrounded by idioms that have no affinity with it."

We have seen them settling, in the earliest ages, in Ireland. They also
formed the base of the dark-haired population of England and Scotland.
They seem to have race affinities with the Berbers, on the Mediterranean
coast of Africa.

Dr. Bodichon, for fifteen years a surgeon in Algiers, says:

"Persons who have inhabited Brittany, and then go to Algeria, are struck
with the resemblance between the ancient Armoricans (the Bretons) and
the Cabyles (of Algiers). In fact, the moral and physical character is
identical. The Breton of pure blood has a long head, light yellow
complexion of bistre tinge, eyes black or brown, stature short, and the
black hair of the Cabyle. Like him, he instinctively hates strangers; in
both are the same perverseness and obstinacy, same endurance of fatigue,
same love of independence, same inflexion of the voice, same expression
of feelings. Listen to a Cabyle speaking his native tongue, and you will
think you bear a Breton talking Celtic."

The Bretons, he tells us, form a strong contrast to the people around
them, who are "Celts of tall stature, with blue eyes, white skins, and
blond hair: they are communicative, impetuous, versatile; they pass
rapidly from courage to despair. The Bretons are entirely different:
they are taciturn, hold strongly to their ideas and usages, are
persevering and melancholic; in a word, both in morale and physique they
present the type of a southern race--of the Atlanteans."

By Atlanteans Dr. Bodichon refers to the inhabitants of the Barbary
States--that being one of the names by which they were known to the
Greeks and Romans. He adds:

"The Atlanteans, among the ancients, passed for the favorite children of
Neptune; they made known the worship of this god to other nations-to the
Egyptians, for example. In other words, the Atlanteans were the first
known navigators. Like all navigators, they must have planted colonies
at a distance. The Bretons, in our opinion, sprung from one of them."

Neptune was Poseidon, according to Plato, founder of Atlantis.

I could multiply proofs of the close relationship between the people of
the Bronze Age of Europe and the ancient inhabitants of Northern Africa,
which should be read remembering that "connecting ridge" which,
according to the deep-sea soundings, united Africa and Atlantis.

CHAPTER V.

THE PERUVIAN COLONY.

If we look at the map of Atlantis, as revealed by the deep sea
soundings, we will find that it approaches at one point, by its
connecting ridge, quite closely to the shore of South. America, above
the mouth of the Amazon, and that probably it was originally connected
with it.

If the population of Atlantis expanded westwardly, it naturally found
its way in its ships up the magnificent valley of the Amazon and its
tributaries; and, passing by the low and fever-stricken lands of Brazil,
it rested not until it had reached the high, fertile, beautiful, and
healthful regions of Bolivia, from which it would eventually cross the
mountains into Peru.

Here it would establish its outlying colonies at the terminus of its
western line of advance, arrested only by the Pacific Ocean, precisely
as we have seen it advancing up the valley of the Mississippi, and
carrying on its mining operations on the shores of Lake Superior;
precisely as we have seen it going eastward up the Mediterranean, past
the Dardanelles, and founding Aryan, Hamitic, and probably Turanian
colonies on the farther shores of the Black Sea and on the Caspian. This
is the universal empire over which, the Hindoo books tell us, Deva
Nahusha was ruler; this was "the great and aggressive empire" to which
Plato alludes; this was the mighty kingdom, embracing the whole of the
then known world, from which the Greeks obtained their conception of the
universal father of all men in King Zeus. And in this universal empire
Senor Lopez must find an explanation of the similarity which, as we
shall show, exists between the speech of the South American Pacific
coast on the one hand, and the speech of Gaul, Ireland, England, Italy,
Greece, Bactria, and Hindostan on the other.

Montesino tells us that at some time near the date of the Deluge, in
other words, in the highest antiquity, America was invaded by a people
with four leaders, named Ayar-manco-topa, Ayar-chaki, Ayar-aucca, and
Ayar-uyssu. "Ayar," says Senor Lopez, "is the Sanscrit Ajar, or aje, and
means primitive chief; and manco, chaki, aucca, and uyssu, mean
believers, wanderers, soldiers, husbandmen. We have here a tradition of
castes like that preserved in the four tribal names of Athens." The
laboring class (naturally enough in a new colony) obtained the
supremacy, and its leader was named Pirhua-manco, revealer of Pir, light
(pu~r, Umbrian pir). Do the laws which control the changes of language,
by which a labial succeeds a labial, indicate that the Mero or Merou of
Theopompus, the name of Atlantis, was carried by the colonists of
Atlantis to South America (as the name of old York was transplanted in a
later age to New York), and became in time Perou or Peru? Was not the
Nubian "Island of Merou," with its pyramids built by "red men," a
similar transplantation? And when the Hindoo priest points to his sacred
emblem with five projecting points upon it, and tells us that they
typify "Mero and the four quarters of the world," does he not refer to
Atlantis and its ancient universal empire?

Manco, in the names of the Peruvian colonists, it has been urged, was
the same as Mannus, Manu, and the Santhal Maniko. It reminds us of
Menes, Minos, etc., who are found at the beginning of so many of the Old
World traditions.

The Quichuas--this invading people--were originally a fair skinned race,
with blue eyes and light and even auburn hair; they had regular
features, large heads, and large bodies. Their descendants are to this
day an olive-skinned people, much lighter in color than the Indian
tribes subjugated by them.

They were a great race. Peru, as it was known to the Spaniards, held
very much the same relation to the ancient Quichua civilization as
England in the sixteenth century held to the civilization of the empire
of the Caesars. The Incas were simply an offshoot, who, descending from
the mountains, subdued the rude races of the sea-coast, and imposed
their ancient civilization upon them.

The Quichua nation extended at one time over a region of country more
than two thousand miles long. This whole region, when the Spaniards
arrived, "was a populous and prosperous empire, complete in its civil
organization, supported by an efficient system of industry, and
presenting a notable development of some of the more important arts of
civilized life." (Baldwin's "Ancient America," p. 222.)

The companions of Pizarro found everywhere the evidences of a
civilization of vast antiquity. Cieca de Leon mentions "great edifices"
that were in ruins at Tiahuanaca, "an artificial hill raised on a
groundwork of stone," and "two stone idols, apparently made by skilful
artificers," ten or twelve feet high, clothed in long robes. "In this
place, also," says De Leon, "there are stones so large and so overgrown
that our wonder is excited, it being incomprehensible how the power of
man could have placed them where we see them. They are variously
wrought, and some of them, having the form of men, must have been idols.
Near the walls are many caves and excavations under the earth; but in
another place, farther west, are other and greater monuments, such as
large gate-ways with hinges, platforms, and porches, each made of a
single stone. It surprised me to see these enormous gate-ways, made of
great masses of stone, some of which were thirty feet long, fifteen
high, and six thick."

The capital of the Chimus of Northern Peru at Gran-Chimu was conquered
by the Incas after a long and bloody struggle, and the capital was given
up to barbaric ravage and spoliation. But its remains exist to-day, the
marvel of the Southern Continent, covering not less than twenty square
miles. Tombs. temples, and palaces arise on every hand, ruined but still
traceable. Immense pyramidal structures, some of them half a mile in
circuit; vast areas shut in by massive walls, each containing its
water-tank, its shops, municipal edifices, and the dwellings of its
inhabitants, and each a branch of a larger organization; prisons,
furnaces for smelting metals, and almost every concomitant of
civilization, existed in the ancient Chimu capital. One of the great
pyramids, called the "Temple of the Sun," is 812 feet long by 470 wide,
and 150 high. These vast structures have been ruined for centuries, but
still the work of excavation is going on.

One of the centres of the ancient Quichua civilization was around Lake
Titicaca. The buildings here, as throughout Peru, were all constructed
of hewn stone, and had doors and windows with posts, sills, and
thresholds of stone.

At Cuelap, in Northern Peru, remarkable ruins were found. "They consist
of a wall of wrought stones 3600 feet long, 560 broad, and 150 high,
constituting a solid mass with a level summit. On this mass was another
600 feet long, 500 broad, and 150 high," making an aggregate height of
three hundred feet! In it were rooms and cells which were used as tombs.

Very ancient ruins, showing remains of large and remarkable edifices,
were found near Huamanga, and described by Cieca de Leon. The native
traditions said this city was built "by bearded white men, who came
there long before the time of the Incas, and established a settlement."

"The Peruvians made large use of aqueducts, which they built with
notable skill, using hewn stones and cement, and making them very
substantial." One extended four hundred and fifty miles across sierras
and over rivers. Think of a stone aqueduct reaching from the city of New
York to the State of North Carolina!

The public roads of the Peruvians were most remarkable; they were built
on masonry. One of the-se roads ran along the mountains through the
whole length of the empire, from Quito to Chili; another, starting from
this at Cuzco, went down to the coast, and extended northward to the
equator. These roads were from twenty to twenty-five feet wide, were
macadamized with pulverized stone mixed with lime and bituminous cement,
and were walled in by strong walls "more than a fathom in thickness." In
many places these roads were cut for leagues through the rock; great
ravines were filled up with solid masonry; rivers were crossed by
suspension bridges, used here ages before their introduction into
Europe. Says Baldwin, "The builders of our Pacific Railroad, with their
superior engineering skill and mechanical appliances, might reasonably
shrink from the cost and the difficulties of such a work as this.
Extending from one degree north of Quito to Cuzco, and from Cuzco to
Chili, it was quite as long as the two Pacific railroads, and its wild
route among the mountains was far more difficult." Sarmiento, describing
it, said, "It seems to me that if the emperor (Charles V.) should see
fit to order the construction of another road like that which leads from
Quito to Cuzco, or that which from Cuzco goes toward Chili, I certainly
think be would not be able to make it, with all his power." Humboldt
said, "This road was marvellous; none of the Roman roads I had seen in
Italy, in the south of France, or in Spain, appeared to me more imposing
than this work of the ancient Peruvians."

Along these great roads caravansaries were established for the
accommodation of travellers.

These roads were ancient in the time of the Incas. They were the work of
the white, auburn-haired, bearded men from Atlantis, thousands of years
before the time of the Incas. When Huayna Capac marched his army over
the main road to invade Quito, it was so old and decayed "that he found
great difficulties in the passage," and he immediately ordered the
necessary reconstructions.

It is not necessary, in a work of this kind, to give a detailed
description of the arts and civilization of the Peruvians.. They were
simply marvellous. Their works in cotton and wool exceeded in fineness
anything known in Europe at that time. They had carried irrigation,
agriculture, and the cutting of gems to a point equal to that of the Old
World. Their accumulations of the precious metals exceeded anything
previously known in the history of the world. In the course of
twenty-five years after the Conquest the Spaniards sent from Peru to
Spain more than eight hundred millions of dollars of gold, nearly all of
it taken from the Peruvians as "booty." In one of their palaces "they
had an artificial garden, the soil of which was made of small pieces of
fine gold, and this was artificially planted with different kinds of
maize, which were of gold, their stems, leaves, and cars. Besides this,
they had more than twenty sheep (llamas) with their lambs, attended by
shepherds, all made of gold." In a description of one lot of golden
articles, sent to Spain in 1534 by Pizarro, there is mention of "four
llamas, ten statues of women of full size, and a cistern of gold, so
curious that it excited the wonder of all."

Can any one read these details and declare Plato's description of
Atlantis to be fabulous, simply because he tells us of the enormous
quantities of gold and silver possessed by the people? Atlantis was the
older country, the parent country, the more civilized country; and,
doubtless, like the Peruvians, its people regarded the precious metals
as sacred to their gods; and they had been accumulating them from all
parts of the world for countless ages. If the story of Plato is true,
there now lies beneath the waters of the Atlantic, covered, doubtless,
by hundreds of feet of volcanic debris, an amount of gold and silver
exceeding many times that brought to Europe from Peru, Mexico, and
Central America since the time of Columbus; a treasure which, if brought
to light, would revolutionize the financial values of the world.

I have already shown, in the chapter upon the similarities between the
civilizations of the Old and New Worlds, some of the remarkable
coincidences which existed between the Peruvians and the ancient
European races; I will again briefly, refer to a few of them:

1. They worshipped the sun, moon, and planets.

2. They believed in the immortality of the soul.

3. They believed in the resurrection of the body, and accordingly
embalmed their dead.

4. The priest examined the entrails of the animals offered in sacrifice,
and, like the Roman augurs, divined the future from their appearance.

5. They had an order of women vowed to celibacy-vestal virgins-nuns; and
a violation of their vow was punished, in both continents, by their
being buried alive.

6. They divided the year into twelve months.

7. Their enumeration was by tens; the people were divided into decades
and hundreds, like the Anglo-Saxons; and the whole nation into bodies of
500, 1000, and 10,000, with a governor over each.

8. They possessed castes; and the trade of the father descended to the
son, as in India.

9. They had bards and minstrels, who sung at the great festivals.

10. Their weapons were the same as those of the Old World, and made
after the same pattern.

11. They drank toasts and invoked blessings.

12. They built triumphal arches for their returning heroes, and strewed
the road before them with leaves and flowers.

13. They used sedan-chairs.

14. They regarded agriculture as the principal interest of the nation,
and held great agricultural fairs and festivals for the interchange of
the productions of the farmers.

15. The king opened the agricultural season by a great celebration, and,
like the kings of Egypt, be put his hand to the plough, and ploughed the
first furrow.

16. They had an order of knighthood, in which the candidate knelt before
the king; his sandals were put on by a nobleman, very much as the spurs
were buckled on the European knight; he was then allowed to use the
girdle or sash around the loins, corresponding to the toga virilis of
the Romans; he was then crowned with flowers. According to Fernandez,
the candidates wore white shirts, like the knights of the Middle Ages,
with a cross embroidered in front.

17. There was a striking resemblance between the architecture of the
Peruvians and that of some of the nations of the Old World. It is enough
for me to quote Mr. Ferguson's words, that the coincidence between the
buildings of the Incas and the Cyclopean remains attributed to the
Pelasgians in Italy and Greece, "is the most remarkable in the history
of architecture."

                     OWL-HEADED VASES, TROY AND PERU

The illustrations on page 397 strikingly confirm Mr. Ferguson's views.

"The sloping jambs, the window cornice, the polygonal masonry, and other
forms so closely resemble what is found in the old Pelasgic cities of
Greece and Italy, that it is difficult to resist the conclusion that
there may be some relation between them."

Even the mode of decorating their palaces and temples finds a parallel
in the Old World. A recent writer says:

"We may end by observing, what seems to have escaped Senor Lopez, that
the interior of an Inca palace, with its walls covered with gold, as
described by Spaniards, with its artificial golden flowers and golden
beasts, must have been exactly like the interior of the house of
Alkinous or Menelaus--

     "'The doors were framed of gold,
     Where underneath the brazen floor doth glass
     Silver pilasters, which with grace uphold
     Lintel of silver framed; the ring was burnished gold,
     And dogs on each side of the door there stand,
     Silver and golden.'"

"I can personally testify" (says Winchell, "Preadamites," p. 387) "that
a study of ancient Peruvian pottery has constantly reminded me of forms
with which we are familiar in Egyptian archaeology."

Dr. Schliemann, in his excavations of the ruins of Troy, found a number
of what he calls "owl-headed idols" and vases. I give specimens on page
398 and page 400.

In Peru we find vases with very much the same style of face.

I might pursue those parallels much farther; but it seems to me that
these extraordinary coincidences must have arisen either from identity
of origin or long-continued ancient intercourse. There can be little
doubt that a fair-skinned, light-haired, bearded race, holding the
religion which Plato says prevailed in Atlantis, carried an Atlantean
civilization at an early day up the valley of the Amazon to the heights
of Bolivia and Peru, precisely as a similar emigration of Aryans went
westward to the shores of the Mediterranean and Caspian, and it is very
likely that these diverse migrations habitually spoke the same language.

Senor Vincente Lopez, a Spanish gentleman of Montevideo, in 1872
published a work entitled "Les Races Aryennes in Perou," in which he
attempts to prove that the great Quichua language, which the Incas
imposed on their subjects over a vast extent of territory, and which is
still a living tongue in Peru and Bolivia, is really a branch of the
great Aryan or Indo-European speech. I quote Andrew Lang's summary of
the proofs on this point:

                          OWL-HEADED VASE, TROY

"Senor Lopez's view, that the Peruvians were Aryans who left the parent
stock long before the Teutonic or Hellenic races entered Europe, is
supported by arguments drawn from language, from the traces of
institutions, from religious beliefs, from legendary records, and
artistic remains. The evidence from language is treated scientifically,
and not as a kind of ingenious guessing. Senor Lopez first combats the
idea that the living dialect of Peru is barbarous and fluctuating. It is
not one of the casual and shifting forms of speech produced by nomad
races. To which of the stages of language does this belong--the
agglutinative, in which one root is fastened on to another, and a word
is formed in which the constitutive elements are obviously distinct, or
the inflexional, where the auxiliary roots get worn down and are only
distinguishable by the philologist? As all known Aryan tongues are
inflexional, Senor Lopez may appear to contradict himself when be says
that Quichua is an agglutinative Aryan language. But he quotes Mr. Max
Mueller's opinion that there must have been a time when the germs of
Aryan tongues had not yet reached the inflexional stage, and shows that
while the form of Quichua is agglutinative, as in Turanian, the roots of
words are Aryan. If this be so, Quichua may be a linguistic missing link.

"When we first look at Quichua, with its multitude of words, beginning
with hu, and its great preponderance of q's, it seems almost as odd as
Mexican. But many of these forms are due to a scanty alphabet, and
really express familiar sounds; and many, again, result from the casual
spelling of the Spaniards. We must now examine some of the-forms which
Aryan roots are supposed to take in Quichua. In the first place, Quichua
abhors the shock of two consonants. Thus, a word like ple'w in Greek
would be unpleasant to the Peruvian's ear, and he says pillui, 'I sail.'
The plu, again, in pluma, a feather, is said to be found in pillu, 'to
fly.' Quichua has no v, any more than Greek has, and just as the Greeks
had to spell Roman words beginning with V with Ou, like
Valerius--Ou?ale'rios--so, where Sanscrit has v, Quichua has sometimes
hu. Here is a list of words in hu:

          +----------------------+----------------------------+
          | QUICHUA.             | SANSCRIT.                  |
          +----------------------+----------------------------+
          | Huakia, to call.     | Vacc, to speak.            |
          +----------------------+----------------------------+
          | Huasi, a house.      | Vas, to inhabit.           |
          +----------------------+----------------------------+
          | Huayra, air, au?'ra. | Va, to breathe.            |
          +----------------------+----------------------------+
          | Huasa, the back.     | Vas, to be able (pouvoir). |
          +----------------------+----------------------------+

"There is a Sanscrit root, kr, to act, to do: this root is found In more
than three hundred names of peoples and places in Southern America. Thus
there are the Caribs, whose name may have the same origin as that of our
old friends the Carians, and mean the Braves, and their land the home of
the Braves, like Kaleva-la, in Finnish. The same root gives kara, the
hand, the Greek xei'r, and kkalli, brave, which a person of fancy may
connect with kalo's. Again, Quichua has an 'alpha privative'--thus
A-stani means 'I change a thing's place;' for ni or mi is the first
person singular, and, added to the root of a verb, is the sign of the
first person of the present indicative. For instance, can means being,
and Can-mi, or Cani, is, 'I am.' In the same way Munanmi, or Munani, is
'I love,' and Apanmi, or Apani, 'I carry.' So Lord Strangford was wrong
when he supposed that the last verb in mi lived with the last patriot in
Lithuania. Peru has stores of a grammatical form which has happily
perished in Europe. It is impossible to do more than refer to the
supposed Aryan roots contained in the glossary, but it may be noticed
that the future of the Quichuan verb is formed in s-I love, Munani; I
shall love, Munasa--and that the affixes denoting cases in the noun are
curiously like the Greek prepositions."

The resemblance between the Quichua and Mandan words for I or
me--mi--will here be observed.

Very recently Dr. Rudolf Falb has announced (Neue Freie Presse, of
Vienna) that be has discovered that the relation of the Quichua and
Aimara languages to the Aryan and Semitic tongues is very close; that,
in fact, they "exhibit the most astounding affinities with the Semitic
tongue, and particularly the Arabic", in which tongue Dr. Falb has been
skilled from his boyhood. Following, up the lines of this discovery, Dr.
Falb has found (1) a connecting link with the Aryan roots, and (2) has
ultimately arrived face to face with the surprising revelation that "the
Semitic roots are universally Aryan." The common stems of all the
variants are found in their purest condition in Quichua and Aimara, from
which fact Dr. Falb derives the conclusion that the high plains of Peru
and Bolivia must be regarded as the point of exit of the present human
race.

[Since the above was written I have received a letter from Dr. Falb,
dated Leipsic, April 5th, 1881. Scholars will be glad to learn that Dr.
Falb's great work on the relationship of the Aryan and Semitic languages
to the Quichua and Aimara tongues will be published in a year or two;
the manuscript contains over two thousand pages, and Dr. Falb has
devoted to it ten years of study. A work from such a source, upon so
curious and important a subject, will be looked for with great interest.]

But it is impossible that the Quichuas and Aimaras could have passed
across the wide Atlantic to Europe if there had been no stepping-stone
in the shape of Atlantis with its bridge-like ridges connecting the two
continents.

It is, however, more reasonable to suppose that the Quichuas and Aimaras
were a race of emigrants from Plato's island than to think that Atlantis
was populated from South America. The very traditions to which we have
referred as existing among the Peruvians, that the civilized race were
white and bearded, and that they entered or invaded the country, would
show that civilization did not originate in Peru, but was a
transplantation from abroad, and only in the direction of Atlantis can
we look for a white and bearded race.

In fact, kindred races, with the same arts, and speaking the same tongue
in an early age of the world, separated in Atlantis and went east and
west--the one to repeat the civilization of the mother-country along the
shores of the Mediterranean Sea, which, like a great river, may be said
to flow out from the Black Sea, with the Nile as one of its tributaries,
and along the shores of the Red Sea and the Persian Gulf; while the
other emigration advanced up the Amazon, and created mighty nations upon
its head-waters in the valleys of the Andes and on the shores of the
Pacific.

CHAPTER VI.

THE AFRICAN COLONIES.

Africa, like Europe and America, evidences a commingling of different
stocks: the blacks are not all black, nor all woolly-haired; the
Africans pass through all shades, from that of a light Berber, no darker
than the Spaniard, to the deep black of the Iolofs, between Senegal and
Gambia.

The traces of red men or copper-colored races are found in many parts of
the continent. Prichard divides the true negroes into four classes; his
second class is thus described:

"2. Other tribes have forms and features like the European; their
complexion is black, or a deep olive, or a copper color approaching to
black, while their hair, though often crisp and frizzled, is not in the
least woolly. Such are the Bishari and Danekil and Hazorta, and the
darkest of the Abyssinians.

"The complexion and hair of the Abyssinians vary very much, their
complexion ranging from almost white to dark brown or black, and their
hair from straight to crisp, frizzled, and almost woolly." (Nott and
Gliddon, "Types of Mankind," p. 194.)

"Some of the Nubians are copper-colored or black, with a tinge of red."
(Ibid., p. 198.)

Speaking of the Barbary States, these authors further say (Ibid., p.
204):

"On the northern coast of Africa, between the Mediterranean and the
Great Desert, including Morocco, Algiers, Tunis, Tripoli, and Benzazi,
there is a continuous system of highlands, which have been included
under the general term Atlas--anciently Atlantis, now the Barbary
States. . . . Throughout Barbary we encounter a peculiar group of races,
subdivided into many tribes of various shades, now spread over a vast
area, but which formerly had its principal and perhaps aboriginal abode
along the mountain slopes of Atlas. . . . The real name of the Berbers
is Mazirgh, with the article prefixed or suffixed--T-amazirgh or
Amazirgh-T--meaning free, dominant, or 'noble race.' . . . We have every
reason to believe the Berbers existed in the remotest times, with all
their essential moral and physical peculiarities. . . . They existed in
the time of Menes in the same condition in which they were discovered by
Phoenician navigators previously to the foundation of Carthage. They are
an indomitable, nomadic people, who, since the introduction of camels,
have penetrated in considerable numbers into the Desert, and even as far
as Nigritia. . . . Some of these clans are white, others black, with
woolly hair."

Speaking of the Barbary Moors, Prichard says:

"Their figure and stature are nearly the same as those of the southern
Europeans, and their complexion, if darker, is only so in proportion to
the higher temperature of the country. It displays great varieties."

Jackson says:

"The men of Temsena and Showiah are of a strong, robust make, and of a
copper color; the women are beautiful. The women of Fez are fair as the
Europeans, but hair and eyes always dark. The women of Mequinas are very
beautiful, and have the red-and-white complexion of English women."

Spix and Martins, the German travellers, depict the Moors as follows:

"A high forehead, an oval countenance, large, speaking, black eyes,
shaded by arched and strong eyebrows, a thin, rather long, but not too
pointed nose, rather broad lips, meeting in an acute angle,
brownish-yellow complexion, thick, smooth, and black hair, and a stature
greater than the middle height."

Hodgson states:

"The Tuarycks are a white people, of the Berber race; the Mozabiaks are
a remarkably white people, and mixed with the Bedouin Arabs. The
Wadreagans and Wurgelans are of a dark bronze, with woolly hair."

The Foolahs, Fulbe (sing. Pullo), Fellani, or Fellatah, are a people of
West and Central Africa. It is the opinion of modern travellers that the
Foolahs are destined to become the dominant people of Negro-land. In
language, appearance, and history they present striking differences from
the neighboring tribes, to whom they are superior in intelligence, but
inferior, according to Garth, in physical development. Golbery describes
them as "robust and courageous, of a reddish-black color, with regular
features, hair longer and less woolly than that of the common negroes,
and high mental capacity." Dr. Barth found great local differences in
their physical characteristics, as Bowen describes the Foolahs of Bomba
as being some black, some almost white, and many of a mulatto color,
varying from dark to very bright. Their features and skulls were cast in
the European mould. They have a tradition that their ancestors were
whites, and certain tribes call themselves white men. They came from
Timbuctoo, which lies to the north of their present location.

The Nubians and Foolahs are classed as Mediterraneans. They are not
black, but yellowish-brown, or red-brown. The hair is not woolly but
curly, and sometimes quite straight; it is either dark-brown or black,
with a fuller growth of beard than the negroes. The oval face gives them
a Mediterranean type. Their noses are prominent, their lips not puffy,
and their languages have no connection with the tongues of the negroes
proper. ("American Cyclopaedia," art. Ethnology, p. 759.)

"The Cromlechs (dolmens) of Algeria" was the subject of an address made
by General Faidherbe at the Brussels International Congress. He
considers these structures to be simply sepulchral monuments, and, after
examining five or six thousand of them, maintains that the dolmens of
Africa and of Europe were all constructed by the same race, during their
emigration from the shores of the Baltic to the southern coast of the
Mediterranean. The author does not, however, attempt to explain the
existence of these monuments in other countries--Hindostan, for
instance, and America. "In Africa," he says, "cromlechs are called tombs
of the idolaters"--the idolaters being neither Romans, nor Christians,
nor Phoenicians, but some antique race. He regards the Berbers as the
descendants of the primitive dolmen-builders. Certain Egyptian monuments
tell of invasions of Lower Egypt one thousand five hundred years before
our era by blond tribes from the West. The bones found in the cromlechs
are those of a large and dolichocephalous race. General Faidherbe gives
the average stature (including the women) at 1.65 or 1.74 metre, while
the average stature of French carabineers is only 1.65 metre. He did not
find a single brachycephalous skull. The profiles indicated great
intelligence. The Egyptian documents already referred to call the
invaders Tamahu, which must have come from the invaders' own language,
as it is not Egyptian. The Tuaregs of the present day may be regarded as
the best representatives of the Tamahus. They are of lofty stature, have
blue eyes, and cling to the custom of bearing long swords, to be wielded
by both bands. In Soudan, on the banks of the Niger, dwells a negro
tribe ruled by a royal family (Masas), who are of rather fair
complexion, and claim descent from white men. Masas is perhaps the same
as Mashash, which occurs in the Egyptian documents applied to the
Tamahus. The Masas wear the hair in the same fashion as the Tamahus, and
General Faidherbe is inclined to think that they too are the descendants
of the dolmen-builders.

These people, according to my theory, were colonists from
Atlantis--colonists of three different races--white, yellow, and
sunburnt or red.

CHAPTER VII.

THE IRISH COLONIES FROM ATLANTIS.

We have seen that beyond question Spain and France owed a great part of
their population to Atlantis. Let us turn now to Ireland.

We would naturally expect, in view of the geographical position of the
country, to find Ireland colonized at an early day by the overflowing
population of Atlantis. And, in fact, the Irish annals tell us that
their island was settled prior to the Flood. In their oldest legends an
account is given of three Spanish fishermen who were driven by contrary
winds on the coast of Ireland before the Deluge. After these came the
Formorians, who were led into the country prior to the Deluge by the
Lady Banbha, or Kesair; her maiden name was h'Erni, or Berba; she was
accompanied by fifty maidens and three men--Bith, Ladhra, and Fintain.
Ladhra was their conductor, who was the first buried in Hibernia. That
ancient book, the "Cin of Drom-Snechta," is quoted in the "Book of
Ballymote" as authority for this legend.

The Irish annals speak of the Formorians as a warlike race, who,
according to the "Annals of Clonmacnois," "were a sept descended from
Cham, the son of Noeh, and lived by pyracie and spoile of other nations,
and were in those days very troublesome to the whole world."

Were not these the inhabitants of Atlantis, who, according to Plato,
carried their arms to Egypt and Athens, and whose subsequent destruction
has been attributed to divine vengeance invoked by their arrogance and
oppressions?

The Formorians were from Atlantis. They were called Fomhoraicc,
F'omoraig Afraic, and Formoragh, which has been rendered into English as
Formorians. They possessed ships, and the uniform representation is that
they came, as the name F'omoraig Afraic indicated, from Africa. But in
that day Africa did not mean the continent of Africa, as we now
understand it. Major Wilford, in the eighth volume of the "Asiatic
Researches," has pointed out that Africa comes from Apar, Aphar, Apara,
or Aparica, terms used to signify "the West," just as we now speak of
the Asiatic world as "the East." When, therefore, the Formorians claimed
to come from Africa, they simply meant that they came from the West--in
other words, from Atlantis--for there was no other country except
America west of them.

They possessed Ireland from so early a period that by some of the
historians they are spoken of as the aborigines of the country.

The first invasion of Ireland, subsequent to the coming of the
Formorians, was led by a chief called Partholan: his people are known in
the Irish annals as "Partholan's people." They were also probably
Atlanteans. They were from Spain. A British prince, Gulguntius, or
Gurmund, encountered off the Hebrides a fleet of thirty ships, filled
with men and women, led by one Partholyan, who told him they were from
Spain, and seeking some place to colonize. The British prince directed
him to Ireland. ("De Antiq. et Orig. Cantab.")

Spain in that day was the land of the Iberians, the Basques; that is to
say, the Atlanteans.

The Formorians defeated Partholan's people, killed Partholan, and drove
the invaders out of the country.

The Formorians were a civilized race; they had "a fleet of sixty ships
and a strong army."

The next invader of their dominions was Neimhidh; he captured one of
their fortifications, but it was retaken by the Formorians under "Morc."
Neimhidh was driven out of the country, and the Atlanteans continued in
undisturbed possession of the island for four hundred years more. Then
came the Fir-Bolgs. They conquered the whole island, and divided it into
five provinces. They held possession of the country for only
thirty-seven years, when they were overthrown by the Tuatha-de-Dananns,
a people more advanced in civilization; so much so that when their king,
Nuadha, lost his hand in battle, "Creidne, the artificer," we are told,
"put a silver hand upon him, the fingers of which were capable of
motion." This great race ruled the country for one hundred and
ninety-seven years: they were overthrown by an immigration from Spain,
probably of Basques, or Iberians, or Atlanteans, "the sons of Milidh,"
or Milesius, who "possessed a large fleet and a strong army." This last
invasion took place about the year 1700 B.C.; so that the invasion of
Neimhidh must have occurred about the year 2334 B.C.; while we will have
to assign a still earlier date for the coming of Partholan's people, and
an earlier still for the occupation of the country by the Formorians
from the West.

In the Irish historic tales called "Catha; or Battles," as given by the
learned O'Curry, a record is preserved of a real battle which was fought
between the Tuatha-de-Dananns and the Fir Bolgs, from which it appears
that these two races spoke the same language, and that they were
intimately connected with the Formorians. As the armies drew near
together the Fir-Bolgs sent out Breas, one of their great chiefs, to
reconnoitre the camp of the strangers; the Tuatha-de-Dananns appointed
one of their champions, named Sreng, to meet the emissary of the enemy;
the two warriors met and talked to one another over the tops of their
shields, and each was delighted to find that the other spoke the same
language. A battle followed, in which Nunda, king of the Fir-Bolgs, was
slain; Breas succeeded him; he encountered the hostility of the bards,
and was compelled to resign the crown. He went to the court of his
father-in-law, Elathe, a Formorian sea-king or pirate; not being well
received, be repaired to the camp of Balor of the Evil Eye, a Formorian
chief. The Formorian head-quarters seem to have been in the Hebrides.
Breas and Balor collected a vast army and navy and invaded Ireland, but
were defeated in a great battle by the Tuatha-de-Dananns.

These particulars would show the race-identity of the Fir-Bolg and
Tuatha-de-Dananns; and also their intimate connection, if not identity
with, the Formorians.

The Tuatha-de-Dananns seem to have been a civilized people; besides
possessing ships and armies and working in the metals, they had an
organized body of surgeons, whose duty it was to attend upon the wounded
in battle; and they had also a bardic or Druid class, to preserve the
history of the country and the deeds of kings and heroes.

According to the ancient books of Ireland the race known as "Partholan's
people," the Nemedians, the Fir-Bolgs, the Tuatha-de-Dananns, and the
Milesians were all descended from two brothers, sons of Magog, son of
Japheth, son of Noah, who escaped from the catastrophe which destroyed
his country. Thus all these races were Atlantean. They were connected
with the African colonies of Atlantis, the Berbers, and with the
Egyptians. The Milesians lived in Egypt: they were expelled thence; they
stopped a while in Crete, then in Scythia, then they settled in Africa
(See MacGeoghegan's "History of Ireland," p. 57), at a place called
Gaethulighe or Getulia, and lived there during eight generations, say
two hundred and fifty years; "then they entered Spain, where they built
Brigantia, or Briganza, named after their king Breogan: they dwelt in
Spain a considerable time. Milesius, a descendant of Breogan, went on an
expedition to Egypt, took part in a war against the Ethiopians, married
the king's daughter, Scota: he died in Spain, but his people soon after
conquered Ireland. On landing on the coast they offered sacrifices to
Neptune or Poseidon"--the god of Atlantis. (Ibid., p. 58.)

The Book of Genesis (chap. x.) gives us the descendants of Noah's three
sons, Shem, Ham, and Japheth. We are told that the sons of Japheth were
Gomer, and Magog, and Madai, and Javan, and Tubal, and Meshech, and
Tiras. We are then given the names of the descendants of Gomer and
Javan, but not of Magog. Josephus says the sons of Magog were the
Scythians. The Irish annals take up the genealogy of Magog's family
where the Bible leaves it. The Book of Invasions, the "Cin of
Drom-Snechta," claims that these Scythians were the Phoenicians; and we
are told that a branch of this family were driven out of Egypt in the
time of Moses: "He wandered through Africa for forty-two years, and
passed by the lake of Salivae to the altars of the Philistines, and
between Rusicada and the mountains Azure, and he came by the river
Monlon, and by the sea to the Pillars of Hercules, and through the
Tuscan sea, and he made for Spain, and dwelt there many years, and he
increased and multiplied, and his people were multiplied."

From all these facts it appears that the population of Ireland came from
the West, and not from Asia--that it was one of the many waves of
population flowing out from the Island of Atlantis-and herein we find
the explanation of that problem which has puzzled the Aryan scholars. As
Ireland is farther from the Punjab than Persia, Greece, Rome, or
Scandinavia, it would follow that the Celtic wave of migration must have
been the earliest sent out from the Sanscrit centre; but it is now
asserted by Professor Schleicher and others that the Celtic tongue shows
that it separated from the Sanscrit original tongue later than the
others, and that it is more closely allied to the Latin than any other
Aryan tongue. This is entirely inexplicable upon any theory of an
Eastern origin of the Indo-European races, but very easily understood if
we recognize the Aryan and Celtic migrations as going out about the same
time from the Atlantean fountain-head.

There are many points confirmatory of this belief. In the first place,
the civilization of the Irish dates back to a vast antiquity. We have
seen their annals laying claim to an immigration from the direction of
Atlantis prior to the Deluge, with no record that the people of Ireland
were subsequently destroyed by the Deluge. From the Formorians, who came
before the Deluge, to the Milesians, who came from Spain in the Historic
Period, the island was continuously inhabited. This demonstrates (1)
that these legends did not come from Christian sources, as the Bible
record was understood in the old time to imply a destruction of all who
lived before the Flood except Noah and his family; (2) it confirms our
view that the Deluge was a local catastrophe, and did not drown the
whole human family; (3) that the coming of the Formorians having been
before the Deluge, that great cataclysm was of comparatively recent
date, to wit, since the settlement of Ireland; and (4) that as the
Deluge was a local catastrophe, it must have occurred somewhere not far
from Ireland to have come to their knowledge. A rude people could
scarcely have heard in that day of a local catastrophe occurring in the
heart of Asia.

There are many evidences that the Old World recognized Ireland as
possessing a very ancient civilization. In the Sanscrit books it is
referred to as Hiranya, the "Island of the Sun," to wit, of sun-worship;
in other words, as pre-eminently the centre of that religion which was
shared by all the ancient races of Europe, Asia, Africa, and America. It
is believed that Ireland was the "Garden of Phoebus" of the Western
mythologists.

The Greeks called Ireland the "Sacred Isle" and "Ogygia."

"Nor can any one," says Camden, "conceive why they should call it
Ogygia, unless, perhaps, from its antiquity; for the Greeks called
nothing Ogygia unless what was extremely ancient." We have seen that
Ogyges was connected by the Greek legends with a first deluge, and that
Ogyges was "a quite mythical personage, lost in the night of ages."

It appears, as another confirmation of the theory of the Atlantis origin
of these colonies, that their original religion was sun-worship; this,
as was the case in other countries, became subsequently overlaid with
idol-worship. In the reign of King Tighernmas the worship of idols was
introduced. The priests constituted the Order of Druids. Naturally many
analogies have been found to exist between the beliefs and customs of
the Druids and the other religions which were drawn from Atlantis. We
have seen in the chapter on sun-worship how extensive this form of
religion was in the Atlantean days, both in Europe and America.

It would appear probable that the religion of the Druids passed from
Ireland to England and France. The metempsychosis or transmigration of
souls was one of the articles of their belief long before the time of
Pythagoras; it had probably been drawn from the storehouse of Atlantis,
whence it passed to the Druids, the Greeks, and the Hindoos. The Druids
had a pontifex maximus to whom they yielded entire obedience. Here again
we see a practice which extended to the Phoenicians, Egyptians, Hindoos,
Peruvians, and Mexicans.

The Druids of Gaul and Britain offered human sacrifices, while it is
claimed that the Irish Druids did not. This would appear to have been a
corrupt after-growth imposed upon the earlier and purer sacrifice of
fruits and flowers known in Atlantis, and due in part to greater cruelty
and barbarism in their descendants. Hence we find it practised in
degenerate ages on both sides of the Atlantic.

The Irish Druidical rites manifested themselves principally in sun
worship. Their chief god was Bel or Baal--the same worshipped by the
Phoenicians--the god of the sun. The Irish name for the sun, Grian, is,
according to Virgil, one of the names of Apollo--another sun-god,
Gryneus. Sun-worship continued in Ireland down to the time of St.
Patrick, and some of its customs exist among the peasantry of that
country to this day. We have seen that among the Peruvians, Romans, and
other nations, on a certain day all fires were extinguished throughout
the kingdom. and a new fire kindled at the chief temple by the sun's
rays, from which the people obtained their fire for the coming year. In
Ireland the same practice was found to exist. A piece of land was set
apart, where the four provinces met, in the present county of Meath;
here, at a palace called Tlachta, the divine fire was kindled. Upon the
night of what is now All-Saints-day the Druids assembled at this place
to offer sacrifice, and it was established, under heavy penalties, that
no fire should be kindled except from this source. On the first of May a
convocation of Druids was held in the royal palace of the King of
Connaught, and two fires were lit, between which cattle were driven, as
a preventive of murrain and other pestilential disorders. This was
called Beltinne, or the day of Bel's fire. And unto this day the Irish
call the first day of May "Lha-Beul-tinne," which signifies "the day of
Bel's fire." The celebration in Ireland of St. John's-eve by watch-fires
is a relic of the ancient sun-worship of Atlantis. The practice of
driving cattle through the fire continued for a longtime, and Kelly
mentions in his "Folk-lore" that in Northamptonshire, in England, a calf
was sacrificed in one of these fires to "stop the murrain" during the
present century. Fires are still lighted in England and Scotland as well
as Ireland for superstitious purposes; so that the people of Great
Britain, it may be said, are still in some sense in the midst of the
ancient sun-worship of Atlantis.

We find among the Irish of to-day many Oriental customs. The game of
"jacks," or throwing up five pebbles and catching them on the back of
the hand, was known in Rome. "The Irish keen (caoine), or the lament
over the dead, may still be heard in Algeria and Upper Egypt, even as
Herodotus heard it chanted by the Libyan women." The same practice
existed among the Egyptians, Etruscans, and Romans. The Irish wakes are
identical with the funeral feasts of the Greeks, Etruscans, and Romans.
(Cusack's "History of Ireland," p. 141.) The Irish custom of saying "God
bless you!" when one sneezes, is a very ancient practice; it was known
to the Romans, and referred, it is said, to a plague in the remote past,
whose first symptom was sneezing.

We find many points of resemblance between the customs of the Irish and
those of the Hindoo. The practice of the creditor fasting at the
door-step of his debtor until be is paid, is known to both countries;
the kindly "God save you!" is the same as the Eastern "God be gracious
to you, my son!" The reverence for the wren in Ireland and Scotland
reminds us of the Oriental and Greek respect for that bird. The practice
of pilgrimages, fasting, bodily macerations, and devotion to holy wells
and particular places, extends from Ireland to India.

All these things speak of a common origin; this fact has been generally
recognized, but it has always been interpreted that the Irish camp, from
the East, and were in fact a migration of Hindoos. There is not the
slightest evidence to sustain this theory. The Hindoos have never within
the knowledge of man sent out colonies or fleets for exploration; but
there is abundant evidence, on the other hand, of migrations from
Atlantis eastward. And how could the Sanscrit writings have preserved
maps of Ireland, England, and Spain, giving the shape and outline of
their coasts, and their very names, and yet have preserved no memory of
the expeditions or colonizations by which they acquired that knowledge?

Another proof of our theory is found in "the round-towers" of Ireland.
Attempts have been made to show, by Dr. Petrie and others, that these
extraordinary structures are of modern origin, and were built by the
Christian priests, in which to keep their church-plate. But it is shown
that the "Annals of Ulster" mention the destruction of fifty-seven of
them by an earthquake in A.D. 448; and Giraldus Cambrensis shows that
Lough Neagh was created by an inundation, or sinking of the laud, in
A.D. 65, and that in his day the fishermen could

     "See the round-towers of other days
     In the waves beneath them shining."

Moreover, we find Diodorus Siculus, in a well-known passage, referring
to Ireland, and describing it as "an island in the ocean over against
Gaul, to the north, and not inferior in size to Sicily, the soil of
which is so fruitful that they mow there twice in the year." He mentions
the skill of their harpers, their sacred groves, and their singular
temples of round form.

                  THE BURGH OF MOUSSA, IN THE SHETLANDS

We find similar structures in America, Sardinia, and India. The remains
of similar round-towers are very abundant in the Orkneys and Shetlands.
"They have been supposed by some," says Sir John Lubbock, "to be
Scandinavian, but no similar buildings exist in Norway, Sweden, or
Denmark, so that this style of architecture is no doubt anterior to the
arrival of the Northmen." I give above a picture of the Burgh or Broch
of the little island of Moussa, in the Shetlands. It is circular in
form, forty-one feet in height. Open at the top; the central space is
twenty feet in diameter, the walls about fourteen feet thick at the
base, and eight feet at the top. They contain a staircase, which leads
to the top of the building. Similar structures are found in the Island
of Sardinia.

         ROUND-TOWER OF THE CANYON OF THE MANCOS, COLORADO, U.S.

In New Mexico and Colorado the remains of round-towers are very
abundant. The illustration below represents our of these in the valley
of the Mancos, in the south-western corner of Colorado. A model of it is
to be found in the Smithsonian collection at Washington. The tower
stands at present, in its ruined condition, twenty feet high. It will be
seen that it resembles the towers of Ireland, not only in its circular
form but also in the fact that its door-way is situated at some distance
from the ground.

It will not do to say that the resemblance between these prehistoric and
singular towers, in countries so far apart as Sardinia, Ireland,
Colorado, and India, is due to an accidental coincidence. It might as
well be argued that the resemblance between the roots of the various
Indo-European languages was also due to accidental coincidence, and did
not establish any similarity of origin. In fact, we might just as well
go back to the theory of the philosophers of one hundred and fifty years
ago, and say that the resemblance between the fossil forms in the rocks
and the living forms upon them did not indicate relationship, or prove
that the fossils were the remains of creatures that had once lived, but
that it was simply a way nature had of working out extraordinary
coincidences in a kind of joke; a sort of "plastic power in nature," as
it was called.

We find another proof that Ireland was settled by the people of Atlantis
in the fact that traditions long existed among the Irish peasantry of a
land in the "Far West," and that this belief was especially found among
the posterity of the Tuatha-de-Dananns, whose connection with the
Formorians we have shown.

The Abbe Brasseur de Bourbourg, in a note to his translation of the
"Popol Vuh," says:

"There is an abundance of legends and traditions concerning the passage
of the Irish into America, and their habitual communication with that
continent many centuries before the time of Columbus. We should bear in
mind that Ireland was colonized by the Phoenicians (or by people of that
race). An Irish Saint named Vigile, who lived in the eighth century, was
accused to Pope Zachary of having taught heresies on the subject of the
antipodes. At first he wrote to the pope in reply to the charge, but
afterward he went to Rome in person to justify himself, and there be
proved to the pope that the Irish had been accustomed to communicate
with a transatlantic world."

"This fact," says Baldwin, "seems to have been preserved in the records
of the Vatican."

The Irish annals preserve the memory of St. Brendan of Clonfert, and his
remarkable voyage to a land in the West, made A.D. 545. His early youth
was passed under the care of St. Ita, a lady of the princely family of
the Desii. When he was five years old he was placed under the care of
Bishop Ercus. Kerry was his native home; the blue waves of the Atlantic
washed its shores; the coast was full of traditions of a wonderful land
in the West. He went to see the venerable St. Enda, the first abbot of
Arran, for counsel. he was probably encouraged in the plan he had formed
of carrying the Gospel to this distant land. "He proceeded along the
coast of Mayo, inquiring as he went for traditions of the Western
continent. On his return to Kerry he decided to set out on the important
expedition. St. Brendan's Hill still bears his name; and from the bay at
the foot of this lofty eminence be sailed for the 'Far West.' Directing
his course toward the southwest, with a few faithful companions, in a
well-provisioned bark, he came, after some rough and dangerous
navigation, to calm seas, where, without aid of oar or sail, he was
borne along for many weeks." He had probably entered upon the same great
current which Columbus travelled nearly one thousand years later, and
which extends from the shores of Africa and Europe to America. He
finally reached land; he proceeded inland until he came to a large river
flowing from east to west, supposed by some to be the Ohio. "After an
absence of seven years he returned to Ireland, and lived not only to
tell of the marvels he had seen, but to found a college of three
thousand monks at Clonfert." There are eleven Latin MSS. in the
Bibliotheque Imperiale at Paris of this legend, the dates of which vary
from the eleventh to the fourteenth century, but all of them anterior to
the time of Columbus.

The fact that St. Brendan sailed in search of a country in the west
cannot be doubted; and the legends which guided him were probably the
traditions of Atlantis among a people whose ancestors had been derived
directly or at second-hand from that country.

This land was associated in the minds of the peasantry with traditions
of Edenic happiness and beauty. Miss Eleanor C. Donnelly, of
Philadelphia, has referred to it in her poem, "The Sleeper's Sail,"
where the starving boy dreams of the pleasant and plentiful land:

     "'Mother, I've been on the cliffs out yonder,
     Straining my eyes o'er the breakers free
     To the lovely spot where the sun was setting,
     Setting and sinking into the sea.

     "'The sky was full of the fairest colors
     Pink and purple and paly green,
     With great soft masses of gray and amber,
     And great bright rifts of gold between.

     "'And all the birds that way were flying,
     Heron and curlew overhead,
     With a mighty eagle westward floating,
     Every plume in their pinions red.

     "'And then I saw it, the fairy city,
     Far away o'er the waters deep;
     Towers and castles and chapels glowing
     Like blessed dreams that we see in sleep.

     "'What is its name?' 'Be still, acushla
     (Thy hair is wet with the mists, my boy);
     Thou hast looked perchance on the Tir-na-n'oge,
     Land of eternal youth and joy!

     "'Out of the sea, when the sun is setting,
     It rises, golden and fair to view;
     No trace of ruin, or change of sorrow,
     No sign of age where all is new.

     "'Forever sunny, forever blooming,
     Nor cloud nor frost can touch that spot,
     Where the happy people are ever roaming,
     The bitter pangs of the past forgot.'

This is the Greek story of Elysion; these are the Elysian Fields of the
Egyptians; these are the Gardens of the Hesperides; this is the region
in the West to which the peasant of Brittany looks from the shores of
Cape Raz; this is Atlantis.

The starving child seeks to reach this blessed land in a boat and is
drowned.

     "High on the cliffs the light-house keeper
     Caught the sound of a piercing scream;
     Low in her hut the lonely widow
     Moaned in the maze of a troubled dream;

     "And saw in her sleep a seaman ghostly,
     With sea-weeds clinging in his hair,
     Into her room, all wet and dripping,
     A drowned boy on his bosom bear.

     "Over Death Sea on a bridge of silver
     The child to his Father's arms had passed!
     Heaven was nearer than Tir-na-n'oge,
     And the golden city was reached at last."

CHAPTER VIII.

THE OLDEST SON OF NOAH.

That eminent authority, Dr. Max Mueller, says, in his "Lectures on the
Science of Religion,"

"If we confine ourselves to the Asiatic continent, with its important
peninsula of Europe, we find that in the vast desert of drifting human
speech three, and only three, oases have been formed in which, before
the beginning of all history, language became permanent and
traditional--assumed, in fact, a new character, a character totally
different from the original character of the floating and constantly
varying speech of human beings. These three oases of language are known
by the name of Turanian, Aryan, and Semitic. In these three centres,
more particularly in the Aryan and Semitic, language ceased to be
natural; its growth was arrested, and it became permanent, solid,
petrified, or, if you like, historical speech. I have always maintained
that this centralization and traditional conservation of language could
only have been the result of religious and political influences, and I
now mean to show that we really have clear evidence of three independent
settlements of religion--the Turanian, the Aryan, and the
Semitic--concomitantly with the three great settlements of language."

There can be no doubt that the Aryan and another branch, which Mueller
calls Semitic, but which may more properly be called Hamitic, radiated
from Noah; it is a question yet to be decided whether the Turanian or
Mongolian is also a branch of the Noachic or Atlantean stock.

To quote again from Max Mueller:

"If it can only be proved that the religions of the Aryan nations are
united by the same bonds of a real relationship which have enabled us to
treat their languages as so many varieties of the same type--and so also
of the Semitic--the field thus opened is vast enough, and its careful
clearing, and cultivation will occupy several generations of scholars.
And this original relationship, I believe, can be proved. Names of the
principal deities, words also expressive of the most essential elements
of religion, such as prayer, sacrifice, altar, spirit, law, and faith,
have been preserved among the Aryan and among the Semitic nations, and
these relies admit of one explanation only. After that, a comparative
study of the Turanian religions may be approached with better hope of
success; for that there was not only a primitive Aryan and a primitive
Semitic religion, but likewise a primitive Turanian religion, before
each of these primeval races was broken up and became separated in
language, worship and national sentiment, admits, I believe, of little
doubt. . . . There was a period during which the ancestors of the
Semitic family had not yet been divided, whether in language or in
religion. That period transcends the recollection of every one of the
Semitic races, in the same way as neither Hindoos, Greeks, nor Romans
have any recollection of the time when they spoke a common language, and
worshipped their Father in heaven by a name that was as yet neither
Sanscrit, nor Greek, nor Latin. But I do not hesitate to call this
Prehistoric Period historical in the best sense of the word. It was a
real period, because, unless it was real, all the realities of the
Semitic languages and the Semitic religions, such as we find them after
their separation, would be unintelligible. Hebrew, Syriac, and Arabic
point to a common source as much as Sanscrit, Greek, and Latin; and
unless we can bring ourselves to doubt that the Hindoos, the Greeks, the
Romans, and the Teutons derived the worship of their principal deity
from their common Aryan sanctuary, we shall not be able to deny that
there was likewise a primitive religion of the whole Semitic race, and
that El, the Strong One in heaven, was invoked by the ancestors of all
the Semitic races before there were Babylonians in Babylon, Phoenicians
in Sidon and Tyrus--before there were Jews in Mesopotamia or Jerusalem.
The evidence of the Semitic is the same as that of the Aryan languages:
the conclusion cannot be different....

"These three classes of religion are not to be mistaken-as little as the
three classes of language, the Turanian, the Semitic, and the Aryan.
They mark three events in the most ancient history of the world, events
which have determined the whole fate of the human race, and of which we
ourselves still feel the consequences in our language, in our thoughts,
and in our religion."

We have seen that all the evidence points to the fact that this original
seat of the Phoenician-Hebrew family was in Atlantis.

The great god of the so-called Semites was El, the Strong One, from
whose name comes the Biblical names Beth-el, the house of God; Ha-el,
the strong one; El-ohim, the gods; El-oah, God; and from the same name
is derived the Arabian name of God, Al-lah.

Another evidence of the connection between the Greeks, Phoenicians,
Hebrews, and Atlanteans is shown in the name of Adonis.

The Greeks tell us that Adonis was the lover of Aphrodite, or Venus, who
was the offspring of Uranus--"she came out of the sea;" Uranus was the
father of Chronos, and the grandfather of Poseidon, king of Atlantis.

Now We find Adonai in the Old Testament used exclusively as the name of
Jehovah, while among the Phoenicians Adonai was the supreme deity. In
both cases the root Ad is probably a reminiscence of Ad-lantis.

There seem to exist similar connections between the Egyptian and the
Turanian mythology. The great god of Egypt was Neph or Num; the chief
god of the Samoyedes is Num; and Max Mueller established an identity
between the Num of the Samoyedes and the god Yum-ala of the Finns, and
probably with the name of the god Nam of the Thibetians.

That mysterious people, the Etruscans, who inhabited part of Italy, and
whose bronze implements agreed exactly in style and workmanship with
those which we think were derived from Atlantis, were, it is now
claimed, a branch of the Turanian family.

"At a recent meeting of the English Philological Society great interest
was excited by a paper on Etruscan Numerals, by the Rev. Isaac Taylor.
He stated that the long-sought key to the Etruscan language had at last
been discovered. Two dice had been found in a tomb, with their six faces
marked with words instead of pips. He showed that these words were
identical with the first six digits in the Altaic branch of the Turanian
family of speech. Guided by this clew, it was easy to prove that the
grammar and vocabulary of the 3000 Etruscan inscriptions were also
Altaic. The words denoting kindred, the pronouns, the conjugations, and
the declensions, corresponded closely to those of the Tartar tribes of
Siberia. The Etruscan mythology proved to be essentially the same as
that of the Kalevala, the great Finnic epic."

According to Lenormant ("Ancient History of the East," vol. i., p. 62;
vol. ii., p. 23), the early contests between the Aryans and the
Turanians are represented in the Iranian traditions as "contests between
hostile brothers . . . the Ugro-Finnish races must, according to all
appearances, be looked upon as a branch, earlier detached than the
others from the Japhetic stem."

If it be true that the first branch originating from Atlantis was the
Turanian, which includes the Chinese and Japanese, then we have derived
from Atlantis all the building and metalworking races of men who have
proved themselves capable of civilization; and we may, therefore, divide
mankind into two great classes: those capable of civilization, derived
from Atlantis, and those essentially and at all times barbarian, who
hold no blood relationship with the people of Atlantis.

Humboldt is sure "that some connection existed between ancient Ethiopia
and the elevated plain of Central Asia." There were invasions which
reached from the shores of Arabia into China. "An Arabian sovereign,
Schamar-Iarasch (Abou Karib), is described by Hamza, Nuwayri, and others
as a powerful ruler and conqueror, who carried his arms successfully far
into Central Asia; he occupied Samarcand and invaded China. He erected
an edifice at Samarcand, bearing an inscription, in Himyarite or Cushite
characters, 'In the name of God, Schamar-Iarasch has erected this
edifice to the sun, his Lord." (Baldwin's "Prehistoric Nations," p.
110.) These invasions must have been prior to 1518 B.C.

Charles Walcott Brooks read a paper before the California Academy of
Sciences, in which be says:

"According to Chinese annals, Tai-Ko-Fokee, the great stranger king,
ruled the kingdom of China. In pictures he is represented with two small
horns, like those associated with the representations of Moses. He and
his successor are said to have introduced into China 'picture-writing,'
like that in use in Central America at the time of the Spanish conquest.
He taught the motions of the heavenly bodies, and divided time into
years and months; be also introduced many other useful arts and sciences.

"Now, there has been found at Copan, in Central America, a figure
strikingly like the Chinese symbol of Fokee, with his two horns; and, in
like manner, there is a close resemblance between the Central American
and the Chinese figures representing earth and heaven. Either one people
learned from the other, or both acquired these forms from a common
source. Many physico-geographical facts favor the hypothesis that they
were derived in very remote ages from America, and that from China they
passed to Egypt. Chinese records say that the progenitors of the Chinese
race came from across the sea."

The two small horns of Tai-Ko-Fokee and Moses are probably a
reminiscence of Baal. We find the horns of Baal represented in the
remains of the Bronze Age of Europe. Bel sometimes wore a tiara with his
bull's horns; the tiara was the crown subsequently worn by the Persian
kings, and it became, in time, the symbol of Papal authority. The
Atlanteans having domesticated cattle, and discovered their vast
importance to humanity, associated the bull and cow with religious
ideas, as revealed in the oldest hymns of the Aryans and the cow-headed
idols of Troy, a representation of one of which is shown on the
preceding page. Upon the head of their great god Baal they placed the
horns of the bull; and these have descended in popular imagination to
the spirit of evil of our day. Burns says:

     "O thou! whatever title suit thee,
     Auld Hornie, Satan, Nick, or Clootie."

"Clootie" is derived from the cleft hoof of a cow; while the Scotch name
for a bull is Bill, a corruption, probably, of Bel. Less than two
hundred years ago it was customary to sacrifice a bull on the 25th of
August to the "God Mowrie" and "his devilans" on the island of Inis
Maree, Scotland. ("The Past in the Present," p. 165.) The trident of
Poseidon has degenerated into the pitchfork of Beelzebub!

And when we cross the Atlantic, we find in America the horns of Baal
reappearing in a singular manner. The first cut on page 429 represents
an idol of the Moquis of New Mexico: the head is very bull-like. In the
next figure we have a representation of the war-god of the Dakotas, with
something like a trident in his hand; while the next illustration is
taken from Zarate's "Peru," and depicts "the god of a degrading
worship." He is very much like the traditional conception of the
European devil-horns, pointed ears, wings, and poker. Compare this last
figure, from Peru, with the representation on page 430 of a Greek siren,
one of those cruel monsters who, according to Grecian mythology, sat in
the midst of bones and blood, tempting men to ruin by their sweet music.
Here we have the same bird-like legs and claws as in the Peruvian demon.

Heeren shows that a great overland commerce extended in ancient times
between the Black Sea and "Great Mongolia;" he mentions a "Temple of the
Sun," and a great caravansary in the desert of Gobi. Arminius Vambery,
in his "Travels in Central Asia," describes very important ruins near
the eastern shore of the Caspian Sea, at a place called Gomueshtepe; and
connected with these are the remains of a great wall which he followed
"ten geographical miles." He found a vast aqueduct one hundred and fifty
miles long, extending to the Persian mountains. He reports abundant
ruins in all that country, extending even to China.

The early history of China indicates contact with a superior race.
"Fuh-hi, who is regarded as a demi-god, founded the Chinese Empire 2852
B.C. He introduced cattle, taught the people how to raise them, and
taught the art of writing." ("American Cyclopaedia," art. China.) He
might have invented his alphabet, but he did not invent the cattle; be
must have got them from some nation who, during many centuries of
civilization, had domesticated them; and from what nation was he more
likely to have obtained them than from the Atlanteans, whose colonies we
have seen reached his borders, and whose armies invaded his territory!
"He instituted the ceremony of marriage." (Ibid.) This also was an
importation from a civilized land. "His successor, Shin-nung, during a
reign of one hundred and forty years, introduced agriculture and medical
science. The next emperor, Hwang-ti, is believed to have invented
weapons, wagons, ships, clocks, and musical instruments, and to have
introduced coins, weights, and measures." (Ibid.) As these various
inventions in all other countries have been the result of slow
development, running through many centuries, or are borrowed from some
other more civilized people, it is certain that no emperor of China ever
invented them all during a period of one hundred and sixty-four years.
These, then, were also importations from the West. In fact, the Chinese
themselves claim to have invaded China in the early days from the
north-west; and their first location is placed by Winchell near Lake
Balkat, a short distance east of the Caspian, where we have already seen
Aryan Atlantean colonies planted at an early day. "The third successor
of Fuh-hi, Ti-ku, established schools, and was the first to practise
polygamy. In 2357 his son Yau ascended the throne, and it is from his
reign that the regular historical records begin. A great flood, which
occurred in his reign, has been considered synchronous and identical
with the Noachic Deluge, and to Yau is attributed the merit of having
successfully battled against the waters."

There can be no question that the Chinese themselves, in their early
legends, connected their origin with a people who were destroyed by
water in a tremendous convulsion of the earth. Associated with this
event was a divine personage called Niu-va (Noah?).

Sir William Jones says:

"The Chinese believe the earth to have been wholly covered with water,
which, in works of undisputed authenticity, they describe as flowing
abundantly, then subsiding and separating the higher from the lower ages
of mankind; that this division of time, from which their poetical
history begins, just preceded the appearance of Fo-hi on the mountains
of Chin." ("Discourse on the Chinese; Asiatic Researches," vol. ii., p.
376.)

The following history of this destruction of their ancestors vividly
recalls to us the convulsion depicted in the Chaldean and American
legends:

"The pillars of heaven were broken; the earth shook to its very
foundations; the heavens sunk lower toward the north; the sun, the moon,
and the stars changed their motions; the earth fell to pieces, and the
waters enclosed within its bosom burst forth with violence and
overflowed it. Man having rebelled against Heaven, the system of the
universe was totally disordered. The sun was eclipsed, the planets
altered their course, and the grand harmony of nature was disturbed."

A learned Frenchman, M. Terrien de la Couperie, member of the Asiatic
Society of Paris, has just published a work (1880) in which he
demonstrates the astonishing fact that the Chinese language is clearly
related to the Chaldean, and that both the Chinese characters and the
cuneiform alphabet are degenerate descendants of an original
hieroglyphical alphabet. The same signs exist for many words, while
numerous words are very much alike. M. de la Couperie gives a table of
some of these similarities, from which I quote as follows:

                  +------------+----------+----------+
                  | English.   | Chinese. | Chaldee. |
                  +------------+----------+----------+
                  | To shine   | Mut      | Mul.     |
                  +------------+----------+----------+
                  | To die     | Mut      | Mit.     |
                  +------------+----------+----------+
                  | Book       | King     | Kin.     |
                  +------------+----------+----------+
                  | Cloth      | Sik      | Sik.     |
                  +------------+----------+----------+
                  | Right hand | Dzek     | Zag.     |
                  +------------+----------+----------+
                  | Hero       | Tan      | Dun.     |
                  +------------+----------+----------+
                  | Earth      | Kien-kai | Kiengi.  |
                  +------------+----------+----------+
                  | Cow        | Lub      | Lu, lup. |
                  +------------+----------+----------+
                  | Brick      | Ku       | Ku.      |
                  +------------+----------+----------+

This surprising discovery brings the Chinese civilization still nearer
to the Mediterranean head-quarters of the races, and increases the
probability that the arts of China were of Atlantean origin; and that
the name of Nai Hoang-ti, or Nai Korti, the founder of Chinese
civilization, may be a reminiscence of Nakhunta, the chief of the gods,
as recorded in the Susian texts, and this, in turn, a recollection of
the Deva-Nahusha of the Hindoos, the Dionysos of the Greeks, the king of
Atlantis, whose great empire reached to the "farther parts of India,"
and embraced, according to Plato, "parts of the continent of America."

Linguistic science achieved a great discovery when it established the
fact that there was a continuous belt of languages from Iceland to
Ceylon which were the variant forms of one mother-tongue, the
Indo-European; but it must prepare itself for a still wider
generalization. There is abundant proof--proof with which pages might be
filled--that there was a still older mother-tongue, from which Aryan,
Semitic, and Hamitic were all derived--the language of Noah, the
language of Atlantis, the language of the great "aggressive empire" of
Plato, the language of the empire of the Titans.

The Arabic word bin, within, becomes, when it means interval, space,
binnon; this is the German and Dutch binnen and Saxon binnon, signifying
within. The Ethiopian word aorf, to fall asleep, is the root of the word
Morpheus, the god of sleep. The Hebrew word chanah, to dwell, is the
parent of the Anglo-Saxon inne and Icelandic inni, a house, and of our
word inn, a hotel. The Hebrew word naval or nafal signifies to fall;
from it is derived our word fall and fool (one who falls); the Chaldee
word is nabal, to make foul, and the Arabic word nabala means to die,
that is, to fall. From the last syllable of the Chaldee nasar, to saw,
we can derive the Latin serra, the High German sagen, the Danish sauga,
and our word to saw. The Arabic nafida, to fade, is the same as the
Italian fado, the Latin fatuus (foolish, tasteless), the Dutch vadden,
and our to fade. The Ethiopic word gaber, to make, to do, and the Arabic
word jabara, to make strong, becomes the Welsh word goberu, to work, to
operate, the Latin operor, and the English operate. The Arabic word
abara signifies to prick, to sting; we see this root in the Welsh bar, a
summit, and par, a spear, and per, a spit; whence our word spear. In the
Chaldee, Syriac, and Arabic zug means to join, to couple; from this the
Greeks obtained zugos, the Romans jugum, and we the word yoke; while the
Germans obtained jok or jog, the Dutch juk, the Swedes ok. The Sanscrit
is juga. The Arabic sanna, to be old, reappears in the Latin senex, the
Welsh hen, and our senile. The Hebrew banah, to build, is the Irish bun,
foundation, and the Latin fundo, fundare, to found. The Arabic baraka,
to bend the knee, to fall on the breast, is probably the Saxon brecau,
the Danish braekke, the Swedish braecka, Welsh bregu, and our word to
break. The Arabic baraka also signifies to rain violently; and from this
we get the Saxon roegn, to rain, Dutch regen, to rain, Cimbric roekia,
rain, Welsh rheg, rain. The Chaldee word braic, a branch, is the Irish
braic or raigh, an arm, the Welsh braic, the Latin brachium, and the
English brace, something which supports like an arm. The Chaldee frak,
to rub, to tread out grain, is the same as the Latin frico, frio, and
our word rake. The Arabic word to rub is fraka. The Chaldee rag, ragag,
means to desire, to long for; it is the same as the Greek oregw, the
Latin porrigere, the Saxon roeccan, the Icelandic rakna, the German
reichen, and our to reach, to rage. The Arabic rauka, to strain or
purify, as wine, is precisely our English word rack, to rack wine. The
Hebrew word bara, to create, is our word to bear, as to bear children: a
great number of words in all the European languages contain this root in
its various modifications. The Hebrew word kafar, to cover, is our word
to cover, and coffer, something which covers, and covert, a secret
place; from this root also comes the Latin cooperio and the French
couvrir, to cover. The Arabic word shakala, to bind under the belly, is
our word to shackle. From the Arabic walada and Ethiopian walad, to
beget, to bring forth, we get the Welsh llawd, a shooting out; and hence
our word lad. Our word matter, or pus, is from the Arabic madda; our
word mature is originally from the Chaldee mita. The Arabic word amida
signifies to end, and from this comes the noun, a limit, a termination,
Latin meta, and our words meet and mete.

I might continue this list, but I have given enough to show that all the
Atlantean races once spoke the same language, and that the dispersion on
the plains of Shinar signifies that breaking up of the tongues of one
people under the operation of vast spaces of time. Philology is yet in
its infancy, and the time is not far distant when the identity of the
languages of all the Noachic races will be as clearly established and as
universally acknowledged as is now the identity, of the languages of the
Aryan family of nations.

And precisely as recent research has demonstrated the relationship
between Pekin and Babylon, so investigation in Central America has
proved that there is a mysterious bond of union connecting the Chinese
and one of the races of Mexico. The resemblances are so great that Mr.
Short ("North Americans of Antiquity," p. 494) says, "There is no doubt
that strong analogies exist between the Otomi and the Chinese." Senor
Najera ("Dissertacion Sobre la lingua Othomi, Mexico," pp. 87, 88) gives
a list of words from which I quote the following:

  +----------+---------+------------+----------+--------+------------+
  | Chinese. | Othomi. | English.   | Chinese. | Othomi | English.   |
  +----------+---------+------------+----------+--------+------------+
  | Cho      | To      | The, that. | Pa       | Da     | To give.   |
  +----------+---------+------------+----------+--------+------------+
  | Y        | N-y     | A wound.   | Tsun     | Nsu    | Honor.     |
  +----------+---------+------------+----------+--------+------------+
  | Ten      | Gu, mu  | Head.      | Hu       | Hmu    | Sir, Lord. |
  +----------+---------+------------+----------+--------+------------+
  | Siao     | Sui     | Night      | Na       | Na     | That.      |
  +----------+---------+------------+----------+--------+------------+
  | Tien     | Tsi     | Tooth      | Hu       | He     | Cold.      |
  +----------+---------+------------+----------+--------+------------+
  | Ye       | Yo      | Shining    | Ye       | He     | And.       |
  +----------+---------+------------+----------+--------+------------+
  | Ky       | Hy (ji) | Happiness. | Hoa      | Hia    | Word.      |
  +----------+---------+------------+----------+--------+------------+
  | Ku       | Du      | Death      | Nugo     | Nga    | I          |
  +----------+---------+------------+----------+--------+------------+
  | Po       | Yo      | No         | Ni       | Nuy    | Thou.      |
  +----------+---------+------------+----------+--------+------------+
  | Na       | Ta      | Man        | Hao      | Nho    | The good.  |
  +----------+---------+------------+----------+--------+------------+
  | Nin      | Nsu     | Female     | Ta       | Da     | The great. |
  +----------+---------+------------+----------+--------+------------+
  | Tseu     | Tsi, ti | Son        | Li       | Ti     | Gain.      |
  +----------+---------+------------+----------+--------+------------+
  | Tso      | Tsa     | To perfect | Ho       | To     | Who.       |
  +----------+---------+------------+----------+--------+------------+
  | Kuan     | Khuani  | True       | Pa       | Pa     | To leave.  |
  +----------+---------+------------+----------+--------+------------+
  | Siao     | Sa      | To mock    | Mu, mo   | Me     | Mother.    |
  +----------+---------+------------+----------+--------+------------+

Recently Herr Forchhammer, of Leipsic, has published a truly scientific
comparison of the grammatical structure of the Choctaw, Chickasaw,
Muscogee, and Seminole languages with the Ural-Altaic tongues, in which
be has developed many interesting points of resemblance.

It has been the custom to ascribe the recognized similarities between
the Indians of America and the Chinese and Japanese to a migration by
way of Behring's Strait from Asia into America; but when we find that
the Chinese themselves only reached the Pacific coast within the
Historical Period, and that they came to it from the direction of the
Mediterranean and Atlantis, and when we find so many and such distinct
recollections of the destruction of Atlantis in the Flood legends of the
American races, it seems more reasonable to conclude that the
resemblances between the Othomi and the Chinese are to be accounted for
by intercourse through Atlantis.

We find a confirmation in all these facts of the order in which Genesis
names the sons of Noah:

"Now these are the generations of the sons of Noah: Shem, Ham, and
Japheth, and unto them were sons born after the flood."

Can we not suppose that those three sons represent three great races in
the order of their precedence?

The record of Genesis claims that the Phoenicians were descended from
Ham, while the Hebrews were descended from Shem; yet we find the Hebrews
and Phoenicians united by the ties of a common language, common
traditions, and common race characteristics. The Jews are the great
merchants of the world eighteen centuries after Christ, just as the
Phoenicians were the great merchants of the world fifteen centuries
before Christ.

Moreover, the Arabians, who are popularly classed as Semites, or sons of
Shem, admit in their traditions that they are descended from "Ad, the
son of Ham;" and the tenth chapter of Genesis classes them among the
descendants of Ham, calling them Seba, Havilah, Raamah, etc. If the two
great so-called Semitic stocks--the Phoenicians and Arabians--are
Hamites, surely the third member of the group belongs to the same
"sunburnt" race.

If we concede that the Jews were also a branch of the Hamitic stock,
then we have, firstly, a Semitic stock, the Turanian, embracing the
Etruscans, the Finns, the Tartars, the Mongols, the Chinese, and
Japanese; secondly, a Hamitic family, "the sunburnt" race--a red
race--including the Cushites, Phoenicians, Egyptians, Hebrews, Berbers,
etc.; and, thirdly, a Japhetic or whiter stock, embracing the Greeks,
Italians, Celts, Goths, and the men who wrote Sanscrit-in other words,
the entire Aryan family.

If we add to these three races the negro race--which cannot be traced
back to Atlantis, and is not included, according to Genesis, among the
descendants of Noah--we have the four races, the white, red, yellow, and
black, recognized by the Egyptians as embracing all the people known to
them.

There seems to be some confusion in Genesis as to the Semitic stock. It
classes different races as both Semites and Hamites; as, for instance,
Sheba and Havilah; while the race of Mash, or Meshech, is classed among
the sons of Shem and the sons of Japheth. In fact, there seems to be a
confusion of Hamitic and Semitic stocks. "This is shown in the blending
of Hamitic and Semitic in some of the most ancient inscriptions; in the
facility of intercourse between the Semites of Asia and the Hamites of
Egypt; in the peaceful and unobserved absorption of all the Asiatic
Hamites, and the Semitic adoption of the Hamitic gods and religious
system. It is manifest that, at a period not long previous, the two
families had dwelt together and spoken the same language." (Winchell's
"Pre-Adamites," p. 36.) Is it not more reasonable to suppose that the
so-called Semitic races of Genesis were a mere division of the Hamitic
stock, and that we are to look for the third great division of the sons
of Noah among the Turanians?

Francis Lenormant, high authority, is of the opinion that the Turanian
races are descended from Magog, the son of Japheth. He regards the
Turanians as intermediate between the white and yellow races, graduating
insensibly into each. "The Uzbecs, the Osmanli Turks, and the Hungarians
are not to be distinguished in appearance from the most perfect branches
of the white race; on the other hand, the Tchondes almost exactly
resemble the Tongouses, who belong to the yellow race.

The Turanian languages are marked by the same agglutinative character
found in the American races.

The Mongolian and the Indian are alike in the absence of a heavy beard.
The royal color of the Incas was yellow; yellow is the color of the
imperial family in China. The religion of the Peruvians was sun-worship;
"the sun was the peculiar god of the Mongols from the earliest times."
The Peruvians regarded Pachacamac as the sovereign creator. Camac-Hya
was the name of a Hindoo goddess. Haylli was the burden of every verse
of the song composed in praise of the sun and the Incas. Mr. John
Ranking derives the word Allah from the word Haylli, also the word
Halle-lujah. In the city of Cuzco was a portion of land which none were
permitted to cultivate except those of the royal blood. At certain
seasons the Incas turned up the sod here, amid much rejoicing, and many
ceremonies. A similar custom prevails in China: The emperor ploughs a
few furrows, and twelve illustrious persons attend the plough after him.
(Du Halde, "Empire of China," vol. i., p. 275.) The cycle of sixty years
was in use among most of the nations of Eastern Asia, and among the
Muyscas of the elevated plains of Bogota. The "quipu," a knotted
reckoning-cord, was in use in Peru and in China. (Bancroft's "Native
Races," vol. v., p. 48.) In Peru and China "both use hieroglyphics,
which are read from above downward." (Ibid.)

"It appears most evident to me," says Humboldt, "that the monuments,
methods of computing time, systems of cosmogony, and many myths of
America, offer striking analogies with the ideas of Eastern
Asia--analogies which indicate an ancient communication, and are not
simply the result of that uniform condition in which all nations are
found in the dawn of civilization." ("Exam. Crit.," tom. ii., p. 68.)

"In the ruined cities of Cambodia, which lies farther to the east of
Burmah, recent research has discovered teocallis like those in Mexico,
and the remains of temples of the same type and pattern as those of
Yucatan. And when we reach the sea we encounter at Suku, in Java, a
teocalli which is absolutely identical with that of Tehuantepec. Mr.
Ferguson said, 'as we advance eastward from the valley of the Euphrates,
at every step we meet with forms of art becoming more and more like
those of Central America.'" ("Builders of Babel," p. 88.)

Prescott says:

The coincidences are sufficiently strong to authorize a belief that the
civilization of Anahuac was in some degree influenced by that of Eastern
Asia; and, secondly, that the discrepancies are such as to carry back
the communication to a very remote period." ("Mexico," vol. iii., p.
418.)

"All appearances," continues Lenormant ("Ancient History of the East,"
vol. i., p. 64), "would lead us to regard the Turanian race as the first
branch of the family of Japheth which went forth into the world; and by
that premature separation, by an isolated and antagonistic existence,
took, or rather preserved, a completely distinct physiognomy. . . . It
is a type of the white race imperfectly developed."

We may regard this yellow race as the first and oldest wave from
Atlantis, and, therefore, reaching farthest away from the common source;
then came the Hamitic race; then the Japhetic.

CHAPTER IX.

THE ANTIQUITY OF SOME OF OUR GREAT INVENTIONS.

It may seem like a flight of the imagination to suppose that the
mariner's compass was known to the inhabitants of Atlantis. And yet, if
my readers are satisfied that the Atlantean, were a highly civilized
maritime people, carrying on commerce with regions as far apart as Peru
and Syria, we must conclude that they possessed some means of tracing
their course in the great seas they traversed; and accordingly, when we
proceed to investigate this subject, we find that as far back as we may
go in the study of the ancient races of the world, we find them
possessed of a knowledge of the virtues of the magnetic stone, and in
the habit of utilizing it. The people of Europe, rising a few centuries
since out of a state of semi-barbarism, have been in the habit of
claiming the invention of many things which they simply borrowed from
the older nations. This was the case with the mariner's compass. It was
believed for many years that it was first invented by an Italian named
Amalfi, A.D. 1302. In that interesting work, Goodrich's "Life of
Columbus," we find a curious history of the magnetic compass prior to
that time, from which we collate the following points:

"In A.D. 868 it was employed by the Northmen." ("The Landnamabok," vol.
i., chap. 2.) An Italian poem Of A.D. 1190 refers to it as in use among
the Italian sailors at that date. In the ancient language of the
Hindoos, the Sanscrit--which has been a dead language for twenty-two
hundred years--the magnet was called "the precious stone beloved of
Iron." The Talmud speaks of it as "the stone of attraction;" and it is
alluded to in the early Hebrew prayers as Kalamitah, the same name given
it by the Greeks, from the reed upon which the compass floated. The
Phoenicians were familiar with the use of the magnet. At the prow of
their vessels stood the figure of a woman (Astarte) holding a cross in
one hand and pointing the way with the other; the cross represented the
compass, which was a magnetized needle, floating in water crosswise upon
a piece of reed or wood. The cross became the coat of arms of the
Phoenicians--not only, possibly, as we have shown, as a recollection of
the four rivers of Atlantis, but because it represented the secret of
their great sea-voyages, to which they owed their national greatness.
The hyperborean magician, Abaras, carried "a guiding arrow," which
Pythagoras gave him, "in order that it may be useful to him in all
difficulties in his long journey." ("Herodotus," vol. iv., p. 36.)

The magnet was called the "Stone of Hercules." Hercules was the patron
divinity of the Phoenicians. He was, as we have shown elsewhere, one of
the gods of Atlantis--probably one of its great kings and navigators.
The Atlanteans were, as Plato tells us, a maritime, commercial people,
trading up the Mediterranean as far as Egypt and Syria, and across the
Atlantic to "the whole opposite continent that surrounds the sea;" the
Phoenicians, as their successors and descendants, and colonized on the
shores of the Mediterranean, inherited their civilization and their
maritime habits, and with these that invention without which their great
voyages were impossible. From them the magnet passed to the Hindoos, and
from them to the Chinese, who certainly possessed it at an early date.
In the year 2700 B.C. the Emperor Wang-ti placed a magnetic figure with
an extended arm, like the Astarte of the Phoenicians, on the front of
carriages, the arm always turning and pointing to the south, which the
Chinese regarded as the principal pole. (See Goodrich's "Columbus," p.
31, etc.) This illustration represents one of these chariots:

In the seventh century it was used by the navigators of the Baltic Sea
and the German Ocean.

                          CHINESE MAGNETIC CAR

The ancient Egyptians called the loadstone the bone of Haroeri, and iron
the bone of Typhon. Haroeri was the son of Osiris and grandson of Rhea,
a goddess of the earth, a queen of Atlantis, and mother of Poseidon;
Typhon was a wind-god and an evil genius, but also a son of Rhea, the
earth goddess. Do we find in this curious designation of iron and
loadstone as "bones of the descendants of the earth," an explanation of
that otherwise inexplicable Greek legend about Deucalion "throwing the
bones of the earth behind him, when instantly men rose from the ground,
and the world was repeopled?" Does it mean that by means of the magnet
he sailed, after the Flood, to the European colonies of Atlantis.
already thickly inhabited?

A late writer, speaking upon the subject of the loadstone, tells us:

"Hercules, it was said, being once overpowered by the heat of the sun,
drew his bow against that luminary; whereupon the god Phoebus, admiring
his intrepidity, gave him a golden cup, with which he sailed over the
ocean. This cup was the compass, which old writers have called Lapis
Heracleus. Pisander says Oceanus lent him the cup, and Lucian says it
was a sea-shell. Tradition affirms that the magnet originally was not on
a pivot, but set to float on water in a cup. The old antiquarian is
wildly theoretical on this point, and sees a compass in the Golden
Fleece of Argos, in the oracular needle which Nero worshipped, and in
everything else. Yet undoubtedly there are some curious facts connected
with the matter. Osonius says that Gama and the Portuguese got the
compass from some pirates at the Cape of Good Hope, A.D. 1260. M.
Fauchet, the French antiquarian, finds it plainly alluded to in some old
poem of Brittany belonging to the year A.D. 1180. Paulo Venetus brought
it in the thirteenth century from China, where it was regarded as
oracular. Genebrand says Melvius, a Neapolitan, brought it to Europe in
A.D. 1303. Costa says Gama got it from Mohammedan seamen. But all
nations with whom it was found associate it with regions where Heraclean
myths prevailed. And one of the most curious facts is that the ancient
Britons, as the Welsh do to-day, call a pilot llywydd (lode).
Lodemanage, in Skinner's 'Etymology,' is the word for the price paid to
a pilot. But whether this famous, and afterward deified, mariner
(Hercules) had a compass or not, we can hardly regard the association of
his name with so many Western monuments as accidental."

Hercules was, as we know, a god of Atlantis, and Oceanos, who lent the
magnetic cup to Hercules, was the Dame by which the Greeks designated
the Atlantic Ocean. And this may be the explanation of the recurrence of
a cup in many antique paintings and statues. Hercules is often
represented with a cup in his hand; we even find the cup upon the handle
of the bronze dagger found in Denmark, and represented in the chapter on
the Bronze Age, in this work. (See p. 254 ante.)

So "oracular" an object as this self-moving needle, always pointing to
the north, would doubtless affect vividly the minds of the people, and
appear in their works of art. When Hercules left the coast of Europe to
sail to the island of Erythea in the Atlantic, in the remote west, we
are told, in Greek mythology (Murray, p. 257), that he borrowed "the
cup" of Helios, in (with) which "he was accustomed to sail every night."
Here we seem to have a reference to the magnetic cup used in night
sailing; and this is another proof that the use of the magnetic needle
in sea-voyages was associated with the Atlantean gods.

                          ANCIENT COINS OF TYRE

Lucian tells us that a sea-shell often took the place of the cup, as a
vessel in which to hold the water where the needle floated, and hence
upon the ancient coins of Tyre we find a sea-shell represented.

Here, too, we have the Pillars of Hercules, supposed to have been placed
at the mouth of the Mediterranean, and the tree of life or knowledge,
with the serpent twined around it, which appears in Genesis; and in the
combination of the two pillars and the serpent we have, it is said, the
original source of our dollar mark [$].

                        COIN FROM CENTRAL AMERICA

Compare these Phoenician coins with the following representation of a
copper coin, two inches in diameter and three lines thick, found nearly
a century ago by Ordonez, at the city of Guatemala. "M. Dupaix noticed
an indication of the use of the compass in the centre of one of the
sides, the figures on the same side representing a kneeling, bearded,
turbaned man between two fierce heads, perhaps of crocodiles, which
appear to defend the entrance to a mountainous and wooded country. The
reverse presents a serpent coiled around a fruit-tree, and an eagle on a
hill." (Bancroft's "Native Races," vol. iv., p. 118.) The mountain leans
to one side: it is a "culhuacan," or crooked mountain.

We find in Sanchoniathon's "Legends of the Phoenicians" that Ouranus,
the first god of the people of Atlantis, "devised Baetulia, contriving
stones that moved as having life, which were supposed to fall from
heaven." These stones were probably magnetic loadstones; in other words,
Ouranus, the first god of Atlantis, devised the mariner's compass.

I find in the "Report of United States Explorations for a Route for a
Pacific Railroad" a description of a New Mexican Indian priest, who
foretells the result of a proposed war by placing a piece of wood in a
bowl of water, and causing it to turn to the right or left, or sink or
rise, as he directs it. This is incomprehensible, unless the wood, like
the ancient Chinese compass, contained a piece of magnetic iron hidden
in it, which would be attracted or repulsed, or even drawn downward, by
a piece of iron held in the hand of the priest, on the outside of the
bowl. If so, this trick was a remembrance of the mariner's compass
transmitted from age to age by the medicine men. The reclining statue of
Chac-Mol, of Central America, holds a bowl or dish upon its breast.

Divination was the ars Etrusca. The Etruscans set their temples squarely
with the cardinal points of the compass; so did the Egyptians, the
Mexicans, and the Mound Builders of America. Could they have done this
without the magnetic compass?

The Romans and the Persians called the line of the axis of the globe
cardo, and it was to cardo the needle pointed. Now "Cardo was the name
of the mountain on which the human race took refuge from the Deluge . .
. the primitive geographic point for the countries which were the cradle
of the human race." (Urquhart's "Pillars of Hercules," vol. i., p. 145.)
From this comes our word "cardinal," as the cardinal points.

Navigation.--Navigation was not by any means in a rude state in the
earliest times:

"In the wanderings of the heroes returning from Troy, Aristoricus makes
Menelaus circumnavigate Africa more than 500 years before Neco sailed
from Gadeira to India." ("Cosmos," vol. ii., p. 144.)

"In the tomb of Rameses the Great is a representation of a naval combat
between the Egyptians and some other people, supposed to be the
Phoenicians, whose huge ships are propelled by sails." (Goodrich's
"Columbus," p. 29.)

The proportions of the fastest sailing-vessels of the present day are
about 300 feet long to 50 wide and 30 high; these were precisely the
proportions of Noah's ark--300 cubits long, 50 broad, and 30 high.

"Hiero of Syracuse built, under the superintendence of Archimedes, a
vessel which consumed in its construction the material for fifty
galleys; it contained galleries, gardens, stables, fish-ponds, mills,
baths, a temple of Venus, and an engine to throw stones three hundred
pounds in weight, and arrows thirty-six feet long. The floors of this
monstrous vessel were inlaid with scenes from Homer's 'Iliad.'" (Ibid.,
p. 30.)

The fleet of Sesostris consisted of four hundred ships; and when
Semiramis invaded India she was opposed by four thousand vessels.

It is probable that in the earliest times the vessels were sheeted with
metal. A Roman ship of the time of Trajan has been recovered from Lake
Ricciole after 1300 years. The outside was covered with sheets of lead
fastened with small copper nails. Even the use of iron chains in place
of ropes for the anchors was known at an early period. Julius Caesar
tells us that the galleys of the Veneti were thus equipped. (Goodrich's
"Columbus," p. 31.)

Gunpowder.--It is not impossible that even the invention of gunpowder
may date back to Atlantis. It was certainly known in Europe long before
the time of the German monk, Berthold Schwarz, who is commonly credited
with the invention of it. It was employed in 1257 at the siege of
Niebla, in Spain. It was described in an Arab treatise of the thirteenth
century. In A.D. 811 the Emperor Leo employed fire-arms. "Greek-fire" is
supposed to have been gunpowder mixed with resin or petroleum, and
thrown in the form of fuses and explosive shells. It was introduced from
Egypt A.D. 668. In A.D. 690 the Arabs used fire-arms against Mecca,
bringing the knowledge of them from India. In A.D. 80 the Chinese
obtained from India a knowledge of gunpowder. There is reason to believe
that the Carthaginian (Phoenician) general, Hannibal, used gunpowder in
breaking a way for his army over the Alps. The Romans, who were ignorant
of its use, said that Hannibal made his way by making fires against the
rocks, and pouring vinegar and water over the ashes. It is evident that
fire and vinegar would have no effect on masses of the Alps great enough
to arrest the march of an army. Dr. William Maginn has suggested that
the wood was probably burnt by Hannibal to obtain charcoal; and the word
which has been translated "vinegar" probably signified some preparation
of nitre and sulphur, and that Hannibal made gunpowder and blew up the
rocks. The same author suggests that the story of Hannibal breaking
loose from the mountains where he was surrounded on all sides by the
Romans, and in danger of starvation, by fastening firebrands to the
horns of two thousand oxen, and sending them rushing at night among the
terrified Romans, simply refers to the use of rockets. As Maginn well
asks, how could Hannibal be in danger of starvation when he had two
thousand oxen to spare for such an experiment? And why should the
veteran Roman troops have been so terrified and panic-stricken by a lot
of cattle with firebrands on their horns? At the battle of Lake
Trasymene, between Hannibal and Flaminius, we have another curious piece
of information which goes far to confirm the belief that Hannibal was
familiar with the use of gunpowder. In the midst of the battle there
was, say the Roman historians, an "earthquake;" the earth reeled under
the feet of the soldiers, a tremendous crash was heard, a fog or smoke
covered the scene, the earth broke open, and the rocks fell upon the
beads of the Romans. This reads very much as if the Carthaginians had
decoyed the Romans into a pass where they had already planted a mine,
and had exploded it at the proper moment to throw them into a panic.
Earthquakes do not cast rocks up in the air to fall on men's heads!

And that this is not all surmise is shown by the fact that a city of
India, in the time of Alexander the Great, defended itself by the use of
gunpowder: it was said to be a favorite of the gods, because thunder and
lightning came from its walls to resist the attacks of its assailants.

As the Hebrews were a branch of the Phoenician race, it is not
surprising that we find some things in their history which look very
much like legends of gunpowder.

When Korah, Dathan, and Abiram led a rebellion against Moses, Moses
separated the faithful from the unfaithful, and thereupon "the ground
clave asunder that was under them: and the earth opened her mouth, and
swallowed them up, and their houses, and all the men that appertained
unto Korah, and all their goods. . . . And there came out a fire from
the Lord, and consumed the two hundred and fifty men that offered
incense. . . . But on the morrow all the congregation of the children of
Israel murmured against Moses and against Aaron, saying, Ye have killed
the people of the Lord." (Numb. xvi., 31-41.)

This looks very much as if Moses had blown up the rebels with gunpowder.

Roger Bacon, who himself rediscovered gunpowder, was of opinion that the
event described in Judges vii., where Gideon captured the camp of the
Midianites with the roar of trumpets, the crash caused by the breaking
of innumerable pitchers, and the flash of a multitude of lanterns, had
reference to the use of gunpowder; that the noise made by the breaking
of the pitchers represented the detonation of an explosion, the flame of
the lights the blaze, and the noise of the trumpets the thunder of the
gunpowder. We can understand, in this wise, the results that followed;
but we cannot otherwise understand how the breaking of pitchers, the
flashing of lamps, and the clangor of trumpets would throw an army into
panic, until "every man's sword was set against his fellow, and the host
fled to Beth-shittah;" and this, too, without any attack upon the part
of the Israelites, for "they stood every man in his place around the
camp; and all the host ran and cried and fled."

If it was a miraculous interposition in behalf of the Jews, the Lord
could have scared the Midianites out of their wits without the smashed
pitchers and lanterns; and certain it is the pitchers, and lanterns
would not have done the work with out a miraculous interposition.

Having traced the knowledge of gunpowder back to the most remote times,
and to the different races which were descended from Atlantis, we are
not surprised to find in the legends of Greek mythology events described
which are only explicable by supposing that the Atlanteans possessed the
secret of this powerful explosive.

A rebellion sprang tip in Atlantis (see Murray's "Manual of Mythology,"
p. .30) against Zeus; it is known in mythology as the "War of the
Titans:"

"The struggle lasted many years, all the might which the Olympians could
bring to bear being useless, until, on the advice of Gaea, Zeus set free
the Kyklopes and the Hekatoncheires" (that is, brought the ships into
play), "of whom the former fashioned thunder-bolts for him, while the
latter advanced on his side with force equal to the shock of an
earthquake. The earth trembled down to lowest Tartarus as Zeus now
appeared with his terrible weapon and new allies. Old Chaos thought his
hour had come, as from a continuous blaze of thunder-bolts the earth
took fire, and the waters seethed in the sea. The rebels were partly
slain or consumed, and partly hurled into deep chasms, with rocks and
hills reeling after them."

Do not these words picture the explosion of a mine with a "force equal
to the shock of an earthquake?"

We have already shown that the Kyklopes and Hekatoncheires were probably
great war-ships, armed with some explosive material in the nature of
gunpowder.

Zeus, the king of Atlantis, was known as "the thunderer," and was
represented armed with thunder-bolts.

Some ancient nation must, in the most remote ages, have invented
gunpowder; and is it unreasonable to attribute it to that "great
original race" rather than to any one people of their posterity, who
seem to have borrowed all the other arts from them; and who, during many
thousands of years, did not add a single new invention to the list they
received from Atlantis?

Iron.--have seen that the Greek mythological legends asserted that
before the submergence of the great race over whom their gods reigned
there had been not only an Age of Bronze but an Age of Iron. This metal
was known to the Egyptians in the earliest ages; fragments of iron have
been found in the oldest pyramids. The Iron Age in Northern Europe far
antedated intercourse with the Greeks or Romans. In the mounds of the
Mississippi Valley, as I have shown, the remains of iron implements have
been found. In the "Mercurio Peruano" (tom. i., p. 201, 1791) it is
stated that "anciently the Peruvian sovereigns worked magnificent iron
mines at Ancoriames, on the west shore of Lake Titicaca." "It is
remarkable," says Molina, "that iron, which has been thought unknown to
the ancient Americans, had particular names in some of their tongues."
In official Peruvian it was called quillay, and in Chilian panilic. The
Mound Builders fashioned implements out of meteoric iron. (Foster's
"Prehistoric Races," p. 333.)

As we find this metal known to man in the earliest ages on both sides of
the Atlantic, the presumption is very strong that it was borrowed by the
nations, east and west, from Atlantis.

Paper.--The same argument holds good as to paper. The oldest Egyptian
monuments contain pictures of the papyrus roll; while in Mexico, as I
have shown, a beautiful paper was manufactured and formed into books
shaped like our own. In Peru a paper was made of plantain leaves, and
books were common in the earlier ages. Humboldt mentions books of
hieroglyphical writings among the Panoes, which were "bundles of their
paper resembling our volumes in quarto."

Silk Manufacture.--The manufacture of a woven fabric of great beauty out
of the delicate fibre of the egg-cocoon of a worm could only have
originated among a people who had attained the highest degree of
civilization; it implies the art of weaving by delicate instruments, a
dense population, a patient, skilful, artistic people, a sense of the
beautiful, and a wealthy and luxurious class to purchase such costly
fabrics.

We trace it back to the most remote ages. In the introduction to the
"History of Hindostan," or rather of the Mohammedan Dynasties, by
Mohammed Cassim, it is stated that in the year 3870 B.C. an Indian king
sent various silk stuffs as a present to the King of Persia. The art of
making silk was known in China more than two thousand six hundred years
before the Christian era, at the time when we find them first possessed
of civilization. The Phoenicians dealt in silks in the most remote past;
they imported them from India and sold them along the shores of the
Mediterranean. It is probable that the Egyptians understood and
practised the art of manufacturing silk. It was woven in the island of
Cos in the time of Aristotle. The "Babylonish garment" referred to in
Joshua (chap. vii., 21), and for secreting which Achan lost his life,
was probably a garment of silk; it was rated above silver and gold in
value.

It is not a violent presumption to suppose that an art known to the
Hindoos 3870 B.C., and to the Chinese and Phoenicians at the very
beginning of their history--an art so curious, so extraordinary--may
have dated back to Atlantean times.

Civil Government.--Mr. Baldwin shows ("Prehistoric Nations," p. 114)
that the Cushites, the successors of the Atlanteans, whose very ancient
empire extended from Spain to Syria, were the first to establish
independent municipal republics, with the right of the people to govern
themselves; and that this system was perpetuated in the great Phoenician
communities; in "the fierce democracies" of ancient Greece; in the
"village republics" of the African Berbers and the Hindoos; in the "free
cities" of the Middle Ages in Europe; and in the independent governments
of the Basques, which continued down to our own day. The Cushite state
was an aggregation of municipalities, each possessing the right of
self-government, but subject within prescribed limits to a general
authority; in other words, it was precisely the form of government
possessed to-day by the United States. It is a surprising thought that
the perfection of modern government may be another perpetuation of
Atlantean civilization.

Agriculture.--The Greek traditions of "the golden apples of the
Hesperides" and "the golden fleece" point to Atlantis. The allusions to
the golden apples indicate that tradition regarded the "Islands of the
Blessed" in the Atlantic Ocean as a place of orchards. And when we turn
to Egypt we find that in the remotest times many of our modern garden
and field plants were there cultivated. When the Israelites murmured in
the wilderness against Moses, they cried out (Numb., chap. xi., 4, 5),
"Who shall give us flesh to eat? We remember the fish which we did eat
in Egypt freely; the cucumbers, and the Melons, and the leeks, and the
onions, and the garlic." The Egyptians also cultivated wheat, barley,
oats, flax, hemp, etc. In fact, if we were to take away from civilized
man the domestic animals, the cereals, and the field and garden
vegetables possessed by the Egyptians at the very dawn of history, there
would be very little left for the granaries or the tables of the world.

Astronomy.--The knowledge of the ancients as to astronomy was great and
accurate. Callisthenes, who accompanied Alexander the Great to Babylon,
sent to Aristotle a series of Chaldean astronomical observations which
he found preserved there, recorded on tablets of baked clay, and
extending back as far as 2234 B.C. Humboldt says, "The Chaldeans knew
the mean motions of the moon with an exactness which induced the Greek
astronomers to use their calculations for the foundation of a lunar
theory." The Chaldeans knew the true nature of comets, and could
foretell their reappearance. "A lens of considerable power was found in
the ruins of Babylon; it was an inch and a half in diameter and
nine-tenths of an inch thick." (Layard's "Nineveh and Babylon," pp.
16,17.) Nero used optical glasses when be watched the fights of the
gladiators; they are supposed to have come from Egypt and the East.
Plutarch speaks of optical instruments used by Archimedes "to manifest
to the eye the largeness of the sun." "There are actual astronomical
calculations in existence, with calendars formed upon them, which
eminent astronomers of England and France admit to be genuine and true,
and which carry back the antiquity of the science of astronomy, together
with the constellations, to within a few years of the Deluge, even on
the longer chronology of the Septuagint." ("The Miracle in Stone," p.
142.) Josephus attributes the invention of the constellations to the
family of the antediluvian Seth, the son of Adam, while Origen affirms
that it was asserted in the Book of Enoch that in the time of that
patriarch the constellations were already divided and named. The Greeks
associated the origin of astronomy with Atlas and Hercules, Atlantean
kings or heroes. The Egyptians regarded Taut (At?) or Thoth, or
At-hotes, as the originator of both astronomy and the alphabet;
doubtless he represented a civilized people, by whom their country was
originally colonized. Bailly and others assert that astronomy "must have
been established when the summer solstice was in the first degree of
Virgo, and that the solar and lunar zodiacs were of similar antiquity,
which would be about four thousand years before, the Christian era. They
suppose the originators to have lived in about the fortieth degree of
north latitude, and to have been a highly-civilized people." It will be
remembered that the fortieth degree of north latitude passed through
Atlantis. Plato knew (" Dialogues, Phaedo," 108) that the earth "is a
body in the centre of the heavens" held in equipoise. He speaks of it as
a "round body," a "globe;" he even understood that it revolved on its
axis, and that these revolutions produced day and night. He
says--"Dialogues, Timaeus"--"The earth circling around the pole (which
is extended through the universe) be made to be the artificer of night
and day." All this Greek learning was probably drawn from the Egyptians.

Only among the Atlanteans in Europe and America do we find traditions
preserved as to the origin of all the principal inventions which have
raised man from a savage to a civilized condition. We can give in part
the very names of the inventors.

Starting with the Chippeway legends, and following with the Bible and
Phoenician records, we make a table like the appended:

+------------------------------+-----------+----------------------------+
| The Invention or Discovery.  | The Race. | The Inventors.             |
+------------------------------+-----------+----------------------------+
| Fire                         | Atlantean | Phos, Phur, and Phlox.     |
+------------------------------+-----------+----------------------------+
| The bow and arrow            | Chippeway | Manaboshu.                 |
+------------------------------+-----------+----------------------------+
| The use of flint             | "         | "                          |
+------------------------------+-----------+----------------------------+
| The use of copper            | "         | "                          |
+------------------------------+-----------+----------------------------+
| The manufacture of bricks    | Atlantean | Autochthon and Technites.  |
+------------------------------+-----------+----------------------------+
| Agriculture and hunting      | "         | Argos and Agrotes.         |
+------------------------------+-----------+----------------------------+
| Village life, and the        | "         | Amynos and Magos.          |
| rearing of flocks            |           |                            |
+------------------------------+-----------+----------------------------+
| The use of salt              | "         | Misor and Sydyk.           |
+------------------------------+-----------+----------------------------+
| The use of letters           | "         | Taautos, or Taut.          |
+------------------------------+-----------+----------------------------+
| Navigation                   | "         | The Cabiri, or Corybantes. |
+------------------------------+-----------+----------------------------+
| The art of music             | Hebrew    | Jubal.                     |
+------------------------------+-----------+----------------------------+
| Metallurgy, and the use of   | "         | Tubal-cain.                |
| iron                         |           |                            |
+------------------------------+-----------+----------------------------+
| The syrinx                   | Greek     | Pan.                       |
+------------------------------+-----------+----------------------------+
| The lyre                     | "         | Hermes.                    |
+------------------------------+-----------+----------------------------+

We cannot consider all these evidences of the vast antiquity of the
great inventions upon which our civilization mainly rests, including the
art of writing, which, as I have shown, dates back far beyond the
beginning of history; we cannot remember that the origin of all the
great food-plants, such as wheat, oats, barley, rye, and maize, is lost
in the remote past; and that all the domesticated animals, the horse,
the ass, the ox, the sheep, the goat, and the hog had been reduced to
subjection to man in ages long previous to written history, without
having the conclusion forced upon us irresistibly that beyond Egypt and
Greece, beyond Chaldea and China, there existed a mighty civilization,
of which these states were but the broken fragments.

CHAPTER X.

THE ARYAN COLONIES FROM ATLANTIS.

We come now to another question: "Did the Aryan or Japhetic race come
from Atlantis?"

If the Aryans are the Japhetic race, and if Japheth was one of the sons
of the patriarch who escaped from the Deluge, then assuredly, if the
tradition of Genesis be true, the Aryans came from the drowned land, to
wit, Atlantis. According to Genesis, the descendants of the Japheth who
escaped out of the Flood with Noah are the Ionians, the inhabitants of
the Morea, the dwellers on the Cilician coast of Asia Minor, the
Cyprians, the Dodoneans of Macedonia, the Iberians, and the Thracians.
These are all now recognized as Aryans, except the Iberians.

"From non-Biblical sources," says Winchell, "we obtain further
information respecting the early dispersion of the Japhethites or
Indo-Europeans--called also Aryans. All determinations confirm the
Biblical account of their primitive residence in the same country with
the Hamites and Semites. Rawlinson informs us that even Aryan roots are
mingled with Presemitic in some of the old inscriptions of Assyria. The
precise region where these three families dwelt in a common home has not
been pointed out." ("Preadamites," p. 43.)

I have shown in the chapter in relation to Peru that all the languages
of the Hamites, Semites, and Japhethites are varieties of one aboriginal
speech.

The centre of the Aryan migrations (according to popular opinion) within
the Historical Period was Armenia. Here too is Mount Ararat, where it is
said the ark rested--another identification with the Flood regions, as
it represents the usual transfer of the Atlantis legend by an Atlantean
people to a high mountain in their new home.

Now turn to a map: Suppose the ships of Atlantis to have reached the
shores of Syria, at the eastern end of the Mediterranean, where dwelt a
people who, as we have seen, used the Central American Maya alphabet;
the Atlantis ships are then but two hundred miles distant from Armenia.
But these ships need not stop at Syria, they can go by the Dardanelles
and the Black Sea, by uninterrupted water communication, to the shores
of Armenia itself. If we admit, then, that it was from Armenia the
Aryans stocked Europe and India, there is no reason why the original
population of Armenia should not have been themselves colonists from
Atlantis.

But we have seen that in the earliest ages, before the first Armenian
migration of the historical Aryans, a people went from Iberian Spain and
settled in Ireland, and the language of this people, it is now admitted,
is Aryan. And these Iberians were originally, according to tradition,
from the West.

The Mediterranean Aryans are known to have been in Southeastern Europe,
along the shores of the Mediterranean, 2000 B.C. They at that early date
possessed the plough; also wheat, rye, barley, gold, silver, and bronze.
Aryan faces are found depicted upon the monuments of Egypt, painted four
thousand years before the time of Christ. "The conflicts between the
Kelts (an Aryan race) and the Iberians were far anterior in date to the
settlements of the Phoenicians, Greeks, Carthaginians, and Noachites on
the coasts of the Mediterranean Sea." ("American Cyclopaedia," art.
Basques.) There is reason to believe that these Kelts were originally
part of the population and Empire of Atlantis. We are told (Rees's
"British Encyclopaedia," art. Titans) that "Mercury, one of the
Atlantean gods, was placed as ruler over the Celtae, and became their
great divinity." F. Pezron, in his "Antiquity of the Celtae," makes out
that the Celtae were the same as the Titans, the giant race who rebelled
in Atlantis, and "that their princes were the same with the giants of
Scripture." He adds that the word Titan "is perfect Celtic, and comes
from tit, the earth, and ten or den, man, and hence the Greeks very
properly also called them terriginae, or earth-born." And it will be
remembered that Plato uses the same phrase when he speaks of the race
into which Poseidon intermarried as "the earth-born primeval men of that
country."

The Greeks, who are Aryans, traced their descent from the people who
were destroyed by the Flood, as did other races clearly Aryan.

"The nations who are comprehended under the common appellation of
Indo-European," says Max Mueller--"the Hindoos, the Persians, the Celts,
Germans, Romans, Greeks, and Slavs--do not only share the same words and
the same grammar, slightly modified in each country, but they seem to
have likewise preserved a mass of popular traditions which had grown up
before they left their common home."

"Bonfey, L. Geiger, and other students of the ancient Indo-European
languages, have recently advanced the opinion that the original home of
the Indo-European races must be sought in Europe, because their stock of
words is rich in the names of plants and animals, and contains names of
seasons that are not found in tropical countries or anywhere in Asia."
("American Cyclopaedia," art. Ethnology.)

By the study of comparative philology, or the seeking out of the words
common to the various branches of the Aryan race before they separated,
we are able to reconstruct an outline of the civilization of that
ancient people. Max Mueller has given this subject great study, and
availing ourselves of his researches we can determine the following
facts as to the progenitors of the Aryan stock: They were a civilized
race; they possessed the institution of marriage; they recognized the
relationship of father, mother, son, daughter, grandson, brother,
sister, mother-in-law, father-in-law, son-in-law, daughter-in-law,
brother-in-law, and sister-in-law, and had separate words for each of
these relationships, which we are only able to express by adding the
words "in-law." They recognized also the condition of widows, or "the
husbandless." They lived in an organized society, governed by a king.
They possessed houses with doors and solid walls. They had wagons and
carriages. They possessed family names. They dwelt in towns and cities,
on highways. They were not hunters or nomads. They were a peaceful
people; the warlike words in the different Aryan languages cannot be
traced back to this original race. They lived in a country having few
wild beasts; the only wild animals whose names can be assigned to this
parent stock being the bear, the wolf, and the serpent. The name of the
elephant, "the beast with a hand," occurs only twice in the "Rig-Veda;"
a singular omission if the Aryans were from time immemorial an Asiatic
race; and "when it does occur, it is in such a way as to show that he
was still an object of wonder and terror to them." (Whitney's "Oriental
and Linguistic Studies," p. 26.) They possessed nearly all the domestic
animals we now have--the ox and the cow, the horse, the dog, the sheep,
the goat, the hog, the donkey, and the goose. They divided the year into
twelve months. They were farmers; they used the plough; their name as a
race (Aryan) was derived from it; they were, par excellence, ploughmen;
they raised various kinds of grain, including flax, barley, hemp, and
wheat; they had mills and millers, and ground their corn. The presence
of millers shows that they had proceeded beyond the primitive condition
where each family ground its corn in its own mill. They used fire, and
cooked and baked their food; they wove cloth and wore clothing; they
spun wool; they possessed the different metals, even iron: they had
gold. The word for "water" also meant "salt made from water," from which
it might be inferred that the water with which they were familiar was
saltwater. It is evident they manufactured salt by evaporating salt
water. They possessed boats and ships. They had progressed so far as to
perfect "a decimal system of enumeration, in itself," says Max Mueller,
"one of the most marvellous achievements of the human mind, based on an
abstract conception of quantity, regulated by a philosophical
classification, and yet conceived, nurtured, and finished before the
soil of Europe was trodden by Greek, Roman, Slav, or Teuton."

                         ANCIENT EGYPTIAN PLOUGH

And herein we find another evidence of relationship between the Aryans
and the people of Atlantis. Although Plato does not tell us that the
Atlanteans possessed the decimal system of numeration, nevertheless
there are many things in his narrative which point to that conclusion
"There were ten kings ruling over ten provinces; the whole country was
divided into military districts or squares ten stadia each way; the
total force of chariots was ten thousand; the great ditch or canal was
one hundred feet deep and ten thousand stadia long; there were one
hundred Nereids," etc. In the Peruvian colony the decimal system clearly
obtained: "The army had heads of ten, fifty, a hundred, five hundred, a
thousand, ten thousand. . . . The community at large was registered in
groups, under the control of officers over tens, fifties, hundreds, and
so on." (Herbert Spencer, "Development of Political Institutions," chap.
x.) The same division into tens and hundreds obtained among the
Anglo-Saxons.

Where, we ask, could this ancient nation, which existed before Greek was
Greek, Celt was Celt, Hindoo was Hindoo, or Goth was Goth, have been
located! The common opinion says, in Armenia or Bactria, in Asia. But
where in Asia could they have found a country so peaceful as to know no
terms for war or bloodshed;--a country so civilized as to possess no
wild beasts save the bear, wolf, and serpent? No people could have been
developed in Asia without bearing in its language traces of century-long
battles for life with the rude and barbarous races around them; no
nation could have fought for ages for existence against "man-eating"
tigers, lions, elephants, and hyenas, without bearing the memory of
these things in their tongue. A tiger, identical with that of Bengal,
still exists around Lake Aral, in Asia; from time to time it is seen in
Siberia. "The last tiger killed in 1828 was on the Lena, in latitude
fifty-two degrees thirty minutes, in a climate colder than that of St.
Petersburg and Stockholm."

The fathers of the Aryan race must have dwelt for many thousand years so
completely protected from barbarians and wild beasts that they at last
lost all memory of them, and all words descriptive of them; and where
could this have been possible save in some great, long-civilized land,
surrounded by the sea, and isolated from the attack of the savage tribes
that occupied the rest of the world? And if such a great civilized
nation had dwelt for centuries in Asia, Europe, or Africa, why have not
their monuments long ago been discovered and identified? Where is the
race who are their natural successors, and who must have continued to
live after them in that sheltered and happy land, where they knew no
human and scarcely any animal enemies? Why would any people have
altogether left such a home? Why, when their civilization had spread to
the ends of the earth, did it cease to exist in the peaceful region
where it originated?

Savage nations cannot usually count beyond five. This people had names
for the numerals up to one hundred, and the power, doubtless, of
combining these to still higher powers, as three hundred, five hundred,
ten hundred, etc. Says a high authority, "If any more proof were wanted
as to the reality of that period which must have preceded the dispersion
of the Aryan race, we might appeal to the Aryan numerals as irrefragable
evidence of that long-continued intellectual life which characterizes
that period." Such a degree of progress implies necessarily an alphabet,
writing, commerce, and trade, even as the existence of words for boats
and ships has already implied navigation.

In what have we added to the civilization of this ancient people? Their
domestic animals were the same as our own, except one fowl adopted from
America. In the past ten thousand years we have added one bird to their
list of domesticated animals! They raised wheat and wool, and spun and
wove as we do, except that we have added some mechanical contrivances to
produce the same results. Their metals are ours. Even iron, the triumph,
as we had supposed, of more modern times, they had already discovered.
And it must not be forgotten that Greek mythology tells us that the
god-like race who dwelt on Olympus, that great island "in the midst of
the Atlantic," in the remote west, wrought in iron; and we find the
remains of an iron sword and meteoric iron weapons in the mounds of the
Mississippi Valley, while the name of the metal is found in the ancient
languages of Peru and Chili, and the Incas worked in iron on the shores
of Lake Titicaca.

A still further evidence of the civilization of this ancient race is
found in the fact that, before the dispersion from their original home,
the Aryans had reached such a degree of development that they possessed
a regularly organized religion: they worshipped God, they believed in an
evil spirit, they believed in a heaven for the just. All this
presupposes temples, priests, sacrifices, and an orderly state of
society.

We have seen that Greek mythology is really a history of the kings and
queens of Atlantis.

When we turn to that other branch of the great Aryan family, the
Hindoos, we find that their gods are also the kings of Atlantis. The
Hindoo god Varuna is conceded to be the Greek god Uranos, who was the
founder of the royal family of Atlantis.

In the Veda we find a hymn to "King Varuna," in which occurs this
passage:

"This earth, too, belongs to Varuna, the king, and this wide sky, with
its ends far apart. The two seas are Varuna's loins; he is contained
also in this drop of water."

Again in the Veda we find another hymn to King Varuna:

"He who knows the place of the birds that fly through the sky; who on
the waters knows the ships. He, the upholder of order, who knows the
twelve months with the offspring of each, and knows the month that is
engendered afterward."

This verse would seem to furnish additional proof that the Vedas were
written by a maritime people; and in the allusion to the twelve months
we are reminded of the Peruvians, who also divided the year into twelve
parts of thirty days each, and afterward added six days to complete the
year. The Egyptians and Mexicans also had intercalary days for the same
purpose.

But, above all, it must be remembered that the Greeks, an Aryan race, in
their mythological traditions, show the closest relationship to
Atlantis. At-tika and At-hens are reminiscences of Ad, and we are told
that Poseidon, god and founder of Atlantis, founded Athens. We find in
the "Eleusinian mysteries" an Atlantean institution; their influence
during the whole period of Greek history down to the coming of
Christianity was extraordinary; and even then this masonry of
Pre-Christian days, in which kings and emperors begged to be initiated,
was, it is claimed, continued to our own times in our own Freemasons,
who trace their descent back to "a Dionysiac fraternity which originated
in Attika." And just as we have seen the Saturnalian festivities of
Italy descending from Atlantean harvest-feasts, so these Eleusinian
mysteries can be traced back to Plato's island. Poseidon was at the base
of them; the first hierophant, Eumolpus, was "a son of Poseidon," and
all the ceremonies were associated with seed-time and harvest, and with
Demeter or Ceres, an Atlantean goddess, daughter of Chronos, who first
taught the Greeks to use the plough and to plant barley. And, as the
"Carnival" is a survival of the "Saturnalia," so Masonry is a survival
of the Eleusinian mysteries. The roots of the institutions of to-day
reach back to the Miocene Age.

We have seen that Zeus, the king of Atlantis, whose tomb was shown at
Crete, was transformed into the Greek god Zeus; and in like manner we
find him reappearing among the Hindoos as Dyaus. He is called
"Dyaus-pitar," or God the Father, as among the Greeks we have
"Zeus-pater," which became among the Romans "Jupiter."

The strongest connection, however, with the Atlantean system is shown in
the case of the Hindoo god Deva-Nahusha.

We have seen in the chapter on Greek mythology that Dionysos was a son
of Zeus and grandson of Poseidon, being thus identified with Atlantis.
"When he arrived at manhood," said the Greeks, "he set out on a journey
through all known countries, even into the remotest parts of India,
instructing the people, as be proceeded, how to tend the vine, and how
to practise many other arts of peace, besides teaching them the value of
just and honorable dealings. He was praised everywhere as the greatest
benefactor of mankind." (Murray's "Mythology," p. 119.)

In other words, be represented the great Atlantean civilization,
reaching into "the remotest parts of India," and "to all parts of the
known world," from America to Asia. In consequence of the connection of
this king with the vine, he was converted in later times into the
dissolute god Bacchus. But everywhere the traditions concerning him
refer us back to Atlantis. "All the legends of Egypt, India, Asia Minor,
and the older Greeks describe him as a king very great during his life,
and deified after death. . . . Amon, king of Arabia or Ethiopia, married
Rhea, sister of Chronos, who reigned over Italy, Sicily, and certain
countries of Northern Africa." Dionysos, according to the Egyptians, was
the son of Amon by the beautiful Amalthea. Chronos and Amon had a
prolonged war; Dionysos defeated Chronos and captured his capital,
dethroned him, and put his son Zeus in his place; Zeus reigned nobly,
and won a great fame. Dionysos succeeded his father Amon, and "became
the greatest of sovereigns. He extended his sway in all the neighboring
countries, and completed the conquest of India. . . . He gave much
attention to the Cushite colonies in Egypt, greatly increasing their
strength, intelligence, and prosperity." (Baldwin's "Prehistoric
Nations," p. 283.)

When we turn to the Hindoo we still find this Atlantean king.

In the Sanscrit books we find reference to a god called Deva-Nahusha,
who has been identified by scholars with Dionysos. He is connected "with
the oldest history and mythology in the world." He is said to have been
a contemporary with Indra, king of Meru, who was also deified, and who
appears in the Veda as a principal form of representation of the Supreme
Being.

"The warmest colors of imagination are used in portraying the greatness
of Deva-Nahusha. For a time he had sovereign control of affairs in Meru;
he conquered the seven dwipas, and led his armies through all the known
countries of the world; by means of matchless wisdom and miraculous
heroism he made his empire universal." (Ibid., p. 287.)

Here we see that the great god Indra, chief god of the Hindoos, was
formerly king of Meru, and that Deva-Nahusha (De(va)nushas--De-onyshas)
had also been king of Meru; and we must remember that Theopompus tell us
that the island of Atlantis was inhabited by the "Meropes;" and
Lenormant has reached the conclusion that the first people of the
ancient world were "the men of Mero."

We can well believe, when we see traces of the same civilization
extending from Peru and Lake Superior to Armenia and the frontiers of
China, that this Atlantean kingdom was indeed "universal," and extended
through all the "known countries of the world."

"We can see in the legends that Pururavas, Nahusha, and others had no
connection with Sanscrit history. They are referred to ages very long
anterior to the Sanscrit immigration, and must have been great
personages celebrated in the traditions of the natives or Dasyus. . . .
Pururavas was a king of great renown, who ruled over thirteen islands of
the ocean, altogether surrounded by inhuman (or superhuman) personages;
he engaged in a contest with Brahmans, and perished. Nahusha, mentioned
by Maull, and in many legends, as famous for hostility to the Brahmans,
lived at the time when Indra ruled on earth. He was a very great king,
who ruled with justice a mighty empire, and attained the sovereignty of
three worlds." (Europe, Africa, and America?) "Being intoxicated with
pride, he was arrogant to Brahmans, compelled them to bear his
palanquin, and even dared to touch one of them with his foot" (kicked
him?), "whereupon be was transformed into a serpent." (Baldwin's
"Prehistoric Nations," p. 291.)

The Egyptians placed Dionysos (Osiris) at the close of the period of
their history which was assigned to the gods, that is, toward the close
of the great empire of Atlantis.

When we remember that the hymns of the "Rig-Veda" are admitted to date
back to a vast antiquity, and are written in a language that had ceased
to be a living tongue thousands of years ago, we can almost fancy those
hymns preserve some part of the songs of praise uttered of old upon the
island of Atlantis. Many of them seem to belong to sun-worship, and
might have been sung with propriety upon the high places of Peru:

"In the beginning there arose the golden child. He was the one born Lord
of all that is. He established the earth and the sky. Who is the god to
whom we shall offer sacrifice?

"He who gives life; He who gives strength; whose command all the bright
gods" (the stars?) "revere; whose light is immortality; whose shadow is
death. . . . He who through his power is the one God of the breathing
and awakening world. He who governs all, man and beast. He whose
greatness these snowy mountains, whose greatness the sea proclaims, with
the distant river. He through whom the sky is bright and the earth firm.
. . . He who measured out the light in the air... Wherever the mighty
water-clouds went, where they placed the seed and lit the fire, thence
arose He who is the sole life of the bright gods. . . . He to whom
heaven and earth, standing firm by His will, look up, trembling
inwardly. . . . May he not destroy us; He, the creator of the earth; He,
the righteous, who created heaven. He also created the bright and mighty
waters."

This is plainly a hymn to the sun, or to a god whose most glorious
representative was the sun. It is the hymn of a people near the sea; it
was not written by a people living in the heart of Asia. It was the hymn
of a people living in a volcanic country, who call upon their god to
keep the earth "firm" and not to destroy them. It was sung at daybreak,
as the sun rolled up the sky over an "awakening world."

The fire (Agni) upon the altar was regarded as a messenger rising from
the earth to the sun:

"Youngest of the gods, their messenger, their invoker. . . . For thou, O
sage, goest wisely between these two creations (heaven and earth, God
and man) like a friendly messenger between two hamlets."

The dawn of the day (Ushas), part of the sun-worship, became also a god:

"She shines upon us like a young wife, rousing every living being to go
to his work. When the fire had to be kindled by man, she made the light
by striking down the darkness."

As the Egyptians and the Greeks looked to a happy abode (an under-world)
in the west, beyond the waters, so the Aryan's paradise was the other
side of some body of water. In the Veda (vii. 56, 24) we find a prayer
to the Maruts, the storm-gods: "O, Maruts, may there be to us a strong
son, who is a living ruler of men; through whom we may cross the waters
on our way to the happy abode." This happy abode is described as "where
King Vaivasvata reigns; where the secret place of heaven is; where the
mighty waters are . . . where there is food and rejoicing . . . where
there is happiness and delight; where joy and pleasure reside."
(Rig-Veda ix. 113, 7.) This is the paradise beyond the seas; the
Elysion; the Elysian Fields of the Greek and the Egyptian, located upon
an island in the Atlantic which was destroyed by water. One great chain
of tradition binds together these widely separated races.

"The religion of the Veda knows no idols," says Max Mueller; "the
worship of idols in India is a secondary formation, a degradation of the
more primitive worship of ideal gods."

It was pure sun-worship, such as prevailed in Peru on the arrival of the
Spaniards. It accords with Plato's description of the religion of
Atlantis.

"The Dolphin's Ridge," at the bottom of the Atlantic, or the high land
revealed by the soundings taken by the ship Challenger, is, as will be
seen, of a three-pronged form--one prong pointing toward the west coast
of Ireland, another connecting with the north-east coast of South
America, and a third near or on the west coast of Africa. It does not
follow that the island of Atlantis, at any time while inhabited by
civilized people, actually reached these coasts; there is a strong
probability that races of men may have found their way there from the
three continents of Europe, America, and Africa; or the great continent
which once filled the whole bed of the present Atlantic Ocean, and from
whose debris geology tells us the Old and New Worlds were constructed,
may have been the scene of the development, during immense periods of
time, of diverse races of men, occupying different zones of climate.

There are many indications that there were three races of men dwelling
on Atlantis. Noah, according to Genesis, had three sons--Shem, Ham, and
Japheth--who represented three different races of men of different
colors. The Greek legends tell us of the rebellions inaugurated at
different times in Olympus. One of these was a rebellion of the Giants,
"a race of beings sprung from the blood of Uranos," the great original
progenitor of the stock. "Their king or leader was Porphyrion, their
most powerful champion Alkyoneus." Their mother was the earth: this
probably meant that they represented the common people of a darker line.
They made a desperate struggle for supremacy, but were conquered by
Zeus. There were also two rebellions of the Titans. The Titans seem to
have had a government of their own, and the names of twelve of their
kings are given in the Greek mythology (see Murray, p. 27). They also
were of "the blood of Uranos," the Adam of the people. We read, in fact,
that Uranos married Gaea (the earth), and had three families: 1, the
Titans; 2, the Hekatoncheires; and 3, the Kyklopes. We should conclude
that the last two were maritime peoples, and I have shown that their
mythical characteristics were probably derived from the appearance of
their ships. Here we have, I think, a reference to the three races: 1,
the red or sunburnt men, like the Egyptians, the Phoenicians, the
Basques, and the Berber and Cushite stocks; 2, the sons of Shem,
possibly the yellow or Turanian race; and 3, the whiter men, the Aryans,
the Greeks, Kelts, Goths, Slavs, etc. If this view is correct, then we
may suppose that colonies of the pale-faced stock may have been sent out
from Atlantis to the northern coasts of Europe at different and perhaps
widely separated periods of time, from some of which the Aryan families
of Europe proceeded; hence the legend, which is found among them, that
they were once forced to dwell in a country where the summers were only
two months long.

From the earliest times two grand divisions are recognized in the Aryan
family: "to the east those who specially called themselves Arians, whose
descendants inhabited Persia, India, etc.; to the west, the Yavana, or
the Young Ones, who first emigrated westward, and from whom have
descended the various nations that have populated Europe. This is the
name (Javan) found in the tenth chapter of Genesis." (Lenormant and
Chevallier, "Ancient History of the East," vol. ii., p. 2.) But surely
those who "first emigrated westward," the earliest to leave the parent
stock, could not be the "Young Ones;" they would be rather the elder
brothers. But if we can suppose the Bactrian population to have left
Atlantis at an early date, and the Greeks, Latins, and Celts to have
left it at a later period, then they would indeed be the "Young Ones" of
the family, following on the heels of the earlier migrations, and herein
we would find the explanation of the resemblance between the Latin and
Celtic tongues. Lenormant says the name of Erin (Ireland) is derived
from Aryan; and yet we have seen this island populated and named Erin by
races distinctly. connected with Spain, Iberia, Africa, and Atlantis.

There is another reason for supposing that the Aryan nations came from
Atlantis.

We find all Europe, except a small corner of Spain and a strip along the
Arctic Circle, occupied by nations recognized as Aryan; but when we turn
to Asia, there is but a corner of it, and that corner in the part
nearest Europe, occupied by the Aryans. All the rest of that great
continent has been filled from immemorial ages by non-Aryan races. There
are seven branches of the Aryan family: 1. Germanic or Teutonic; 2.
Slavo-Lithuanic; 3. Celtic; 4. Italic; 5. Greek; 6. Iranian or Persian;
7. Sanscritic or Indian; and of these seven branches five dwell on the
soil of Europe, and the other two are intrusive races in Asia from the
direction of Europe. The Aryans in Europe have dwelt there apparently
since the close of the Stone Age, if not before it, while the movements
of the Aryans in Asia are within the Historical Period, and they appear
as intrusive stocks, forming a high caste amid a vast population of a
different race. The Vedas are supposed to date back to 2000 B.C., while
there is every reason to believe that the Celt inhabited Western Europe
5000 B.C. If the Aryan race had originated in the heart of Asia, why
would not its ramifications have extended into Siberia, China, and
Japan, and all over Asia? And if the Aryans moved at a comparatively
recent date into Europe from Bactria, where are the populations that
then inhabited Europe--the men of the ages of stone and bronze? We
should expect to find the western coasts of Europe filled with them,
just as the eastern coasts of Asia and India are filled with Turanian
populations. On the contrary, we know that the Aryans descended upon
India from the Punjab, which lies to the north-west of that region; and
that their traditions represent that they came there from the west, to
wit, from the direction of Europe and Atlantis.

CHAPTER XI.

ATLANTIS RECONSTRUCTED.

The farther we go back in time toward the era of Atlantis, the more the
evidences multiply that we are approaching the presence of a great,
wise, civilized race. For instance, we find the Egyptians, Ethiopians,
and Israelites, from the earliest ages, refusing to eat the flesh of
swine. The Western nations departed from this rule, and in these modern
days we are beginning to realize the dangers of this article of food, on
account of the trichina contained in it; and when we turn to the Talmud,
we are told that it was forbidden to the Jews, "because of a small
insect which infests it."

The Egyptians, the Ethiopians, the Phoenicians, the Hebrews, and others
of the ancient races, practised circumcision. It was probably resorted
to in Atlantean days, and imposed as a religious duty, to arrest one of
the most dreadful scourges of the human race-a scourge which continued
to decimate the people of America, arrested their growth, and paralyzed
their civilization. Circumcision stamped out the disease in Atlantis; we
read of one Atlantean king, the Greek god Ouranos, who, in a time of
plague, compelled his whole army and the armies of his allies to undergo
the rite. The colonies that went out to Europe carried the practice but
not the disease out of which it originated with them; and it was not
until Columbus reopened communication with the infected people of the
West India Islands that the scourge crossed the Atlantic and "turned
Europe," as one has expressed it, "into a charnal-house."

Life-insurance statistics show, nowadays, that the average life and
health of the Hebrew is much greater than that of other men; and he owes
this to the retention of practices and beliefs imposed ten thousand
years ago by the great, wise race of Atlantis.

Let us now, with all the facts before us, gleaned from various sources,
reconstruct, as near as may be, the condition of the antediluvians.

They dwelt upon a great island, near which were other smaller islands,
probably east and west of them, forming stepping-stones, as it were,
toward Europe and Africa in one direction, and the West India Islands
and America in the other. There were volcanic mountains upon the main
island, rising to a height of fifteen hundred feet, with their tops
covered with perpetual snow. Below these were elevated table-lands, upon
which were the royal establishments. Below these, again, was "the great
plain of Atlantis." There were four rivers flowing north, south, east,
and west from a central point. The climate was like that of the Azores,
mild and pleasant; the soil volcanic and fertile, and suitable at its
different elevations for the growth of the productions of the tropical
and temperate zones.

The people represented at least two different races: a dark brown
reddish race, akin to the Central Americans, the Berbers and the
Egyptians; and a white race, like the Greeks, Goths, Celts, and
Scandinavians. Various battles and struggles followed between the
different peoples for supremacy. The darker race seems to have been,
physically, a smaller race, with small hands; the lighter-colored race
was much larger--hence the legends of the Titans and Giants. The
Guanches of the Canary Islands were men of very great stature. As the
works of the Bronze Age represent a small-handed race, and as the races
who possessed the ships and gunpowder joined in the war against the
Giants, we might conclude that the dark races were the more civilized,
that they were the metal-workers and navigators.

The fact that the same opinions and customs exist on both sides of the
ocean implies identity of origin; it might be argued that the fact that
the explanation of many customs existing on both hemispheres is to be
found only in America, implies that the primeval stock existed in
America, the emigrating portion of the population carrying away the
custom, but forgetting the reason for it. The fact that domestic cattle
and the great cereals, wheat, oats, barley, and rye, are found in Europe
and not in America, would imply that after population moved to Atlantis
from America civilization was developed in Atlantis, and that in the
later ages communication was closer and more constant between Atlantis
and Europe than between Atlantis and America. In the case of the bulky
domestic animals, it would be more difficult to transport them, in the
open vessels of that day, from Atlantis across the wider expanse of sea
to America, than it would be to carry them by way of the now submerged
islands in front of the Mediterranean Sea to the coast of Spain. It may
be, too, that the climate of Spain and Italy was better adapted to the
growth of wheat, barley, oats and rye, than maize; while the drier
atmosphere of America was better suited to the latter plant Even now
comparatively little wheat or barley is raised in Central America,
Mexico, or Peru, and none on the low coasts of those countries; while a
smaller quantity of maize, proportionately, is grown in Italy, Spain,
and the rest of Western Europe, the rainy climate being unsuited to it.
We have seen (p. 60, ante) that there is reason to believe that maize
was known in a remote period in the drier regions of the Egyptians and
Chinese.

As science has been able to reconstruct the history of the migrations of
the Aryan race, by the words that exist or fail to appear in the kindred
branches of that tongue, so the time will come when a careful comparison
of words, customs, opinions, arts existing on the opposite sides of the
Atlantic will furnish an approximate sketch of Atlantean history.

The people had attained a high position as agriculturists. The presence
of the plough in Egypt and Peru implies that they possessed that
implement. And as the horns and ox-head of Baal show the esteem in which
cattle were held among them, we may suppose that they had passed the
stage in which the plough was drawn by men, as in Peru and Egypt in
ancient times, and in Sweden during the Historical Period, and that it
was drawn by oxen or horses. They first domesticated the horse, hence
the association of Poseidon or Neptune, a sea-god, with horses; hence
the race-courses for horses described by Plato. They possessed sheep,
and manufactured woollen goods; they also had goats, dogs, and swine.
They raised cotton and made cotton goods; they probably cultivated
maize, wheat, oats, barley, rye, tobacco, hemp, and flax, and possibly
potatoes; they built aqueducts and practised irrigation; they were
architects, sculptors, and engravers; they possessed an alphabet; they
worked in tin, copper, bronze, silver, gold, and iron.

During the vast period of their duration, as peace and agriculture
caused their population to increase to overflowing, they spread out in
colonies east and west to the ends of the earth. This was not the work
of a few years, but of many centuries; and the relations between these
colonies may have been something like the relation between the different
colonies that in a later age were established by the Phoenicians, the
Greeks, and the Romans; there was an intermingling with the more ancient
races, the autochthones of the different lands where they settled; and
the same crossing of stocks, which we know to have been continued all
through the Historical Period, must have been going on for thousands of
years, whereby new races and new dialects were formed; and the result of
all this has been that the smaller races of antiquity have grown larger,
while all the complexions shade into each other, so that we can pass
from the whitest to the darkest by insensible degrees.

In some respects the Atlanteans exhibited conditions similar to those of
the British Islands: there were the same, and even greater, race
differences in the population; the same plantation of colonies in
Europe, Asia, and America; the same carrying of civilization to the ends
of the earth. We have seen colonies from Great Britain going out in the
third and fifth centuries to settle on the shores of France, in
Brittany, representing one of the nationalities and languages of the
mother-country--a race Atlantean in origin. In the same way we may
suppose Hamitic emigrations to have gone out from Atlantis to Syria,
Egypt, and the Barbary States. If we could imagine Highland Scotch,
Welsh, Cornish, and Irish populations emigrating en masse from England
in later times, and carrying to their new lands the civilization of
England, with peculiar languages not English, we would have a state of
things probably more like the migrations which took place from Atlantis.
England, with a civilization Atlantean in origin, peopled by races from
the same source, is repeating in these modern times the empire of Zeus
and Chronos; and, just as we have seen Troy, Egypt, and Greece warring
against the parent race, so in later days we have seen Brittany and the
United States separating themselves from England, the race
characteristics remaining after the governmental connection had ceased.

In religion the Atlanteans had reached all the great thoughts which
underlie our modern creeds. They had attained to the conception of one
universal, omnipotent, great First Cause. We find the worship of this
One God in Peru and in early Egypt. They looked upon the sun as the
mighty emblem, type, and instrumentality of this One God. Such a
conception could only have come with civilization. It is not until these
later days that science has realized the utter dependence of all earthly
life upon the sun's rays:

"All applications of animal power may be regarded as derived directly or
indirectly from the static chemical power of the vegetable substance by
which the various organisms and their capabilities are sustained; and
this power, in turn, from the kinetic action of the sun's rays.

"Winds and ocean currents, hailstorms and rain, sliding glaciers,
flowing rivers, and falling cascades are the direct offspring of solar
heat. All our machinery, therefore, whether driven by the windmill or
the water-wheel, by horse-power or by steam--all the results of
electrical and electro-magnetic changes--our telegraphs, our clocks, and
our watches, all are wound up primarily by the sun.

"The sun is the great source of energy in almost all terrestrial
phenomena. From the meteorological to the geographical, from the
geological to the biological, in the expenditure and conversion of
molecular movements, derived from the sun's rays, must be sought the
motive power of all this infinitely varied phantasmagoria."

But the people of Atlantis had gone farther; they believed that the soul
of man was immortal, and that he would live again in his material body;
in other words, they believed in "the resurrection of the body and the
life everlasting." They accordingly embalmed their dead.

The Duke of Argyll ("The Unity of Nature") says:

"We have found in the most ancient records of the Aryan language proof
that the indications of religious thought are higher, simpler, and purer
as we go back in time, until at last, in the very oldest compositions of
human speech which have come down to us, we find the Divine Being spoken
of in the sublime language which forms the opening of the Lord's Prayer.
The date in absolute chronology of the oldest Vedic literature does not
seem to be known. Professor Max Mueller, however, considers that it may
possibly take us back 5000 years. . . . All we can see with certainty is
that the earliest inventions of mankind are the most wonderful that the
race has ever made. . . . The first use of fire, and the discovery of
the methods by which it can be kindled; the domestication of wild
animals; and, above all, the processes by which the various cereals were
first developed out of some wild grasses-these are all discoveries with
which, in ingenuity and in importance, no subsequent discoveries may
compare. They are all unknown to history--all lost in the light of an
effulgent dawn."

The Atlanteans possessed an established order of priests; their
religious worship was pure and simple. They lived under a kingly
government; they had their courts, their judges, their records, their
monuments covered with inscriptions, their mines, their founderies,
their workshops, their looms, their grist-mills, their boats and
sailing-vessels, their highways, aqueducts, wharves, docks, and canals.
They had processions, banners, and triumphal arches for their kings and
heroes; they built pyramids, temples, round-towers, and obelisks; they
practised religious ablutions; they knew the use of the magnet and of
gunpowder. In short, they were in the enjoyment of a civilization nearly
as high as our own, lacking only the printing-press, and those
inventions in which steam, electricity, and magnetism are used. We are
told that Deva-Nahusha visited his colonies in Farther India. An empire
which reached from the Andes to Hindostan, if not to China, must have
been magnificent indeed. In 'its markets must have met the maize of the
Mississippi Valley, the copper of Lake Superior, the gold and silver of
Peru and Mexico, the spices of India, the tin of Wales and Cornwall, the
bronze of Iberia, the amber of the Baltic, the wheat and barley of
Greece, Italy, and Switzerland.

It is not surprising that when this mighty nation sank beneath the
waves, in the midst of terrible convulsions, with all its millions of
people, the event left an everlasting impression upon the imagination of
mankind. Let us suppose that Great Britain should to-morrow meet with a
similar fate. What a wild consternation would fall upon her colonies and
upon the whole human family! The world might relapse into barbarism,
deep and almost universal. William the Conqueror, Richard Coeur de Lion,
Alfred the Great, Cromwell, and Victoria might survive only as the gods
or demons of later races; but the memory of the cataclysm in which the
centre of a universal empire instantaneously went down to death would
never be forgotten; it would survive in fragments, more or less
complete, in every land on earth; it would outlive the memory of a
thousand lesser convulsions of nature; it would survive dynasties,
nations, creeds, and languages; it would never be forgotten while man
continued to inhabit the face of the globe.

Science has but commenced its work of reconstructing the past and
rehabilitating the ancient peoples, and surely there is no study which
appeals more strongly to the imagination than that of this drowned
nation, the true antediluvians. They were the founders of nearly all our
arts and sciences; they were the parents of our fundamental beliefs;
they were the first civilizers, the first navigators, the first
merchants, the first colonizers of the earth; their civilization was old
when Egypt was young, and they had passed away thousands of years before
Babylon, Rome, or London were dreamed of. This lost people were our
ancestors, their blood flows in our veins; the words we use every day
were heard, in their primitive form, in their cities, courts, and
temples. Every line of race and thought, of blood and belief, leads back
to them.

Nor is it impossible that the nations of the earth may yet employ their
idle navies in bringing to the light of day some of the relies of this
buried people. Portions of the island lie but a few hundred fathoms
beneath the sea; and if expeditions have been sent out from time to time
in the past, to resurrect from the depths of the ocean sunken
treasure-ships with a few thousand doubloons bidden in their cabins, why
should not an attempt be made to reach the buried wonders of Atlantis? A
single engraved tablet dredged up from Plato's island would be worth
more to science, would more strike the imagination of mankind, than all
the gold of Peru, all the monuments of Egypt, and all the terra-cotta
fragments gathered from the great libraries of Chaldea.

May not the so-called "Phoenician coins" found on Corvo, one of the
Azores, be of Atlantean origin? Is it probable that that great race,
pre-eminent as a founder of colonies, could have visited those islands
within the Historical Period, and have left them unpeopled, as they were
when discovered by the Portuguese?

We are but beginning to understand the past: one hundred years ago the
world knew nothing of Pompeii or Herculaneum; nothing of the lingual tie
that binds together the Indo-European nations; nothing of the
significance of the vast volume of inscriptions upon the tombs and
temples of Egypt; nothing of the meaning of the arrow-headed
inscriptions of Babylon; nothing of the marvellous civilizations
revealed in the remains of Yucatan, Mexico, and Peru. We are on the
threshold. Scientific investigation is advancing with giant strides. Who
shall say that one hundred years from now the great museums of the world
may not be adorned with gems, statues, arms, and implements from
Atlantis, while the libraries of the world shall contain translations of
its inscriptions, throwing new light upon all the past history of the
human race, and all the great problems which now perplex the thinkers of
our day?

THE END.














Produced by Alfred J. Drake, Ph.D.





APPRECIATIONS, WITH AN ESSAY ON STYLE

By WALTER HORATIO PATER

E-text Editor: Alfred J. Drake, Ph.D.
Electronic Version 1.0 / Date 10-12-01


DISCLAIMER OF DAMAGES

[1] I DISCLAIM ALL LIABILITY TO YOU FOR DAMAGES, COSTS AND EXPENSES,
INCLUDING LEGAL FEES, AND

[2] YOU HAVE NO REMEDIES FOR NEGLIGENCE OR UNDER STRICT LIABILITY, OR
FOR BREACH OF WARRANTY OR CONTRACT, INCLUDING BUT NOT LIMITED TO
INDIRECT, CONSEQUENTIAL, PUNITIVE OR INCIDENTAL DAMAGES, EVEN IF YOU
GIVE NOTICE OF THE POSSIBILITY OF SUCH DAMAGES.

THE E-TEXTS ON THIS SITE ARE PROVIDED TO YOU "AS-IS".  NO WARRANTIES
OF ANY KIND, EXPRESS OR IMPLIED, ARE MADE TO YOU AS TO THE E-TEXTS OR
ANY MEDIUM THEY MAY BE ON, INCLUDING BUT NOT LIMITED TO WARRANTIES OF
MERCHANTABILITY OR FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.

Some states do not allow disclaimers of implied warranties or the
exclusion or limitation of consequential damages, so the above
disclaimers and exclusions may not apply to you, and you may have
other legal rights.



APPRECIATIONS, WITH AN ESSAY ON STYLE


NOTES BY THE E-TEXT EDITOR:

Reliability: Although I have done my best to ensure that the text
you read is error-free in comparison with an exact reprint of the
standard edition--Macmillan's 1910 Library Edition--please exercise
scholarly caution in using it.  It is not intended as a substitute
for the printed original but rather as a searchable supplement.
My e-texts may prove convenient substitutes for hard-to-get works in
a course where both instructor and students accept the possibility
of some imperfections in the text, but if you are writing a scholarly
article, dissertation, or book, you should use the standard hard-
copy editions of any works you cite.

Pagination and Paragraphing: To avoid an unwieldy electronic copy,
I have transferred original pagination to brackets.  A bracketed
numeral such as [22] indicates that the material immediately
following the number marks the beginning of the relevant page.  I
have preserved paragraph structure except for first-line indentation.

Hyphenation: I have not preserved original hyphenation since an
e-text does not require line-end or page-end hyphenation.

Greek typeface: For this full-text edition, I have transliterated
Pater's Greek quotations.  If there is a need for the original Greek,
it can be viewed at my site, http://www.ajdrake.com/etexts, a
Victorianist archive that contains the complete works of Walter Pater
and many other nineteenth-century texts, mostly in first editions.


CONTENTS

Style: 5-38

Wordsworth: 39-64

Coleridge: 65-104

Charles Lamb: 105-123

Sir Thomas Browne: 124-160

"Love's Labours Lost": 161-169

"Measure for Measure": 170-184

Shakespeare's English Kings: 185-204

Dante Gabriel Rossetti: 205-218

Feuillet's "La Morte": 219-240

Postscript: 241-261



APPRECIATIONS


STYLE

[5] SINCE all progress of mind consists for the most part in
differentiation, in the resolution of an obscure and complex object
into its component aspects, it is surely the stupidest of losses to
confuse things which right reason has put asunder, to lose the sense
of achieved distinctions, the distinction between poetry and prose,
for instance, or, to speak more exactly, between the laws and
characteristic excellences of verse and prose composition.  On the
other hand, those who have dwelt most emphatically on the distinction
between prose and verse, prose and poetry, may sometimes have been
tempted to limit the proper functions of prose too narrowly; and this
again is at least false economy, as being, in effect, the
renunciation of a certain means or faculty, in a world where after
all we must needs make the most of things.  Critical efforts to limit
art a priori, by anticipations regarding the natural incapacity of
the material with which this or that artist works, as the sculptor
with solid form, or the prose-writer with the ordinary [6] language
of men, are always liable to be discredited by the facts of artistic
production; and while prose is actually found to be a coloured thing
with Bacon, picturesque with Livy and Carlyle, musical with Cicero
and Newman, mystical and intimate with Plato and Michelet and Sir
Thomas Browne, exalted or florid, it may be, with Milton and Taylor,
it will be useless to protest that it can be nothing at all, except
something very tamely and narrowly confined to mainly practical ends-
-a kind of  "good round-hand;" as useless as the protest that poetry
might not touch prosaic subjects as with Wordsworth, or an abstruse
matter as with Browning, or treat contemporary life nobly as with
Tennyson.  In subordination to one essential beauty in all good
literary style, in all literature as a fine art, as there are many
beauties of poetry so the beauties of prose are many, and it is the
business of criticism to estimate them as such; as it is good in the
criticism of verse to look for those hard, logical, and quasi-prosaic
excellences which that too has, or needs.  To find in the poem, amid
the flowers, the allusions, the mixed perspectives, of Lycidas for
instance, the thought, the logical structure:--how wholesome! how
delightful! as to identify in prose what we call the poetry, the
imaginative power, not treating it as out of place and a kind of
vagrant intruder, but by way of an estimate of its rights, that is,
of its achieved powers, there.

[7] Dryden, with the characteristic instinct of his age, loved to
emphasise the distinction between poetry and prose, the protest
against their confusion with each other, coming with somewhat
diminished effect from one whose poetry was so prosaic.  In truth,
his sense of prosaic excellence affected his verse rather than his
prose, which is not only fervid, richly figured, poetic, as we say,
but vitiated, all unconsciously, by many a scanning line.  Setting up
correctness, that humble merit of prose, as the central literary
excellence, he is really a less correct writer than he may seem,
still with an imperfect mastery of the relative pronoun.  It might
have been foreseen that, in the rotations of mind, the province of
poetry in prose would find its assertor; and, a century after Dryden,
amid very different intellectual needs, and with the need therefore
of great modifications in literary form, the range of the poetic
force in literature was effectively enlarged by Wordsworth.  The true
distinction between prose and poetry he regarded as the almost
technical or accidental one of the absence or presence of metrical
beauty, or, say! metrical restraint; and for him the opposition came
to be between verse and prose of course; but, as the essential
dichotomy in this matter, between imaginative and unimaginative
writing, parallel to De Quincey's distinction between "the literature
of power and the literature of knowledge," in the former of which the
composer gives us [8] not fact, but his peculiar sense of fact,
whether past or present.

Dismissing then, under sanction of Wordsworth, that harsher
opposition of poetry to prose, as savouring in fact of the arbitrary
psychology of the last century, and with it the prejudice that there
can be but one only beauty of prose style, I propose here to point
out certain qualities of all literature as a fine art, which, if they
apply to the literature of fact, apply still more to the literature
of the imaginative sense of fact, while they apply indifferently to
verse and prose, so far as either is really imaginative--certain
conditions of true art in both alike, which conditions may also
contain in them the secret of the proper discrimination and
guardianship of the peculiar excellences of either.

The line between fact and something quite different from external
fact is, indeed, hard to draw.  In Pascal, for instance, in the
persuasive writers generally, how difficult to define the point
where, from time to time, argument which, if it is to be worth
anything at all, must consist of facts or groups of facts, becomes a
pleading--a theorem no longer, but essentially an appeal to the
reader to catch the writer's spirit, to think with him, if one can or
will--an expression no longer of fact but of his sense of it, his
peculiar intuition of a world, prospective, or discerned below the
faulty conditions of the present, in either case changed somewhat
from the actual [9] world.  In science, on the other hand, in history
so far as it conforms to scientific rule, we have a literary domain
where the imagination may be thought to be always an intruder.  And
as, in all science, the functions of literature reduce themselves
eventually to the transcribing of fact, so all the excellences of
literary form in regard to science are reducible to various kinds of
pains-taking; this good quality being involved in all "skilled work"
whatever, in the drafting of an act of parliament, as in sewing.  Yet
here again, the writer's sense of fact, in history especially, and in
all those complex subjects which do but lie on the borders of
science, will still take the place of fact, in various degrees.  Your
historian, for instance, with absolutely truthful intention, amid the
multitude of facts presented to him must needs select, and in
selecting assert something of his own humour, something that comes
not of the world without but of a vision within.  So Gibbon moulds
his unwieldy material to a preconceived view.  Livy, Tacitus,
Michelet, moving full of poignant sensibility amid the records of the
past, each, after his own sense, modifies--who can tell where and to
what degree?--and becomes something else than a transcriber; each, as
he thus modifies, passing into the domain of art proper.  For just in
proportion as the writer's aim, consciously or unconsciously, comes
to be the transcribing, not of the world, not of mere fact, but of
his sense [10] of it, he becomes an artist, his work fine art; and
good art (as I hope ultimately to show) in proportion to the truth of
his presentment of that sense; as in those humbler or plainer
functions of literature also, truth--truth to bare fact, there--is
the essence of such artistic quality as they may have.  Truth! there
can be no merit, no craft at all, without that.  And further, all
beauty is in the long run only fineness of truth, or what we call
expression, the finer accommodation of speech to that vision within.

--The transcript of his sense of fact rather than the fact, as being
preferable, pleasanter, more beautiful to the writer himself.  In
literature, as in every other product of human skill, in the moulding
of a bell or a platter for instance, wherever this sense asserts
itself, wherever the producer so modifies his work as, over and above
its primary use or intention, to make it pleasing (to himself, of
course, in the first instance) there, "fine" as opposed to merely
serviceable art, exists.  Literary art, that is, like all art which
is in any way imitative or reproductive of fact--form, or colour, or
incident--is the representation of such fact as connected with soul,
of a specific personality, in its preferences, its volition and
power.

Such is the matter of imaginative or artistic literature--this
transcript, not of mere fact, but of fact in its infinite variety, as
modified by human preference in all its infinitely varied [11] forms.
It will be good literary art not because it is brilliant or sober, or
rich, or impulsive, or severe, but just in proportion as its
representation of that sense, that soul-fact, is true, verse being
only one department of such literature, and imaginative prose, it may
be thought, being the special art of the modern world.  That
imaginative prose should be the special and opportune art of the
modern world results from two important facts about the latter:
first, the chaotic variety and complexity of its interests, making
the intellectual issue, the really master currents of the present
time incalculable--a condition of mind little susceptible of the
restraint proper to verse form, so that the most characteristic verse
of the nineteenth century has been lawless verse; and secondly, an
all-pervading naturalism, a curiosity about everything whatever as it
really is, involving a certain humility of attitude, cognate to what
must, after all, be the less ambitious form of literature.  And prose
thus asserting itself as the special and privileged artistic faculty
of the present day, will be, however critics may try to narrow its
scope, as varied in its excellence as humanity itself reflecting on
the facts of its latest experience--an instrument of many stops,
meditative, observant, descriptive, eloquent, analytic, plaintive,
fervid.  Its beauties will be not exclusively "pedestrian": it will
exert, in due measure, all the varied charms of poetry, down to the
rhythm which, as in Cicero, [12] or Michelet, or Newman, at their
best, gives its musical value to every syllable.*

The literary artist is of necessity a scholar, and in what he .
proposes to do will have in mind, first of all, the scholar and the
scholarly conscience--the male conscience in this matter, as we must
think it, under a system of education which still to so large an
extent limits real scholarship to men.  In his self-criticism, he
supposes always that sort of reader who will go (full of eyes)
warily, considerately, though without consideration for him, over the
ground which the female conscience traverses so lightly, so amiably.
For the material in which he works is no more a creation of his own
than the sculptor's marble.  Product of a myriad various minds and
contending tongues, compact of obscure and minute association, a
language has its own abundant and often recondite laws, in the
habitual and summary recognition of which scholarship consists.  A
writer, full of a matter he is before all things anxious to express,
may think of those laws, the limitations of vocabulary, structure,
and the like, as a restriction, but if a [13] real artist will find
in them an opportunity. His punctilious observance of the proprieties
of his medium will diffuse through all he writes a general air of
sensibility, of refined usage.  Exclusiones debitae--the exclusions,
or rejections, which nature demands--we know how large a part these
play, according to Bacon, in the science of nature.  In a somewhat
changed sense, we might say that the art of the scholar is summed up
in the observance of those rejections demanded by the nature of his
medium, the material he must use.  Alive to the value of an
atmosphere in which every term finds its utmost degree of expression,
and with all the jealousy of a lover of words, he will resist a
constant tendency on the part of the majority of those who use them
to efface the distinctions of language, the facility of writers often
reinforcing in this respect the work of the vulgar.  He will feel the
obligation not of the laws only, but of those affinities, avoidances,
those mere preferences, of his language, which through the
associations of literary history have become a part of its nature,
prescribing the rejection of many a neology, many a license, many a
gipsy phrase which might present itself as actually expressive.  His
appeal, again, is to the scholar, who has great experience in
literature, and will show no favour to short-cuts, or hackneyed
illustration, or an affectation of learning designed for the
unlearned.  Hence a contention, a sense [14] of self-restraint and
renunciation, having for the susceptible reader the effect of a
challenge for minute consideration; the attention of the writer, in
every minutest detail, being a pledge that it is worth the reader's
while to be attentive too, that the writer is dealing scrupulously
with his instrument, and therefore, indirectly, with the reader
himself also, that he has the science of the instrument he plays on,
perhaps, after all, with a freedom which in such case will be the
freedom of a master.

For meanwhile, braced only by those restraints, he is really
vindicating his liberty in the making of a vocabulary, an entire
system of composition, for himself, his own true manner; and when we
speak of the manner of a true master we mean what is essential in his
art.  Pedantry being only the scholarship of le cuistre (we have no
English equivalent) he is no pedant, and does but show his
intelligence of the rules of language in his freedoms with it,
addition or expansion, which like the spontaneities of manner in a
well-bred person will still further illustrate good taste.--The right
vocabulary!  Translators have not invariably seen how all-important
that is in the work of translation, driving for the most part at
idiom or construction; whereas, if the original be first-rate, one's
first care should be with its elementary particles, Plato, for
instance, being often reproducible by an exact following, with no
variation in structure, of word after word, as [15] the pencil
follows a drawing under tracing-paper, so only each word or syllable
be not of false colour, to change my illustration a little.

Well! that is because any writer worth translating at all has
winnowed and searched through his vocabulary, is conscious of the
words he would select in systematic reading of a dictionary, and
still more of the words he would reject were the dictionary other
than Johnson's; and doing this with his peculiar sense of the world
ever in view, in search of an instrument for the adequate expression
of that, he begets a vocabulary faithful to the colouring of his own
spirit, and in the strictest sense original.  That living authority
which language needs lies, in truth, in its scholars, who recognising
always that every language possesses a genius, a very fastidious
genius, of its own, expand at once and purify its very elements,
which must needs change along with the changing thoughts of living
people.  Ninety years ago, for instance, great mental force,
certainly, was needed by Wordsworth, to break through the consecrated
poetic associations of a century, and speak the language that was
his, that was to become in a measure the language of the next
generation.  But he did it with the tact of a scholar also.  English,
for a quarter of a century past, has been assimilating the
phraseology of pictorial art; for half a century, the phraseology of
the great German metaphysical movement of eighty years ago; in part
also the [16] language of mystical theology: and none but pedants
will regret a great consequent increase of its resources.  For many
years to come its enterprise may well lie in the naturalisation of
the vocabulary of science, so only it be under the eye of a sensitive
scholarship--in a liberal naturalisation of the ideas of science too,
for after all the chief stimulus of good style is to possess a full,
rich, complex matter to grapple with.  The literary artist,
therefore, will be well aware of physical science; science also
attaining, in its turn, its true literary ideal.  And then, as the
scholar is nothing without the historic sense, he will be apt to
restore not really obsolete or really worn-out words, but the finer
edge of words still in use: ascertain, communicate, discover--words
like these it has been part of our "business" to misuse.  And still,
as language was made for man, he will be no authority for
correctnesses which, limiting freedom of utterance, were yet but
accidents in their origin; as if one vowed not to say "its," which
ought to have been in Shakespeare; "his" "hers," for inanimate
objects, being but a barbarous and really inexpressive survival.  Yet
we have known many things like this.  Racy Saxon monosyllables, close
to us as touch and sight, he will intermix readily with those long,
savoursome, Latin words, rich in "second intention."  In this late
day certainly, no critical process can be conducted reasonably
without eclecticism.  Of [17] such eclecticism we have a justifying
example in one of the first poets of our time.  How illustrative of
monosyllabic effect, of sonorous Latin, of the phraseology of
science, of metaphysic, of colloquialism even, are the writings of
Tennyson; yet with what a fine, fastidious scholarship throughout!

A scholar writing for the scholarly, he will of course leave
something to the willing intelligence of his reader.  "To go preach
to the first passer-by," says Montaigne, "to become tutor to the
ignorance of the first I meet, is a thing I abhor;" a thing, in fact,
naturally distressing to the scholar, who will therefore ever be shy
of offering uncomplimentary assistance to the reader's wit.  To
really strenuous minds there is a pleasurable stimulus in the
challenge for a continuous effort on their part, to be rewarded by
securer and more intimate grasp of the author's sense.  Self-
restraint, a skilful economy of means, ascesis, that too has a beauty
of its own; and for the reader supposed there will be an aesthetic
satisfaction in that frugal closeness of style which makes the most
of a word, in the exaction from every sentence of a precise relief,
in the just spacing out of word to thought, in the logically filled
space connected always with the delightful sense of difficulty
overcome.

Different classes of persons, at different times, make, of course,
very various demands upon literature.  Still, scholars, I suppose,
and not [18] only scholars, but all disinterested lovers of books,
will always look to it, as to all other fine art, for a refuge, a
sort of cloistral refuge, from a certain vulgarity in the actual
world.  A perfect poem like Lycidas, a perfect fiction like Esmond,
the perfect handling of a theory like Newman's Idea of a University,
has for them something of the uses of a religious "retreat."  Here,
then, with a view to the central need of a select few, those "men of
a finer thread" who have formed and maintain the literary ideal,
everything, every component element, will have undergone exact trial,
and, above all, there will be no uncharacteristic or tarnished or
vulgar decoration, permissible ornament being for the most part
structural, or necessary.  As the painter in his picture, so the
artist in his book, aims at the production by honourable artifice of
a peculiar atmosphere.  "The artist," says Schiller, "may be known
rather by what he omits"; and in literature, too, the true artist may
be best recognised by his tact of omission.  For to the grave reader
words too are grave; and the ornamental word, the figure, the
accessory form or colour or reference, is rarely content to die to
thought precisely at the right moment, but will inevitably linger
awhile, stirring a long "brain-wave" behind it of perhaps quite alien
associations.

Just there, it may be, is the detrimental tendency of the sort of
scholarly attentiveness [19] of mind I am recommending.  But the true
artist allows for it.  He will remember that, as the very word
ornament indicates what is in itself non-essential, so the "one
beauty" of all literary style is of its very essence, and
independent, in prose and verse alike, of all removable decoration;
that it may exist in its fullest lustre, as in Flaubert's Madame
Bovary, for instance, or in Stendhal's Le Rouge et Le Noir, in a
composition utterly unadorned, with hardly a single suggestion of
visibly beautiful things.  Parallel, allusion, the allusive way
generally, the flowers in the garden:--he knows the narcotic force of
these upon the negligent intelligence to which any diversion,
literally, is welcome, any vagrant intruder, because one can go
wandering away with it from the immediate subject.  Jealous, if he
have a really quickening motive within, of all that does not hold
directly to that, of the facile, the otiose, he will never depart
from the strictly pedestrian process, unless he gains a ponderable
something thereby.  Even assured of its congruity, he will still
question its serviceableness.  Is it worth while, can we afford, to
attend to just that, to just that figure or literary reference, just
then?--Surplusage! he will dread that, as the runner on his muscles.
For in truth all art does but consist in the removal of surplusage,
from the last finish of the gem-engraver blowing away the last
particle of invisible dust, back to the earliest divination of [20]
the finished work to be, lying somewhere, according to Michelangelo's
fancy, in the rough-hewn block of stone.

And what applies to figure or flower must be understood of all other
accidental or removable ornaments of writing whatever; and not of
specific ornament only, but of all that latent colour and imagery
which language as such carries in it.  A lover of words for their own
sake, to whom nothing about them is unimportant, a minute and
constant observer of their physiognomy, he will be on the alert not
only for obviously mixed metaphors of course, but for the metaphor
that is mixed in all our speech, though a rapid use may involve no
cognition of it.  Currently recognising the incident, the colour, the
physical elements or particles in words like absorb, consider,
extract, to take the first that occur, he will avail himself of them,
as further adding to the resources of expression.  The elementary
particles of language will be realised as colour and light and shade
through his scholarly living in the full sense of them.  Still
opposing the constant degradation of language by those who use it
carelessly, he will not treat coloured glass as if it were clear; and
while half the world is using figure unconsciously, will be fully
aware not only of all that latent figurative texture in speech, but
of the vague, lazy, half-formed personification--a rhetoric,
depressing, and worse than nothing, [21] because it has no really
rhetorical motive--which plays so large a part there, and, as in the
case of more ostentatious ornament, scrupulously exact of it, from
syllable to syllable, its precise value.

So far I have been speaking of certain conditions of the literary art
arising out of the medium or material in or upon which it works, the
essential qualities of language and its aptitudes for contingent
ornamentation, matters which define scholarship as science and good
taste respectively.  They are both subservient to a more intimate
quality of good style: more intimate, as coming nearer to the artist
himself.  The otiose, the facile, surplusage: why are these abhorrent
to the true literary artist, except because, in literary as in all
other art, structure is all-important, felt, or painfully missed,
everywhere?--that architectural conception of work, which foresees
the end in the beginning and never loses sight of it, and in every
part is conscious of all the rest, till the last sentence does but,
with undiminished vigour, unfold and justify the first--a condition
of literary art, which, in contradistinction to another quality of
the artist himself, to be spoken of later, I shall call the necessity
of mind in style.

An acute philosophical writer, the late Dean Mansel (a writer whose
works illustrate the literary beauty there may be in closeness, and
with obvious repression or economy of a fine [22] rhetorical gift)
wrote a book, of fascinating precision in a very obscure subject, to
show that all the technical laws of logic are but means of securing,
in each and all of its apprehensions, the unity, the strict identity
with itself, of the apprehending mind.  All the laws of good writing
aim at a similar unity or identity of the mind in all the processes
by which the word is associated to its import.  The term is right,
and has its essential beauty, when it becomes, in a manner, what it
signifies, as with the names of simple sensations.  To give the
phrase, the sentence, the structural member, the entire composition,
song, or essay, a similar unity with its subject and with itself:--
style is in the right way when it tends towards that.  All depends
upon the original unity, the vital wholeness and identity, of the
initiatory apprehension or view.  So much is true of all art, which
therefore requires always its logic, its comprehensive reason--
insight, foresight, retrospect, in simultaneous action--true, most of
all, of the literary art, as being of all the arts most closely
cognate to the abstract intelligence.  Such logical coherency may be
evidenced not merely in the lines of composition as a whole, but in
the choice of a single word, while it by no means interferes with,
but may even prescribe, much variety, in the building of the sentence
for instance, or in the manner, argumentative, descriptive,
discursive, of this or that [23] part or member of the entire design.
The blithe, crisp sentence, decisive as a child's expression of its
needs, may alternate with the long-contending, victoriously intricate
sentence; the sentence, born with the integrity of a single word,
relieving the sort of sentence in which, if you look closely, you can
see much contrivance, much adjustment, to bring a highly qualified
matter into compass at one view.  For the literary architecture, if
it is to be rich and expressive, involves not only foresight of the
end in the beginning, but also development or growth of design, in
the process of execution, with many irregularities, surprises, and
afterthoughts; the contingent as well as the necessary being subsumed
under the unity of the whole.  As truly, to the lack of such
architectural design, of a single, almost visual, image, vigorously
informing an entire, perhaps very intricate, composition, which shall
be austere, ornate, argumentative, fanciful, yet true from first to
last to that vision within, may be attributed those weaknesses of
conscious or unconscious repetition of word, phrase, motive, or
member of the whole matter, indicating, as Flaubert was aware, an
original structure in thought not organically complete.  With such
foresight, the actual conclusion will most often get itself written
out of hand, before, in the more obvious sense, the work is finished.
With some strong and leading sense of the world, the [24] tight hold
of which secures true composition and not mere loose accretion, the
literary artist, I suppose, goes on considerately, setting joint to
joint, sustained by yet restraining the productive ardour, retracing
the negligences of his first sketch, repeating his steps only that he
may give the reader a sense of secure and restful progress,
readjusting mere assonances even, that they may soothe the reader, or
at least not interrupt him on his way; and then, somewhere before the
end comes, is burdened, inspired, with his conclusion, and betimes
delivered of it, leaving off, not in weariness and because he finds
himself at an end, but in all the freshness of volition.  His work
now structurally complete, with all the accumulating effect of
secondary shades of meaning, he finishes the whole up to the just
proportion of that ante-penultimate conclusion, and all becomes
expressive.  The house he has built is rather a body he has informed.
And so it happens, to its greater credit, that the better interest
even of a narrative to be recounted, a story to be told, will often
be in its second reading.  And though there are instances of great
writers who have been no artists, an unconscious tact sometimes
directing work in which we may detect, very pleasurably, many of the
effects of conscious art, yet one of the greatest pleasures of really
good prose literature is in the critical tracing out of that
conscious artistic structure, and the pervading sense of it [25] as
we read.  Yet of poetic literature too; for, in truth, the kind of
constructive intelligence here supposed is one of the forms of the
imagination.

That is the special function of mind, in style.  Mind and soul:--hard
to ascertain philosophically, the distinction is real enough
practically, for they often interfere, are sometimes in conflict,
with each other.  Blake, in the last century, is an instance of
preponderating soul, embarrassed, at a loss, in an era of
preponderating mind.  As a quality of style, at all events, soul is a
fact, in certain writers--the way they have of absorbing language, of
attracting it into the peculiar spirit they are of, with a subtlety
which makes the actual result seem like some inexplicable
inspiration.  By mind, the literary artist reaches us, through static
and objective indications of design in his work, legible to all.  By
soul, he reaches us, somewhat capriciously perhaps, one and not
another, through vagrant sympathy and a kind of immediate contact.
Mind we cannot choose but approve where we recognise it; soul may
repel us, not because we misunderstand it.  The way in which
theological interests sometimes avail themselves of language is
perhaps the best illustration of the force I mean to indicate
generally in literature, by the word soul.  Ardent religious
persuasion may exist, may make its way, without finding any
equivalent heat in language: or, again, it may enkindle [26] words to
various degrees, and when it really takes hold of them doubles its
force.  Religious history presents many remarkable instances in
which, through no mere phrase-worship, an unconscious literary tact
has, for the sensitive, laid open a privileged pathway from one to
another.  "The altar-fire," people say, "has touched those lips!"
The Vulgate, the English Bible, the English Prayer-Book, the writings
of Swedenborg, the Tracts for the Times:--there, we have instances of
widely different and largely diffused phases of religious feeling in
operation as soul in style.  But something of the same kind acts with
similar power in certain writers of quite other than theological
literature, on behalf of some wholly personal and peculiar sense of
theirs.  Most easily illustrated by theological literature, this
quality lends to profane writers a kind of religious influence.  At
their best, these writers become, as we say sometimes, "prophets";
such character depending on the effect not merely of their matter,
but of their matter as allied to, in "electric affinity" with,
peculiar form, and working in all cases by an immediate sympathetic
contact, on which account it is that it may be called soul, as
opposed to mind, in style.  And this too is a faculty of choosing and
rejecting what is congruous or otherwise, with a drift towards unity-
-unity of atmosphere here, as there of design--soul securing colour
(or perfume, might [27] we say?) as mind secures form, the latter
being essentially finite, the former vague or infinite, as the
influence of a living person is practically infinite.  There are some
to whom nothing has any real interest, or real meaning, except as
operative in a given person; and it is they who best appreciate the
quality of soul in literary art.  They seem to know a person, in a
book, and make way by intuition: yet, although they thus enjoy the
completeness of a personal information, it is still a characteristic
of soul, in this sense of the word, that it does but suggest what can
never be uttered, not as being different from, or more obscure than,
what actually gets said, but as containing that plenary substance of
which there is only one phase or facet in what is there expressed.

If all high things have their martyrs, Gustave Flaubert might perhaps
rank as the martyr of literary style.  In his printed correspondence,
a curious series of letters, written in his twenty-fifth year,
records what seems to have been his one other passion--a series of
letters which, with its fine casuistries, its firmly repressed
anguish, its tone of harmonious grey, and the sense of disillusion in
which the whole matter ends, might have been, a few slight changes
supposed, one of his own fictions.  Writing to Madame X. certainly he
does display, by "taking thought" mainly, by constant and delicate
pondering, as in his love for literature, a heart really moved, but
[28] still more, and as the pledge of that emotion, a loyalty to his
work.  Madame X., too, is a literary artist, and the best gifts he
can send her are precepts of perfection in art, counsels for the
effectual pursuit of that better love.  In his love-letters it is the
pains and pleasures of art he insists on, its solaces: he
communicates secrets, reproves, encourages, with a view to that.
Whether the lady was dissatisfied with such divided or indirect
service, the reader is not enabled to see; but sees that, on
Flaubert's part at least, a living person could be no rival of what
was, from first to last, his leading passion, a somewhat solitary and
exclusive one.

I must scold you (he writes) for one thing, which shocks,
scandalises me, the small concern, namely, you show for art
just now.  As regards glory be it so: there, I approve.  But
for art!--the one thing in life that is good and real--can you
compare with it an earthly love?--prefer the adoration of a
relative beauty to the cultus of the true beauty?  Well! I tell
you the truth.  That is the one thing good in me: the one thing
I have, to me estimable.  For yourself, you blend with the
beautiful a heap of alien things, the useful, the agreeable,
what not?--

The only way not to be unhappy is to shut yourself up in art,
and count everything else as nothing.  Pride takes the place of
all beside when it is established on a large basis.  Work!  God
wills it.  That, it seems to me, is clear.--+

I am reading over again the Aeneid, certain verses of which I
repeat to myself to satiety.  There are phrases there which stay
in one's head, by which I find myself beset, as with those musical
airs which are for ever returning, and cause you pain, you love
them so much.  I observe that I no longer laugh much, and am no
longer depressed.  I am ripe.  You talk of my serenity, and envy
me.  It may well surprise you.  Sick, [29] irritated, the prey
a thousand times a day of cruel pain, I continue my labour like
a true working-man, who, with sleeves turned up, in the sweat of
his brow, beats away at his anvil, never troubling himself whether
it rains or blows, for hail or thunder.  I was not like that
formerly.  The change has taken place naturally, though my will
has counted for something in the matter.--

Those who write in good style are sometimes accused of a neglect
of ideas, and of the moral end, as if the end of the physician
were something else than healing, of the painter than painting-
as if the end of art were not, before all else, the beautiful.

What, then, did Flaubert understand by beauty, in the art he pursued
with so much fervour, with so much self-command?  Let us hear a
sympathetic commentator :--

Possessed of an absolute belief that there exists but one way of
expressing one thing, one word to call it by, one adjective to
qualify, one verb to animate it, he gave himself to superhuman
labour for the discovery, in every phrase, of that word, that
verb, that epithet.  In this way, he believed in some mysterious
harmony of expression, and when a true word seemed to him to
lack euphony still went on seeking another, with invincible
patience, certain that he had not yet got hold of the unique
word....  A thousand preoccupations would beset him at the
same moment, always with this desperate certitude fixed in his
spirit: Among all the expressions in the world, all forms and
turns of expression, there is but one--one form, one mode--to
express what I want to say.

The one word for the one thing, the one thought, amid the multitude
of words, terms, that might just do: the problem of style was there!-
-the unique word, phrase, sentence, paragraph, essay, or song,
absolutely proper to the single mental presentation or vision within.

[30] In that perfect justice, over and above the many contingent and
removable beauties with which beautiful style may charm us, but which
it can exist without, independent of them yet dexterously availing
itself of them, omnipresent in good work, in function at every point,
from single epithets to the rhythm of a whole book, lay the specific,
indispensable, very intellectual, beauty of literature, the
possibility of which constitutes it a fine art.

One seems to detect the influence of a philosophic idea there, the
idea of a natural economy, of some pre-existent adaptation, between a
relative, somewhere in the world of thought, and its correlative,
somewhere in the world of language--both alike, rather, somewhere in
the mind of the artist, desiderative, expectant, inventive--meeting
each other with the readiness of "soul and body reunited," in Blake's
rapturous design; and, in fact, Flaubert was fond of giving his
theory philosophical expression.--

There are no beautiful thoughts (he would say) without beautiful
forms, and conversely.  As it is impossible to extract from a
physical body the qualities which really constitute it--colour,
extension, and the like--without reducing it to a hollow
abstraction, in a word, without destroying it; just so it is
impossible to detach the form from the idea, for the idea only
exists by virtue of the form.

All, the recognised flowers, the removable ornaments of literature
(including harmony and ease in reading aloud, very carefully
considered [31] by him) counted, certainly; for these too are part
of the actual value of what one says.  But still, after all, with
Flaubert, the search, the unwearied research, was not for the smooth,
or winsome, or forcible word, as such, as with false Ciceronians, but
quite simply and honestly, for the word's adjustment to its meaning.
The first condition of this must be, of course, to know yourself, to
have ascertained your own sense exactly.  Then, if we suppose an
artist, he says to the reader,--I want you to see precisely what I
see.  Into the mind sensitive to "form," a flood of random sounds,
colours, incidents, is ever penetrating from the world without, to
become, by sympathetic selection, a part of its very structure, and,
in turn, the visible vesture and expression of that other world it
sees so steadily within, nay, already with a partial conformity
thereto, to be refined, enlarged, corrected, at a hundred points; and
it is just there, just at those doubtful points that the function of
style, as tact or taste, intervenes.  The unique term will come more
quickly to one than another, at one time than another, according also
to the kind of matter in question.  Quickness and slowness, ease and
closeness alike, have nothing to do with the artistic character of
the true word found at last.  As there is a charm of ease, so there
is also a special charm in the signs of discovery, of effort and
contention towards a due end, as so often with Flaubert himself--in
the style which has [32] been pliant, as only obstinate, durable
metal can be, to the inherent perplexities and recusancy of a certain
difficult thought.

If Flaubert had not told us, perhaps we should never have guessed how
tardy and painful his own procedure really was, and after reading his
confession may think that his almost endless hesitation had much to
do with diseased nerves.  Often, perhaps, the felicity supposed will
be the product of a happier, a more exuberant nature than Flaubert's.
Aggravated, certainly, by a morbid physical condition, that anxiety
in "seeking the phrase," which gathered all the other small ennuis of
a really quiet existence into a kind of battle, was connected with
his lifelong contention against facile poetry, facile art--art,
facile and flimsy; and what constitutes the true artist is not the
slowness or quickness of the process, but the absolute success of the
result.  As with those labourers in the parable, the prize is
independent of the mere length of the actual day's work.  "You talk,"
he writes, odd, trying lover, to Madame X.--

"You talk of the exclusiveness of my literary tastes.  That
might have enabled you to divine what kind of a person I am in
the matter of love.  I grow so hard to please as a literary
artist, that I am driven to despair.  I shall end by not
writing another line."

"Happy," he cries, in a moment of discouragement at that patient labour,
which for him, certainly, was the condition of a great success--[33]

Happy those who have no doubts of themselves! who lengthen out,
as the pen runs on, all that flows forth from their brains.  As
for me, I hesitate, I disappoint myself, turn round upon myself
in despite: my taste is augmented in proportion as my natural
vigour decreases, and I afflict my soul over some dubious word
out of all proportion to the pleasure I get from a whole page
of good writing.  One would have to live two centuries to attain
a true idea of any matter whatever.  What Buffon said is a big
blasphemy: genius is not long-continued patience.  Still, there
is some truth in the statement, and more than people think,
especially as regards our own day.  Art! art! art! bitter
deception! phantom that glows with light, only to lead one on
to destruction...

Again--

I am growing so peevish about my writing.  I am like a man whose
ear is true but who plays falsely on the violin: his fingers
refuse to reproduce precisely those sounds of which he has the
inward sense.  Then the tears come rolling down from the poor
scraper's eyes and the bow falls from his hand.

Coming slowly or quickly, when it comes, as it came with so much
labour of mind, but also with so much lustre, to Gustave Flaubert,
this discovery of the word will be, like all artistic success and
felicity, incapable of strict analysis: effect of an intuitive
condition of mind, it must be recognised by like intuition on the
part of the reader, and a sort of immediate sense.  In every one of
those masterly sentences of Flaubert there was, below all mere
contrivance, shaping and afterthought, by some happy instantaneous
concourse of the various faculties of the mind with each other, the
exact apprehension of what was needed to carry the meaning.  And that
it fits with absolute justice will be a judgment of [34] immediate
sense in the appreciative reader.  We all feel this in what may be
called inspired translation.  Well! all language involves translation
from inward to outward.  In literature, as in all forms of art, there
are the absolute and the merely relative or accessory beauties; and
precisely in that exact proportion of the term to its purpose is the
absolute beauty of style, prose or verse.  All the good qualities,
the beauties, of verse also, are such, only as precise expression.

In the highest as in the lowliest literature, then, the one
indispensable beauty is, after all, truth:--truth to bare fact in the
latter, as to some personal sense of fact, diverted somewhat from
men's ordinary sense of it, in the former; truth there as accuracy,
truth here as expression, that finest and most intimate form of
truth, the vraie verite. And what an eclectic principle this really
is! employing for its one sole purpose--that absolute accordance of
expression to idea--all other literary beauties and excellences
whatever: how many kinds of style it covers, explains, justifies, and
at the same time safeguards!  Scott's facility, Flaubert's deeply
pondered evocation of "the phrase," are equally good art.  Say what
you have to say, what you have a will to say, in the simplest, the
most direct and exact manner possible, with no surplusage:--there, is
the justification of the sentence so fortunately born, "entire,
smooth, and round," that it needs no punctuation, and also [35] (that
is the point!) of the most elaborate period, if it be right in its
elaboration.  Here is the office of ornament: here also the purpose
of restraint in ornament.  As the exponent of truth, that austerity
(the beauty, the function, of which in literature Flaubert understood
so well) becomes not the correctness or purism of the mere scholar,
but a security against the otiose, a jealous exclusion of what does
not really tell towards the pursuit of relief, of life and vigour in
the portraiture of one's sense.  License again, the making free with
rule, if it be indeed, as people fancy, a habit of genius, flinging
aside or transforming all that opposes the liberty of beautiful
production, will be but faith to one's own meaning.  The seeming
baldness of Le Rouge et Le Noir is nothing in itself; the wild
ornament of Les Miserables is nothing in itself; and the restraint of
Flaubert, amid a real natural opulence, only redoubled beauty--the
phrase so large and so precise at the same time, hard as bronze, in
service to the more perfect adaptation of words to their matter.
Afterthoughts, retouchings, finish, will be of profit only so far as
they too really serve to bring out the original, initiative,
generative, sense in them.

In this way, according to the well-known saying, "The style is the
man," complex or simple, in his individuality, his plenary sense of
what he really has to say, his sense of the world; all cautions
regarding style arising out of so many [36] natural scruples as to
the medium through which alone he can expose that inward sense of
things, the purity of this medium, its laws or tricks of refraction:
nothing is to be left there which might give conveyance to any matter
save that.  Style in all its varieties, reserved or opulent, terse,
abundant, musical, stimulant, academic, so long as each is really
characteristic or expressive, finds thus its justification, the
sumptuous good taste of Cicero being as truly the man himself, and
not another, justified, yet insured inalienably to him, thereby, as
would have been his portrait by Raffaelle, in full consular
splendour, on his ivory chair.

A relegation, you may say perhaps--a relegation of style to the
subjectivity, the mere caprice, of the individual, which must soon
transform it into mannerism.  Not so! since there is, under the
conditions supposed, for those elements of the man, for every
lineament of the vision within, the one word, the one acceptable
word, recognisable by the sensitive, by others "who have
intelligence" in the matter, as absolutely as ever anything can be in
the evanescent and delicate region of human language.  The style, the
manner, would be the man, not in his unreasoned and really
uncharacteristic caprices, involuntary or affected, but in absolutely
sincere apprehension of what is most real to him.  But let us hear
our French guide again.--

Styles (says Flaubert's commentator), Styles, as so many [37]
peculiar moulds, each of which bears the mark of a particular
writer, who is to pour into it the whole content of his ideas,
were no part of his theory.  What he believed in was Style:
that is to say, a certain absolute and unique manner of
expressing a thing, in all its intensity and colour.  For him
the form was the work itself.  As in living creatures, the
blood, nourishing the body, determines its very contour and
external aspect, just so, to his mind, the matter, the basis,
in a work of art, imposed, necessarily, the unique, the just
expression, the measure, the rhythm--the form in all its
characteristics.

If the style be the man, in all the colour and intensity of a
veritable apprehension, it will be in a real sense "impersonal."

I said, thinking of books like Victor Hugo's Les Miserables, that
prose literature was the characteristic art of the nineteenth
century, as others, thinking of its triumphs since the youth of Bach,
have assigned that place to music.  Music and prose literature are,
in one sense, the opposite terms of art; the art of literature
presenting to the imagination, through the intelligence, a range of
interests, as free and various as those which music presents to it
through sense.  And certainly the tendency of what has been here said
is to bring literature too under those conditions, by conformity to
which music takes rank as the typically perfect art.  If music be the
ideal of all art whatever, precisely because in music it is
impossible to distinguish the form from the substance or matter, the
subject from the expression, then, literature, by finding its
specific excellence in the absolute correspondence of the term to its
import, will be [38] but fulfilling the condition of all artistic
quality in things everywhere, of all good art.

Good art, but not necessarily great art; the distinction between
great art and good art depending immediately, as regards literature
at all events, not on its form, but on the matter.  Thackeray's
Esmond, surely, is greater art than Vanity Fair, by the greater
dignity of its interests.  It is on the quality of the matter it
informs or controls, its compass, its variety, its alliance to great
ends, or the depth of the note of revolt, or the largeness of hope in
it, that the greatness of literary art depends, as The Divine Comedy,
Paradise Lost, Les Miserables, The English Bible, are great art.
Given the conditions I have tried to explain as constituting good
art;--then, if it be devoted further to the increase of men's
happiness, to the redemption of the oppressed, or the enlargement of
our sympathies with each other, or to such presentment of new or old
truth about ourselves and our relation to the world as may ennoble
and fortify us in our sojourn here, or immediately, as with Dante, to
the glory of God, it will be also great art; if, over and above those
qualities I summed up as mind and soul--that colour and mystic
perfume, and that reasonable structure, it has something of the soul
of humanity in it, and finds its logical, its architectural place, in
the great structure of human life.

1888.

NOTES

12. *Mr. Saintsbury, in his Specimens of English Prose, from Malory
to Macaulay, has succeeded in tracing, through successive English
prose-writers, the tradition of that severer beauty in them, of which
this admirable scholar of our literature is known to be a lover.
English Prose, from Mandeville to Thackeray, more recently "chosen
and edited" by a younger scholar, Mr. Arthur Galton, of New College,
Oxford, a lover of our literature at once enthusiastic and discreet,
aims at a more various illustration of the eloquent powers of English
prose, and is a delightful companion.

28. +In the original, the quoted material is not indented but instead
appears in a smaller typeface; I have chosen to indent the material
half an inch to make it easier to read.



WORDSWORTH

[39] SOME English critics at the beginning of the present century had
a great deal to say concerning a distinction, of much importance, as
they thought, in the true estimate of poetry, between the Fancy, and
another more powerful faculty--the Imagination.  This metaphysical
distinction, borrowed originally from the writings of German
philosophers, and perhaps not always clearly apprehended by those who
talked of it, involved a far deeper and more vital distinction, with
which indeed all true criticism more or less directly has to do, the
distinction, namely, between higher and lower degrees of intensity in
the poet's perception of his subject, and in his concentration of
himself upon his work.  Of those who dwelt upon the metaphysical
distinction between the Fancy and the Imagination, it was Wordsworth
who made the most of it, assuming it as the basis for the final
classification of his poetical writings; and it is in these writings
that the deeper and more vital distinction, which, as I have said,
underlies the metaphysical [40] distinction, is most needed, and may
best be illustrated.

For nowhere is there so perplexed a mixture as in Wordsworth's own
poetry, of work touched with intense and individual power, with work
of almost no character at all.  He has much conventional sentiment,
and some of that insincere poetic diction, against which his most
serious critical efforts were directed: the reaction in his political
ideas, consequent on the excesses of 1795, makes him, at times, a
mere declaimer on moral and social topics; and he seems, sometimes,
to force an unwilling pen, and write by rule.  By making the most of
these blemishes it is possible to obscure the true aesthetic value of
his work, just as his life also, a life of much quiet delicacy and
independence, might easily be placed in a false focus, and made to
appear a somewhat tame theme in illustration of the more obvious
parochial virtues.  And those who wish to understand his influence,
and experience his peculiar savour, must bear with patience the
presence of an alien element in Wordsworth's work, which never
coalesced with what is really delightful in it, nor underwent his
special power.  Who that values his writings most has not felt the
intrusion there, from time to time, of something tedious and prosaic?
Of all poets equally great, he would gain most by a skilfully made
anthology.  Such a selection would show, in truth, not so much what
he was, or to himself or others [41] seemed to be, as what, by the
more energetic and fertile quality in his writings, he was ever
tending to become.  And the mixture in his work, as it actually
stands, is so perplexed, that one fears to miss the least promising
composition even, lest some precious morsel should be lying hidden
within--the few perfect lines, the phrase, the single word perhaps,
to which he often works up mechanically through a poem, almost the
whole of which may be tame enough.  He who thought that in all
creative work the larger part was given passively, to the recipient
mind, who waited so dutifully upon the gift, to whom so large a
measure was sometimes given, had his times also of desertion and
relapse; and he has permitted the impress of these too to remain in
his work.  And this duality there--the fitfulness with which the
higher qualities manifest themselves in it, gives the effect in his
poetry of a power not altogether his own, or under his control, which
comes and goes when it will, lifting or lowering a matter, poor in
itself; so that that old fancy which made the poet's art an
enthusiasm, a form of divine possession, seems almost literally true
of him.

This constant suggestion of an absolute duality between higher and
lower moods, and the work done in them, stimulating one always to
look below the surface, makes the reading of Wordsworth an excellent
sort of training towards the things of art and poetry.  It begets in
those, [42] who, coming across him in youth, can bear him at all, a
habit of reading between the lines, a faith in the effect of
concentration and collectedness of mind in the right appreciation of
poetry, an expectation of things, in this order, coming to one by
means of a right discipline of the temper as well as of the
intellect.  He meets us with the promise that he has much, and
something very peculiar, to give us, if we will follow a certain
difficult way, and seems to have the secret of a special and
privileged state of mind.  And those who have undergone his
influence, and followed this difficult way, are like people who have
passed through some initiation, a disciplina arcani, by submitting to
which they become able constantly to distinguish in art, speech,
feeling, manners, that which is organic, animated, expressive, from
that which is only conventional, derivative, inexpressive.

But although the necessity of selecting these precious morsels for
oneself is an opportunity for the exercise of Wordsworth's peculiar
influence, and induces a kind of just criticism and true estimate of
it, yet the purely literary product would have been more excellent,
had the writer himself purged away that alien element.  How perfect
would have been the little treasury, shut between the covers of how
thin a book!  Let us suppose the desired separation made, the
electric thread untwined, the golden pieces, [43] great and small,
lying apart together.*  What are the peculiarities of this residue?
What special sense does Wordsworth exercise, and what instincts does
he satisfy?  What are the subjects and the motives which in him
excite the imaginative faculty?  What are the qualities in things and
persons which he values, the impression and sense of which he can
convey to others, in an extraordinary way?

An intimate consciousness of the expression of natural things, which
weighs, listens, penetrates, where the earlier mind passed roughly
by, is a large element in the complexion of modern poetry.  It has
been remarked as a fact in mental history again and again.  It
reveals itself in many forms; but is strongest and most attractive in
what is strongest and most attractive in modern literature.  It is
exemplified, almost equally, by writers as unlike each other as
Senancour and Theophile Gautier: as a singular chapter in the history
of the human mind, its growth might be traced from Rousseau to
Chateaubriand, from Chateaubriand to Victor Hugo: it has doubtless
some latent connexion with those pantheistic theories which locate an
intelligent soul in material things, and have largely exercised men's
minds in some modern systems of philosophy: it is traceable even in
[44] the graver writings of historians: it makes as much difference
between ancient and modern landscape art, as there is between the
rough masks of an early mosaic and a portrait by Reynolds or
Gainsborough.  Of this new sense, the writings of Wordsworth are the
central and elementary expression: he is more simply and entirely
occupied with it than any other poet, though there are fine
expressions of precisely the same thing in so different a poet as
Shelley.  There was in his own character a certain contentment, a
sort of inborn religious placidity, seldom found united with a
sensibility so mobile as his, which was favourable to the quiet,
habitual observation of inanimate, or imperfectly animate, existence.
His life of eighty years is divided by no very profoundly felt
incidents: its changes are almost wholly inward, and it falls into
broad, untroubled, perhaps somewhat monotonous spaces.  What it most
resembles is the life of one of those early Italian or Flemish
painters, who, just because their minds were full of heavenly
visions, passed, some of them, the better part of sixty years in
quiet, systematic industry.  This placid life matured a quite unusual
sensibility, really innate in him, to the sights and sounds of the
natural world--the flower and its shadow on the stone, the cuckoo and
its echo.  The poem of Resolution and Independence is a storehouse of
such records: for its fulness of imagery it may be compared to
Keats's Saint Agnes' Eve.  To [45] read one of his longer pastoral
poems for the first time, is like a day spent in a new country: the
memory is crowded for a while with its precise and vivid incidents--

The pliant harebell swinging in the breeze
On some grey rock ;--

The single sheep and the one blasted tree
And the bleak music from that old stone wall;--

In the meadows and the lower ground
Was all the sweetness of a common dawn;--

And that green corn all day is rustling in thine ears.

Clear and delicate at once, as he is in the outlining of visible
imagery, he is more clear and delicate still, and finely scrupulous,
in the noting of sounds; so that he conceives of noble sound as even
moulding the human countenance to nobler types, and as something
actually "profaned" by colour, by visible form, or image.

He has a power likewise of realising, and conveying to the
consciousness of the reader, abstract and elementary impressions--
silence, darkness, absolute motionlessness: or, again, the whole
complex sentiment of a particular place, the abstract expression of
desolation in the long white road, of peacefulness in a particular
folding of the hills.  In the airy building of the brain, a special
day or hour even, comes to have for him a sort of personal identity,
a spirit or angel given to it, by which, for its exceptional [46]
insight, or the happy light upon it, it has a presence in one's
history, and acts there, as a separate power or accomplishment; and
he has celebrated in many of his poems the "efficacious spirit,"
which, as he says, resides in these "particular spots" of time.

It is to such a world, and to a world of congruous meditation
thereon, that we see him retiring in his but lately published poem of
The Recluse--taking leave, without much count of costs, of the world
of business, of action and ambition; as also of all that for the
majority of mankind counts as sensuous enjoyment.*

And so it came about that this sense of a life in natural objects,
which in most poetry is but a rhetorical artifice, is with Wordsworth
the assertion of what for him is almost literal fact.  To him every
natural object seemed to possess more or less of a moral or spiritual
life, to be [47] capable of a companionship with man, full of
expression, of inexplicable affinities and delicacies of intercourse.
An emanation, a particular spirit, belonged, not to the moving leaves
or water only, but to the distant peak of the hills arising suddenly,
by some change of perspective, above the nearer horizon, to the
passing space of light across the plain, to the lichened Druidic
stone even, for a certain weird fellowship in it with the moods of
men.  It was like a "survival," in the peculiar intellectual
temperament of a man of letters at the end of the eighteenth century,
of that primitive condition, which some philosophers have traced in
the general history of human culture, wherein all outward objects
[48] alike, including even the works of men's hands, were believed to
be endowed with animation, and the world was "full of souls"--that
mood in which the old Greek gods were first begotten, and which had
many strange aftergrowths.

In the early ages, this belief, delightful as its effects on poetry
often are, was but the result of a crude intelligence.  But, in
Wordsworth, such power of seeing life, such perception of a soul, in
inanimate things, came of an exceptional susceptibility to the
impressions of eye and ear, and was, in its essence, a kind of
sensuousness.  At least, it is only in a temperament exceptionally
susceptible on the sensuous side, that this sense of the
expressiveness of outward things comes to be so large a part of life.
That he awakened "a sort of thought in sense," is Shelley's just
estimate of this element in Wordsworth's poetry.

And it was through nature, thus ennobled by a semblance of passion
and thought, that he approached the spectacle of human life.  Human
life, indeed, is for him, at first, only an additional, accidental
grace on an expressive landscape.  When he thought of man, it was of
man as in the presence and under the influence of these effective
natural objects, and linked to them by many associations.  The close
connexion of man with natural objects, the habitual association of
his thoughts and feelings with a particular spot of earth, has
sometimes seemed to [49] degrade those who are subject to its
influence, as if it did but reinforce that physical connexion of our
nature with the actual lime and clay of the soil, which is always
drawing us nearer to our end.  But for Wordsworth, these influences
tended to the dignity of human nature, because they tended to
tranquillise it.  By raising nature to the level of human thought he
gives it power and expression: he subdues man to the level of nature,
and gives him thereby a certain breadth and coolness and solemnity.
The leech-gatherer on the moor, the woman "stepping westward," are
for him natural objects, almost in the same sense as the aged thorn,
or the lichened rock on the heath.  In this sense the leader of the
"Lake School," in spite of an earnest preoccupation with man, his
thoughts, his destiny, is the poet of nature.  And of nature, after
all, in its modesty.  The English lake country has, of course, its
grandeurs.  But the peculiar function of Wordsworth's genius, as
carrying in it a power to open out the soul of apparently little or
familiar things, would have found its true test had he become the
poet of Surrey, say! and the prophet of its life.  The glories of
Italy and Switzerland, though he did write a little about them, had
too potent a material life of their own to serve greatly his poetic
purpose.

Religious sentiment, consecrating the affections and natural regrets
of the human heart, above all, that pitiful awe and care for the [50]
perishing human clay, of which relic-worship is but the corruption,
has always had much to do with localities, with the thoughts which
attach themselves to actual scenes and places.  Now what is true of
it everywhere, is truest of it in those secluded valleys where one
generation after another maintains the same abiding-place; and it was
on this side, that Wordsworth apprehended religion most strongly.
Consisting, as it did so much, in the recognition of local
sanctities, in the habit of connecting the stones and trees of a
particular spot of earth with the great events of life, till the low
walls, the green mounds, the half-obliterated epitaphs seemed full of
voices, and a sort of natural oracles, the very religion of these
people of the dales appeared but as another link between them and the
earth, and was literally a religion of nature.  It tranquillised them
by bringing them under the placid rule of traditional and narrowly
localised observances.  "Grave livers," they seemed to him, under
this aspect, with stately speech, and something of that natural
dignity of manners, which underlies the highest courtesy.

And, seeing man thus as a part of nature, elevated and solemnised in
proportion as his daily life and occupations brought him into
companionship with permanent natural objects, his very religion
forming new links for him with the narrow limits of the valley, the
low vaults of his church, the rough stones of his [51] home, made
intense for him now with profound sentiment, Wordsworth was able to
appreciate passion in the lowly.  He chooses to depict people from
humble life, because, being nearer to nature than others, they are on
the whole more impassioned, certainly more direct in their expression
of passion, than other men: it is for this direct expression of
passion, that he values their humble words. In much that he said in
exaltation of rural life, he was but pleading indirectly for that
sincerity, that perfect fidelity to one's own inward presentations,
to the precise features of the picture within, without which any
profound poetry is impossible.  It was not for their tameness, but
for this passionate sincerity, that he chose incidents and situations
from common life, "related in a selection of language really used by
men."  He constantly endeavours to bring his language near to the
real language of men: to the real language of men, however, not on
the dead level of their ordinary intercourse, but in select moments
of vivid sensation, when this language is winnowed and ennobled by
excitement.  There are poets who have chosen rural life as their
subject, for the sake of its passionless repose, and times when
Wordsworth himself extols the mere calm and dispassionate survey of
things as the highest aim of poetical culture.  But it was not for
such passionless calm that he preferred the scenes of pastoral life;
and the meditative poet, sheltering [52] himself, as it might seem,
from the agitations of the outward world, is in reality only clearing
the scene for the great exhibitions of emotion, and what he values
most is the almost elementary expression of elementary feelings.

And so he has much for those who value highly the concentrated
presentment of passion, who appraise men and women by their
susceptibility to it, and art and poetry as they afford the spectacle
of it.  Breaking from time to time into the pensive spectacle of
their daily toil, their occupations near to nature, come those great
elementary feelings, lifting and solemnising their language and
giving it a natural music.  The great, distinguishing passion came to
Michael by the sheepfold, to Ruth by the wayside, adding these humble
children of the furrow to the true aristocracy of passionate souls.
In this respect, Wordsworth's work resembles most that of George
Sand, in those of her novels which depict country life.  With a
penetrative pathos, which puts him in the same rank with the masters
of the sentiment of pity in literature, with Meinhold and Victor
Hugo, he collects all the traces of vivid excitement which were to be
found in that pastoral world--the girl who rung her father's knell;
the unborn infant feeling about its mother's heart; the instinctive
touches of children; the sorrows of the wild creatures, even--their
home-sickness, their strange yearnings; the tales of passionate
regret that hang [53] by a ruined farm-building, a heap of stones, a
deserted sheepfold; that gay, false, adventurous, outer world, which
breaks in from time to time to bewilder and deflower these quiet
homes; not "passionate sorrow" only, for the overthrow of the soul's
beauty, but the loss of, or carelessness for personal beauty even, in
those whom men have wronged--their pathetic wanness; the sailor "who,
in his heart, was half a shepherd on the stormy seas"; the wild woman
teaching her child to pray for her betrayer; incidents like the
making of the shepherd's staff, or that of the young boy laying the
first stone of the sheepfold;--all the pathetic episodes of their
humble existence, their longing, their wonder at fortune, their poor
pathetic pleasures, like the pleasures of children, won so hardly in
the struggle for bare existence; their yearning towards each other,
in their darkened houses, or at their early toil.  A sort of biblical
depth and solemnity hangs over this strange, new, passionate,
pastoral world, of which he first raised the image, and the
reflection of which some of our best modern fiction has caught from
him.

He pondered much over the philosophy of his poetry, and reading
deeply in the history of his own mind, seems at times to have passed
the borders of a world of strange speculations, inconsistent enough,
had he cared to note such inconsistencies, with those traditional
beliefs, which [54] were otherwise the object of his devout
acceptance.  Thinking of the high value he set upon customariness,
upon all that is habitual, local, rooted in the ground, in matters of
religious sentiment, you might sometimes regard him as one tethered
down to a world, refined and peaceful indeed, but with no broad
outlook, a world protected, but somewhat narrowed, by the influence
of received ideas.  But he is at times also something very different
from this, and something much bolder.  A chance expression is
overheard and placed in a new connexion, the sudden memory of a thing
long past occurs to him, a distant object is relieved for a while by
a random gleam of light--accidents turning up for a moment what lies
below the surface of our immediate experience--and he passes from the
humble graves and lowly arches of "the little rock-like pile" of a
Westmoreland church, on bold trains of speculative thought, and
comes, from point to point, into strange contact with thoughts which
have visited, from time to time, far more venturesome, perhaps
errant, spirits.

He had pondered deeply, for instance, on those strange reminiscences
and forebodings, which seem to make our lives stretch before and
behind us, beyond where we can see or touch anything, or trace the
lines of connexion.  Following the soul, backwards and forwards, on
these endless ways, his sense of man's dim, potential powers became a
pledge to him, indeed, of a future life, [55] but carried him back
also to that mysterious notion of an earlier state of existence--the
fancy of the Platonists--the old heresy of Origen.  It was in this
mood that he conceived those oft-reiterated regrets for a half-ideal
childhood, when the relics of Paradise still clung about the soul--a
childhood, as it seemed, full of the fruits of old age, lost for all,
in a degree, in the passing away of the youth of the world, lost for
each one, over again, in the passing away of actual youth.  It is
this ideal childhood which he celebrates in his famous Ode on the
Recollections of Childhood, and some other poems which may be grouped
around it, such as the lines on Tintern Abbey, and something like
what he describes was actually truer of himself than he seems to have
understood; for his own most delightful poems were really the
instinctive productions of earlier life, and most surely for him,
"the first diviner influence of this world" passed away, more and
more completely, in his contact with experience.

Sometimes as he dwelt upon those moments of profound, imaginative
power, in which the outward object appears to take colour and
expression, a new nature almost, from the prompting of the observant
mind, the actual world would, as it were, dissolve and detach itself,
flake by flake, and he himself seemed to be the creator, and when he
would the destroyer, of the world in which he lived--that old
isolating thought of many a brain-sick mystic of ancient and modern
times.

[56] At other times, again, in those periods of intense
susceptibility, in which he appeared to himself as but the passive
recipient of external influences, he was attracted by the thought of
a spirit of life in outward things, a single, all-pervading mind in
them, of which man, and even the poet's imaginative energy, are but
moments--that old dream of the anima mundi, the mother of all things
and their grave, in which some had desired to lose themselves, and
others had become indifferent to the distinctions of good and evil.
It would come, sometimes, like the sign of the macrocosm to Faust in
his cell: the network of man and nature was seen to be pervaded by a
common, universal life: a new, bold thought lifted him above the
furrow, above the green turf of the Westmoreland churchyard, to a
world altogether different in its vagueness and vastness, and the
narrow glen was full of the brooding power of one universal spirit.

And so he has something, also, for those who feel the fascination of
bold speculative ideas, who are really capable of rising upon them to
conditions of poetical thought.  He uses them, indeed, always with a
very fine apprehension of the limits within which alone philosophical
imaginings have any place in true poetry; and using them only for
poetical purposes, is not too careful even to make them consistent
with each other.  To him, theories which for other men [57] bring a
world of technical diction, brought perfect form and expression, as
in those two lofty books of The Prelude, which describe the decay and
the restoration of Imagination and Taste.  Skirting the borders of
this world of bewildering heights and depths, he got but the first
exciting influence of it, that joyful enthusiasm which great
imaginative theories prompt, when the mind first comes to have an
understanding of them; and it is not under the influence of these
thoughts that his poetry becomes tedious or loses its blitheness.  He
keeps them, too, always within certain ethical bounds, so that no
word of his could offend the simplest of those simple souls which are
always the largest portion of mankind.  But it is, nevertheless, the
contact of these thoughts, the speculative boldness in them, which
constitutes, at least for some minds, the secret attraction of much
of his best poetry--the sudden passage from lowly thoughts and places
to the majestic forms of philosophical imagination, the play of these
forms over a world so different, enlarging so strangely the bounds of
its humble churchyards, and breaking such a wild light on the graves
of christened children.

And these moods always brought with them faultless expression.  In
regard to expression, as with feeling and thought, the duality of the
higher and lower moods was absolute.  It belonged to the higher, the
imaginative mood, and was the pledge of its reality, to bring the
[58] appropriate language with it.  In him, when the really poetical
motive worked at all, it united, with absolute justice, the word and
the idea; each, in the imaginative flame, becoming inseparably one
with the other, by that fusion of matter and form, which is the
characteristic of the highest poetical expression.  His words are
themselves thought and feeling; not eloquent, or musical words
merely, but that sort of creative language which carries the reality
of what it depicts, directly, to the consciousness.

The music of mere metre performs but a limited, yet a very peculiar
and subtly ascertained function, in Wordsworth's poetry.  With him,
metre is but an additional grace, accessory to that deeper music of
words and sounds, that moving power, which they exercise in the
nobler prose no less than in formal poetry.  It is a sedative to that
excitement, an excitement sometimes almost painful, under which the
language, alike of poetry and prose, attains a rhythmical power,
independent of metrical combination, and dependent rather on some
subtle adjustment of the elementary sounds of words themselves to the
image or feeling they convey.  Yet some of his pieces, pieces
prompted by a sort of half-playful mysticism, like the Daffodils and
The Two April Mornings, are distinguished by a certain quaint gaiety
of metre, and rival by their perfect execution, in this respect,
similar pieces among our own Elizabethan, or contemporary French
poetry.

[59] And those who take up these poems after an interval of months,
or years perhaps, may be surprised at finding how well old favourites
wear, how their strange, inventive turns of diction or thought still
send through them the old feeling of surprise.  Those who lived about
Wordsworth were all great lovers of the older English literature, and
oftentimes there came out in him a noticeable likeness to our earlier
poets.  He quotes unconsciously, but with new power of meaning, a
clause from one of Shakespeare's sonnets; and, as with some other
men's most famous work, the Ode on the Recollections of Childhood had
its anticipator.*  He drew something too from the unconscious
mysticism of the old English language itself, drawing out the inward
significance of its racy idiom, and the not wholly unconscious poetry
of the language used by the simplest people under strong excitement--
language, therefore, at its origin.

The office of the poet is not that of the moralist, and the first aim
of Wordsworth's poetry is to give the reader a peculiar kind of
pleasure.  But through his poetry, and through this pleasure in it,
he does actually convey to the reader an extraordinary wisdom in the
things of practice.  One lesson, if men must have lessons, he conveys
more clearly than all, the supreme importance of contemplation in the
conduct of life.

[60] Contemplation--impassioned contemplation--that, is with
Wordsworth the end-in-itself, the perfect end.  We see the majority
of mankind going most often to definite ends, lower or higher ends,
as their own instincts may determine; but the end may never be
attained, and the means not be quite the right means, great ends and
little ones alike being, for the most part, distant, and the ways to
them, in this dim world, somewhat vague.  Meantime, to higher or
lower ends, they move too often with something of a sad countenance,
with hurried and ignoble gait, becoming, unconsciously, something
like thorns, in their anxiety to bear grapes; it being possible for
people, in the pursuit of even great ends, to become themselves thin
and impoverished in spirit and temper, thus diminishing the sum of
perfection in the world, at its very sources.  We understand this
when it is a question of mean, or of intensely selfish ends--of
Grandet, or Javert.  We think it bad morality to say that the end
justifies the means, and we know how false to all higher conceptions
of the religious life is the type of one who is ready to do evil that
good may come.  We contrast with such dark, mistaken eagerness, a
type like that of Saint Catherine of Siena, who made the means to her
ends so attractive, that she has won for herself an undying place in
the House Beautiful, not by her rectitude of soul only, but by its
"fairness"--by those quite different qualities [61] which commend
themselves to the poet and the artist.

Yet, for most of us, the conception of means and ends covers the
whole of life, and is the exclusive type or figure under which we
represent our lives to ourselves.  Such a figure, reducing all things
to machinery, though it has on its side the authority of that old
Greek moralist who has fixed for succeeding generations the outline
of the theory of right living, is too like a mere picture or
description of men's lives as we actually find them, to be the basis
of the higher ethics.  It covers the meanness of men's daily lives,
and much of the dexterity with which they pursue what may seem to
them the good of themselves or of others; but not the intangible
perfection of those whose ideal is rather in being than in doing--not
those manners which are, in the deepest as in the simplest sense,
morals, and without which one cannot so much as offer a cup of water
to a poor man without offence--not the part of  "antique Rachel,"
sitting in the company of Beatrice; and even the moralist might well
endeavour rather to withdraw men from the too exclusive consideration
of means and ends, in life.

Against this predominance of machinery in our existence, Wordsworth's
poetry, like all great art and poetry, is a continual protest.
Justify rather the end by the means, it seems to say: whatever may
become of the fruit, make sure of [62] the flowers and the leaves.
It was justly said, therefore, by one who had meditated very
profoundly on the true relation of means to ends in life, and on the
distinction between what is desirable in itself and what is desirable
only as machinery, that when the battle which he and his friends were
waging had been won, the world would need more than ever those
qualities which Wordsworth was keeping alive and nourishing.*

That the end of life is not action but contemplation--being as
distinct from doing--a certain disposition of the mind: is, in some
shape or other, the principle of all the higher morality.  In poetry,
in art, if you enter into their true spirit at all; you touch this
principle, in a measure: these, by their very sterility, are a type
of beholding for the mere joy of beholding.  To treat life in the
spirit of art, is to make life a thing in which means and ends are
identified: to encourage such treatment, the true moral significance
of art and poetry.  Wordsworth, and other poets who have been like
him in ancient or more recent times, are the masters, the experts, in
this art of impassioned contemplation.  Their work is, not to teach
lessons, or enforce rules, or even to stimulate us to noble ends; but
to withdraw the thoughts for a little while from the mere machinery
of life, to fix [63] them, with appropriate emotions, on the
spectacle of those great facts in man's existence which no machinery
affects, "on the great and universal passions of men, the most
general and interesting of their occupations, and the entire world of
nature,"--on "the operations of the elements and the appearances of
the visible universe, on storm and sunshine, on the revolutions of
the seasons, on cold and heat, on loss of friends and kindred, on
injuries and resentments, on gratitude and hope, on fear and
sorrow."  To witness this spectacle with appropriate emotions is the
aim of all culture; and of these emotions poetry like Wordsworth's is
a great nourisher and stimulant.  He sees nature full of sentiment
and excitement; he sees men and women as parts of nature, passionate,
excited, in strange grouping and connexion with the grandeur and
beauty of the natural world:--images, in his own words, "of man
suffering, amid awful forms and powers."

Such is the figure of the more powerful and original poet, hidden
away, in part, under those weaker elements in Wordsworth's poetry,
which for some minds determine their entire character; a poet
somewhat bolder and more passionate than might at first sight be
supposed, but not too bold for true poetical taste; an unimpassioned
writer, you might sometimes fancy, yet thinking the chief aim, in
life and art alike, to be a certain deep emotion; seeking most often
the great [64] elementary passions in lowly places; having at least
this condition of all impassioned work, that he aims always at an
absolute sincerity of feeling and diction, so that he is the true
forerunner of the deepest and most passionate poetry of our own day;
yet going back also, with something of a protest against the
conventional fervour of much of the poetry popular in his own time,
to those older English poets, whose unconscious likeness often comes
out in him.

1874.

NOTES

43. *Since this essay was written, such selections have been made,
with excellent taste, by Matthew Arnold and Professor Knight.

46-47. *In Wordsworth's prefatory advertisement to the first edition
of The Prelude, published in 1850, it is stated that that work was
intended to be introductory to The Recluse; and that The Recluse, if
completed, would have consisted of three parts.  The second part is
The Excursion.  The third part was only planned; but the first book
of the first part was left in manuscript by Wordsworth--though in
manuscript, it is said, in no great condition of forwardness for the
printers.  This book, now for the first time printed  in extenso (a
very noble passage from it found place in that prose advertisement to
The Excursion), is included in the latest edition of Wordsworth by
Mr. John Morley.  It was well worth adding to the poet's great
bequest to English literature.  A true student of his work, who has
formulated for himself what he supposes to be the leading
characteristics of Wordsworth's genius, will feel, we think, lively
interest in testing them by the various fine passages in what is
here presented for the first time.  Let the following serve for
a sample:--

Thickets full of songsters, and the voice
Of lordly birds, an unexpected sound
Heard now and then from morn to latest eve,
Admonishing the man who walks below
Of solitude and silence in the sky:--
These have we, and a thousand nooks of earth
Have also these, but nowhere else is found,
Nowhere (or is it fancy?) can be found
The one sensation that is here; 'tis here,
Here as it found its way into my heart
In childhood, here as it abides by day,
By night, here only; or in chosen minds
That take it with them hence, where'er they go.
--'Tis, but I cannot name it, 'tis the sense
Of majesty, and beauty, and repose,
A blended holiness of earth and sky,
Something that makes this individual spot,
This small abiding-place of many men,
A termination, and a last retreat,
A centre, come from wheresoe'er you will,
A whole without dependence or defect,
Made for itself, and happy in itself,
Perfect contentment, Unity entire.

59. *Henry Vaughan, in The Retreat.

62. *See an interesting paper, by Mr. John Morley, on "The Death of
Mr. Mill," Fortnightly Review, June 1873.



COLERIDGE*

[65] FORMS of intellectual and spiritual culture sometimes exercise
their subtlest and most artful charm when life is already passing
from them. Searching and irresistible as are the changes of the human
spirit on its way to perfection, there is yet so much elasticity of
temper that what must pass away sooner or later is not disengaged all
at once, even from the highest order of minds. Nature, which by one
law of development evolves ideas, hypotheses, modes of inward life,
and represses them in turn, has in this way provided that the earlier
growth should propel its fibres into the later, and so transmit the
whole of its forces in an unbroken continuity of life. Then comes the
spectacle of the reserve of the elder generation exquisitely refined
by the antagonism of the new.  That current of new life chastens them
while they contend against it. Weaker minds fail to perceive the
change: the clearest minds abandon themselves to it.  To [66] feel
the change everywhere, yet not abandon oneself to it, is a situation
of difficulty and contention.  Communicating, in this way, to the
passing stage of culture, the charm of what is chastened, high-
strung, athletic, they yet detach the highest minds from the past, by
pressing home its difficulties and finally proving it impossible.
Such has been the charm of many leaders of lost causes in philosophy
and in religion.  It is the special charm of Coleridge, in connexion
with those older methods of philosophic inquiry, over which the
empirical philosophy of our day has triumphed.

Modern thought is distinguished from ancient by its cultivation of
the "relative" spirit in place of the "absolute."  Ancient philosophy
sought to arrest every object in an eternal outline, to fix thought
in a necessary formula, and the varieties of life in a classification
by "kinds," or genera.  To the modern spirit nothing is, or can be
rightly known, except relatively and under conditions.  The
philosophical conception of the relative has been developed in modern
times through the influence of the sciences of observation.  Those
sciences reveal types of life evanescing into each other by
inexpressible refinements of change.  Things pass into their
opposites by accumulation of undefinable quantities.  The growth of
those sciences consists in a continual analysis of facts of rough and
general observation into groups of facts more precise and minute.

[67] The faculty for truth is recognised as a power of distinguishing
and fixing delicate and fugitive detail.  The moral world is ever in
contact with the physical, and the relative spirit has invaded moral
philosophy from the ground of the inductive sciences.  There it has
started a new analysis of the relations of body and mind, good and
evil, freedom and necessity.  Hard and abstract moralities are
yielding to a more exact estimate of the subtlety and complexity of
our life.  Always, as an organism increases in perfection, the
conditions of its life become more complex.  Man is the most complex
of the products of nature.  Character merges into temperament: the
nervous system refines itself into intellect.  Man's physical
organism is played upon not only by the physical conditions about it,
but by remote laws of inheritance, the vibration of long-past acts
reaching him in the midst of the new order of things in which he
lives.  When we have estimated these conditions he is still not yet
simple and isolated; for the mind of the race, the character of the
age, sway him this way or that through the medium of language and
current ideas.  It seems as if the most opposite statements about him
were alike true: he is so receptive, all the influences of nature and
of society ceaselessly playing upon him, so that every hour in his
life is unique, changed altogether by a stray word, or glance, or
touch.  It is the truth of these relations that experience [68] gives
us, not the truth of eternal outlines ascertained once for all, but a
world of fine gradations and subtly linked conditions, shifting
intricately as we ourselves change--and bids us, by a constant
clearing of the organs of observation and perfecting of analysis, to
make what we can of these.  To the intellect, the critical spirit,
just these subtleties of effect are more precious than anything else.
What is lost in precision of form is gained in intricacy of
expression.  It is no vague scholastic abstraction that will satisfy
the speculative instinct in our modern minds.  Who would change the
colour or curve of a rose-leaf for that ousia akhromatos,
askhematistos, anaphes+--that colourless, formless, intangible,
being--Plato put so high?  For the true illustration of the
speculative temper is not the Hindoo mystic, lost to sense,
understanding, individuality, but one such as Goethe, to whom every
moment of life brought its contribution of experimental, individual
knowledge; by whom no touch of the world of form, colour, and passion
was disregarded.

Now the literary life of Coleridge was a disinterested struggle
against the relative spirit. With a strong native bent towards the
tracking of all questions, critical or practical, to first
principles, he is ever restlessly scheming to "apprehend the
absolute," to affirm it effectively, to get it acknowledged.  It was
an effort, surely, an effort of sickly thought, that saddened his
[69] mind, and limited the operation of his unique poetic gift.

So what the reader of our own generation will least find in
Coleridge's prose writings is the excitement of the literary sense.
And yet, in those grey volumes, we have the larger part of the
production of one who made way ever by a charm, the charm of voice,
of aspect, of language, above all by the intellectual charm of new,
moving, luminous ideas.  Perhaps the chief offence in Coleridge is an
excess of seriousness, a seriousness arising not from any moral
principle, but from a misconception of the perfect manner.  There is
a certain shade of unconcern, the perfect manner of the eighteenth
century, which may be thought to mark complete culture in the
handling of abstract questions.  The humanist, the possessor of that
complete culture, does not "weep" over the failure of "a theory of
the quantification of the predicate," nor "shriek" over the fall of a
philosophical formula.  A kind of humour is, in truth, one of the
conditions of the just mental attitude, in the criticism of by-past
stages of thought.  Humanity cannot afford to be too serious about
them, any more than a man of good sense can afford to be too serious
in looking back upon his own childhood.  Plato, whom Coleridge claims
as the first of his spiritual ancestors, Plato, as we remember him, a
true humanist, holds his theories lightly, glances with a somewhat
blithe and naive inconsequence from [70] one view to another, not
anticipating the burden of importance "views" will one day have for
men.  In reading him one feels how lately it was that Croesus thought
it a paradox to say that external prosperity was not necessarily
happiness.  But on Coleridge lies the whole weight of the sad
reflection that has since come into the world, with which for us the
air is full, which the "children in the market-place" repeat to each
other.  His very language is forced and broken lest some saving
formula should be lost--distinctities, enucleation, pentad of
operative Christianity; he has a whole armoury of these terms, and
expects to turn the tide of human thought by fixing the sense of such
expressions as "reason," "understanding," "idea."  Again, he lacks
the jealousy of a true artist in excluding all associations that have
no colour, or charm, or gladness in them; and everywhere allows the
impress of a somewhat inferior theological literature.

"I was driven from life in motion to life in thought and sensation:"
so Coleridge sums up his childhood, with its delicacy, its
sensitiveness, and passion.  But at twenty-five he was exercising a
wonderful charm, and had already defined for himself his peculiar
line of intellectual activity.  He had an odd, attractive gift of
conversation, or rather of monologue, as Madame de Stael observed of
him, full of bizarreries, with the rapid alternations of a dream, and
here or there an unexpected summons into a world [71] strange to the
hearer, abounding in images drawn from a sort of divided imperfect
life, the consciousness of the opium-eater, as of one to whom the
external world penetrated only in part, and, blent with all this,
passages of deep obscurity, precious, if at all, only for their
musical cadence, echoes in Coleridge of the eloquence of those older
English writers of whom he was so ardent a lover.  And all through
this brilliant early manhood we may discern the power of the
"Asiatic" temperament, of that voluptuousness, which is connected
perhaps with his appreciation of the intimacy, the almost mystical
communion of touch, between nature and man.  "I am much better," he
writes, "and my new and tender health is all over me like a
voluptuous feeling."  And whatever fame, or charm, or life-inspiring
gift he has had as a speculative thinker, is the vibration of the
interest he excited then, the propulsion into years which clouded his
early promise of that first buoyant, irresistible, self-assertion.
So great is even the indirect power of a sincere effort towards the
ideal life, of even a temporary escape of the spirit from routine.

In 1798 he visited Germany, then, the only half-known, "promised
land," of the metaphysical, the "absolute," philosophy.  A beautiful
fragment of this period remains, describing a spring excursion to the
Brocken.  His excitement still vibrates in it.  Love, all joyful
states [72] of mind, are self-expressive: they loosen the tongue,
they fill the thoughts with sensuous images, they harmonise one with
the world of sight.  We hear of the "rich graciousness and courtesy"
of Coleridge's manner, of the white and delicate skin, the abundant
black hair, the full, almost animal lips--that whole physiognomy of
the dreamer, already touched with narcotism.  One says, of the
beginning of one of his Unitarian sermons: "His voice rose like a
stream of rich, distilled perfumes;" another, "He talks like an
angel, and does--nothing!"

The Aids to Reflection, The Friend, The Biographia Literaria: those
books came from one whose vocation was in the world of the
imagination, the theory and practice of poetry.  And yet, perhaps, of
all books that have been influential in modern times, they are
furthest from artistic form--bundles of notes; the original matter
inseparably mixed up with that borrowed from others; the whole, just
that mere preparation for an artistic effect which the finished
literary artist would be careful one day to destroy.  Here, again, we
have a trait profoundly characteristic of Coleridge.  He sometimes
attempts to reduce a phase of thought, subtle and exquisite, to
conditions too rough for it.  He uses a purely speculative gift for
direct moral edification.  Scientific truth is a thing fugitive,
relative, full of fine gradations: he tries to fix it in absolute
formulas.  The Aids to Reflection, The Friend, are [73] efforts to
propagate the volatile spirit of conversation into the less ethereal
fabric of a written book; and it is only here or there that the
poorer matter becomes vibrant, is really lifted by the spirit.

De Quincey said of him that "he wanted better bread than can be made
with wheat:" Lamb, that from childhood he had "hungered for
eternity." Yet the faintness, the continuous dissolution, whatever
its cause, which soon supplanted the buoyancy of his first wonderful
years, had its own consumptive refinements, and even brought, as to
the "Beautiful Soul" in Wilhelm Meister, a faint religious ecstasy--
that "singing in the sails" which is not of the breeze.  Here again
is one of his occasional notes:--

"In looking at objects of nature while I am thinking, as at yonder
moon, dim-glimmering through the window-pane, I seem rather to be
seeking, as it were asking, a symbolical language for something
within me, that already and for ever exists, than observing anything
new.  Even when the latter is the case, yet still I have always an
obscure feeling, as if that new phenomenon were the dim awaking of a
forgotten or hidden truth of my inner nature.  While I was preparing
the pen to make this remark, I lost the train of thought which had
led me to it."

What a distemper of the eye of the mind!  What an almost bodily
distemper there is in that!

Coleridge's intellectual sorrows were many; [74] but he had one
singular intellectual happiness.  With an inborn taste for
transcendental philosophy, he lived just at the time when that
philosophy took an immense spring in Germany, and connected itself
with an impressive literary movement.  He had the good luck to light
upon it in its freshness, and introduce it to his countrymen.  What
an opportunity for one reared on the colourless analytic English
philosophies of the last century, but who feels an irresistible
attraction towards bold metaphysical synthesis!  How rare are such
occasions of intellectual contentment!  This transcendental
philosophy, chiefly as systematised by the mystic Schelling,
Coleridge applied with an eager, unwearied subtlety, to the questions
of theology, and poetic or artistic criticism.  It is in his theory
of poetry, of art, that he comes nearest to principles of permanent
truth and importance: that is the least fugitive part of his prose
work.  What, then, is the essence of his philosophy of art--of
imaginative production?

Generally, it may be described as an attempt to reclaim the world of
art as a world of fixed laws, to show that the creative activity of
genius and the simplest act of thought are but higher and lower
products of the laws of a universal logic.  Criticism, feeling its
own inadequacy in dealing with the greater works of art, is sometimes
tempted to make too much of those dark and capricious suggestions of
genius, which even [75] the intellect possessed by them is unable to
explain or recall.  It has seemed due to the half-sacred character of
those works to ignore all analogy between the productive process by
which they had their birth, and the simpler processes of mind.
Coleridge, on the other hand, assumes that the highest phases of
thought must be more, not less, than the lower, subject to law.

With this interest, in the Biographia Literaria, he refines
Schelling's "Philosophy of Nature" into a theory of art.  "There can
be no plagiarism in philosophy," says Heine:--Es giebt kein Plagiat
in der Philosophie, in reference to the charge brought against
Schelling of unacknowledged borrowing from Bruno; and certainly that
which is common to Coleridge and Schelling and Bruno alike is of far
earlier origin than any of them.  Schellingism, the "Philosophy of
Nature," is indeed a constant tradition in the history of thought: it
embodies a permanent type of the speculative temper.  That mode of
conceiving nature as a mirror or reflex of the intelligence of man
may be traced up to the first beginnings of Greek speculation.  There
are two ways of envisaging those aspects of nature which seem to bear
the impress of reason or intelligence.  There is the deist's way,
which regards them merely as marks of design, which separates the
informing mind from its result in nature, as the mechanist from the
machine; and there is the pantheistic way, which identifies the two,
which [76] regards nature itself as the living energy of an
intelligence of the same kind as though vaster in scope than the
human.  Partly through the influence of mythology, the Greek mind
became early possessed with the conception of nature as living,
thinking, almost speaking to the mind of man.  This unfixed poetical
prepossession, reduced to an abstract form, petrified into an idea,
is the force which gives unity of aim to Greek philosophy.  Little by
little, it works out the substance of the Hegelian formula: "Whatever
is, is according to reason: whatever is according to reason, that
is."  Experience, which has gradually saddened the earth's colours
for us, stiffened its motions, withdrawn from it some blithe and
debonair presence, has quite changed the character of the science of
nature, as we understand it.  The "positive" method, in truth, makes
very little account of marks of intelligence in nature: in its wider
view of phenomena, it sees that those instances are a minority, and
may rank as happy coincidences: it absorbs them in the larger
conception of universal mechanical law.  But the suspicion of a mind
latent in nature, struggling for release, and intercourse with the
intellect of man through true ideas, has never ceased to haunt a
certain class of minds.  Started again and again in successive
periods by enthusiasts on the antique pattern, in each case the
thought may have seemed paler and more fantastic amid the growing
[77] consistency and sharpness of outline of other and more positive
forms of knowledge.  Still, wherever the speculative instinct has
been united with a certain poetic inwardness of temperament, as in
Bruno, in Schelling, there that old Greek conception, like some seed
floating in the air, has taken root and sprung up anew.  Coleridge,
thrust inward upon himself, driven from "life in thought and
sensation" to life in thought only, feels already, in his dark London
school, a thread of the Greek mind on this matter vibrating strongly
in him.  At fifteen he is discoursing on Plotinus, as in later years
he reflects from Schelling that flitting intellectual tradition. He
supposes a subtle, sympathetic co-ordination between the ideas of the
human reason and the laws of the natural world.  Science, the real
knowledge of that natural world, is to be attained, not by
observation, experiment, analysis, patient generalisation, but by the
evolution or recovery of those ideas directly from within, by a sort
of Platonic "recollection"; every group of observed facts remaining
an enigma until the appropriate idea is struck upon them from the
mind of a Newton, or a Cuvier, the genius in whom sympathy with the
universal reason becomes entire.  In the next place, he conceives
that this reason or intelligence in nature becomes reflective, or
self-conscious.  He fancies he can trace, through all the simpler
forms of life, fragments of an eloquent prophecy about the [78] human
mind.  The whole of nature he regards as a development of higher
forms out of the lower, through shade after shade of systematic
change.  The dim stir of chemical atoms towards the axis of crystal
form, the trance-like life of plants, the animal troubled by strange
irritabilities, are stages which anticipate consciousness.  All
through the ever-increasing movement of life that was shaping itself;
every successive phase of life, in its unsatisfied susceptibilities,
seeming to be drawn out of its own limits by the more pronounced
current of life on its confines, the "shadow of approaching humanity"
gradually deepening, the latent intelligence winning a way to the
surface.  And at this point the law of development does not lose
itself in caprice: rather it becomes more constraining and incisive.
From the lowest to the very highest acts of the conscious
intelligence, there is another series of refining shades.  Gradually
the mind concentrates itself, frees itself from the limitations of
the particular, the individual, attains a strange power of modifying
and centralising what it receives from without, according to the
pattern of an inward ideal.  At last, in imaginative genius, ideas
become effective: the intelligence of nature, all its discursive
elements now connected and justified, is clearly reflected; the
interpretation of its latent purposes being embodied in the great
central products of creative art.  The secret of creative [79] genius
would be an exquisitely purged sympathy with nature, with the
reasonable soul antecedent there.  Those associative conceptions of
the imagination, those eternally fixed types of action and passion,
would come, not so much from the conscious invention of the artist,
as from his self-surrender to the suggestions of an abstract reason
or ideality in things: they would be evolved by the stir of nature
itself, realising the highest reach of its dormant reason: they would
have a kind of prevenient necessity to rise at some time to the
surface of the human mind.

It is natural that Shakespeare should be the favourite illustration
of such criticism, whether in England or Germany.  The first
suggestion in Shakespeare is that of capricious detail, of a
waywardness that plays with the parts careless of the impression of
the whole; what supervenes is the constraining unity of effect, the
ineffaceable impression, of Hamlet or Macbeth.  His hand moving
freely is curved round as if by some law of gravitation from within:
an energetic unity or identity makes itself visible amid an abounding
variety.  This unity or identity Coleridge exaggerates into something
like the identity of a natural organism, and the associative act
which effected it into something closely akin to the primitive power
of nature itself.  "In the Shakespearian drama," he says, "there is a
vitality which grows and evolves itself from within."

[80] Again--

He, too, worked in the spirit of nature, by evolving the germ
from within, by the imaginative power, according to the idea.
For as the power of seeing is to light, so is an idea in mind
to a law in nature.  They are correlatives which suppose
each other.

Again--

The organic form is innate: it shapes, as it develops, itself from
within, and the fulness of its development is one and the same with
the perfection of its outward form.  Such as the life is, such is the
form.  Nature, the prime, genial artist, inexhaustible in diverse
powers, is equally inexhaustible in forms: each exterior is the
physiognomy of the being within, and even such is the appropriate
excellence of Shakespeare, himself a nature humanised, a genial
understanding, directing self-consciously a power and an implicit
wisdom deeper even than our consciousness.+

In this late age we are become so familiarised with the greater works
of art as to be little sensitive of the act of creation in them: they
do not impress us as a new presence in the world.  Only sometimes, in
productions which realise immediately a profound influence and
enforce a change in taste, we are actual witnesses of the moulding of
an unforeseen type by some new principle of association; and to that
phenomenon Coleridge wisely recalls our attention.  What makes his
view a one-sided one is, that in it the artist has become almost a
mechanical agent: instead of the most luminous and self-possessed
phase of consciousness, the associative act in art or poetry is made
to look like some blindly organic process of assimilation.  The work
of art is likened to a living organism.  That expresses [81] truly
the sense of a self-delighting, independent life which the finished
work of art gives us: it hardly figures the process by which such
work was produced.  Here there is no blind ferment of lifeless
elements towards the realisation of a type.  By exquisite analysis
the artist attains clearness of idea; then, through many stages of
refining, clearness of expression.  He moves slowly over his work,
calculating the tenderest tone, and restraining the subtlest curve,
never letting hand or fancy move at large, gradually enforcing
flaccid spaces to the higher degree of expressiveness.  The
philosophic critic, at least, will value, even in works of
imagination, seemingly the most intuitive, the power of the
understanding in them, their logical process of construction, the
spectacle of a supreme intellectual dexterity which they afford.

Coleridge's prose writings on philosophy, politics, religion, and
criticism, were, in truth, but one element in a whole lifetime of
endeavours to present the then recent metaphysics of Germany to
English readers, as a legitimate expansion of the older, classical
and native masters of what has been variously called the a priori, or
absolute, or spiritual, or Platonic, view of things.  His criticism,
his challenge for recognition in the concrete, visible, finite work
of art, of the dim, unseen, comparatively infinite, soul or power of
the artist, may well be [82] remembered as part of the long pleading
of German culture for the things "behind the veil."  To introduce
that spiritual philosophy, as represented by the more transcendental
parts of Kant, and by Schelling, into all subjects, as a system of
reason in them, one and ever identical with itself, however various
the matter through which it was diffused, became with him the motive
of an unflagging enthusiasm, which seems to have been the one thread
of continuity in a life otherwise singularly wanting in unity of
purpose, and in which he was certainly far from uniformly at his
best.  Fragmentary and obscure, but often eloquent, and always at
once earnest and ingenious, those writings, supplementing his
remarkable gift of conversation, were directly and indirectly
influential, even on some the furthest removed from Coleridge's own
masters; on John Stuart Mill, for instance, and some of the earlier
writers of the "high-church" school.  Like his verse, they display
him also in two other characters--as a student of words, and as a
psychologist, that is, as a more minute observer or student than
other men of the phenomena of mind.  To note the recondite
associations of words, old or new; to expound the logic, the
reasonable soul, of their various uses; to recover the interest of
older writers who had had a phraseology of their own--this was a vein
of inquiry allied to his undoubted gift of tracking out and analysing
curious modes of thought.  A [83] quaint fragment of verse on Human
Life might serve to illustrate his study of the earlier English
philosophical poetry.  The latter gift, that power of the "subtle-
souled psychologist," as Shelley calls him, seems to have been
connected with some tendency to disease in the physical temperament,
something of a morbid want of balance in those parts where the
physical and intellectual elements mix most closely together, with a
kind of languid visionariness, deep-seated in the very constitution
of the "narcotist," who had quite a gift for "plucking the poisons of
self-harm," and which the actual habit of taking opium, accidentally
acquired, did but reinforce.  This morbid languor of nature,
connected both with his fitfulness of purpose and his rich delicate
dreaminess, qualifies Coleridge's poetic composition even more than
his prose; his verse, with the exception of his avowedly political
poems, being, unlike that of the "Lake School," to which in some
respects he belongs, singularly unaffected by any moral, or
professional, or personal effort or ambition,--"written," as he says,
"after the more violent emotions of sorrow, to give him pleasure,
when perhaps nothing else could;" but coming thus, indeed, very close
to his own most intimately personal characteristics, and having a
certain languidly soothing grace or cadence, for its most fixed
quality, from first to last.  After some Platonic soliloquy on a
flower opening on a fine day in February, he goes on-- [84]

Dim similitudes
Weaving in mortal strains, I've stolen one hour
From anxious self, life's cruel taskmaster!
And the warm wooings of this sunny day
Tremble along my frame and harmonise
The attempered organ, that even saddest thoughts
Mix with some sweet sensations, like harsh tunes
Played deftly on a sweet-toned instrument.

The expression of two opposed, yet allied, elements of sensibility in
these lines, is very true to Coleridge:--the grievous agitation, the
grievous listlessness, almost never entirely relieved, together with
a certain physical voluptuousness.  He has spoken several times of
the scent of the bean-field in the air:--the tropical touches in a
chilly climate; his is a nature that will make the most of these,
which finds a sort of caress in such things.  Kubla Khan, the
fragment of a poem actually composed in some certainly not quite
healthy sleep, is perhaps chiefly of interest as showing, by the mode
of its composition, how physical, how much of a diseased or
valetudinarian temperament, in its moments of relief, Coleridge's
happiest gift really was; and side by side with Kubla Khan should be
read, as Coleridge placed it, the Pains of Sleep, to illustrate that
retarding physical burden in his temperament, that "unimpassioned
grief," the source of which lay so near the source of those
pleasures.  Connected also with this, and again in contrast with
Wordsworth, is the limited quantity of his poetical performance, as
he himself [85] regrets so eloquently in the lines addressed to
Wordsworth after his recitation of The Prelude.  It is like some
exotic plant, just managing to blossom a little in the somewhat un-
english air of Coleridge's own south-western birthplace, but never
quite well there.

In 1798 he joined Wordsworth in the composition of a volume of poems-
-the Lyrical Ballads.  What Wordsworth then wrote already vibrates
with that blithe impulse which carried him to final happiness and
self-possession.  In Coleridge we feel already that faintness and
obscure dejection which clung like some contagious damp to all his
work.  Wordsworth was to be distinguished by a joyful and penetrative
conviction of the existence of certain latent affinities between
nature and the human mind, which reciprocally gild the mind and
nature with a kind of "heavenly alchemy."

My voice proclaims
How exquisitely the individual mind
(And the progressive powers, perhaps, no less
Of the whole species) to the external world
Is fitted; and how exquisitely, too,
The external world is fitted to the mind;
And the creation, by no lower name
Can it be called, which they with blended might
Accomplish.

In Wordsworth this took the form of an unbroken dreaming over the
aspects and transitions of nature--a reflective, though altogether
unformulated, analysis of them.

[86] There are in Coleridge's poems expressions of this conviction as
deep as Wordsworth's.  But Coleridge could never have abandoned
himself to the dream, the vision, as Wordsworth did, because the
first condition of such abandonment must be an unvexed quietness of
heart.  No one can read the Lines composed above Tintern without
feeling how potent the physical element was among the conditions of
Wordsworth's genius--"felt in the blood and felt along the heart."

My whole life I have lived in quiet thought!

The stimulus which most artists require of nature he can renounce.
He leaves the ready-made glory of the Swiss mountains that he may
reflect glory on a mouldering leaf.  He loves best to watch the
floating thistledown, because of its hint at an unseen life in the
air.  Coleridge's temperament, aei en sphodra orexei,+ with its
faintness, its grieved dejection, could never have been like that.

My genial spirits fail;
And what can these avail
To lift the smothering weight from off my breast?
It were a vain endeavour,
Though I should gaze for ever
On that green light that lingers in the west
I may not hope from outward forms to win
The passion and the life whose fountains are within.

Wordsworth's flawless temperament, his fine mountain atmosphere of
mind, that calm, sabbatic, mystic, wellbeing which De Quincey, [87] a
little cynically, connected with worldly (that is to say, pecuniary)
good fortune, kept his conviction of a latent intelligence in nature
within the limits of sentiment or instinct, and confined it to those
delicate and subdued shades of expression which alone perfect art
allows.  In Coleridge's sadder, more purely intellectual, cast of
genius, what with Wordsworth was sentiment or instinct became a
philosophical idea, or philosophical formula, developed, as much as
possible, after the abstract and metaphysical fashion of the
transcendental schools of Germany.

The period of Coleridge's residence at Nether Stowey, 1797-1798, was
for him the annus mirabilis.  Nearly all the chief works by which his
poetic fame will live were then composed or planned.  What shapes
itself for criticism as the main phenomenon of Coleridge's poetic
life, is not, as with most true poets, the gradual development of a
poetic gift, determined, enriched, retarded, by the actual
circumstances of the poet's life, but the sudden blossoming, through
one short season, of such a gift already perfect in its kind, which
thereafter deteriorates as suddenly, with something like premature
old age.  Connecting this phenomenon with the leading motive of his
prose writings, we might note it as the deterioration of a productive
or creative power into one merely metaphysical or discursive.  In his
unambitious conception of his function as a poet, and in the very
limited quantity of his [88] poetical performance, as I have said, he
was a contrast to his friend Wordsworth.  That friendship with
Wordsworth, the chief "developing" circumstance of his poetic life,
comprehended a very close intellectual sympathy; and in such
association chiefly, lies whatever truth there may be in the popular
classification of Coleridge as a member of what is called the "Lake
School."  Coleridge's philosophical speculations do really turn on
the ideas which underlay Wordsworth's poetical practice.  His prose
works are one long explanation of all that is involved in that famous
distinction between the Fancy and the Imagination.  Of what is
understood by both writers as the imaginative quality in the use
of poetic figures, we may take some words of Shakespeare as an
example.--

My cousin Suffolk,
My soul shall thine keep company to heaven
Tarry, sweet soul, for mine, then fly abreast.

The complete infusion here of the figure into the thought, so vividly
realised, that, though birds are not actually mentioned, yet the
sense of their flight, conveyed to us by the single word "abreast,"
comes to be more than half of the thought itself:--this, as the
expression of exalted feeling, is an instance of what Coleridge meant
by Imagination.  And this sort of identification of the poet's
thought, of himself, with the image or figure which serves him, is
the secret, sometimes, [89] of a singularly entire realisation of
that image, such as makes these lines of Coleridge, for instance,
"imaginative"--

Amid the howl of more than wintry storms,
The halcyon hears the voice of vernal hours
Already on the wing.

There are many such figures both in Coleridge's verse and prose.  He
has, too, his passages of that sort of impassioned contemplation on
the permanent and elementary conditions of nature and humanity, which
Wordsworth held to be the essence of a poet; as it would be his
proper function to awaken such contemplation in other men--those
"moments," as Coleridge says, addressing him--

Moments awful,
Now in thy inner life, and now abroad,
When power streamed from thee, and thy soul received
The light reflected, as a light bestowed.

The entire poem from which these lines are taken, "composed on the
night after Wordsworth's recitation of a poem on the growth of an
individual mind," is, in its high-pitched strain of meditation, and
in the combined justice and elevation of its philosophical
expression--

high and passionate thoughts
To their own music chanted;

wholly sympathetic with The Prelude which it celebrates, and of
which the subject is, in effect, the generation of the spirit of
the "Lake poetry." [90] The Lines to Joseph Cottle have the same
philosophically imaginative character; the Ode to Dejection being
Coleridge's most sustained effort of this kind.

It is in a highly sensitive apprehension of the aspects of external
nature that Coleridge identifies himself most closely with one of the
main tendencies of the "Lake School"; a tendency instinctive, and no
mere matter of theory, in him as in Wordsworth.  That record of the

green light
Which lingers in the west,

and again, of

the western sky,
And its peculiar tint of yellow green,

which Byron found ludicrously untrue, but which surely needs no
defence, is a characteristic example of a singular watchfulness for
the minute fact and expression of natural scenery pervading all he
wrote--a closeness to the exact physiognomy of nature, having
something to do with that idealistic philosophy which sees in the
external world no mere concurrence of mechanical agencies, but an
animated body, informed and made expressive, like the body of man, by
an indwelling intelligence.  It was a tendency, doubtless, in the
air, for Shelley too is affected by it, and Turner, with the school
of landscape which followed him.  "I had found," Coleridge tells us,

[91]

That outward forms, the loftiest, still receive
Their finer influence from the world within;
Fair ciphers of vague import, where the eye
Traces no spot, in which the heart may read
History and prophecy:...

and this induces in him no indifference to actual colour and form and
process, but such minute realism as this--

The thin grey cloud is spread on high,
It covers but not hides the sky.
The moon is behind and at the full;
And yet she looks both small and dull;

or this, which has a touch of "romantic" weirdness--

Nought was green upon the oak
But moss and rarest misletoe

or this--

There is not wind enough to twirl
The one red leaf, the last of its clan,
That dances as often as dance it can,
Hanging so light, and hanging so high,
On the topmost twig that looks up at the sky

or this, with a weirdness, again, like that of some wild French
etcher--

Lo! the new-moon winter-bright!
And overspread with phantom light
(With swimming phantom light o'erspread,
But rimmed and circled with a silver thread)
I see the old moon in her lap, foretelling
The coming on of rain and squally blast.

He has a like imaginative apprehension of the silent and unseen
processes of nature, its "ministries" [92] of dew and frost, for
instance; as when he writes, in April--

A balmy night! and though the stars be dim,
Yet let us think upon the vernal showers
That gladden the green earth, and we shall find
A pleasure in the dimness of the stars.

Of such imaginative treatment of landscape there is no better
instance than the description of The Dell, in Fears in Solitude--

A green and silent spot amid the hills,
A small and silent dell!  O'er stiller place
No singing skylark ever poised himself--
But the dell,
Bathed by the mist is fresh and delicate
As vernal cornfield, or the unripe flax
When, through its half-transparent stalks, at eve,
The level sunshine glimmers with green light:--

The gust that roared and died away
To the distant tree--

heard and only heard
In this low dell, bowed not the delicate grass.

This curious insistence of the mind on one particular spot, till it
seems to attain actual expression and a sort of soul in it--a mood so
characteristic of the "Lake School"--occurs in an earnest political
poem, "written in April 1798, during the alarm of an invasion"; and
that silent dell is the background against which the tumultuous fears
of the poet are in strong relief, while the quiet sense of the place,
maintained all through them, gives a true poetic unity to the piece.
Good political poetry--[93] political poetry that shall be
permanently moving--can, perhaps, only be written on motives which,
for those they concern, have ceased to be open questions, and are
really beyond argument; while Coleridge's political poems are for the
most part on open questions.  For although it was a great part of his
intellectual ambition to subject political questions to the action of
the fundamental ideas of his philosophy, he was nevertheless an
ardent partisan, first on one side, then on the other, of the actual
politics proper to the end of the last and the beginning of the
present century, where there is still room for much difference of
opinion.  Yet The Destiny of Nations, though formless as a whole, and
unfinished, presents many traces of his most elevated manner of
speculation, cast into that sort of imaginative philosophical
expression, in which, in effect, the language itself is inseparable
from, or essentially a part of, the thought.  France, an Ode, begins
with a famous apostrophe to Liberty--

Ye Clouds! that far above me float and pause,
Whose pathless march no mortal may control!
Ye Ocean-waves! that wheresoe'er ye roll,
Yield homage only to eternal laws!
Ye Woods! that listen to the night-bird's singing,
Midway the smooth and perilous slope reclined,
Save when your own imperious branches swinging,
Have made a solemn music of the wind!
Where like a man beloved of God,
Through glooms which never woodman trod,
How oft, pursuing fancies holy,

[94]

My moonlight way o'er flowering weeds I wound,
Inspired, beyond the guess of folly,
By each rude shape and wild unconquerable sound!
O ye loud Waves! and O ye Forests high!
And O ye Clouds that far above me soar'd!

Thou rising Sun! thou blue rejoicing Sky!
Yea, everything that is and will be free!
Bear witness for me, wheresoe'er ye be,
With what deep worship I have still adored
The spirit of divinest liberty.

And the whole ode, though, after Coleridge's way, not quite equal to
that exordium, is an example of strong national sentiment, partly in
indignant reaction against his own earlier sympathy with the French
Republic, inspiring a composition which, in spite of some turgid
lines, really justifies itself as poetry, and has that true unity of
effect which the ode requires.  Liberty, after all his hopes of young
France, is only to be found in nature:--

Thou speedest on thy subtle pinions,
The guide of homeless winds, and playmate of the waves!

In his changes of political sentiment, Coleridge was associated with
the "Lake School"; and there is yet one other very different sort of
sentiment in which he is one with that school, yet all himself, his
sympathy, namely, with the animal world.  That was a sentiment
connected at once with the love of outward nature in himself and in
the "Lake School," and its assertion of the natural affections in
their simplicity; with the homeliness and pity, consequent upon [95]
that assertion.  The Lines to a Young Ass, tethered--

Where the close-eaten grass is scarcely seen,
While sweet around her waves the tempting green,

which had seemed merely whimsical in their day, indicate a vein of
interest constant in Coleridge's poems, and at its height in his
greatest poems--in Christabel, where it has its effect, as it were
antipathetically, in the vivid realisation of the serpentine element
in Geraldine's nature; and in The Ancient Mariner, whose fate is
interwoven with that of the wonderful bird, at whose blessing of the
water-snakes the curse for the death of the albatross passes away,
and where the moral of the love of all creatures, as a sort of
religious duty, is definitely expressed.

Christabel, though not printed till 1816, was written mainly in the
year 1797: The Rhyme of the Ancient Mariner was printed as a
contribution to the Lyrical Ballads in 1798; and these two poems
belong to the great year of Coleridge's poetic production, his
twenty-fifth year.  In poetic quality, above all in that most poetic
of all qualities, a keen sense of, and delight in beauty, the
infection of which lays hold upon the reader, they are quite out of
proportion to all his other compositions.  The form in both is that
of the ballad, with some of its terminology, and some also of its
quaint conceits.  They connect themselves with that revival of ballad
literature, of which Percy's Relics, and, in another [96] way,
Macpherson's Ossian are monuments, and which afterwards so powerfully
affected Scott--

Young-eyed poesy
All deftly masked as hoar antiquity.

The Ancient Mariner, as also, in its measure, Christabel, is a
"romantic" poem, impressing us by bold invention, and appealing to
that taste for the supernatural, that longing for le frisson, a
shudder, to which the "romantic" school in Germany, and its
derivations in England and France, directly ministered.  In
Coleridge, personally, this taste had been encouraged by his odd and
out-of-the-way reading in the old-fashioned literature of the
marvellous--books like Purchas's Pilgrims, early voyages like
Hakluyt's, old naturalists and visionary moralists, like Thomas
Burnet, from whom he quotes the motto of "The Ancient Mariner, Facile
credo, plures esse naturas invisibiles quam visibiles in rerum
universitate, etc."  Fancies of the strange things which may very
well happen, even in broad daylight, to men shut up alone in ships
far off on the sea, seem to have occurred to the human mind in all
ages with a peculiar readiness, and often have about them, from the
story of the stealing of Dionysus downwards, the fascination of a
certain dreamy grace, which distinguishes them from other kinds of
marvellous inventions.  This sort of fascination The Ancient Mariner
brings to its highest degree: it is the delicacy, the dreamy [97]
grace, in his presentation of the marvellous, which makes Coleridge's
work so remarkable.  The too palpable intruders from a spiritual
world in almost all ghost literature, in Scott and Shakespeare even,
have a kind of crudity or coarseness.  Coleridge's power is in the
very fineness with which, as by some really ghostly finger, he brings
home to our inmost sense his inventions, daring as they are--the
skeleton ship, the polar spirit, the inspiriting of the dead corpses
of the ship's crew.  The Rhyme of the Ancient Mariner has the
plausibility, the perfect adaptation to reason and the general aspect
of life, which belongs to the marvellous, when actually presented as
part of a credible experience in our dreams.  Doubtless, the mere
experience of the opium-eater, the habit he must almost necessarily
fall into of noting the more elusive phenomena of dreams, had
something to do with that: in its essence, however, it is connected
with a more purely intellectual circumstance in the development of
Coleridge's poetic gift.  Some one once asked William Blake, to whom
Coleridge has many resemblances, when either is at his best (that
whole episode of the re-inspiriting of the ship's crew in The Ancient
Mariner being comparable to Blake's well-known design of the "Morning
Stars singing together") whether he had ever seen a ghost, and was
surprised when the famous seer, who ought, one might think, to have
seen so many, answered frankly, "Only [98] once!"  His "spirits," at
once more delicate, and so much more real, than any ghost--the
burden, as they were the privilege, of his temperament--like it, were
an integral element in his everyday life.  And the difference of mood
expressed in that question and its answer, is indicative of a change
of temper in regard to the supernatural which has passed over the
whole modern mind, and of which the true measure is the influence of
the writings of Swedenborg.  What that change is we may see if we
compare the vision by which Swedenborg was "called," as he thought,
to his work, with the ghost which called Hamlet, or the spells of
Marlowe's Faust with those of Goethe's.  The modern mind, so minutely
self-scrutinising, if it is to be affected at all by a sense of the
supernatural, needs to be more finely touched than was possible in
the older, romantic presentment of it.  The spectral object, so
crude, so impossible, has become plausible, as

The blot upon the brain,
That will show itself without;

and is understood to be but a condition of one's own mind, for which,
according to the scepticism, latent at least, in so much of our
modern philosophy, the so-called real things themselves are but
spectra after all.

It is this finer, more delicately marvellous supernaturalism, fruit
of his more delicate [99] psychology, that Coleridge infuses into
romantic adventure, itself also then a new or revived thing in
English literature; and with a fineness of weird effect in The
Ancient Mariner, unknown in those older, more simple, romantic
legends and ballads.  It is a flower of medieval or later German
romance, growing up in the peculiarly compounded atmosphere of modern
psychological speculation, and putting forth in it wholly new
qualities.  The quaint prose commentary, which runs side by side with
the verse of The Ancient Mariner, illustrates this--a composition of
quite a different shade of beauty and merit from that of the verse
which it accompanies, connecting this, the chief poem of Coleridge,
with his philosophy, and emphasising therein that psychological
interest of which I have spoken, its curious soul-lore.

Completeness, the perfectly rounded wholeness and unity of the
impression it leaves on the mind of a reader who fairly gives himself
to it--that, too, is one of the characteristics of a really excellent
work, in the poetic as in every other kind of art; and by this
completeness, The Ancient Mariner certainly gains upon Christabel--a
completeness, entire as that of Wordsworth's Leech-gatherer, or
Keats's Saint Agnes' Eve, each typical in its way of such wholeness
or entirety of effect on a careful reader.  It is Coleridge's one
great complete work, the one really finished thing, in a life of many
beginnings.  Christabel remained a fragment.  In The Ancient Mariner
[100] this unity is secured in part by the skill with which the
incidents of the marriage-feast are made to break in dreamily from
time to time upon the main story.  And then, how pleasantly, how
reassuringly, the whole nightmare story itself is made to end, among
the clear fresh sounds and lights of the bay, where it began, with

The moon-light steeped in silentness,
The steady weather-cock.

So different from The Rhyme of the Ancient Mariner in regard to this
completeness of effect, Christabel illustrates the same complexion of
motives, a like intellectual situation.  Here, too, the work is of a
kind peculiar to one who touches the characteristic motives of the
old romantic ballad, with a spirit made subtle and fine by modern
reflection; as we feel, I think, in such passages as--

But though my slumber had gone by,
This dream it would not pass away--
It seems to live upon mine eye;

and--

For she, belike, hath drunken deep
Of all the blessedness of sleep;

and again--

With such perplexity of mind
As dreams too lively leave behind.

And that gift of handling the finer passages of human feeling, at
once with power and delicacy, which was another result of his finer
psychology, [101] of his exquisitely refined habit of self-
reflection, is illustrated by a passage on Friendship in the Second
Part--

Alas! they had been friends in youth;
But whispering tongues can poison truth;
And constancy lives in realms above;
And life is thorny; and youth is vain;
And to be wroth with one we love,
Doth work like madness in the brain.
And thus it chanced, as I divine,
With Roland and Sir Leoline.
Each spake words of high disdain
And insult to his heart's best brother
They parted--ne'er to meet again!
But never either found another
To free the hollow heart from paining--
They stood aloof the scars remaining,
Like cliffs which had been rent asunder;
A dreary sea now flows between;
But neither heat, nor frost, nor thunder,
Shall wholly do away, I ween,
The marks of that which once hath been.

I suppose these lines leave almost every reader with a quickened
sense of the beauty and compass of human feeling; and it is the sense
of such richness and beauty which, in spite of his "dejection," in
spite of that burden of his morbid lassitude, accompanies Coleridge
himself through life.  A warm poetic joy in everything beautiful,
whether it be a moral sentiment, like the friendship of Roland and
Leoline, or only the flakes of falling light from the water-snakes--
this joy, visiting him, now and again, after sickly dreams, in sleep
or waking, as a relief not to be forgotten, [102] and with such a
power of felicitous expression that the infection of it passes
irresistibly to the reader--such is the predominant element in the
matter of his poetry, as cadence is the predominant quality of its
form.  "We bless thee for our creation!" he might have said, in his
later period of definite religious assent, "because the world is so
beautiful: the world of ideas--living spirits, detached from the
divine nature itself, to inform and lift the heavy mass of material
things; the world of man, above all in his melodious and intelligible
speech; the world of living creatures and natural scenery; the world
of dreams."  What he really did say, by way of A Tombless Epitaph, is
true enough of himself--

Sickness, 'tis true,
Whole years of weary days, besieged him close,
Even to the gates and inlets of his life!
But it is true, no less, that strenuous, firm,
And with a natural gladness, he maintained
The citadel unconquered, and in joy
Was strong to follow the delightful Muse.
For not a hidden path, that to the shades
Of the beloved Parnassian forest leads,
Lurked undiscovered by him; not a rill
There issues from the fount of Hippocrene,
But he had traced it upward to its source,
Through open glade, dark glen, and secret dell,
Knew the gay wild flowers on its banks, and culled
Its med'cinable herbs.  Yea, oft alone,
Piercing the long-neglected holy cave,
The haunt obscure of old Philosophy,
He bade with lifted torch its starry walls
Sparkle, as erst they sparkled to the flame

[103]

Of odorous lamps tended by saint and sage.
O framed for calmer times and nobler hearts!
O studious Poet, eloquent for truth!
Philosopher! contemning wealth and death,
Yet docile, childlike, full of Life and Love.

The student of empirical science asks, Are absolute principles
attainable?  What are the limits of knowledge?  The answer he
receives from science itself is not ambiguous.  What the moralist
asks is, Shall we gain or lose by surrendering human life to the
relative spirit?  Experience answers that the dominant tendency of
life is to turn ascertained truth into a dead letter, to make us all
the phlegmatic servants of routine.  The relative spirit, by its
constant dwelling on the more fugitive conditions or circumstances of
things, breaking through a thousand rough and brutal classifications,
and giving elasticity to inflexible principles, begets an
intellectual finesse of which the ethical result is a delicate and
tender justice in the criticism of human life.  Who would gain more
than Coleridge by criticism in such a spirit?  We know how his life
has appeared when judged by absolute standards.  We see him trying to
apprehend the "absolute," to stereotype forms of faith and
philosophy, to attain, as he says, "fixed principles" in politics,
morals, and religion, to fix one mode of life as the essence of life,
refusing to see the parts as parts only; and all the time his own
pathetic history pleads for a more [104] elastic moral philosophy
than his, and cries out against every formula less living and
flexible than life itself.

"From his childhood he hungered for eternity."  There, after all, is
the incontestable claim of Coleridge.  The perfect flower of any
elementary type of life must always be precious to humanity, and
Coleridge is a true flower of the ennuye, of the type of Rene.  More
than Childe Harold, more than Werther, more than Rene himself,
Coleridge, by what he did, what he was, and what he failed to do,
represents that inexhaustible discontent, languor, and homesickness,
that endless regret, the chords of which ring all through our modern
literature.  It is to the romantic element in literature that those
qualities belong.  One day, perhaps, we may come to forget the
distant horizon, with full knowledge of the situation, to be content
with "what is here and now"; and herein is the essence of classical
feeling.  But by us of the present moment, certainly--by us for whom
the Greek spirit, with its engaging naturalness, simple, chastened,
debonair, tryphes, habrotetos, khlides, khariton, himerou, pothou
pater+, is itself the Sangrail of an endless pilgrimage, Coleridge,
with his passion for the absolute, for something fixed where all is
moving, his faintness, his broken memory, his intellectual disquiet,
may still be ranked among the interpreters of one of the constituent
elements of our life.

1865, 1880.

NOTES

65. *The latter part of this paper, like that on Dante Gabriel
Rossetti, was contributed to Mr. T. H. Ward's English Poets.

68. +Transliteration: ousia akhromatos, askhematistos, anaphes.
Translation:  "the colorless, utterly formless, intangible essence."
Phaedrus 247C.

80. +The two passages are not indented in the original; they are in
smaller typeface that makes for difficult reading.

86. +Transliteration: aei en sphodra orexei.  Translation: "always
greatly yearning."

104. +Transliteration: tryphes, habrotetos, khlides, khariton,
himerou, pothou pater.  Translation: "Of daintiness, delicacy,
luxury, graces, father of desire."



CHARLES LAMB

[105] THOSE English critics who at the beginning of the present
century introduced from Germany, together with some other subtleties
of thought transplanted hither not without advantage, the distinction
between the Fancy and the Imagination, made much also of the cognate
distinction between Wit and Humour, between that unreal and
transitory mirth, which is as the crackling of thorns under the pot,
and the laughter which blends with tears and even with the
sublimities of the imagination, and which, in its most exquisite
motives, is one with pity--the laughter of the comedies of
Shakespeare, hardly less expressive than his moods of seriousness or
solemnity, of that deeply stirred soul of sympathy in him, as flowing
from which both tears and laughter are alike genuine and contagious.

This distinction between wit and humour, Coleridge and other kindred
critics applied, with much effect, in their studies of some of our
older English writers.  And as the distinction between imagination
and fancy, made popular by Wordsworth, [106] found its best
justification in certain essential differences of stuff in
Wordsworth's own writings, so this other critical distinction,
between wit and humour, finds a sort of visible interpretation and
instance in the character and writings of Charles Lamb;--one who
lived more consistently than most writers among subtle literary
theories, and whose remains are still full of curious interest for
the student of literature as a fine art.

The author of the English Humourists of the Eighteenth Century,
coming to the humourists of the nineteenth, would have found, as is
true preeminently of Thackeray himself, the springs of pity in them
deepened by the deeper subjectivity, the intenser and closer living
with itself, which is characteristic of the temper of the later
generation; and therewith, the mirth also, from the amalgam of which
with pity humour proceeds, has become, in Charles Dickens, for
example, freer and more boisterous.

To this more high-pitched feeling, since predominant in our
literature, the writings of Charles Lamb, whose life occupies the
last quarter of the eighteenth century and the first quarter of the
nineteenth, are a transition; and such union of grave, of terrible
even, with gay, we may note in the circumstances of his life, as
reflected thence into his work.  We catch the aroma of a singular,
homely sweetness about his first years, spent on Thames' side, amid
the red [107] bricks and terraced gardens, with their rich historical
memories of old-fashioned legal London.  Just above the poorer class,
deprived, as he says, of the "sweet food of academic institution," he
is fortunate enough to be reared in the classical languages at an
ancient school, where he becomes the companion of Coleridge, as at a
later period he was his enthusiastic disciple.  So far, the years go
by with less than the usual share of boyish difficulties; protected,
one fancies, seeing what he was afterwards, by some attraction of
temper in the quaint child, small and delicate, with a certain Jewish
expression in his clear, brown complexion, eyes not precisely of the
same colour, and a slow walk adding to the staidness of his figure;
and whose infirmity of speech, increased by agitation, is partly
engaging.

And the cheerfulness of all this, of the mere aspect of Lamb's quiet
subsequent life also, might make the more superficial reader think of
him as in himself something slight, and of his mirth as cheaply
bought.  Yet we know that beneath this blithe surface there was
something of the fateful domestic horror, of the beautiful heroism
and devotedness too, of old Greek tragedy.  His sister Mary, ten
years his senior, in a sudden paroxysm of madness, caused the death
of her mother, and was brought to trial for what an overstrained
justice might have construed as the greatest of crimes.  She was
[108] released on the brother's pledging himself to watch over her;
and to this sister, from the age of twenty-one, Charles Lamb
sacrificed himself, "seeking thenceforth," says his earliest
biographer, "no connexion which could interfere with her supremacy in
his affections, or impair his ability to sustain and comfort her."
The "feverish, romantic tie of love," he cast away in exchange for
the "charities of home."  Only, from time to time, the madness
returned, affecting him too, once; and we see the brother and sister
voluntarily yielding to restraint.  In estimating the humour of Elia,
we must no more forget the strong undercurrent of this great
misfortune and pity, than one could forget it in his actual story.
So he becomes the best critic, almost the discoverer, of Webster, a
dramatist of genius so sombre, so heavily coloured, so macabre.
Rosamund Grey, written in his twenty-third year, a story with
something bitter and exaggerated, an almost insane fixedness of gloom
perceptible in it, strikes clearly this note in his work.

For himself, and from his own point of view, the exercise of his
gift, of his literary art, came to gild or sweeten a life of
monotonous labour, and seemed, as far as regarded others, no very
important thing; availing to give them a little pleasure, and inform
them a little, chiefly in a retrospective manner, but in no way
concerned with the turning of the tides of the great world.  And yet
this very modesty, this unambitious [109] way of conceiving his work,
has impressed upon it a certain exceptional enduringness.  For of the
remarkable English writers contemporary with Lamb, many were greatly
preoccupied with ideas of practice--religious, moral, political--
ideas which have since, in some sense or other, entered permanently
into the general consciousness; and, these having no longer any
stimulus for a generation provided with a different stock of ideas,
the writings of those who spent so much of themselves in their
propagation have lost, with posterity, something of what they gained
by them in immediate influence.  Coleridge, Wordsworth, Shelley even-
-sharing so largely in the unrest of their own age, and made
personally more interesting thereby, yet, of their actual work,
surrender more to the mere course of time than some of those who may
have seemed to exercise themselves hardly at all in great matters, to
have been little serious, or a little indifferent, regarding them.

Of this number of the disinterested servants of literature, smaller
in England than in France, Charles Lamb is one.  In the making of
prose he realises the principle of art for its own sake, as
completely as Keats in the making of verse.  And, working ever close
to the concrete, to the details, great or small, of actual things,
books, persons, and with no part of them blurred to his vision by the
intervention of mere abstract theories, he has reached an enduring
moral effect [l10] also, in a sort of boundless sympathy.
Unoccupied, as he might seem, with great matters, he is in immediate
contact with what is real, especially in its caressing littleness,
that littleness in which there is much of the whole woeful heart of
things, and meets it more than half-way with a perfect understanding
of it.  What sudden, unexpected touches of pathos in him!--bearing
witness how the sorrow of humanity, the Weltschmerz, the constant
aching of its wounds, is ever present with him: but what a gift also
for the enjoyment of life in its subtleties, of enjoyment actually
refined by the need of some thoughtful economies and making the most
of things!  Little arts of happiness he is ready to teach to others.
The quaint remarks of children which another would scarcely have
heard, he preserves--little flies in the priceless amber of his Attic
wit--and has his "Praise of chimney-sweepers" (as William Blake has
written, with so much natural pathos, the Chimney-sweeper's Song)
valuing carefully their white teeth, and fine enjoyment of white
sheets in stolen sleep at Arundel Castle, as he tells the story,
anticipating something of the mood of our deep humourists of the last
generation.  His simple mother-pity for those who suffer by accident,
or unkindness of nature, blindness for instance, or fateful disease
of mind like his sister's, has something primitive in its largeness;
and on behalf of ill-used animals he is early in composing a Pity's
Gift.

[111] And if, in deeper or more superficial sense, the dead do care
at all for their name and fame, then how must the souls of
Shakespeare and Webster have been stirred, after so long converse
with things that stopped their ears, whether above or below the soil,
at his exquisite appreciations of them; the souls of Titian and of
Hogarth too; for, what has not been observed so generally as the
excellence of his literary criticism, Charles Lamb is a fine critic
of painting also.  It was as loyal, self-forgetful work for others,
for Shakespeare's self first, for instance, and then for
Shakespeare's readers, that that too was done: he has the true
scholar's way of forgetting himself in his subject.  For though
"defrauded," as we saw, in his young years, "of the sweet food of
academic institution," he is yet essentially a scholar, and all his
work mainly retrospective, as I said; his own sorrows, affections,
perceptions, being alone real to him of the present.  "I cannot make
these present times," he says once, "present to me."

Above all, he becomes not merely an expositor, permanently valuable,
but for Englishmen almost the discoverer of the old English drama.
"The book is such as I am glad there should be," he modestly says of
the Specimens of English Dramatic Poets who lived about the time of
Shakespeare; to which, however, he adds in a series of notes the very
quintessence of criticism, the choicest savour and perfume of
Elizabethan poetry being [112] sorted, and stored here, with a sort
of delicate intellectual epicureanism, which has had the effect of
winning for these, then almost forgotten, poets, one generation after
another of enthusiastic students.  Could he but have known how fresh
a source of culture he was evoking there for other generations,
through all those years in which, a little wistfully, he would harp
on the limitation of his time by business, and sigh for a better
fortune in regard to literary opportunities!

To feel strongly the charm of an old poet or moralist, the literary
charm of Burton, for instance, or Quarles, or The Duchess of
Newcastle; and then to interpret that charm, to convey it to others--
he seeming to himself but to hand on to others, in mere humble
ministration, that of which for them he is really the creator--this
is the way of his criticism; cast off in a stray letter often, or
passing note, or lightest essay or conversation.  It is in such a
letter, for instance, that we come upon a singularly penetrative
estimate of the genius and writings of Defoe.

Tracking, with an attention always alert, the whole process of their
production to its starting-point in the deep places of the mind, he
seems to realise the but half-conscious intuitions of Hogarth or
Shakespeare, and develops the great ruling unities which have swayed
their actual work; or "puts up," and takes, the one morsel of good
stuff in an old, forgotten writer.  Even [113] in what he says
casually there comes an aroma of old English; noticeable echoes, in
chance turn and phrase, of the great masters of style, the old
masters.  Godwin, seeing in quotation a passage from John Woodvil,
takes it for a choice fragment of an old dramatist, and goes to Lamb
to assist him in finding the author.  His power of delicate imitation
in prose and verse reaches the length of a fine mimicry even, as in
those last essays of Elia on Popular Fallacies, with their gentle
reproduction or caricature of Sir Thomas Browne, showing, the more
completely, his mastery, by disinterested study, of those elements of
the man which were the real source of style in that great, solemn
master of old English, who, ready to say what he has to say with
fearless homeliness, yet continually overawes one with touches of a
strange utterance from worlds afar.  For it is with the delicacies of
fine literature especially, its gradations of expression, its fine
judgment, its pure sense of words, of vocabulary--things, alas! dying
out in the English literature of the present, together with the
appreciation of them in our literature of the past--that his literary
mission is chiefly concerned.  And yet, delicate, refining, daintily
epicurean, as he may seem, when he writes of giants, such as Hogarth
or Shakespeare, though often but in a stray note, you catch the sense
of veneration with which those great names in past literature and art
brooded over his intelligence, his undiminished [114] impressibility
by the great effects in them.  Reading, commenting on Shakespeare, he
is like a man who walks alone under a grand stormy sky, and among
unwonted tricks of light, when powerful spirits might seem to be
abroad upon the air; and the grim humour of Hogarth, as he analyses
it, rises into a kind of spectral grotesque; while he too knows the
secret of fine, significant touches like theirs.

There are traits, customs, characteristics of houses and dress,
surviving morsels of old life, such as Hogarth has transferred so
vividly into The Rake's Progress, or Marriage a la Mode, concerning
which we well understand how, common, uninteresting, or even
worthless in themselves, they have come to please us at last as
things picturesque, being set in relief against the modes of our
different age.  Customs, stiff to us, stiff dresses, stiff furniture-
-types of cast-off fashions, left by accident, and which no one ever
meant to preserve--we contemplate with more than good-nature, as
having in them the veritable accent of a time, not altogether to be
replaced by its more solemn and self-conscious deposits; like those
tricks of individuality which we find quite tolerable in persons,
because they convey to us the secret of lifelike expression, and with
regard to which we are all to some extent humourists.  But it is part
of the privilege of the genuine humourist to anticipate this pensive
mood with regard to the ways and things [115] of his own day; to look
upon the tricks in manner of the life about him with that same
refined, purged sort of vision, which will come naturally to those of
a later generation, in observing whatever may have survived by chance
of its mere external habit.  Seeing things always by the light of an
understanding more entire than is possible for ordinary minds, of the
whole mechanism of humanity, and seeing also the manner, the outward
mode or fashion, always in strict connexion with the spiritual
condition which determined it, a humourist such as Charles Lamb
anticipates the enchantment of distance; and the characteristics of
places, ranks, habits of life, are transfigured for him, even now and
in advance of time, by poetic light; justifying what some might
condemn as mere sentimentality, in the effort to hand on unbroken the
tradition of such fashion or accent.  "The praise of beggars," "the
cries of London," the traits of actors just grown "old," the spots in
"town" where the country, its fresh green and fresh water, still
lingered on, one after another, amidst the bustle; the quaint,
dimmed, just played-out farces, he had relished so much, coming
partly through them to understand the earlier English theatre as a
thing once really alive; those fountains and sun-dials of old
gardens, of which he entertains such dainty discourse:--he feels the
poetry of these things, as the poetry of things old indeed, but
surviving [116] as an actual part of the life of the present; and as
something quite different from the poetry of things flatly gone from
us and antique, which come back to us, if at all, as entire
strangers, like Scott's old Scotch-border personages, their oaths and
armour.  Such gift of appreciation depends, as I said, on the
habitual apprehension of men's life as a whole--its organic
wholeness, as extending even to the least things in it--of its
outward manner in connexion with its inward temper; and it involves a
fine perception of the congruities, the musical accordance between
humanity and its environment of custom, society, personal
intercourse; as if all this, with its meetings, partings, ceremonies,
gesture, tones of speech, were some delicate instrument on which an
expert performer is playing.

These are some of the characteristics of Elia, one essentially an
essayist, and of the true family of Montaigne, "never judging," as he
says, "system-wise of things, but fastening on particulars;" saying
all things as it were on chance occasion only, and by way of pastime,
yet succeeding thus, "glimpse-wise," in catching and recording more
frequently than others "the gayest, happiest attitude of things;" a
casual writer for dreamy readers, yet always giving the reader so
much more than he seemed to propose.  There is something of the
follower of George Fox about him, and the Quaker's belief in the
inward light coming to one passive, [117] to the mere wayfarer, who
will be sure at all events to lose no light which falls by the way--
glimpses, suggestions, delightful half-apprehensions, profound
thoughts of old philosophers, hints of the innermost reason in
things, the full knowledge of which is held in reserve; all the
varied stuff, that is, of which genuine essays are made.

And with him, as with Montaigne, the desire of self-portraiture is,
below all more superficial tendencies, the real motive in writing at
all--a desire closely connected with that intimacy, that modern
subjectivity, which may be called the Montaignesque element in
literature.  What he designs is to give you himself, to acquaint you
with his likeness; but must do this, if at all, indirectly, being
indeed always more or less reserved, for himself and his friends;
friendship counting for so much in his life, that he is jealous of
anything that might jar or disturb it, even to the length of a sort
of insincerity, to which he assigns its quaint "praise"; this lover
of stage plays significantly welcoming a little touch of the
artificiality of play to sweeten the intercourse of actual life.

And, in effect, a very delicate and expressive portrait of him does
put itself together for the duly meditative reader.  In indirect
touches of his own work, scraps of faded old letters, what others
remembered of his talk, the man's likeness emerges; what he laughed
and wept at, [118] his sudden elevations, and longings after absent
friends, his fine casuistries of affection and devices to jog
sometimes, as he says, the lazy happiness of perfect love, his solemn
moments of higher discourse with the young, as they came across him
on occasion, and went along a little way with him, the sudden,
surprised apprehension of beauties in old literature, revealing anew
the deep soul of poetry in things, and withal the pure spirit of fun,
having its way again; laughter, that most short-lived of all things
(some of Shakespeare's even being grown hollow) wearing well with
him.  Much of all this comes out through his letters, which may be
regarded as a department of his essays.  He is an old-fashioned
letter-writer, the essence of the old fashion of letter-writing
lying, as with true essay-writing, in the dexterous availing oneself
of accident and circumstance, in the prosecution of deeper lines of
observation; although, just as with the record of his conversation,
one loses something, in losing the actual tones of the stammerer,
still graceful in his halting, as he halted also in composition,
composing slowly and by fits, "like a Flemish painter," as he tells
us, so "it is to be regretted," says the editor of his letters, "that
in the printed letters the reader will lose the curious varieties of
writing with which the originals abound, and which are scrupulously
adapted to the subject."

Also, he was a true "collector," delighting [119] in the personal
finding of a thing, in the colour an old book or print gets for him
by the little accidents which attest previous ownership.  Wither's
Emblems, "that old book and quaint," long-desired, when he finds it
at last, he values none the less because a child had coloured the
plates with his paints.  A lover of household warmth everywhere, of
that tempered atmosphere which our various habitations get by men's
living within them, he "sticks to his favourite books as he did to
his friends," and loved the "town," with a jealous eye for all its
characteristics, "old houses" coming to have souls for him.  The
yearning for mere warmth against him in another, makes him content,
all through life, with pure brotherliness, "the most kindly and
natural species of love," as he says, in place of the passion of
love.  Brother and sister, sitting thus side by side, have, of
course, their anticipations how one of them must sit at last in the
faint sun alone, and set us speculating, as we read, as to precisely
what amount of melancholy really accompanied for him the approach of
old age, so steadily foreseen; make us note also, with pleasure, his
successive wakings up to cheerful realities, out of a too curious
musing over what is gone and what remains, of life.  In his subtle
capacity for enjoying the more refined points of earth, of human
relationship, he could throw the gleam of poetry or humour on what
seemed common or threadbare; has a care for the [120] sighs, and the
weary, humdrum preoccupations of very weak people, down to their
little pathetic "gentilities," even; while, in the purely human
temper, he can write of death, almost like Shakespeare.

And that care, through all his enthusiasm of discovery, for what is
accustomed, in literature, connected thus with his close clinging to
home and the earth, was congruous also with that love for the
accustomed in religion, which we may notice in him.  He is one of the
last votaries of that old-world sentiment, based on the feelings of
hope and awe, which may be described as the religion of men of
letters (as Sir Thomas Browne has his Religion of the Physician)
religion as understood by the soberer men of letters in the last
century, Addison, Gray, and Johnson; by Jane Austen and Thackeray,
later.  A high way of feeling developed largely by constant
intercourse with the great things of literature, and extended in its
turn to those matters greater still, this religion lives, in the main
retrospectively, in a system of received sentiments and beliefs;
received, like those great things of literature and art, in the first
instance, on the authority of a long tradition, in the course of
which they have linked themselves in a thousand complex ways to the
conditions of human life, and no more questioned now than the feeling
one keeps by one of the greatness--say! of Shakespeare.  For Charles
Lamb, such form of religion becomes [121] the solemn background on
which the nearer and more exciting objects of his immediate
experience relieve themselves, borrowing from it an expression of
calm; its necessary atmosphere being indeed a profound quiet, that
quiet which has in it a kind of sacramental efficacy, working, we
might say, on the principle of the opus operatum, almost without any
co-operation of one's own, towards the assertion of the higher self.
And, in truth, to men of Lamb's delicately attuned temperament mere
physical stillness has its full value; such natures seeming to long
for it sometimes, as for no merely negative thing, with a sort of
mystical sensuality.

The writings of Charles Lamb are an excellent illustration of the
value of reserve in literature.  Below his quiet, his quaintness, his
humour, and what may seem the slightness, the occasional or
accidental character of his work, there lies, as I said at starting,
as in his life, a genuinely tragic element.  The gloom, reflected at
its darkest in those hard shadows of Rosamund Grey, is always there,
though not always realised either for himself or his readers, and
restrained always in utterance.  It gives to those lighter matters on
the surface of life and literature among which he for the most part
moved, a wonderful force of expression, as if at any moment these
slight words and fancies might pierce very far into the deeper soul
of things.  In his writing, as in his [122] life, that quiet is not
the low-flying of one from the first drowsy by choice, and needing
the prick of some strong passion or worldly ambition, to stimulate
him into all the energy of which he is capable; but rather the
reaction of nature, after an escape from fate, dark and insane as in
old Greek tragedy, following upon which the sense of mere relief
becomes a kind of passion, as with one who, having narrowly escaped
earthquake or shipwreck, finds a thing for grateful tears in just
sitting quiet at home, under the wall, till the end of days.

He felt the genius of places; and I sometimes think he resembles the
places he knew and liked best, and where his lot fell--London, sixty-
five years ago, with Covent Garden and the old theatres, and the
Temple gardens still unspoiled, Thames gliding down, and beyond to
north and south the fields at Enfield or Hampton, to which, "with
their living trees," the thoughts wander "from the hard wood of the
desk"--fields fresher, and coming nearer to town then, but in one of
which the present writer remembers, on a brooding early summer's day,
to have heard the cuckoo for the first time.  Here, the surface of
things is certainly humdrum, the streets dingy, the green places,
where the child goes a-maying, tame enough.  But nowhere are things
more apt to respond to the brighter weather, nowhere is there so much
difference between rain and sunshine, nowhere do the [123] clouds
roll together more grandly; those quaint suburban pastorals gathering
a certain quality of grandeur from the background of the great city,
with its weighty atmosphere, and portent of storm in the rapid light
on dome and bleached stone steeples.

1878.



SIR THOMAS BROWNE

[124] ENGLISH prose literature towards the end of the seventeenth
century, in the hands of Dryden and Locke, was becoming, as that of
France had become at an earlier date, a matter of design and skilled
practice, highly conscious of itself as an art, and, above all,
correct.  Up to that time it had been, on the whole, singularly
informal and unprofessional, and by no means the literature of the
"man of letters," as we understand him.  Certain great instances
there had been of literary structure or architecture--The
Ecclesiastical Polity, The Leviathan--but for the most part that
earlier prose literature is eminently occasional, closely determined
by the eager practical aims of contemporary politics and theology, or
else due to a man's own native instinct to speak because he cannot
help speaking.  Hardly aware of the habit, he likes talking to
himself; and when he writes (still in undress) he does but take the
"friendly reader" into his confidence.  The type of this literature,
obviously, is not Locke or Gibbon, but, above all others, Sir Thomas
[125] Browne; as Jean Paul is a good instance of it in German
literature, always in its developments so much later than the
English; and as the best instance of it in French literature, in the
century preceding Browne, is Montaigne, from whom indeed, in a great
measure, all those tentative writers, or essayists, derive.

It was a result, perhaps, of the individualism and liberty of
personal development, which, even for a Roman Catholic, were effects
of the Reformation, that there was so much in Montaigne of the
"subjective," as people say, of the singularities of personal
character.  Browne, too, bookish as he really is claims to give his
readers a matter, "not picked from the leaves of any author, but bred
amongst the weeds and tares" of his own brain.  The faults of such
literature are what we all recognise in it: unevenness, alike in
thought and style; lack of design; and caprice--the lack of
authority; after the full play of which, there is so much to refresh
one in the reasonable transparency of Hooker, representing thus early
the tradition of a classical clearness in English literature,
anticipated by Latimer and More, and to be fulfilled afterwards in
Butler and Hume.  But then, in recompense for that looseness and
whim, in Sir Thomas Browne for instance, we have in those "quaint"
writers, as they themselves understood the term (coint, adorned, but
adorned with all the curious ornaments of their own predilection,
provincial [126] or archaic, certainly unfamiliar, and selected
without reference to the taste or usages of other people) the charm
of an absolute sincerity, with all the ingenuous and racy effect of
what is circumstantial and peculiar in their growth.

The whole creation is a mystery and particularly that of man.
At the blast of His mouth were the rest of the creatures made,
and at His bare word they started out of nothing.  But in the
frame of man He played the sensible operator, and seemed not
so much to create as to make him.  When He had separated the
materials of other creatures, there consequently resulted a
form and soul: but having raised the walls of man, He was
driven to a second and harder creation--of a substance like
Himself, an incorruptible and immortal soul.

There, we have the manner of Sir Thomas Browne, in exact expression
of his mind!--minute and curious in its thinking; but with an effect,
on the sudden, of a real sublimity or depth.  His style is certainly
an unequal one.  It has the monumental aim which charmed, and perhaps
influenced, Johnson--a dignity that can be attained only in such
mental calm as follows long and learned pondering on the high
subjects Browne loves to deal with.  It has its garrulity, its
various levels of painstaking, its mannerism, pleasant of its kind or
tolerable, together with much, to us intolerable, but of which he was
capable on a lazy summer afternoon down at Norwich.  And all is so
oddly mixed, showing, in its entire ignorance of self, how much he,
and the sort of literature he represents, really stood in need of
technique, [127] of a formed taste in literature, of a literary
architecture.

And yet perhaps we could hardly wish the result different, in him,
any more than in the books of Burton and Fuller, or some other
similar writers of that age--mental abodes, we might liken, after
their own manner, to the little old private houses of some historic
town grouped about its grand public structures, which, when they have
survived at all, posterity is loth to part with.  For, in their
absolute sincerity, not only do these authors clearly exhibit
themselves ("the unique peculiarity of the writer's mind," being, as
Johnson says of Browne, "faithfully reflected in the form and matter
of his work") but, even more than mere professionally instructed
writers, they belong to, and reflect, the age they lived in.  In
essentials, of course, even Browne is by no means so unique among his
contemporaries, and so singular, as he looks.  And then, as the very
condition of their work, there is an entire absence of personal
restraint in dealing with the public, whose humours they come at last
in a great measure to reproduce.  To speak more properly, they have
no sense of a "public" to deal with, at all--only a full confidence
in the "friendly reader," as they love to call him.  Hence their
amazing pleasantry, their indulgence in their own conceits; but hence
also those unpremeditated wildflowers of speech we should [128] never
have the good luck to find in any more formal kind of literature.

It is, in truth, to the literary purpose of the humourist, in the
old-fashioned sense of the term, that this method of writing
naturally allies itself--of the humourist to whom all the world is
but a spectacle in which nothing is really alien from himself, who
has hardly a sense of the distinction between great and little among
things that are at all, and whose half-pitying, half-amused sympathy
is called out especially by the seemingly small interests and traits
of character in the things or the people around him.  Certainly, in
an age stirred by great causes, like the age of Browne in England, of
Montaigne in France, that is not a type to which one would wish to
reduce all men of letters.  Still, in an age apt also to become
severe, or even cruel (its eager interest in those great causes
turning sour on occasion) the character of the humourist may well
find its proper influence, through that serene power, and the leisure
it has for conceiving second thoughts, on the tendencies, conscious
or unconscious, of the fierce wills around it.  Something of such a
humourist was Browne--not callous to men and their fortunes;
certainly not without opinions of his own about them; and yet,
undisturbed by the civil war, by the fall, and then the restoration,
of the monarchy, through that long quiet life (ending at last on the
day [129] himself had predicted, as if at the moment he had willed)
in which "all existence," as he says, "had been but food for
contemplation."

Johnson, in beginning his Life of Browne, remarks that Browne "seems
to have had the fortune, common among men of letters, of raising
little curiosity after their private life."  Whether or not, with the
example of Johnson himself before us, we can think just that, it is
certain that Browne's works are of a kind to directly stimulate
curiosity about himself--about himself, as being manifestly so large
a part of those works; and as a matter of fact we know a great deal
about his life, uneventful as in truth it was.  To himself, indeed,
his life at Norwich, as he gives us to understand, seemed wonderful
enough.  "Of these wonders," says Johnson, "the view that can now be
taken of his life offers no appearance."  But "we carry with us," as
Browne writes, "the wonders we seek without us," and we may note on
the other hand, a circumstance which his daughter, Mrs. Lyttleton,
tells us of his childhood: "His father used to open his breast when
he was asleep, and kiss it in prayers over him, as 'tis said of
Origen's father, that the Holy Ghost would take possession there."
It was perhaps because the son inherited an aptitude for a like
profound kindling of sentiment in the taking of his life, that,
uneventful as it was, [130] commonplace as it seemed to Johnson, to
Browne himself it was so full of wonders, and so stimulates the
curiosity of his more careful reader of to-day.  "What influence,"
says Johnson again, "learning has had on its possessors may be
doubtful."  Well! the influence of his great learning, of his
constant research on Browne, was its imaginative influence--that it
completed his outfit as a poetic visionary, stirring all the strange
"conceit" of his nature to its depths.

Browne himself dwells, in connexion with the first publication
(extorted by circumstance) of the Religio Medici, on the natural
"inactivity of his disposition"; and he does, as I have said, pass
very quietly through an exciting time.  Born in the year of the
Gunpowder Plot, he was not, in truth, one of those clear and
clarifying souls which, in an age alike of practical and mental
confusion, can anticipate and lay down the bases of reconstruction,
like Bacon or Hooker.  His mind has much of the perplexity which was
part of the atmosphere of the time.  Not that he is without his own
definite opinions on events.  For him, Cromwell is a usurper, the
death of Charles an abominable murder.  In spite of what is but an
affectation, perhaps, of the sceptical mood, he is a Churchman too;
one of those who entered fully into the Anglican position, so full of
sympathy with those ceremonies and observances [131] which "misguided
zeal terms superstition," that there were some Roman Catholics who
thought that nothing but custom and education kept him from their
communion.  At the Restoration he rejoices to see the return of the
comely Anglican order in old episcopal Norwich, with its ancient
churches; the antiquity, in particular, of the English Church being,
characteristically, one of the things he most valued in it,
vindicating it, when occasion came, against the "unjust scandal" of
those who made that Church a creation of Henry the Eighth.  As to
Romanists--he makes no scruple to "enter their churches in defect of
ours."  He cannot laugh at, but rather pities, "the fruitless
journeys of pilgrims--for there is something in it of devotion."  He
could never "hear the Ave Mary! bell without an oraison."  At a
solemn procession he has "wept abundantly."  How English, in truth,
all this really is!  It reminds one how some of the most popular of
English writers, in many a half-conscious expression, have witnessed
to a susceptibility in the English mind itself, in spite of the
Reformation, to what is affecting in religious ceremony.  Only, in
religion as in politics, Browne had no turn for disputes; was
suspicious of them, indeed; knowing, as he says with true acumen,
that "a man may be in as just possession of truth as of a city, and
yet be forced to surrender," even in controversies not [132]
necessarily maladroit--an image in which we may trace a little
contemporary colouring.

The Enquiries into Vulgar Errors appeared in the year 1646; a year
which found him very hard on "the vulgar."  His suspicion, in the
abstract, of what Bacon calls Idola Fori, the Idols of the Market-
place, takes a special emphasis from the course of events about him:
"being erroneous in their single numbers, once huddled together, they
will be error itself."  And yet, congruously with a dreamy sweetness
of character we may find expressed in his very features, he seems not
greatly concerned at the temporary suppression of the institutions he
values so much.  He seems to possess some inward Platonic reality of
them--church or monarchy--to hold by in idea, quite beyond the reach
of Roundhead or unworthy Cavalier.  In the power of what is inward
and inviolable in his religion, he can still take note: "In my
solitary and retired imagination (neque enim cum porticus aut me
lectulus accepit, desum mihi) I remember I am not alone, and
therefore forget not to contemplate Him and His attributes who is
ever with me."

His father, a merchant of London, with some claims to ancient
descent, left him early in possession of ample means.  Educated at
Winchester and Oxford, he visited Ireland, France, and Italy; and in
the year 1633, at the age of twenty-eight, became Doctor of Medicine
at Leyden.  Three years later he established himself as a physician
[133] at Norwich for the remainder of his life, having married a
lady, described as beautiful and attractive, and affectionate also,
as we may judge from her letters and postscripts to those of her
husband, in an orthography of a homeliness amazing even for that age.
Dorothy Browne bore him ten children, six of whom he survived.

Their house at Norwich, even then an old one it would seem, must have
grown, through long years of acquisition, into an odd cabinet of
antiquities--antiquities properly so called; his old Roman, or
Romanised British urns, from Walsingham or Brampton, for instance,
and those natural objects which he studied somewhat in the temper of
a curiosity-hunter or antiquary.  In one of the old churchyards of
Norwich he makes the first discovery of adipocere, of which grim
substance "a portion still remains with him."  For his multifarious
experiments he must have had his laboratory.  The old window-
stanchions had become magnetic, proving, as he thinks, that iron
"acquires verticity" from long lying in one position.  Once we find
him re-tiling the place.  It was then, perhaps, that he made the
observation that bricks and tiles also acquire "magnetic alliciency"-
-one's whole house, one might fancy; as indeed, he holds the earth
itself to be a vast lodestone.

The very faults of his literary work, its desultoriness, the time it
costs his readers, that [134] slow Latinity which Johnson imitated
from him, those lengthy leisurely terminations which busy posterity
will abbreviate, all breathe of the long quiet of the place.  Yet he
is by no means indolent.  Besides wide book-learning, experimental
research at home, and indefatigable observation in the open air, he
prosecutes the ordinary duties of a physician; contrasting himself
indeed with other students, "whose quiet and unmolested doors afford
no such distractions."  To most persons of mind sensitive as his, his
chosen studies would have seemed full of melancholy, turning always,
as they did, upon death and decay.  It is well, perhaps, that life
should be something of a "meditation upon death": but to many,
certainly, Browne's would have seemed too like a lifelong following
of one's own funeral.  A museum is seldom a cheerful place--oftenest
induces the feeling that nothing could ever have been young; and to
Browne the whole world is a museum; all the grace and beauty it has
being of a somewhat mortified kind.  Only, for him (poetic dream, or
philosophic apprehension, it was this which never failed to evoke his
wonderful genius for exquisitely impassioned speech) over all those
ugly anatomical preparations, as though over miraculous saintly
relics, there was the perpetual flicker of a surviving spiritual
ardency, one day to reassert itself--stranger far than any fancied
odylic gravelights!

[135] When Browne settled at Norwich, being then about thirty-six
years old, he had already completed the Religio Medici; a desultory
collection of observations designed for himself only and a few
friends, at all events with no purpose of immediate publication.  It
had been lying by him for seven years, circulating privately in his
own extraordinarily perplexed manuscript, or in manuscript copies,
when, in 1642, an incorrect printed version from one of those copies,
"much corrupted by transcription at various hands," appeared
anonymously.  Browne, decided royalist as he was in spite of seeming
indifference, connects this circumstance with the unscrupulous use of
the press for political purposes, and especially against the king, at
that time.  Just here a romantic figure comes on the scene.  Son of
the unfortunate young Everard Digby who perished on the scaffold for
some half-hearted participation in the Gunpowder Plot, Kenelm Digby,
brought up in the reformed religion, had returned in manhood to the
religion of his father.  In his intellectual composition he had, in
common with Browne, a scientific interest, oddly tinged with both
poetry and scepticism: he had also a strong sympathy with religious
reaction, and a more than sentimental love for a seemingly vanishing
age of faith, which he, for one, would not think of as vanishing.  A
copy of that surreptitious edition of the Religio Medici found him a
prisoner on suspicion of a too active [136] royalism, and with much
time on his hands.

The Roman Catholic, although, secure in his definite orthodoxy, he
finds himself indifferent on many points (on the reality of
witchcraft, for instance) concerning which Browne's more timid,
personally grounded faith might indulge no scepticism, forced
himself, nevertheless, to detect a vein of rationalism in a book
which on the whole much attracted him, and hastily put forth his
"animadversions" upon it.  Browne, with all his distaste for
controversy, thus found himself committed to a dispute, and his reply
came with the correct edition of the Religio Medici published at last
with his name.  There have been many efforts to formulate the
"religion of the layman," which might be rightly understood, perhaps,
as something more than what is called "natural," yet less than
ecclesiastical, or "professional" religion.  Though its habitual mode
of conceiving experience is on a different plane, yet it would
recognise the legitimacy of the traditional religious interpretation
of that experience, generally and by implication; only, with a marked
reserve as to religious particulars, both of thought and language,
out of a real reverence or awe, as proper only for a special place.
Such is the lay religion, as we may find it in Addison, in Gray, in
Thackeray; and there is something of a concession--a concession, on
second thoughts--about it.  Browne's Religio Medici is designed as
the expression of a mind [137] more difficult of belief than that of
the mere "layman," as above described; it is meant for the religion
of the man of science.  Actually, it is something less to the point,
in any balancing of the religious against the worldly view of things,
than the religion of the layman, as just now defined.  For Browne, in
spite of his profession of boisterous doubt, has no real
difficulties, and his religion, certainly, nothing of the character
of a concession.  He holds that there has never existed an atheist.
Not that he is credulous; but that his religion is only the
correlative of himself, his peculiar character and education, a
religion of manifold association.  For him, the wonders of religion,
its supernatural events or agencies, are almost natural facts or
processes.  "Even in this material fabric, the spirits walk as freely
exempt from the affection of time, place and motion, as beyond the
extremest circumference."  Had not Divine interference designed to
raise the dead, nature herself is in act to do it--to lead out the
"incinerated soul" from the retreats of her dark laboratory.
Certainly Browne has not, like Pascal, made the "great resolution,"
by the apprehension that it is just in the contrast of the moral
world to the world with which science deals that religion finds its
proper basis.  It is from the homelessness of the world which science
analyses so victoriously, its dark unspirituality, wherein the soul
he is conscious of seems such a [138] stranger, that Pascal "turns
again to his rest," in the conception of a world of wholly reasonable
and moral agencies.  For Browne, on the contrary, the light is full,
design everywhere obvious, its conclusion easy to draw, all small and
great things marked clearly with the signature of the "Word."  The
adhesion, the difficult adhesion, of men such as Pascal, is an
immense contribution to religious controversy; the concession, again,
of a man like Addison, of great significance there.  But in the
adhesion of Browne, in spite of his crusade against "vulgar errors,"
there is no real significance.  The Religio Medici is a contribution,
not to faith, but to piety; a refinement and correction, such as
piety often stands in need of; a help, not so much to religious
belief in a world of doubt, as to the maintenance of the religious
mood amid the interests of a secular calling.

From about this time Browne's letters afford a pretty clear view of
his life as it passed in the house at Norwich.  Many of these letters
represent him in correspondence with the singular men who shared his
own half poetic, half scientific turn of mind, with that
impressibility towards what one might call the thaumaturgic elements
in nature which has often made men dupes, and which is certainly an
element in the somewhat atrabiliar mental complexion of that age in
England.  He corresponds seriously with William Lily, the astrologer;
is acquainted [139] with Dr.  Dee, who had some connexion with
Norwich, and has "often heard him affirm, sometimes with oaths, that
he had seen transmutation of pewter dishes and flagons into silver
(at least) which the goldsmiths at Prague bought of him."  Browne is
certainly an honest investigator; but it is still with a faint hope
of something like that upon fitting occasion, and on the alert always
for surprises in nature (as if nature had a rhetoric, at times, to
deliver to us, like those sudden and surprising flowers of his own
poetic style) that he listens to her everyday talk so attentively.
Of strange animals, strange cures, and the like, his correspondence
is full.  The very errors he combats are, of course, the curiosities
of error--those fascinating, irresistible, popular, errors, which
various kinds of people have insisted on gliding into because they
like them.  Even his heresies were old ones--the very fossils of
capricious opinion.

It is as an industrious local naturalist that Browne comes before us
first, full of the fantastic minute life in the fens and "Broads"
around Norwich, its various sea and marsh birds.  He is something of
a vivisectionist also, and we may not be surprised at it, perhaps, in
an age which, for the propagation of truth, was ready to cut off
men's ears.  He finds one day "a Scarabaus capricornus odoratus,"
which he takes "to be mentioned by Monfetus, folio 150.  He saith,
'Nucem moschatam et cinnamomum vere spirat'--[140] but to me it smelt
like roses, santalum, and ambergris."  "Musca tuliparum moschata,"
again, "is a small bee-like fly of an excellent fragrant odour, which
I have often found at the bottom of the flowers of tulips."  Is this
within the experience of modern entomologists?

The Garden of Cyrus, though it ends indeed with a passage of
wonderful felicity, certainly emphasises (to say the least) the
defects of Browne's literary good qualities.  His chimeric fancy
carries him here into a kind of frivolousness, as if he felt almost
too safe with his public, and were himself not quite serious, or
dealing fairly with it; and in a writer such as Browne levity must of
necessity be a little ponderous.  Still, like one of those stiff
gardens, half-way between the medieval garden and the true "English"
garden of Temple or Walpole, actually to be seen in the background of
some of the conventional portraits of that day, the fantasies of this
indescribable exposition of the mysteries of the quincunx form part
of the complete portrait of Browne himself; and it is in connexion
with it that, once or twice, the quaintly delightful pen of Evelyn
comes into the correspondence--in connexion with the "hortulane
pleasure."  "Norwich," he writes to Browne, "is a place, I
understand, much addicted to the flowery part."  Professing himself a
believer in the operation "of the air and genius of gardens upon
human spirits, towards virtue and sanctity," he is all for [141]
natural gardens as against "those which appear like gardens of paste-
board and march-pane, and smell more of paint than of flowers and
verdure."  Browne is in communication also with Ashmole and Dugdale,
the famous antiquaries; to the latter of whom, who had written a work
on the history of the embanking of fens, he communicates the
discovery of certain coins, on a piece of ground "in the nature of an
island in the fens."

Far more interesting certainly than those curious scientific letters
is Browne's "domestic correspondence."  Dobson, Charles the First's
"English Tintoret," would seem to have painted a life-sized picture
of Sir Thomas Browne and his family, after the manner of those big,
urbane, family groups, then coming into fashion with the Dutch
Masters.  Of such a portrait nothing is now known.  But in these old-
fashioned, affectionate letters, transmitted often, in those
troublous times, with so much difficulty, we have what is almost as
graphic--a numerous group, in which, although so many of Browne's
children died young, he was happy; with Dorothy Browne, occasionally
adding her charming, ill-spelt postscripts to her husband's letters;
the religious daughter who goes to daily prayers after the
Restoration, which brought Browne the honour of knighthood; and,
above all, two Toms, son and grandson of Sir Thomas, the latter being
the son of Dr. Edward Browne, [142] now become distinguished as a
physician in London (he attended John, Earl of Rochester, in his last
illness at Woodstock) and his childish existence as he lives away
from his proper home in London, in the old house at Norwich, two
hundred years ago, we see like a thing of to-day.

At first the two brothers, Edward and Thomas (the elder) are together
in everything.  Then Edward goes abroad for his studies, and Thomas,
quite early, into the navy, where he certainly develops into a
wonderfully gallant figure; passing away, however, from the
correspondence, it is uncertain how, before he was of full age.  From
the first he is understood to be a lad of parts.  "If you practise to
write, you will have a good pen and style:" and a delightful, boyish
journal of his remains, describing a tour the two brothers made in
September 1662 among the Derbyshire hills.  "I received your two last
letters," he writes to his father from aboard the Marie Rose, "and
give you many thanks for the discourse you sent me out of Vossius: De
motu marium et ventorum.  It seemed very hard to me at first; but I
have now beaten it, and I wish I had the book."  His father is
pleased to think that he is "like to proceed not only a good
navigator, but a good scholar": and he finds the much exacting, old
classical prescription for the character of the brave man fulfilled
in him.  On 16th July 1666 the young man writes--still from the Marie
Rose--

[143] If it were possible to get an opportunity to send as often
as I am desirous to write, you should hear more often from me,
being now so near the grand action, from which I would by no means
be absent.  I extremely long for that thundering day: wherein I
hope you shall hear we have behaved ourselves like men, and to
the honour of our country.  I thank you for your directions for
my ears against the noise of the guns, but I have found that I
could endure it; nor is it so intolerable as most conceive;
especially when men are earnest, and intent upon their business,
unto whom muskets sound but like pop-guns.  It is impossible
to express unto another how a smart sea-fight elevates the spirits
of a man, and makes him despise all dangers.  In and after all
sea-fights, I have been very thirsty.

He died, as I said, early in life.  We only hear of him later in
connexion with a trait of character observed in Tom the grandson,
whose winning ways, and tricks of bodily and mental growth, are duly
recorded in these letters: the reader will, I hope, pardon the
following extracts from them:--

Little Tom is lively....  Frank is fayne sometimes to play him
asleep with a fiddle.  When we send away our letters he scribbles
a paper and will have it sent to his sister, and saith she doth
not know how many fine things there are in Norwich....  He
delights his grandfather when he comes home.

Tom gives you many thanks for his clothes (from London).  He
has appeared very fine this King's day with them.

Tom presents his duty.  A gentleman at our election asked Tom
who hee was for? and he answered, "For all four."  The gentleman
replied that he answered like a physician's son.

Tom would have his grandmother, his aunt Betty, and Frank,
valentines: but hee conditioned with them that they should give
him nothing of any kind that hee had ever had or seen before.

[144] "Tom is just now gone to see two bears which are to be
shown."  "Tom, his duty.  He is begging books and reading of
them."  "The players are at the Red Lion hard by; and Tom goes
sometimes to see a play."

And then one day he stirs old memories--

The fairings were welcome to Tom.  He finds about the house
divers things that were your brother's (the late Edward's),
and Betty sometimes tells him stories about him, so that he
was importunate with her to write his life in a quarter of
a sheet of paper, and read it unto him, and will have still
more added.

Just as I am writing (learnedly about a comet, 7th January
1680-81) Tom comes and tells me the blazing star is in the
yard, and calls me to see it.  It was but dim, and the sky
not clear....  I am very sensible of this sharp weather.+

He seems to have come to no good end, riding forth one stormy night.
Requiescat in pace!

Of this long, leisurely existence the chief events were Browne's rare
literary publications; some of his writings indeed having been left
unprinted till after his death; while in the circumstances of the
issue of every one of them there is something accidental, as if the
world might have missed it altogether.  Even the Discourse of Vulgar
Errors, the longest and most elaborate of his works, is entirely
discursive and occasional, coming to an end with no natural
conclusion, but only because the writer chose to leave off just
there; and few probably have been the readers of the book as a
consecutive whole. At times indeed we seem to have in it observations
only, or notes, preliminary to some more orderly composition.  Dip
into it: read, for [145] instance, the chapter "Of the Ring-finger,"
or the chapters "Of the Long Life of the Deer," and on the "Pictures
of Mermaids, Unicorns, and some Others," and the part will certainly
seem more than the whole.  Try to read it through, and you will soon
feel cloyed;--miss very likely, its real worth to the fancy, the
literary fancy (which finds its pleasure in inventive word and
phrase) and become dull to the really vivid beauties of a book so
lengthy, but with no real evolution.  Though there are words,
phrases, constructions innumerable, which remind one how much the
work initiated in France by Madame de Rambouillet--work, done for
England, we may think perhaps imperfectly, in the next century by
Johnson and others--was really needed; yet the capacities of Browne's
manner of writing, coming as it did so directly from the man, are
felt even in his treatment of matters of science.  As with Buffon,
his full, ardent, sympathetic vocabulary, the poetry of his language,
a poetry inherent in its elementary particles--the word, the epithet-
-helps to keep his eye, and the eye of the reader, on the object
before it, and conduces directly to the purpose of the naturalist,
the observer.  But, only one half observation, its other half
consisting of very out-of-the-way book-lore, this work displays
Browne still in the character of the antiquary, as that age
understood him.  He is a kind of Elias Ashmole, but dealing with
natural objects; which are for him, in the first [146] place, and
apart from the remote religious hints and intimations they carry with
them, curiosities.  He seems to have no true sense of natural law, as
Bacon understood it; nor even of that immanent reason in the natural
world, which the Platonic tradition supposes.  "Things are really
true," he says, "as they correspond unto God's conception; and have
so much verity as they hold of conformity unto that intellect, in
whose idea they had their first determinations."  But, actually, what
he is busy in the record of, are matters more or less of the nature
of caprices; as if things, after all, were significant of their
higher verity only at random, and in a sort of surprises, like music
in old instruments suddenly touched into sound by a wandering finger,
among the lumber of people's houses.  Nature, "the art of God," as he
says, varying a little a phrase used also by Hobbes, in a work
printed later--Nature, he seems to protest, is only a little less
magical, its processes only a little less in the way of alchemy, than
you had supposed.  We feel that, as with that disturbed age in
England generally (and it is here that he, with it, is so
interesting, curious, old-world, and unlike ourselves) his supposed
experience might at any moment be broken in upon by a hundred forms
of a natural magic, only not quite so marvellous as that older sort
of magic, or alchemy, he is at so much pains to expose; and the large
promises of which, its large words too, he still regretfully enjoys.

[147] And yet the Discourse of Vulgar Errors, seeming, as it often
does, to be a serious refutation of fairy tales--arguing, for
instance, against the literal truth of the poetic statement that "The
pigeon hath no gall," and such questions as "Whether men weigh
heavier dead than alive?" being characteristic questions--is
designed, with much ambition, under its pedantic Greek title
Pseudodoxia Epidemica, as a criticism, a cathartic, an instrument for
the clarifying of the intellect.  He begins from "that first error in
Paradise," wondering much at "man's deceivability in his
perfection,"--"at such gross deceit."  He enters in this connexion,
with a kind of poetry of scholasticism which may interest the student
of Paradise Lost, into what we may call the intellectual and moral
by-play of the situation of the first man and woman in Paradise, with
strange queries about it.  Did Adam, for instance, already know of
the fall of the Angels?  Did he really believe in death, till Abel
died?  It is from Julius Scaliger that he takes his motto, to the
effect that the true knowledge of things must be had from things
themselves, not from books; and he seems as seriously concerned as
Bacon to dissipate the crude impressions of a false "common sense,"
of false science, and a fictitious authority.  Inverting, oddly,
Plato's theory that all learning is but reminiscence, he reflects
with a sigh how much of oblivion must needs be involved in the
getting of any true knowledge.  "Men that [148] adore times past,
consider not that those times were once present (that is, as our own
are) and ourselves unto those to come, as they unto us at present."
That, surely, coming from one both by temperament and habit so great
an antiquary, has the touch of something like an influence in the
atmosphere of the time.  That there was any actual connexion between
Browne's work and Bacon's is but a surmise.  Yet we almost seem to
hear Bacon when Browne discourses on the "use of doubts, and the
advantages which might be derived from drawing up a calendar of
doubts, falsehoods, and popular errors;" and, as from Bacon, one gets
the impression that men really have been very much the prisoners of
their own crude or pedantic terms, notions, associations; that they
have been very indolent in testing very simple matters--with a
wonderful kind of "supinity," as he calls it.  In Browne's chapter on
the "Sources of Error," again, we may trace much resemblance to
Bacon's striking doctrine of the Idola, the "shams" men fall down and
worship.  Taking source respectively, from the "common infirmity of
human nature," from the "erroneous disposition of the people," from
"confident adherence to authority," the errors which Browne chooses
to deal with may be registered as identical with Bacon's Idola
Tribus, Fori, Theatri; the idols of our common human nature; of the
vulgar, when they get together; and of the learned, when they get
together.

[149] But of the fourth species of error noted by Bacon, the Idola
Specus, the Idols of the Cave, that whole tribe of illusions, which
are "bred amongst the weeds and tares of one's own brain," Browne
tells us nothing by way of criticism; was himself, rather, a lively
example of their operation.  Throw those illusions, those "idols,"
into concrete or personal form, suppose them introduced among the
other forces of an active intellect, and you have Sir Thomas Browne
himself.  The sceptical inquirer who rises from his cathartic, his
purging of error, a believer in the supernatural character of pagan
oracles, and a cruel judge of supposed witches, must still need as
much as ever that elementary conception of the right method and the
just limitations of knowledge, by power of which he should not just
strain out a single error here or there, but make a final precipitate
of fallacy.

And yet if the temperament had been deducted from Browne's work--that
inherent and strongly marked way of deciding things, which has guided
with so surprising effect the musings of the Letter to a Friend, and
the Urn-Burial--we should probably have remembered him little.  Pity!
some may think, for himself at least, that he had not lived earlier,
and still believed in the mandrake, for instance; its fondness for
places of execution, and its human cries "on eradication, with hazard
of life to them that pull it up."  "In philosophy," he observes,
meaning to contrast [150] his free-thinking in that department with
his orthodoxy in religion--in philosophy, "where truth seems double-
faced, there is no man more paradoxical than myself:" which is true,
we may think, in a further sense than he meant, and that it was the
"paradoxical" that he actually preferred.  Happy, at all events, he
still remained--undisturbed and happy--in a hundred native
prepossessions, some certainly valueless, some of them perhaps
invaluable.  And while one feels that no real logic of fallacies has
been achieved by him, one feels still more how little the
construction of that branch of logical inquiry really helps men's
minds; fallacy, like truth itself, being a matter so dependent on
innate gift of apprehension, so extra-logical and personal; the
original perception counting for almost everything, the mere
inference for so little!  Yes!  "A man may be in as just possession
of truth as of a city, and yet be forced to surrender," even in
controversies not necessarily maladroit.

The really stirring poetry of science is not in guesses, or facile
divinations about it, but in its larger ascertained truths--the order
of infinite space, the slow method and vast results of infinite time.
For Browne, however, the sense of poetry which so overmasters his
scientific procedure, depends chiefly on its vaguer possibilities;
the empirical philosophy, even after Bacon, being still dominated by
a temper, resultant from the general unsettlement of men's [151]
minds at the Reformation, which may be summed up in the famous
question of Montaigne--Que scais-je?  The cold-blooded method of
observation and experiment was creeping but slowly over the domain of
science; and such unreclaimed portions of it as the phenomena of
magnetism had an immense fascination for men like Browne and Digby.
Here, in those parts of natural philosophy "but yet in discovery,"
"the America and untravelled parts of truth," lay for them the true
prospect of science, like the new world itself to a geographical
discoverer such as Raleigh.  And welcome as one of the minute hints
of that country far ahead of them, the strange bird, or floating
fragment of unfamiliar vegetation, which met those early navigators,
there was a certain fantastic experiment, in which, as was alleged,
Paracelsus had been lucky.  For Browne and others it became the
crucial type of the kind of agency in nature which, as they
conceived, it was the proper function of science to reveal in larger
operation.  "The subject of my last letter," says Dr.  Henry Power,
then a student, writing to Browne in 1648, the last year of Charles
the First, "being so high and noble a piece of chemistry, invites me
once more to request an experimental eviction of it from yourself;
and I hope you will not chide my importunity in this petition, or be
angry at my so frequent knockings at your door to obtain a grant of
so great and admirable a [152] mystery."  What the enthusiastic young
student expected from Browne, so high and noble a piece of chemistry,
was the "re-individualling of an incinerated plant"--a violet,
turning to freshness, and smelling sweet again, out of its ashes,
under some genially fitted conditions of the chemic art.

Palingenesis, resurrection, effected by orderly prescription--the
"re-individualling" of an "incinerated organism"--is a subject which
affords us a natural transition to the little book of the
Hydriotaphia, or Treatise of Urn-Burial--about fifty or sixty pages--
which, together with a very singular letter not printed till after
Browne's death, is perhaps, after all, the best justification of
Browne's literary reputation, as it were his own curiously figured
urn, and treasure-place of immortal memory.

In its first presentation to the public this letter was connected
with Browne's Christian Morals; but its proper and sympathetic
collocation would be rather with the Urn-Burial, of which it is a
kind of prelude, or strikes the keynote.  He is writing in a very
complex situation--to a friend, upon occasion of the death of a
common friend.  The deceased apparently had been little known to
Browne himself till his recent visits, while the intimate friend to
whom he is writing had been absent at the time; and the leading
motive of Browne's letter is the deep impression he has received
during those visits, of a sort of [153] physical beauty in the coming
of death, with which he still surprises and moves his reader.  There
had been, in this case, a tardiness and reluctancy in the
circumstances of dissolution, which had permitted him, in the
character of a physician, as it were to assist at the spiritualising
of the bodily frame by natural process; a wonderful new type of a
kind of mortified grace being evolved by the way.  The spiritual body
had anticipated the formal moment of death; the alert soul, in that
tardy decay, changing its vesture gradually, and as if piece by
piece.  The infinite future had invaded this life perceptibly to the
senses, like the ocean felt far inland up a tidal river.  Nowhere,
perhaps, is the attitude of questioning awe on the threshold of
another life displayed with the expressiveness of this unique morsel
of literature; though there is something of the same kind, in another
than the literary medium, in the delicate monumental sculpture of the
early Tuscan School, as also in many of the designs of William Blake,
often, though unconsciously, much in sympathy with those
unsophisticated Italian workmen.  With him, as with them, and with
the writer of the Letter to a Friend upon the occasion of the death
of his intimate Friend,--so strangely! the visible function of death
is but to refine, to detach from aught that is vulgar.  And this
elfin letter, really an impromptu epistle to a friend, affords the
best possible light on the general temper of the man [154] who could
be moved by the accidental discovery of those old urns at Walsingham-
-funeral relics of "Romans, or Britons Romanised which had learned
Roman customs"--to the composition of that wonderful book the
Hydriotaphia.  He had drawn up a short account of the circumstance at
the moment; but it was after ten years' brooding that he put forth
the finished treatise, dedicated to an eminent collector of ancient
coins and other rarities, with congratulations that he "can daily
command the view of so many imperial faces," and (by way of
frontispiece) with one of the urns, "drawn with a coal taken out of
it and found among the burnt bones."  The discovery had resuscitated
for him a whole world of latent observation, from life, from out-of-
the-way reading, from the natural world, and fused into a
composition, which with all its quaintness we may well pronounce
classical, all the heterogeneous elements of that singular mind.  The
desire to "record these risen ashes and not to let them be buried
twice among us," had set free, in his manner of conceiving things,
something not wholly analysable, something that may be properly
called genius, which shapes his use of common words to stronger and
deeper senses, in a way unusual in prose writing.  Let the reader,
for instance, trace his peculiarly sensitive use of the epithets thin
and dark, both here and in the Letter to a Friend.

Upon what a grand note he can begin and end [155] chapter or
paragraph!  "When the funeral pyre was out, and the last valediction
over:"  "And a large part of the earth is still in the urn unto us."
Dealing with a very vague range of feelings, it is his skill to
associate them to very definite objects.  Like the Soul, in Blake's
design, "exploring the recesses of the tomb," he carries a light, the
light of the poetic faith which he cannot put off him, into those
dark places, "the abode of worms and pismires," peering round with a
boundless curiosity and no fear; noting the various casuistical
considerations of men's last form of self-love; all those whims of
humanity as a "student of perpetuity," the mortuary customs of all
nations, which, from their very closeness to our human nature, arouse
in most minds only a strong feeling of distaste.  There is something
congruous with the impassive piety of the man in his waiting on
accident from without to take start for the work, which, of all his
work, is most truly touched by the "divine spark."  Delightsome as
its eloquence is actually found to be, that eloquence is attained out
of a certain difficulty and halting crabbedness of expression; the
wretched punctuation of the piece being not the only cause of its
impressing the reader with the notion that he is but dealing with a
collection of notes for a more finished composition, and of a
different kind; perhaps a purely erudite treatise on its subject,
with detachment of all personal colour now adhering [156] to it.  Out
of an atmosphere of all-pervading oddity and quaintness--the
quaintness of mind which reflects that this disclosing of the urns of
the ancients hath "left unto our view some parts which they never
beheld themselves"--arises a work really ample and grand, nay!
classical, as I said, by virtue of the effectiveness with which it
fixes a type in literature; as, indeed, at its best, romantic
literature (and Browne is genuinely romantic) in every period attains
classical quality, giving true measure of the very limited value of
those well-worn critical distinctions.  And though the Urn-Burial
certainly has much of the character of a poem, yet one is never
allowed to forget that it was designed, candidly, as a scientific
treatise on one department of ancient "culture" (as much so as
Guichard's curious old French book on Divers Manners of Burial) and
was the fruit of much labour, in the way especially of industrious
selection from remote and difficult writers; there being then few or
no handbooks, or anything like our modern shortcuts to varied
knowledge.  Quite unaffectedly, a curious learning saturates, with a
kind of grey and aged colour most apt and congruous with the subject-
matter, all the thoughts that arise in him.  His great store of
reading, so freely displayed, he uses almost as poetically as Milton;
like him, profiting often by the mere sonorous effect of some heroic
or ancient name, which he can adapt to that same sort of learned
sweetness of [157] cadence with which so many of his single sentences
are made to fall upon the ear.

Pope Gregory, that great religious poet, requested by certain eminent
persons to send them some of those relics he sought for so devoutly
in all the lurking-places of old Rome, took up, it is said, a portion
of common earth, and delivered it to the messengers; and, on their
expressing surprise at such a gift, pressed the earth together in his
hand, whereupon the sacred blood of the Martyrs was beheld flowing
out between his fingers.  The veneration of relics became a part of
Christian (as some may think it a part of natural) religion.  All
over Rome we may count how much devotion in fine art is owing to it;
and, through all ugliness or superstition, its intention still speaks
clearly to serious minds.  The poor dead bones, ghastly and
forbidding:--we know what Shakespeare would have felt about them.--
"Beat not the bones of the buried: when he breathed, he was a man!"
And it is with something of a similar feeling that Browne is full, on
the common and general ground of humanity; an awe-stricken sympathy
with those, whose bones "lie at the mercies of the living," strong
enough to unite all his various chords of feeling into a single
strain of impressive and genuine poetry.  His real interest is in
what may be called the curiosities of our common humanity.  As
another might be moved at the sight of Alexander's bones, or Saint
Edmund's, or Saint Cecilia's, [158] so he is full of a fine poetical
excitement at such lowly relics as the earth hides almost everywhere
beneath our feet.  But it is hardly fair to take our leave amid these
grievous images of so happy a writer as Sir Thomas Browne; so great a
lover of the open air, under which much of his life was passed.  His
work, late one night, draws to a natural close:--"To keep our eyes
open longer," he bethinks himself suddenly, "were but to act our
Antipodes.  The huntsmen are up in America! "

What a fund of open-air cheerfulness, there! in turning to sleep.
Still, even when we are dealing with a writer in whom mere style
counts for so much as with Browne, it is impossible to ignore his
matter; and it is with religion he is really occupied from first to
last, hardly less than Richard Hooker.  And his religion, too, after
all, was a religion of cheerfulness: he has no great consciousness of
evil in things, and is no fighter.  His religion, if one may say so,
was all profit to him; among other ways, in securing an absolute
staidness and placidity of temper, for the intellectual work which
was the proper business of his life.  His contributions to
"evidence," in the Religio Medici, for instance, hardly tell, because
he writes out of view of a really philosophical criticism.  What does
tell in him, in this direction, is the witness he brings to men's
instinct of survival--the "intimations of immortality," as Wordsworth
terms them, which  [159] were natural with him in surprising force.
As was said of Jean Paul, his special subject was the immortality of
the soul; with an assurance as personal, as fresh and original, as it
was, on the one hand, in those old half-civilised people who had
deposited the urns; on the other hand, in the cynical French poet of
the nineteenth century, who did not think, but knew, that his soul
was imperishable.  He lived in an age in which that philosophy made a
great stride which ends with Hume; and his lesson, if we may be
pardoned for taking away a "lesson" from so ethical a writer, is the
force of men's temperaments in the management of opinion, their own
or that of others;--that it is not merely different degrees of bare
intellectual power which cause men to approach in different degrees
to this or that intellectual programme.  Could he have foreseen the
mature result of that mechanical analysis which Bacon had applied to
nature, and Hobbes to the mind of man, there is no reason to think
that he would have surrendered his own chosen hypothesis concerning
them.  He represents, in an age, the intellectual powers of which
tend strongly to agnosticism, that class of minds to which the
supernatural view of things is still credible.  The non-mechanical
theory of nature has had its grave adherents since: to the non-
mechanical theory of man--that he is in contact with a moral order on
a different plane from the [160] mechanical order--thousands, of the
most various types and degrees of intellectual power, always adhere;
a fact worth the consideration of all ingenuous thinkers, if (as is
certainly the case with colour, music, number, for instance) there
may be whole regions of fact, the recognition of which belongs to one
and not to another, which people may possess in various degrees; for
the knowledge of which, therefore, one person is dependent upon
another; and in relation to which the appropriate means of cognition
must lie among the elements of what we call individual temperament,
so that what looks like a pre-judgment may be really a legitimate
apprehension.  "Men are what they are," and are not wholly at the
mercy of formal conclusions from their formally limited premises.
Browne passes his whole life in observation and inquiry: he is a
genuine investigator, with every opportunity: the mind of the age all
around him seems passively yielding to an almost foregone
intellectual result, to a philosophy of disillusion.  But he thinks
all that a prejudice; and not from any want of intellectual power
certainly, but from some inward consideration, some afterthought,
from the antecedent gravitation of his own general character--or,
will you say? from that unprecipitated infusion of fallacy in him--he
fails to draw, unlike almost all the rest of the world, the
conclusion ready to hand.

1886.

NOTES

144. +In the original, this quotation, like several above it, is not
indented; it is in smaller type.  Return.



"LOVE'S LABOURS LOST"

[161] Love's Labours Lost is one of the earliest of Shakespeare's
dramas, and has many of the peculiarities of his poems, which are
also the work of his earlier life.  The opening speech of the king on
the immortality of fame--on the triumph of fame over death--and the
nobler parts of Biron, display something of the monumental style of
Shakespeare's Sonnets, and are not without their concerts of thought
and expression.  This connexion of Love's Labours Lost with
Shakespeare's poems is further enforced by the actual insertion in it
of three sonnets and a faultless song; which, in accordance with his
practice in other plays, are inwoven into the argument of the piece
and, like the golden ornaments of a fair woman, give it a peculiar
air of distinction.  There is merriment in it also, with choice
illustrations of both wit and humour; a laughter, often exquisite,
ringing, if faintly, yet as genuine laughter still, though sometimes
sinking into mere burlesque, which has not lasted quite so well.  And
Shakespeare [162] brings a serious effect out of the trifling of his
characters.  A dainty love-making is interchanged with the more
cumbrous play: below the many artifices of Biron's amorous speeches
we may trace sometimes the "unutterable longing;" and the lines in
which Katherine describes the blighting through love of her younger
sister are one of the most touching things in older literature.*
Again, how many echoes seem awakened by those strange words, actually
said in jest!  "The sweet war-man (Hector of Troy) is dead and
rotten; sweet chucks, beat not the bones of the buried: when he
breathed, he was a man!"--words which may remind us of Shakespeare's
own epitaph.  In the last scene, an ingenious turn is given to the
action, so that the piece does not conclude after the manner of other
comedies.--

Our wooing doth not end like an old play;
Jack hath not Jill:

and Shakespeare strikes a passionate note across it at last, in the
entrance of the messenger, who announces to the princess that the
king her father is suddenly dead.

The merely dramatic interest of the piece is slight enough; only just
sufficient, indeed, to form the vehicle of its wit and poetry.  The
scene--a park of the King of Navarre--is unaltered throughout; and
the unity of the [163] play is not so much the unity of a drama as
that of a series of pictorial groups, in which the same figures
reappear, in different combinations but on the same background.  It
is as if Shakespeare had intended to bind together, by some inventive
conceit, the devices of an ancient tapestry, and give voices to its
figures.  On one side, a fair palace; on the other, the tents of the
Princess of France, who has come on an embassy from her father to the
King of Navarre; in the midst, a wide space of smooth grass.

The same personages are combined over and over again into a series of
gallant scenes--the princess, the three masked ladies, the quaint,
pedantic king; one of those amiable kings men have never loved
enough, whose serious occupation with the things of the mind seems,
by contrast with the more usual forms of kingship, like frivolity or
play.  Some of the figures are grotesque merely, and all the male
ones at least, a little fantastic.  Certain objects reappearing from
scene to scene--love-letters crammed with verses to the margin, and
lovers' toys--hint obscurely at some story of intrigue.  Between
these groups, on a smaller scale, come the slighter and more homely
episodes, with Sir Nathaniel the curate, the country-maid Jaquenetta,
Moth or Mote the elfin-page, with Hiems and Ver, who recite "the
dialogue that the two learned men have compiled in praise of the owl
and the cuckoo."  The ladies are [164] lodged in tents, because the
king, like the princess of the modern poet's fancy, has taken a vow

to make his court a little Academe,

and for three years' space no woman may come within a mile of it; and
the play shows how this artificial attempt was broken through.  For
the king and his three fellow-scholars are of course soon forsworn,
and turn to writing sonnets, each to his chosen lady.  These fellow-
scholars of the king--"quaint votaries of science" at first,
afterwards "affection's men-at-arms"--three youthful knights,
gallant, amorous, chivalrous, but also a little affected, sporting
always a curious foppery of language, are, throughout, the leading
figures in the foreground; one of them, in particular, being more
carefully depicted than the others, and in himself very noticeable--a
portrait with somewhat puzzling manner and expression, which at once
catches the eye irresistibly and keeps it fixed.

Play is often that about which people are most serious; and the
humourist may observe how, under all love of playthings, there is
almost always hidden an appreciation of something really engaging and
delightful.  This is true always of the toys of children: it is often
true of the playthings of grown-up people, their vanities, their
fopperies even, their lighter loves; the cynic would add their
pursuit of fame.  Certainly, this is true without exception [165] of
the playthings of a past age, which to those who succeed it are
always full of a pensive interest--old manners, old dresses, old
houses. For what is called fashion in these matters occupies, in each
age, much of the care of many of the most discerning people,
furnishing them with a kind of mirror of their real inward
refinements, and their capacity for selection.  Such modes or
fashions are, at their best, an example of the artistic predominance
of form over matter; of the manner of the doing of it over the thing
done; and have a beauty of their own.  It is so with that old
euphuism of the Elizabethan age--that pride of dainty language and
curious expression, which it is very easy to ridicule, which often
made itself ridiculous, but which had below it a real sense of
fitness and nicety; and which, as we see in this very play, and still
more clearly in the Sonnets, had some fascination for the young
Shakespeare himself.  It is this foppery of delicate language, this
fashionable plaything of his time, with which Shakespeare is occupied
in Love's Labours Lost.  He shows us the manner in all its stages;
passing from the grotesque and vulgar pedantry of Holofernes, through
the extravagant but polished caricature of Armado, to become the
peculiar characteristic of a real though still quaint poetry in Biron
himself, who is still chargeable even at his best with just a little
affectation.  As Shakespeare laughs broadly at it in Holofernes or
Armado, so he [166] is the analyst of its curious charm in Biron; and
this analysis involves a delicate raillery by Shakespeare himself at
his own chosen manner.

This "foppery" of Shakespeare's day had, then, its really delightful
side, a quality in no sense "affected," by which it satisfies a real
instinct in our minds--the fancy so many of us have for an exquisite
and curious skill in the use of words.  Biron is the perfect flower
of this manner:

A man of fire-new words, fashion's own knight:

--as he describes Armado, in terms which are really applicable to
himself.  In him this manner blends with a true gallantry of nature,
and an affectionate complaisance and grace.  He has at times some of
its extravagance or caricature also, but the shades of expression by
which he passes from this to the "golden cadence" of Shakespeare's
own most characteristic verse, are so fine, that it is sometimes
difficult to trace them.  What is a vulgarity in Holofernes, and a
caricature in Armado, refines itself with him into the expression of
a nature truly and inwardly bent upon a form of delicate perfection,
and is accompanied by a real insight into the laws which determine
what is exquisite in language, and their root in the nature of
things.  He can appreciate quite the opposite style--

In russet yeas, and honest kersey noes;

he knows the first law of pathos, that

Honest plain words best suit the ear of grief.

[167] He delights in his own rapidity of intuition; and, in harmony
with the half-sensuous philosophy of the Sonnets, exalts, a little
scornfully, in many memorable expressions, the judgment of the
senses, above all slower, more toilsome means of knowledge, scorning
some who fail to see things only because they are so clear:

So here you find where light in darkness lies,
Your light grows dark by losing of your eyes:--

as with some German commentators on Shakespeare.  Appealing always to
actual sensation from men's affected theories, he might seem to
despise learning; as, indeed, he has taken up his deep studies partly
in sport, and demands always the profit of learning in renewed
enjoyment.  Yet he surprises us from time to time by intuitions which
could come only from a deep experience and power of observation; and
men listen to him, old and young, in spite of themselves.  He is
quickly impressible to the slightest clouding of the spirits in
social intercourse, and has his moments of extreme seriousness: his
trial-task may well be, as Rosaline puts it--

To enforce the pained impotent to smile.

But still, through all, he is true to his chosen manner: that gloss
of dainty language is a second nature with him: even at his best he
is not without a certain artifice: the trick of playing on words
never deserts him; and [168] Shakespeare, in whose own genius there
is an element of this very quality, shows us in this graceful, and,
as it seems, studied, portrait, his enjoyment of it.

As happens with every true dramatist, Shakespeare is for the most
part hidden behind the persons of his creation.  Yet there are
certain of his characters in which we feel that there is something of
self-portraiture.  And it is not so much in his grander, more subtle
and ingenious creations that we feel this--in Hamlet and King Lear--
as in those slighter and more spontaneously developed figures, who,
while far from playing principal parts, are yet distinguished by a
peculiar happiness and delicate ease in the drawing of them; figures
which possess, above all, that winning attractiveness which there is
no man but would willingly exercise, and which resemble those works
of art which, though not meant to be very great or imposing, are yet
wrought of the choicest material.  Mercutio, in Romeo and Juliet,
belongs to this group of Shakespeare's characters--versatile,
mercurial people, such as make good actors, and in whom the

nimble spirits of the arteries,

the finer but still merely animal elements of great wit, predominate.
A careful delineation of minor, yet expressive traits seems to mark
them out as the characters of his predilection; [169] and it is hard
not to identify him with these more than with others.  Biron, in
Love's Labours Lost, is perhaps the most striking member of this
group.  In this character, which is never quite in touch, never quite
on a perfect level of understanding, with the other persons of the
play, we see, perhaps, a reflex of Shakespeare himself, when he has
just become able to stand aside from and estimate the first period of
his poetry.

1878.

NOTES

162. *Act V. Scene II.  Return.



"MEASURE FOR MEASURE"

[170] IN Measure for Measure, as in some other of his plays,
Shakespeare has remodelled an earlier and somewhat rough composition
to "finer issues," suffering much to remain as it had come from the
less skilful hand, and not raising the whole of his work to an equal
degree of intensity.  Hence perhaps some of that depth and
weightiness which make this play so impressive, as with the true seal
of experience, like a fragment of life itself, rough and disjointed
indeed, but forced to yield in places its profounder meaning.  In
Measure for Measure, in contrast with the flawless execution of Romeo
and Juliet, Shakespeare has spent his art in just enough modification
of the scheme of the older play to make it exponent of this purpose,
adapting its terrible essential incidents, so that Coleridge found it
the only painful work among Shakespeare's dramas, and leaving for the
reader of to-day more than the usual number of difficult expressions;
but infusing a lavish colour and a profound significance into it, so
that under his [171] touch certain select portions of it rise far
above the level of all but his own best poetry, and working out of it
a morality so characteristic that the play might well pass for the
central expression of his moral judgments.  It remains a comedy, as
indeed is congruous with the bland, half-humorous equity which
informs the whole composition, sinking from the heights of sorrow and
terror into the rough scheme of the earlier piece; yet it is hardly
less full of what is really tragic in man's existence than if Claudio
had indeed "stooped to death."  Even the humorous concluding scenes
have traits of special grace, retaining in less emphatic passages a
stray lire or word of power, as it seems, so that we watch to the end
for the traces where the nobler hand has glanced along, leaving its
vestiges, as if accidentally or wastefully, in the rising of the
style.

The interest of Measure for Measure, therefore, is partly that of an
old story told over again.  We measure with curiosity that variety of
resources which has enabled Shakespeare to refashion the original
material with a higher motive; adding to the intricacy of the piece,
yet so modifying its structure as to give the whole almost the unity
of a single scene; lending, by the light of a philosophy which dwells
much on what is complex and subtle in our nature, a true human
propriety to its strange and unexpected turns of feeling and
character, to incidents so [172] difficult as the fall of Angelo, and
the subsequent reconciliation of Isabella, so that she pleads
successfully for his life.  It was from Whetstone, a contemporary
English writer, that Shakespeare derived the outline of Cinthio's
"rare history" of Promos and Cassandra, one of that numerous class of
Italian stories, like Boccaccio's Tancred of Salerno, in which the
mere energy of southern passion has everything its own way, and
which, though they may repel many a northern reader by a certain
crudity in their colouring, seem to have been full of fascination for
the Elizabethan age.  This story, as it appears in Whetstone's
endless comedy, is almost as rough as the roughest episode of actual
criminal life.  But the play seems never to have been acted, and some
time after its publication Whetstone himself turned the thing into a
tale, included in his Heptameron of Civil Discourses, where it still
figures as a genuine piece, with touches of undesigned poetry, a
quaint field-flower here and there of diction or sentiment, the whole
strung up to an effective brevity, and with the fragrance of that
admirable age of literature all about it.  Here, then, there is
something of the original Italian colour: in this narrative
Shakespeare may well have caught the first glimpse of a composition
with nobler proportions; and some artless sketch from his own hand,
perhaps, putting together his first impressions, insinuated itself
between Whetstone's work and the play as we actually read it.  Out
[173] of these insignificant sources Shakespeare's play rises, full
of solemn expression, and with a profoundly designed beauty, the new
body of a higher, though sometimes remote and difficult poetry,
escaping from the imperfect relics of the old story, yet not wholly
transformed, and even as it stands but the preparation only, we might
think, of a still more imposing design.  For once we have in it a
real example of that sort of writing which is sometimes described as
suggestive, and which by the help of certain subtly calculated hints
only, brings into distinct shape the reader's own half-developed
imaginings.  Often the quality is attributed to writing merely vague
and unrealised, but in Measure for Measure, quite certainly,
Shakespeare has directed the attention of sympathetic readers along
certain channels of meditation beyond the immediate scope of his
work.

Measure for Measure, therefore, by the quality of these higher
designs, woven by his strange magic on a texture of poorer quality,
is hardly less indicative than Hamlet even, of Shakespeare's reason,
of his power of moral interpretation.  It deals, not like Hamlet with
the problems which beset one of exceptional temperament, but with
mere human nature.  It brings before us a group of persons,
attractive, full of desire, vessels of the genial, seed-bearing
powers of nature, a gaudy existence flowering out over the old court
and city of Vienna, a spectacle of the fulness and [174] pride of
life which to some may seem to touch the verge of wantonness.  Behind
this group of people, behind their various action, Shakespeare
inspires in us the sense of a strong tyranny of nature and
circumstance.  Then what shall there be on this side of it--on our
side, the spectators' side, of this painted screen, with its puppets
who are really glad or sorry all the time? what philosophy of life,
what sort of equity?

Stimulated to read more carefully by Shakespeare's own profounder
touches, the reader will note the vivid reality, the subtle
interchange of light and shade, the strongly contrasted characters of
this group of persons, passing across the stage so quickly.  The
slightest of them is at least not ill-natured: the meanest of them
can put forth a plea for existence--Truly, sir, I am a poor fellow
that would live!--they are never sure of themselves, even in the
strong tower of a cold unimpressible nature: they are capable of many
friendships and of a true dignity in danger, giving each other a
sympathetic, if transitory, regret--one sorry that another "should be
foolishly lost at a game of tick-tack."  Words which seem to exhaust
man's deepest sentiment concerning death and life are put on the lips
of a gilded, witless youth; and the saintly Isabella feels fire creep
along her, kindling her tongue to eloquence at the suggestion of
shame.  In places the shadow deepens: death intrudes itself on the
scene, as among other [175] things "a great disguiser," blanching the
features of youth and spoiling its goodly hair, touching the fine
Claudio even with its disgraceful associations.  As in Orcagna's
fresco at Pisa, it comes capriciously, giving many and long reprieves
to Barnardine, who has been waiting for it nine years in prison,
taking another thence by fever, another by mistake of judgment,
embracing others in the midst of their music and song.  The little
mirror of existence, which reflects to each for a moment the stage on
which he plays, is broken at last by a capricious accident; while all
alike, in their yearning for untasted enjoyment, are really
discounting their days, grasping so hastily and accepting so
inexactly the precious pieces.  The Duke's quaint but excellent
moralising at the beginning of the third act does but express, like
the chorus of a Greek play, the spirit of the passing incidents.  To
him in Shakespeare's play, to a few here and there in the actual
world, this strange practical paradox of our life, so unwise in its
eager haste, reveals itself in all its clearness.

The Duke disguised as a friar, with his curious moralising on life
and death, and Isabella in her first mood of renunciation, a thing
"ensky'd and sainted," come with the quiet of the cloister as a
relief to this lust and pride of life: like some grey monastic
picture hung on the wall of a gaudy room, their presence cools the
heated air of the piece.  For a moment we [176] are within the placid
conventual walls, whither they fancy at first that the Duke has come
as a man crossed in love, with Friar Thomas and Friar Peter, calling
each other by their homely, English names, or at the nunnery among
the novices, with their little limited privileges, where

If you speak you must not show your face,
Or if you show your face you must not speak.

Not less precious for this relief in the general structure of the
piece, than for its own peculiar graces is the episode of Mariana, a
creature wholly of Shakespeare's invention, told, by way of
interlude, in subdued prose.  The moated grange, with its dejected
mistress, its long, listless, discontented days, where we hear only
the voice of a boy broken off suddenly in the midst of one of the
loveliest songs of Shakespeare, or of Shakespeare's school,* is the
pleasantest of many glimpses we get here of pleasant places--the
field without the town, Angelo's garden-house, the consecrated
fountain.  Indirectly it has suggested two of the most perfect
compositions among the poetry of our own generation.  Again it is a
picture within a picture, but with fainter lines and a greyer
atmosphere: we have here the same passions, the same wrongs, the same
continuance of affection, the same crying out upon death, as in the
nearer and larger piece, though softened, and reduced to the mood of
a more dreamy scene.

[177] Of Angelo we may feel at first sight inclined to say only
guarda e passa! or to ask whether he is indeed psychologically
possible.  In the old story, he figures as an embodiment of pure and
unmodified evil, like "Hyliogabalus of Rome or Denis of Sicyll."  But
the embodiment of pure evil is no proper subject of art, and
Shakespeare, in the spirit of a philosophy which dwells much on the
complications of outward circumstance with men's inclinations, turns
into a subtle study in casuistry this incident of the austere judge
fallen suddenly into utmost corruption by a momentary contact with
supreme purity.  But the main interest in Measure for Measure is not,
as in Promos and Cassandra, in the relation of Isabella and Angelo,
but rather in the relation of Claudio and Isabella.

Greek tragedy in some of its noblest products has taken for its theme
the love of a sister, a sentiment unimpassioned indeed, purifying by
the very spectacle of its passionlessness, but capable of a fierce
and almost animal strength if informed for a moment by pity and
regret.  At first Isabella comes upon the scene as a tranquillising
influence in it.  But Shakespeare, in the development of the action,
brings quite different and unexpected qualities out of her.  It is
his characteristic poetry to expose this cold, chastened personality,
respected even by the worldly Lucio as "something ensky'd and
sainted, and almost an immortal spirit," to two [178] sharp, shameful
trials, and wring out of her a fiery, revealing eloquence.  Thrown
into the terrible dilemma of the piece, called upon to sacrifice that
cloistral whiteness to sisterly affection, become in a moment the
ground of strong, contending passions, she develops a new character
and shows herself suddenly of kindred with those strangely conceived
women, like Webster's Vittoria, who unite to a seductive sweetness
something of a dangerous and tigerlike changefulness of feeling.  The
swift, vindictive anger leaps, like a white flame, into this white
spirit, and, stripped in a moment of all convention, she stands
before us clear, detached, columnar, among the tender frailties of
the piece.  Cassandra, the original of Isabella in Whetstone's tale,
with the purpose of the Roman Lucretia in her mind, yields gracefully
enough to the conditions of her brother's safety; and to the lighter
reader of Shakespeare there may seem something harshly conceived, or
psychologically impossible even, in the suddenness of the change
wrought in her, as Claudio welcomes for a moment the chance of life
through her compliance with Angelo's will, and he may have a sense
here of flagging skill, as in words less finely handled than in the
preceding scene.  The play, though still not without traces of nobler
handiwork, sinks down, as we know, at last into almost homely comedy,
and it might be supposed that just here the grander manner [179]
deserted it.  But the skill with which Isabella plays upon Claudio's
well-recognised sense of honour, and endeavours by means of that to
insure him beforehand from the acceptance of life on baser terms,
indicates no coming laxity of hand just in this place.  It was rather
that there rose in Shakespeare's conception, as there may for the
reader, as there certainly would in any good acting of the part,
something of that terror, the seeking for which is one of the notes
of romanticism in Shakespeare and his circle.  The stream of ardent
natural affection, poured as sudden hatred  upon the youth condemned
to die, adds an additional note of expression to the horror of the
prison where so much of the scene takes place.  It is not here only
that Shakespeare has conceived of such extreme anger and pity as
putting a sort of genius into simple women, so that their "lips drop
eloquence," and their intuitions interpret that which is often too
hard or fine for manlier reason; and it is Isabella with her grand
imaginative diction, and that poetry laid upon the "prone and
speechless dialect" there is in mere youth itself, who gives
utterance to the equity, the finer judgments of the piece on men and
things.

From behind this group with its subtle lights and shades, its poetry,
its impressive contrasts, Shakespeare, as I said, conveys to us a
strong sense of the tyranny of nature and [180] circumstance over
human action.  The most powerful expressions of this side of
experience might be found here.  The bloodless, impassible
temperament does but wait for its opportunity, for the almost
accidental coherence of time with place, and place with wishing, to
annul its long and patient discipline, and become in a moment the
very opposite of that which under ordinary conditions it seemed to
be, even to itself.  The mere resolute self-assertion of the blood
brings to others special temptations, temptations which, as defects
or over-growths, lie in the very qualities which make them otherwise
imposing or attractive; the very advantage of men's gifts of
intellect or sentiment being dependent on a balance in their use so
delicate that men hardly maintain it always.  Something also must be
conceded to influences merely physical, to the complexion of the
heavens, the skyey influences, shifting as the stars shift; as
something also to the mere caprice of men exercised over each other
in the dispensations of social or political order, to the chance
which makes the life or death of Claudio dependent on Angelo's will.

The many veins of thought which render the poetry of this play so
weighty and impressive unite in the image of Claudio, a flowerlike
young man, whom, prompted by a few hints from Shakespeare, the
imagination easily clothes with all the bravery of youth, as he
crosses the stage before us on his way to death, coming so [181]
hastily to the end of his pilgrimage.  Set in the horrible blackness
of the prison, with its various forms of unsightly death, this flower
seems the braver.  Fallen by "prompture of the blood," the victim of
a suddenly revived law against the common fault of youth like his, he
finds his life forfeited as if by the chance of a lottery.  With that
instinctive clinging to life, which breaks through the subtlest
casuistries of monk or sage apologising for an early death, he
welcomes for a moment the chance of life through his sister's shame,
though he revolts hardly less from the notion of perpetual
imprisonment so repulsive to the buoyant energy of youth.
Familiarised, by the words alike of friends and the indifferent, to
the thought of death, he becomes gentle and subdued indeed, yet more
perhaps through pride than real resignation, and would go down to
darkness at last hard and unblinded.  Called upon suddenly to
encounter his fate, looking with keen and resolute profile straight
before him, he gives utterance to some of the central truths of human
feeling, the sincere, concentrated expression of the recoiling flesh.
Thoughts as profound and poetical as Hamlet's arise in him; and but
for the accidental arrest of sentence he would descend into the dust,
a mere gilded, idle flower of youth indeed, but with what are perhaps
the most eloquent of all Shakespeare's words upon his lips.

As Shakespeare in Measure for Measure has [182] refashioned, after a
nobler pattern, materials already at hand, so that the relics of
other men's poetry are incorporated into his perfect work, so traces
of the old "morality," that early form of dramatic composition which
had for its function the inculcating of some moral theme, survive in
it also, and give it a peculiar ethical interest.  This ethical
interest, though it can escape no attentive reader, yet, in
accordance with that artistic law which demands the predominance of
form everywhere over the mere matter or subject handled, is not to be
wholly separated from the special circumstances, necessities,
embarrassments, of these particular dramatic persons.  The old
"moralities" exemplified most often some rough-and-ready lesson.
Here the very intricacy and subtlety of the moral world itself, the
difficulty of seizing the true relations of so complex a material,
the difficulty of just judgment, of judgment that shall not be
unjust, are the lessons conveyed.  Even in Whetstone's old story this
peculiar vein of moralising comes to the surface: even there, we
notice the tendency to dwell on mixed motives, the contending issues
of action, the presence of virtues and vices alike in unexpected
places, on "the hard choice of two evils," on the "imprisoning" of
men's "real intents."  Measure for Measure is full of expressions
drawn from a profound experience of these casuistries, and that
ethical interest becomes predominant in it: it is no longer Promos
and [183] Cassandra, but Measure for Measure, its new name expressly
suggesting the subject of poetical justice.  The action of the play,
like the action of life itself for the keener observer, develops in
us the conception of this poetical justice, and the yearning to
realise it, the true justice of which Angelo knows nothing, because
it lies for the most part beyond the limits of any acknowledged law.
The idea of justice involves the idea of rights.  But at bottom
rights are equivalent to that which really is, to facts; and the
recognition of his rights therefore, the justice he requires of our
hands, or our thoughts, is the recognition of that which the person,
in his inmost nature, really is; and as sympathy alone can discover
that which really is in matters of feeling and thought, true justice
is in its essence a finer knowledge through love.

'Tis very pregnant:
The jewel that we find we stoop and take it,
Because we see it; but what we do not see
We tread upon, and never think of it.

It is for this finer justice, a justice based on a more delicate
appreciation of the true conditions of men and things, a true respect
of persons in our estimate of actions, that the people in Measure for
Measure cry out as they pass before us; and as the poetry of this
play is full of the peculiarities of Shakespeare's poetry, so in its
ethics it is an epitome of Shakespeare's moral judgments.  They are
the moral judgments of [184] an observer, of one who sits as a
spectator, and knows how the threads in the design before him hold
together under the surface: they are the judgments of the humourist
also, who follows with a half-amused but always pitiful sympathy, the
various ways of human disposition, and sees less distance than
ordinary men between what are called respectively great and little
things.  It is not always that poetry can be the exponent of
morality; but it is this aspect of morals which it represents most
naturally, for this true justice is dependent on just those finer
appreciations which poetry cultivates in us the power of making,
those peculiar valuations of action and its effect which poetry
actually requires.

1874.

NOTES

176.  *Fletcher, in the Bloody Brother, gives the rest of it.
Return.



SHAKESPEARE'S ENGLISH KINGS

[185]

A brittle glory shineth in this face:
As brittle as the glory is the face.

THE English plays of Shakespeare needed but the completion of one
unimportant interval to possess the unity of a popular chronicle from
Richard the Second to Henry the Eighth, and possess, as they actually
stand, the unity of a common motive in the handling of the various
events and persons which they bring before us.  Certain of his
historic dramas, not English, display Shakespeare's mastery in the
development of the heroic nature amid heroic circumstances; and had
he chosen, from English history, to deal with Coeur-de-Lion or Edward
the First, the innate quality of his subject would doubtless have
called into play something of that profound and sombre power which in
Julius Caesar and Macbeth has sounded the depths of mighty character.
True, on the whole, to fact, it is another side of kingship which he
has made prominent in his English histories.  The irony [186] of
kingship--average human nature, flung with a wonderfully pathetic
effect into the vortex of great events; tragedy of everyday quality
heightened in degree only by the conspicuous scene which does but
make those who play their parts there conspicuously unfortunate; the
utterance of common humanity straight from the heart, but refined
like other common things for kingly uses by Shakespeare's unfailing
eloquence: such, unconsciously for the most part, though palpably
enough to the careful reader, is the conception under which
Shakespeare has arranged the lights and shadows of the story of the
English kings, emphasising merely the light and shadow inherent in
it, and keeping very close to the original authorities, not simply in
the general outline of these dramatic histories but sometimes in
their very expression.  Certainly the history itself, as he found it
in Hall, Holinshed, and Stowe, those somewhat picturesque old
chroniclers who had themselves an eye for the dramatic "effects" of
human life, has much of this sentiment already about it.  What he did
not find there was the natural prerogative--such justification, in
kingly, that is to say, in exceptional, qualities, of the exceptional
position, as makes it practicable in the result.  It is no Henriade
he writes, and no history of the English people, but the sad fortunes
of some English kings as conspicuous examples of the ordinary human
condition.  As in a children's [187] story, all princes are in
extremes.  Delightful in the sunshine above the wall into which
chance lifts the flower for a season, they can but plead somewhat
more touchingly than others their everyday weakness in the storm.
Such is the motive that gives unity to these unequal and intermittent
contributions toward a slowly evolved dramatic chronicle, which it
would have taken many days to rehearse; a not distant story from real
life still well remembered in its general course, to which people
might listen now and again, as long as they cared, finding human
nature at least wherever their attention struck ground in it.

He begins with John, and allows indeed to the first of these English
kings a kind of greatness, making the development of the play centre
in the counteraction of his natural gifts--that something of heroic
force about him--by a madness which takes the shape of reckless
impiety, forced especially on men's attention by the terrible
circumstances of his end, in the delineation of which Shakespeare
triumphs, setting, with true poetic tact, this incident of the king's
death, in all the horror of a violent one, amid a scene delicately
suggestive of what is perennially peaceful and genial in the outward
world.  Like the sensual humours of Falstaff in another play, the
presence of the bastard Faulconbridge, with his physical energy and
his unmistakable family likeness--"those limbs [188] which Sir Robert
never holp to make"* contributes to an almost coarse assertion of the
force of nature, of the somewhat ironic preponderance of nature and
circumstance over men's artificial arrangements, to, the recognition
of a certain potent natural aristocracy, which is far from being
always identical with that more formal, heraldic one.  And what is a
coarse fact in the case of Faulconbridge becomes a motive of pathetic
appeal in the wan and babyish Arthur.  The magic with which nature
models tiny and delicate children to the likeness of their rough
fathers is nowhere more justly expressed than in the words of King
Philip.--

Look here upon thy brother Geoffrey's face
These eyes, these brows were moulded out of his:
This little abstract doth contain that large
Which died in Geoffrey; and the hand of time
Shall draw this brief into as huge a volume.

It was perhaps something of a boyish memory of the shocking end of
his father that had distorted the piety of Henry the Third into
superstitious terror.  A frightened soul, himself touched with the
contrary sort of religious madness, doting on all that was alien from
his father's huge ferocity, on the genialities, the soft gilding, of
life, on the genuine interests of art and poetry, to be credited more
than any other person with the deep religious expression of [189]
Westminster Abbey, Henry the Third, picturesque though useless, but
certainly touching, might have furnished Shakespeare, had he filled
up this interval in his series, with precisely the kind of effect he
tends towards in his English plays.  But he found it completer still
in the person and story of Richard the Second, a figure--"that sweet
lovely rose"--which haunts Shakespeare's mind, as it seems long to
have haunted the minds of the English people, as the most touching of
all examples of the irony of kingship.

Henry the Fourth--to look for a moment beyond our immediate subject,
in pursuit of Shakespeare's thought--is presented, of course, in
general outline, as an impersonation of "surviving force:" he has a
certain amount of kingcraft also, a real fitness for great
opportunity.  But still true to his leading motive, Shakespeare, in
King Henry the Fourth, has left the high-water mark of his poetry in
the soliloquy which represents royalty longing vainly for the
toiler's sleep; while the popularity, the showy heroism, of Henry the
Fifth, is used to give emphatic point to the old earthy commonplace
about "wild oats."  The wealth of homely humour in these plays, the
fun coming straight home to all the world, of Fluellen especially in
his unconscious interview with the king, the boisterous earthiness of
Falstaff and his companions, contribute to the same effect.  The
keynote of [190] Shakespeare's treatment is indeed expressed by Henry
the Fifth himself, the greatest of Shakespeare's kings.--"Though I
speak it to you," he says incognito, under cover of night, to a
common soldier on the field, "I think the king is but a man, as I am:
the violet smells to him as it doth to me: all his senses have but
human conditions; and though his affections be higher mounted than
ours yet when they stoop they stoop with like wing."  And, in truth,
the really kingly speeches which Shakespeare assigns to him, as to
other kings weak enough in all but speech, are but a kind of flowers,
worn for, and effective only as personal embellishment.  They combine
to one result with the merely outward and ceremonial ornaments of
royalty, its pageantries, flaunting so naively, so credulously, in
Shakespeare, as in that old medieval time.  And then, the force of
Hotspur is but transient youth, the common heat of youth, in him.
The character of Henry the Sixth again, roi faineant, with La
Pucelle* for his counterfoil, lay in the direct course of
Shakespeare's design: he has done much to fix the sentiment of the
"holy Henry."  Richard the Third, touched, like John, with an effect
of real heroism, is spoiled like him by something of criminal
madness, and reaches his highest level of tragic expression [191]
when circumstances reduce him to terms of mere human nature.--

A horse!  A horse!  My kingdom for a horse!

The Princes in the Tower recall to mind the lot of young Arthur:--

I'll go with thee,
And find the inheritance of this poor child,
His little kingdom of a forced grave.

And when Shakespeare comes to Henry the Eighth, it is not the
superficial though very English splendour of the king himself, but
the really potent and ascendant nature of the butcher's son on the
one hand, and Katharine's subdued reproduction of the sad fortunes of
Richard the Second on the other, that define his central interest.*

With a prescience of the Wars of the Roses, of which his errors were
the original cause, it is Richard who best exposes Shakespeare's own
constant sentiment concerning war, and especially that sort of
civil war which was then recent in English memories.  The soul of
Shakespeare, certainly, was not wanting in a sense of the magnanimity
of warriors.  The grandiose aspects of war, its magnificent
apparelling, he records [192] monumentally enough--the "dressing of
the lists," the lion's heart, its unfaltering haste thither in all
the freshness of youth and morning.--

Not sick although I have to do with death--
The sun doth gild our armour: Up, my Lords!--
I saw young Harry with his beaver on,
His cuisses on his thighs, gallantly arm'd,
Rise from the ground like feather'd Mercury.

Only, with Shakespeare, the afterthought is immediate:--

They come like sacrifices in their trim.

--Will it never be to-day?  I will trot to-morrow a mile, and my
way shall be paved with English faces.

This sentiment Richard reiterates very plaintively, in association
with the delicate sweetness of the English fields, still sweet and
fresh, like London and her other fair towns in that England of
Chaucer, for whose soil the exiled Bolingbroke is made to long so
dangerously, while Richard on his return from Ireland salutes it--

That pale, that white-fac'd shore,--
As a long-parted mother with her child.--
So, weeping, smiling, greet I thee, my earth!
And do thee favour with my royal hands.--

Then (of Bolingbroke)

Ere the crown he looks for live in peace,
Ten thousand bloody crowns of mothers' sons
Shall ill become the flower of England's face;
Change the complexion of her maid-pale peace
To scarlet indignation, and bedew
My pastures' grass with faithful English blood.--

[193]

Why have they dared to march?--

asks York,

So many miles upon her peaceful bosom,
Frighting her pale-fac'd visages with war?--

waking, according to Richard,

Our peace, which in our country's cradle,
Draws the sweet infant breath of gentle sleep:--

bedrenching "with crimson tempest"

The fresh green lap of fair king Richard's land:--

frighting "fair peace" from "our quiet confines," laying

The summer's dust with showers of blood,
Rained from the wounds of slaughter'd Englishmen:

bruising

Her flowerets with the armed hoofs
Of hostile paces.

Perhaps it is not too fanciful to note in this play a peculiar recoil
from the mere instruments of warfare, the contact of the "rude ribs,"
the "flint bosom," of Barkloughly Castle or Pomfret or

Julius Caesar's ill-erected tower:

the

Boisterous untun'd drums
With harsh-resounding trumpets' dreadful bray
And grating shock of wrathful iron arms.

It is as if the lax, soft beauty of the king took effect, at least by
contrast, on everything beside.  One gracious prerogative, certainly,
Shakespeare's [194]  English kings possess: they are a very eloquent
company, and Richard is the most sweet-tongued of them all.  In no
other play perhaps is there such a flush of those gay, fresh,
variegated flowers of speech--colour and figure, not lightly attached
to, but fused into, the very phrase itself--which Shakespeare cannot
help dispensing to his characters, as in this "play of the Deposing
of King Richard the Second," an exquisite poet if he is nothing else,
from first to last, in light and gloom alike, able to see all things
poetically, to give a poetic turn to his conduct of them, and
refreshing with his golden language the tritest aspects of that
ironic contrast between the pretensions of a king and the actual
necessities of his destiny.  What a garden of words!  With him, blank
verse, infinitely graceful, deliberate, musical in inflexion, becomes
indeed a true "verse royal," that rhyming lapse, which to the
Shakespearian ear, at least in youth, came as the last touch of
refinement on it, being here doubly appropriate.  His eloquence
blends with that fatal beauty, of which he was so frankly aware, so
amiable to his friends, to his wife, of the effects of which on the
people his enemies were so much afraid, on which Shakespeare himself
dwells so attentively as the "royal blood" comes and goes in the face
with his rapid changes of temper.  As happens with sensitive natures,
it attunes him to a congruous suavity of manners, by which anger
itself became flattering: [195] it blends with his merely youthful
hopefulness and high spirits, his sympathetic love for gay people,
things, apparel--"his cote of gold and stone, valued at thirty
thousand marks," the novel Italian fashions he preferred, as also
with those real amiabilities that made people forget the darker
touches of his character, but never tire of the pathetic rehearsal of
his fall, the meekness of which would have seemed merely abject in a
less graceful performer.

Yet it is only fair to say that in the painstaking "revival" of King
Richard the Second, by the late Charles Kean, those who were very
young thirty years ago were afforded much more than Shakespeare's
play could ever have been before--the very person of the king based
on the stately old portrait in Westminster Abbey, "the earliest
extant contemporary likeness of any English sovereign," the grace,
the winning pathos, the sympathetic voice of the player, the tasteful
archaeology confronting vulgar modern London with a scenic
reproduction, for once really agreeable, of the London of Chaucer.
In the hands of Kean the play became like an exquisite performance on
the violin.

The long agony of one so gaily painted by nature's self, from his
"tragic abdication" till the hour in which he

Sluiced out his innocent soul thro' streams of blood,

was for playwrights a subject ready to hand, and [196] became early
the theme of a popular drama, of which some have fancied surviving
favourite fragments in the rhymed parts of Shakespeare's work.

The king Richard of Yngland
Was in his flowris then regnand:
But his flowris efter sone
Fadyt, and ware all undone:--

says the old chronicle.  Strangely enough, Shakespeare supposes him
an over-confident believer in that divine right of kings, of which
people in Shakespeare's time were coming to hear so much; a general
right, sealed to him (so Richard is made to think) as an ineradicable
personal gift by the touch--stream rather, over head and breast and
shoulders--of the "holy oil" of his consecration at Westminster; not,
however, through some oversight, the genuine balm used at the
coronation of his successor, given, according to legend, by the
Blessed Virgin to Saint Thomas of Canterbury.  Richard himself found
that, it was said, among other forgotten treasures, at the crisis of
his changing fortunes, and vainly sought reconsecration therewith--
understood, wistfully, that it was reserved for his happier rival.
And yet his coronation, by the pageantry, the amplitude, the learned
care, of its order, so lengthy that the king, then only eleven years
of age, and fasting, as a communicant at the ceremony, was carried
away in a faint, fixed the type under which it has ever [197] since
continued.  And nowhere is there so emphatic a reiteration as in
Richard the Second of the sentiment which those singular rites were
calculated to produce.

Not all the water in the rough rude sea
Can wash the balm from an anointed king,--

as supplementing another, almost supernatural, right.--"Edward's
seven sons," of whom Richard's father was one,

Were as seven phials of his sacred blood.

But this, too, in the hands of Shakespeare, becomes for him, like any
other of those fantastic, ineffectual, easily discredited, personal
graces, as capricious in its operation on men's wills as merely
physical beauty, kindling himself to eloquence indeed, but only
giving double pathos to insults which "barbarism itself" might have
pitied--the dust in his face, as he returns, through the streets of
London, a prisoner in the train of his victorious enemy.

How soon my sorrow hath destroyed my face!

he cries, in that most poetic invention of the mirror scene, which
does but reinforce again that physical charm which all confessed.
The sense of "divine right" in kings is found to act not so much as a
secret of power over others, as of infatuation to themselves.  And of
all those personal gifts the one which alone never altogether fails
him is just that royal utterance, his [198] appreciation of the
poetry of his own hapless lot, an eloquent self-pity, infecting
others in spite of themselves, till they too become irresistibly
eloquent about him.

In the Roman Pontifical, of which the order of Coronation is really
a part, there is no form for the inverse process, no rite of
"degradation," such as that by which an offending priest or bishop
may be deprived, if not of the essential quality of "orders," yet,
one by one, of its outward dignities.  It is as if Shakespeare had
had in mind some such inverted rite, like those old ecclesiastical or
military ones, by which human hardness, or human justice, adds the
last touch of unkindness to the execution of its sentences, in the
scene where Richard "deposes" himself, as in some long, agonising
ceremony, reflectively drawn out, with an extraordinary refinement of
intelligence and variety of piteous appeal, but also with a felicity
of poetic invention, which puts these pages into a very select class,
with the finest "vermeil and ivory" work of Chatterton or Keats.

Fetch hither Richard that in common view
He may surrender!--

And Richard more than concurs: he throws himself into the part,
realises a type, falls gracefully as on the world's stage.--Why is he
sent for?

To do that office of thine own good will
Which tired majesty did make thee offer.--

Now mark me! how I will undo myself.

[199] "Hath Bolingbroke deposed thine intellect?" the Queen asks him,
on his way to the Tower:--

Hath Bolingbroke
Deposed thine intellect? hath he been in thy heart?

And in truth, but for that adventitious poetic gold, it would be only
"plume-plucked Richard."--

I find myself a traitor with the rest,
For I have given here my soul's consent
To undeck the pompous body of a king.

He is duly reminded, indeed, how

That which in mean men we entitle patience
Is pale cold cowardice in noble breasts.

Yet at least within the poetic bounds of Shakespeare's play, through
Shakespeare's bountiful gifts, his desire seems fulfilled.--

O! that I were as great
As is my grief.

And his grief becomes nothing less than a central expression of all
that in the revolutions of Fortune's wheel goes down in the world.

No!  Shakespeare's kings are not, nor are meant to be, great men:
rather, little or quite ordinary humanity, thrust upon greatness,
with those pathetic results, the natural self-pity of the weak
heightened in them into irresistible appeal to others as the net
result of their royal prerogative.  One after another, they seem to
lie composed in Shakespeare's embalming pages, with just that touch
of nature about them, [200] making the whole world akin, which has
infused into their tombs at Westminster a rare poetic grace.  It is
that irony of kingship, the sense that it is in its happiness child's
play, in its sorrows, after all, but children's grief, which gives
its finer accent to all the changeful feeling of these wonderful
speeches:--the great meekness of the graceful, wild creature, tamed
at last.--

Give Richard leave to live till Richard die!

his somewhat abject fear of death, turning to acquiescence at moments
of extreme weariness:--

My large kingdom for a little grave!
A little little grave, an obscure grave!--

his religious appeal in the last reserve, with its bold reference to
the judgment of Pilate, as he thinks once more of his "anointing."

And as happens with children he attains contentment finally in the
merely passive recognition of superior strength, in the naturalness
of the result of the great battle as a matter of course, and
experiences something of the royal prerogative of poetry to obscure,
or at least to attune and soften men's griefs.  As in some sweet
anthem of Handel, the sufferer, who put finger to the organ under the
utmost pressure of mental conflict, extracts a kind of peace at last
from the mere skill with which he sets his distress to music.--

Beshrew thee, Cousin, that didst lead me forth
Of that sweet way I was in to despair!

[201] "With Cain go wander through the shades of night!" cries the
new king to the gaoler Exton, dissimulating his share in the murder
he is thought to have suggested; and in truth there is something of
the murdered Abel about Shakespeare's Richard.  The fact seems to be
that he died of "waste and a broken heart:" it was by way of proof
that his end had been a natural one that, stifling a real fear of the
face, the face of Richard, on men's minds, with the added pleading
now of all dead faces, Henry exposed the corpse to general view; and
Shakespeare, in bringing it on the stage, in the last scene of his
play, does but follow out the motive with which he has emphasised
Richard's physical beauty all through it--that "most beauteous inn,"
as the Queen says quaintly, meeting him on the way to death--
residence, then soon to be deserted, of that wayward, frenzied, but
withal so affectionate soul.  Though the body did not go to
Westminster immediately, his tomb,

That small model of the barren earth
Which serves as paste and cover to our bones,*

the effigy clasping the hand of his youthful consort, was already
prepared there, with "rich [202] gilding and ornaments," monument of
poetic regret, for Queen Anne of Bohemia, not of course the "Queen"
of Shakespeare, who however seems to have transferred to this second
wife something of Richard's wildly proclaimed affection for the
first.  In this way, through the connecting link of that sacred spot,
our thoughts once more associate Richard's two fallacious
prerogatives, his personal beauty and his "anointing."

According to Johnson, Richard the Second is one of those plays which
Shakespeare has "apparently revised;" and how doubly delightful
Shakespeare is where he seems to have revised!  "Would that he had
blotted a thousand"--a thousand hasty phrases, we may venture once
more to say with his earlier critic, now that the tiresome German
superstition has passed away which challenged us to a dogmatic faith
in the plenary verbal inspiration of every one of Shakespeare's
clowns.  Like some melodiously contending anthem of Handle's, I said,
of Richard's meek "undoing" of himself in the mirror-scene; and, in
fact, the play of Richard the Second does, like a musical
composition, possess a certain concentration of all its parts, a
simple continuity, an evenness in execution, which are rare in the
great dramatist.  With Romeo and Juliet, that perfect symphony
(symphony of three independent poetic forms set in a grander one*
which it is the merit of German [203] criticism to have detected) it
belongs to a small group of plays, where, by happy birth and
consistent evolution, dramatic form approaches to something like the
unity of a lyrical ballad, a lyric, a song, a single strain of music.
Which sort of poetry we are to account the highest, is perhaps a
barren question.  Yet if, in art generally, unity of impression is a
note of what is perfect, then lyric poetry, which in spite of complex
structure often preserves the unity of a single passionate
ejaculation, would rank higher than dramatic poetry, where,
especially to the reader, as distinguished from the spectator
assisting at a theatrical performance, there must always be a sense
of the effort necessary to keep the various parts from flying
asunder, a sense of imperfect continuity, such as the older criticism
vainly sought to obviate by the rule of the dramatic "unities."  It
follows that a play attains artistic perfection just in proportion as
it approaches that unity of lyrical effect, as if a song or ballad
were still lying at the root of it, all the various expression of the
conflict of character and circumstance falling at last into the
compass of a single melody, or musical theme.  As, historically, the
earliest classic drama arose out of the chorus, from which this or
that person, this or that episode, detached itself, so, into the
unity of a choric song the perfect drama ever tends to return, its
intellectual scope deepened, complicated, enlarged, but still with an
unmistakable [204] singleness, or identity, in its impression on the
mind.  Just there, in that vivid single impression left on the mind
when all is over, not in any mechanical limitation of time and place,
is the secret of the "unities"--the true imaginative unity--of the
drama.

1889.

NOTES

188. *Elinor.  Do you not read some tokens of my son (Coeur-de-Lion)
/ In the large composition of this man?

190. *Perhaps the one person of genius in these English plays.

The spirit of deep prophecy she hath,
Exceeding the nine Sibyls of old Rome:
What's past and what's to come she can descry.

191. *Proposing in this paper to trace the leading sentiment in
Shakespeare's English Plays as a sort of popular dramatic chronicle,
I have left untouched the question how much (or, in the case of Henry
the Sixth and Henry the Eighth, how little) of them may be really
his: how far inferior hands have contributed to a result, true on the
whole to the greater, that is to say, the Shakespearian elements in
them.

201. *Perhaps a double entendre:--of any ordinary grave, as
comprising, in effect, the whole small earth now left to its occupant
or, of such a tomb as Richard's in particular, with its actual model,
or effigy, of the clay of him.  Both senses are so characteristic
that it would be a pity to lose either.

202. *The Sonnet: the Aubade: the Epithalamium.



DANTE GABRIEL ROSSETTI

[205] IT was characteristic of a poet who had ever something about
him of mystic isolation, and will still appeal perhaps, though with a
name it may seem now established in English literature, to a special
and limited audience, that some of his poems had won a kind of
exquisite fame before they were in the full sense published.  The
Blessed Damozel, although actually printed twice before the year
1870, was eagerly circulated in manuscript; and the volume which it
now opens came at last to satisfy a long-standing curiosity as to the
poet, whose pictures also had become an object of the same peculiar
kind of interest.  For those poems were the work of a painter,
understood to belong to, and to be indeed the leader, of a new school
then rising into note; and the reader of to-day may observe already,
in The Blessed Damozel, written at the age of eighteen, a
prefigurement of the chief characteristics of that school, as he will
recognise in it also, in proportion as he really knows Rossetti, many
of the characteristics which are most markedly personal and his own.
Common [206] to that school and to him, and in both alike of primary
significance, was the quality of sincerity, already felt as one of
the charms of that earliest poem--a perfect sincerity, taking effect
in the deliberate use of the most direct and unconventional
expression, for the conveyance of a poetic sense which recognised no
conventional standard of what poetry was called upon to be.  At a
time when poetic originality in England might seem to have had its
utmost play, here was certainly one new poet more, with a structure
and music of verse, a vocabulary, an accent, unmistakably novel, yet
felt to be no mere tricks of manner adopted with a view to forcing
attention--an accent which might rather count as the very seal of
reality on one man's own proper speech; as that speech itself was the
wholly natural expression of certain wonderful things he really felt
and saw.  Here was one, who had a matter to present to his readers,
to himself at least, in the first instance, so valuable, so real and
definite, that his primary aim, as regards form or expression in his
verse, would be but its exact equivalence to those data within.  That
he had this gift of transparency in language--the control of a style
which did but obediently shift and shape itself to the mental motion,
as a well-trained hand can follow on the tracing-paper the outline of
an original drawing below it, was proved afterwards by a volume of
typically perfect translations from the delightful but difficult
[207] "early Italian poets:" such transparency being indeed the
secret of all genuine style, of all such style as can truly belong to
one man and not to another.  His own meaning was always personal and
even recondite, in a certain sense learned and casuistical, sometimes
complex or obscure; but the term was always, one could see,
deliberately chosen from many competitors, as the just transcript of
that peculiar phase of soul which he alone knew, precisely as he knew
it.

One of the peculiarities of The Blessed Damozel was a definiteness of
sensible imagery, which seemed almost grotesque to some, and was
strange, above all, in a theme so profoundly visionary.  The gold bar
of heaven from which she leaned, her hair yellow like ripe corn, are
but examples of a general treatment, as naively detailed as the
pictures of those early painters contemporary with Dante, who has
shown a similar care for minute and definite imagery in his verse;
there, too, in the very midst of profoundly mystic vision.  Such
definition of outline is indeed one among many points in which
Rossetti resembles the great Italian poet, of whom, led to him at
first by family circumstances, he was ever a lover--a "servant and
singer," faithful as Dante, "of Florence and of Beatrice"--with some
close inward conformities of genius also, independent of any mere
circumstances of education.  It was said by a critic of the last
century, not wisely though agreeably to the practice of his time,
[208] that poetry rejoices in abstractions.  For Rossetti, as for
Dante, without question on his part, the first condition of the
poetic way of seeing and presenting things is particularisation.
"Tell me now," he writes, for Villon's

Dictes-moy ou, n'en quel pays,
Est Flora, la belle Romaine--

Tell me now, in what hidden way is
Lady Flora the lovely Roman:

--"way," in which one might actually chance to meet her; the
unmistakably poetic effect of the couplet in English being dependent
on the definiteness of that single word (though actually lighted on
in the search after a difficult double rhyme) for which every one
else would have written, like Villon himself, a more general one,
just equivalent to place or region.

And this delight in concrete definition is allied with another of his
conformities to Dante, the really imaginative vividness, namely, of
his personifications--his hold upon them, or rather their hold upon
him, with the force of a Frankenstein, when once they have taken life
from him.  Not Death only and Sleep, for instance, and the winged
spirit of Love, but certain particular aspects of them, a whole
"populace" of special hours and places, "the hour" even "which might
have been, yet might not be," are living creatures, with hands and
eyes and articulate voices.

[209]

Stands it not by the door--
Love's Hour--till she and I shall meet;
With bodiless form and unapparent feet
That cast no shadow yet before,
Though round its head the dawn begins to pour
The breath that makes day sweet?--

Nay, why
Name the dead hours?  I mind them well:
Their ghosts in many darkened doorways dwell
With desolate eyes to know them by.

Poetry as a mania--one of Plato's two higher forms of "divine" mania-
-has, in all its species, a mere insanity incidental to it, the
"defect of its quality," into which it may lapse in its moment of
weakness; and the insanity which follows a vivid poetic
anthropomorphism like that of Rossetti may be noted here and there in
his work, in a forced and almost grotesque materialising of
abstractions, as Dante also became at times a mere subject of the
scholastic realism of the Middle Age.

In Love's Nocturn and The Stream's Secret, congruously perhaps with a
certain feverishness of soul in the moods they present, there is at
times a near approach (may it be said?) to such insanity of realism--

Pity and love shall burn
In her pressed cheek and cherishing hands;
And from the living spirit of love that stands
Between her lips to soothe and yearn,
Each separate breath shall clasp me round in turn
And loose my spirit's bands.

[210] But even if we concede this; even if we allow, in the very plan
of those two compositions, something of the literary conceit--what
exquisite, what novel flowers of poetry, we must admit them to be, as
they stand!  In the one, what a delight in all the natural beauty of
water, all its details for the eye of a painter; in the other, how
subtle and fine the imaginative hold upon all the secret ways of
sleep and dreams!  In both of them, with much the same attitude and
tone, Love--sick and doubtful Love--would fain inquire of what lies
below the surface of sleep, and below the water; stream or dream
being forced to speak by Love's powerful "control"; and the poet
would have it foretell the fortune, issue, and event of his wasting
passion.  Such artifices, indeed, were not unknown in the old
Provencal poetry of which Dante had learned something.  Only, in
Rossetti at least, they are redeemed by a serious purpose, by that
sincerity of his, which allies itself readily to a serious beauty, a
sort of grandeur of literary workmanship, to a great style.  One
seems to hear there a really new kind of poetic utterance, with
effects which have nothing else like them; as there is nothing else,
for instance, like the narrative of Jacob's Dream in Genesis, or
Blake's design of the Singing of the Morning Stars, or Addison's
Nineteenth Psalm.

With him indeed, as in some revival of the old mythopoeic age, common
things--dawn, [211] noon, night--are full of human or personal
expression, full of sentiment.  The lovely little sceneries scattered
up and down his poems, glimpses of a landscape, not indeed of broad
open-air effects, but rather that of a painter concentrated upon the
picturesque effect of one or two selected objects at a time--the
"hollow brimmed with mist," or the "ruined weir," as he sees it from
one of the windows, or reflected in one of the mirrors of his "house
of life" (the vignettes for instance seen by Rose Mary in the magic
beryl) attest, by their very freshness and simplicity, to a pictorial
or descriptive power in dealing with the inanimate world, which is
certainly also one half of the charm, in that other, more remote and
mystic, use of it.  For with Rossetti this sense of lifeless nature,
after all, is translated to a higher service, in which it does but
incorporate itself with some phase of strong emotion.  Every one
understands how this may happen at critical moments of life; what a
weirdly expressive soul may have crept, even in full noonday, into
"the white-flower'd elder-thicket," when Godiva saw it "gleam through
the Gothic archways in the wall," at the end of her terrible ride.
To Rossetti it is so always, because to him life is a crisis at every
moment.  A sustained impressibility towards the mysterious conditions
of man's everyday life, towards the very mystery itself in it, gives
a singular gravity to all his work: those matters never became trite
[212] to him.  But throughout, it is the ideal intensity of love--of
love based upon a perfect yet peculiar type of physical or material
beauty--which is enthroned in the midst of those mysterious powers;
Youth and Death, Destiny and Fortune, Fame, Poetic Fame, Memory,
Oblivion, and the like.  Rossetti is one of those who, in the words
of Merimee, se passionnent pour la passion, one of Love's lovers.

And yet, again as with Dante, to speak of his ideal type of beauty as
material, is partly misleading.  Spirit and matter, indeed, have been
for the most part opposed, with a false contrast or antagonism by
schoolmen, whose artificial creation those abstractions really are.
In our actual concrete experience, the two trains of phenomena which
the words matter and spirit do but roughly distinguish, play
inextricably into each other.  Practically, the church of the Middle
Age by its aesthetic worship, its sacramentalism, its real faith in
the resurrection of the flesh, had set itself against that Manichean
opposition of spirit and matter, and its results in men's way of
taking life; and in this, Dante is the central representative of its
spirit.  To him, in the vehement and impassioned heat of his
conceptions, the material and the spiritual are fused and blent: if
the spiritual attains the definite visibility of a crystal, what is
material loses its earthiness and impurity.  And here again, by force
of instinct, Rossetti [213] is one with him.  His chosen type of
beauty is one,

Whose speech Truth knows not from her thought,
Nor Love her body from her soul.

Like Dante, he knows no region of spirit which shall not be sensuous
also, or material.  The shadowy world, which he realises so
powerfully, has still the ways and houses, the land and water, the
light and darkness, the fire and flowers, that had so much to do in
the moulding of those bodily powers and aspects which counted for so
large a part of the soul, here.

For Rossetti, then, the great affections of persons to each other,
swayed and determined, in the case of his highly pictorial genius,
mainly by that so-called material loveliness, formed the great
undeniable reality in things, the solid resisting substance, in a
world where all beside might be but shadow.  The fortunes of those
affections--of the great love so determined; its casuistries, its
languor sometimes; above all, its sorrows; its fortunate or
unfortunate collisions with those other great matters; how it looks,
as the long day of life goes round, in the light and shadow of them:
all this, conceived with an abundant imagination, and a deep, a
philosophic, reflectiveness, is the matter of his verse, and
especially of what he designed as his chief poetic work, "a work to
be called The House of Life," towards which the majority of his
sonnets and songs were contributions.

[214] The dwelling-place in which one finds oneself by chance or
destiny, yet can partly fashion for oneself; never properly one's own
at all, if it be changed too lightly; in which every object has its
associations--the dim mirrors, the portraits, the lamps, the books,
the hair-tresses of the dead and visionary magic crystals in the
secret drawers, the names and words scratched on the windows, windows
open upon prospects the saddest or the sweetest; the house one must
quit, yet taking perhaps, how much of its quietly active light and
colour along with us!--grown now to be a kind of raiment to one's
body, as the body, according to Swedenborg, is but the raiment of the
soul--under that image, the whole of Rossetti's work might count as a
House of Life, of which he is but the "Interpreter."  And it is a
"haunted" house.  A sense of power in love, defying distance, and
those barriers which are so much more than physical distance, of
unutterable desire penetrating into the world of sleep, however
"lead-bound," was one of those anticipative notes obscurely struck in
The Blessed Damozel, and, in his later work, makes him speak
sometimes almost like a believer in mesmerism.  Dream-land, as we
said, with its "phantoms of the body," deftly coming and going on
love's service, is to him, in no mere fancy or figure of speech, a
real country, a veritable expansion of, or addition to, our waking
life; and he did well perhaps to wait carefully upon sleep, for the
lack [215] of it became mortal disease with him.  One may even
recognise a sort of morbid and over-hasty making-ready for death
itself, which increases on him; thoughts concerning it, its
imageries, coming with a frequency and importunity, in excess, one
might think, of even the very saddest, quite wholesome wisdom.

And indeed the publication of his second volume of Ballads and
Sonnets preceded his death by scarcely a twelvemonth.  That volume
bears witness to the reverse of any failure of power, or falling-off
from his early standard of literary perfection, in every one of his
then accustomed forms of poetry--the song, the sonnet, and the
ballad.  The newly printed sonnets, now completing The House of Life,
certainly advanced beyond those earlier ones, in clearness; his
dramatic power in the ballad, was here at its height; while one
monumental, gnomic piece, Soothsay, testifies, more clearly even than
the Nineveh of his first volume, to the reflective force, the dry
reason, always at work behind his imaginative creations, which at no
time dispensed with a genuine intellectual structure.  For in matters
of pure reflection also, Rossetti maintained the painter's sensuous
clearness of conception; and this has something to do with the
capacity, largely illustrated by his ballads, of telling some red-
hearted story of impassioned action with effect.

Have there, in very deed, been ages, in which [216] the external
conditions of poetry such as Rossetti's were of more spontaneous
growth than in our own?  The archaic side of Rossetti's work, his
preferences in regard to earlier poetry, connect him with those who
have certainly thought so, who fancied they could have breathed more
largely in the age of Chaucer, or of Ronsard, in one of those ages,
in the words of Stendhal--ces siecles de passions ou les ames
pouvaient se livrer franchement a la plus haute exaltation, quand les
passions qui font la possibilite We may think, perhaps, that such old
time as that has never really existed except in the fancy of poets;
but it was to find it, that Rossetti turned so often from modern life
to the chronicle of the past.  Old Scotch history, perhaps beyond any
other, is strong in the matter of heroic and vehement hatreds and
love, the tragic Mary herself being but the perfect blossom of them;
and it is from that history that Rossetti has taken the subjects of
the two longer ballads of his second volume: of the three admirable
ballads in it, The King's Tragedy (in which Rossetti has dexterously
interwoven some relics of James's own exquisite early verse) reaching
the highest level of dramatic success, and marking perfection,
perhaps, in this kind of poetry; which, in the earlier volume, gave
us, among other pieces, Troy Town, Sister Helen, and Eden Bower.

Like those earlier pieces, the ballads of the [217] second volume
bring with them the question of the poetic value of the "refrain"--

Eden bower's in flower:
And O the bower and the hour!

--and the like.  Two of those ballads--Troy Town and Eden Bower, are
terrible in theme; and the refrain serves, perhaps, to relieve their
bold aim at the sentiment of terror.  In Sister Helen again, the
refrain has a real, and sustained purpose (being here duly varied
also) and performs the part of a chorus, as the story proceeds.  Yet
even in these cases, whatever its effect may be in actual recitation,
it may fairly be questioned, whether, to the mere reader their actual
effect is not that of a positive interruption and drawback, at least
in pieces so lengthy; and Rossetti himself, it would seem, came to
think so, for in the shortest of his later ballads, The White Ship--
that old true history of the generosity with which a youth, worthless
in life, flung himself upon death--he was contented with a single
utterance of the refrain, "given out" like the keynote or tune of a
chant.

In The King's Tragedy, Rossetti has worked upon motive, broadly human
(to adopt the phrase of popular criticism) such as one and all may
realise.  Rossetti, indeed, with all his self-concentration upon his
own peculiar aim, by no means ignored those general interests which
are external to poetry as he conceived it; as he has [218] shown here
and there, in this poetic, as also in pictorial, work.  It was but
that, in a life to be shorter even than the average, he found enough
to occupy him in the fulfilment of a task, plainly "given him to
do."  Perhaps, if one had to name a single composition of his to
readers desiring to make acquaintance with him for the first time,
one would select: The King's Tragedy--that poem so moving, so
popularly dramatic, and lifelike.  Notwithstanding this, his work, it
must be conceded, certainly through no narrowness or egotism, but in
the faithfulness of a true workman to a vocation so emphatic, was
mainly of the esoteric order.  But poetry, at all times, exercises
two distinct functions: it may reveal, it may unveil to every eye,
the ideal aspects of common things, after Gray's way (though Gray
too, it is well to remember, seemed in his own day, seemed even to
Johnson, obscure) or it may actually add to the number of motives
poetic and uncommon in themselves, by the imaginative creation of
things that are ideal from their very birth.  Rossetti did something,
something excellent, of the former kind; but his characteristic, his
really revealing work, lay in the adding to poetry of fresh poetic
material, of a new order of phenomena, in the creation of a new
ideal.

1883.



FEUILLET'S "LA MORTE"

[219] IN his latest novel M. Octave Feuillet adds two charming people
to that chosen group of personages in which he loves to trace the
development of the more serious elements of character amid the
refinements and artifices of modern society, and which make such good
company.  The proper function of fictitious literature in affording
us a refuge into a world slightly better--better conceived, or better
finished--than the real one, is effected in most instances less
through the imaginary events at which a novelist causes us to assist,
than by the imaginary persons to whom he introduces us.  The
situations of M. Feuillet's novels are indeed of a real and intrinsic
importance:--tragic crises, inherent in the general conditions of
human nature itself, or which arise necessarily out of the special
conditions of modern society.  Still, with him, in the actual result,
they become subordinate, as it is their tendency to do in real life,
to the characters they help to form.  Often, his most attentive
reader will have forgotten the actual details of his plot; while
[220] the soul, tried, enlarged, shaped by it, remains as a well-
fixed type in the memory.  He may return a second or third time to
Sibylle, or Le Journal d'une Femme, or Les Amours de Philippe, and
watch, surprised afresh, the clean, dainty, word-sparing literary
operation (word-sparing, yet with no loss of real grace or ease)
which, sometimes in a few pages, with the perfect logic of a problem
of Euclid, complicates and then unravels some moral embarrassment,
really worthy of a trained dramatic expert.  But the characters
themselves, the agents in those difficult, revealing situations, such
a reader will recognise as old acquaintances after the first reading,
feeling for them as for some gifted and attractive persons he has
known in the actual world--Raoul de Chalys, Henri de Lerne, Madame de
Tecle, Jeanne de la Roche-Ermel, Maurice de Fremeuse, many others; to
whom must now be added Bernard and Aliette de Vaudricourt.

"How I love those people!" cries Mademoiselle de Courteheuse, of
Madame de Sevigne and some other of her literary favourites in the
days of the Grand Monarch.  "What good company!  What pleasure they
took in high things!  How much more worthy they were than the people
who live now!"--What good company!  That is precisely what the
admirer of M. Feuillet's books feels as one by one he places them on
his book-shelf, to be sought again.  What is proposed here is not to
tell his last story, [221] but to give the English reader specimens
of his most recent effort at characterisation.

It is with the journal of Bernard himself that the story opens,
September 187-.  Bernard-Maurice Hugon de Montauret, Vicomte de
Vaudricourt, is on a visit to his uncle, the head of his family, at
La Saviniere, a country-house somewhere between Normandy and
Brittany.  This uncle, an artificial old Parisian in manner, but
honest in purpose, a good talker, and full of real affection for his
heir Bernard, is one of M. Feuillet's good minor characters--one of
the quietly humorous figures with which he relieves his more serious
company.  Bernard, with whom the refinements of a man of fashion in
the Parisian world by no means disguise a powerful intelligence
cultivated by wide reading, has had thoughts during his tedious stay
at La Saviniere of writing a history of the reign of Louis the
Fourteenth, the library of a neighbouring chateau being rich in
memoirs of that period.  Finally, he prefers to write his own story,
a story so much more interesting to himself; to write it at a
peculiar crisis in his life, the moment when his uncle, unmarried,
but anxious to perpetuate his race, is bent on providing him with a
wife, and indeed has one in view.

The accomplished Bernard, with many graces of person, by his own
confession, takes nothing seriously.  As to that matter of religious
beliefs, "the breeze of the age, and of science, has blown [222] over
him, as it has blown over his contemporaries, and left empty space
there."  Still, when he saw his childish religious faith departing
from him, as he thinks it must necessarily depart from all
intelligent male Parisians, he wept.  Since that moment, however, a
gaiety, serene and imperturbable, has been the mainstay of his
happily constituted character.  The girl to whom his uncle desires to
see him united--odd, quixotic, intelligent, with a sort of pathetic
and delicate grace, and herself very religious--belongs to an old-
fashioned, devout family,.  resident at Varaville, near by.  M.
Feuillet, with half a dozen fine touches of his admirable pencil
makes us see the place.  And the enterprise has at least sufficient
interest to keep Bernard in the country, which the young Parisian
detests.  "This piquant episode of my life," he writes, "seems to me
to be really deserving of study; to be worth etching off, day by day,
by an observer well informed on the subject."

Recognising in himself, though as his one real fault, that he can
take nothing seriously in heaven or earth, Bernard de Vaudricourt,
like all M. Feuillet's favourite young men, so often erring or
corrupt, is a man of scrupulous "honour."  He has already shown
disinterestedness in wishing his rich uncle to marry again.  His
friends at Varaville think so well-mannered a young man more of a
Christian than he really is; and, at all events, he will never owe
his happiness to a falsehood.  If he has great faults, [223]
hypocrisy at least is no part of them.  In oblique paths he finds
himself ill at ease.  Decidedly, as he thinks, he was born for
straight ways, for loyalty in all his enterprises; and he
congratulates himself upon the fact.

In truth, Bernard has merits which he ignores, at least in this first
part of his journal: merits which are necessary to explain the
influence he is able to exercise from the first over such a character
as Mademoiselle de Courteheuse.  His charm, in fact, is in the union
of that gay and apparently wanton nature with a genuine power of
appreciating devotion in others, which becomes devotion in himself.
With all the much-cherished elegance and worldly glitter of his
personality, he is capable of apprehending, of understanding and
being touched by the presence of great matters.  In spite of that
happy lightness of heart, so jealously fenced about, he is to be
wholly caught at last, as he is worthy to be, by the serious, the
generous influence of things.  In proportion to his immense worldly
strength is his capacity for the immense pity which breaks his heart.

In a few life-like touches M. Feuillet brings out, as if it were
indeed a thing of ordinary existence, the simple yet delicate life of
a French country-house, the ideal life in an ideal France.  Bernard
is paying a morning visit at the old turreted home of the
"prehistoric" Courteheuse family.  Mademoiselle Aliette de
Courteheuse, a studious girl, though a bold and excellent rider [224]
--Mademoiselle de Courteheuse, "with her hair of that strange colour
of fine ashes"--has conducted her visitor to see the library:

One day she took me to see the library, rich in works of the
seventeenth century and in memoirs relating to that time.  I
remarked there also a curious collection of engravings of the
same period.  "Your father," I observed, "had a strong
predilection for the age of Louis the Fourteenth."

"My father lived in that age," she answered gravely.  And as
I looked at her with surprise, and a little embarrassed, she
added, "He made me live there too, in his company."

And then the eyes of this singular girl filled with tears.
She turned away, took a few steps to suppress her emotion, and
returning, pointed me to a chair.  Then seating herself on the
step of the book-case, she said, "I must explain my father
to you."

She was half a minute collecting her thoughts: then, speaking
with an expansion of manner not habitual with her, hesitating,
and blushing deeply, whenever she was about to utter a word that
might seem a shade too serious for lips so youthful:--"My
father," she proceeded, "died of the consequences of a wound he
had received at Patay.  That may show you that he loved his
country, but he was no lover of his own age.  He possessed in
the highest degree the love of order; and order was a thing
nowhere to be seen.  He had a horror of disorder; and he saw it
everywhere.  In those last years, especially, his reverence,
his beliefs, his tastes, all alike were ruffled to the point of
actual suffering, by whatever was done and said and written
around him.  Deeply saddened by the conditions of the present
time, he habituated himself to find a refuge in the past, and
the seventeenth century more particularly offered him the kind
of society in which he would have wished to live--a society,
well-ordered, polished, lettered, believing.  More and more he
loved to shut himself up in it.  More and more also he loved to
make the moral discipline and the literary tastes of that
favourite age prevail in his own household.  You may even have
remarked that he carried his predilection into minute matters of
arrangement and decoration.  You can see from this window the
straight paths, the box in [225] patterns, the yew trees and
clipped alleys of our garden.  You may notice that in our garden-
beds we have none but flowers of the period--lilies, rose-mallows,
immortelles, rose-pinks, in short what people call parsonage
flowers--des fleurs de cure.  Our old silvan tapestries,
similarly, are of that age.  You see too that all our furniture,
from presses and sideboards, down to our little tables and our
arm-chairs, is in the severest style of Louis the Fourteenth.
My father did not appreciate the dainty research of our modern
luxury.  He maintained that our excessive care for the comforts
of life weakened mind as well as body.  That," added the girl
with a laugh,--"that is why you find your chair so hard when
you come to see us."

Then, with resumed gravity--"It was thus that my father
endeavoured, by the very aspect and arrangement of outward
things, to promote in himself the imaginary presence of the
epoch in which his thoughts delighted.  As for myself--need I
tell you that I was the confidant of that father, so well-
beloved: a confidant touched by his sorrows, full of
indignation at his disappointments, charmed by his consolations.
Here, precisely--surrounded by those books which we read
together, and which he taught me to love--it is here that I
have passed the pleasantest hours of my youth.  In common we
indulged our enthusiasm for those days of faith; of the quiet
life; its blissful hours of leisure well-secured; for the
French language in its beauty and purity; the delicate, the
noble urbanity, which was then the honour and the special mark
of our country, but has ceased to be so."

She paused, with a little confusion, as I thought, at the warmth
of her last words.

And then, just to break the silence, "You have explained," I
said, "an impression which I have experienced again and again
in my visits here, and which has sometimes reached the intensity
of an actual illusion, though a very agreeable one.  The look
of your house, its style, its tone and keeping, carried me two
centuries back so completely that I should hardly have been
surprised to hear Monsieur le Prince, Madame de la Fayette,
or Madame de Sevigne herself, announced at your drawing-
room door."

"Would it might be!" said Mademoiselle de Courteheuse.  [226]
"Ah!  Monsieur, how I love those people!  What good company!
What pleasure they took in high things!  How much more worthy
they were than the people who live now!"  I tried to calm a
little this retrospective enthusiasm, so much to the prejudice
of my contemporaries and of myself.  "Most truly,
Mademoiselle," I said, "the age which you regret had its
rare merits--merits which I appreciate as you do.  But then,
need one say that that society, so regular, so choice in
appearance, had, like our own, below the surface, its troubles,
its disorders?  I see here many of the memoirs of that time.
I can't tell exactly which of them you may or may not have read,
and so I feel a certain difficulty in speaking."

She interrupted me: "Ah!" she said, with entire simplicity, "I
understand you.  I have not read all you see here.  But I have
read enough of it to know that my friends in that past age had,
like those who live now, their passions, their weaknesses,
their mistakes.  But, as my father used to say to me, all that
did but pass over a ground of what was solid and serious, which
always discovered itself again anew.  There were great faults
then; but there were also great repentances.  There was a
certain higher region to which everything conducted--even what
as evil."  She blushed deeply: then rising a little suddenly,
"A long speech!" she said: "Forgive me!  I am not usually so
very talkative.  It is because my father was in question; and
I should wish his memory to be as dear and as venerable to all
the rest of the world as it is to me."

We pass over the many little dramatic intrigues and misunderstandings,
with the more or less adroit interferences of the uncle, which raise
and lower alternately Bernard's hopes.  M. Feuillet has more than once
tried his hand with striking success in the portraiture of French
ecclesiastics.  He has drawn none better than the Bishop of Saint-Meen,
uncle of Mademoiselle de Courteheuse, to whose interests he is devoted.
Bernard feels that to gain the influence of this prelate [227] would
be to gain his cause; and the opportunity for an interview comes.

Monseigneur de Courteheuse would seem to be little over fifty
years of age: he is rather tall, and very thin: the eyes, black
and full of life, are encircled by a ring of deep brown.  His
speech and gesture are animated, and, at times, as if carried
away.  He adopts frequently a sort of furious manner which
on a sudden melts into the smile of an honest man.  He has
beautiful silvery hair, flying in vagrant locks over his
forehead, and beautiful bishop's hands.  As he becomes calm
he has an imposing way of gently resettling himself in his
sacerdotal dignity.  To sum up: his is a physiognomy full of
passion, consumed with zeal, yet still frank and sincere.

I was hardly seated, when with a motion of the hand he invited
me to speak.

"Monseigneur!" I said, "I come to you (you understand me?) as
to my last resource.  What I am now doing is almost an act of
despair; for it might seem at first sight that no member of
the family of Mademoiselle de Courteheuse must show himself
more pitiless than yourself towards the faults with which I
am reproached.  I am an unbeliever: you are an apostle!  And
yet, Monseigneur, it is often at the hands of saintly priests,
such as yourself, that the guilty find most indulgence.  And
then, I am not indeed guilty: I have but wandered.  I am refused
the hand of your niece because I do not share her faith--your
own faith.  But, Monseigneur, unbelief is not a crime, it is
a misfortune.  I know people often say, a man denies God when
by his own conduct he has brought himself into a condition in
which he may well desire that God does not exist.  In this
way he is made guilty, or, in a sense, responsible for his
incredulity.  For myself, Monseigneur, I have consulted my
conscience with an entire sincerity; and although my youth has
been amiss, I am certain that my atheism proceeds from no
sentiment of personal interest.  On the contrary, I may tell you
with truth that the day on which I perceived my faith come to
nought, the day on which I lost hope in God, I shed the bitterest
tears of my life.  In spite of appearances, I am not so light a
spirit as people think.  I am not one of those for whom God,
when He disappears, [228] leaves no sense of a void place.
Believe me!--a man may love sport, his club, his worldly
habits, and yet have his hours of thought, of self-
recollection.  Do you suppose that in those hours one does
not feel the frightful discomfort of an existence with no
moral basis, without principles, with no outlook beyond this
world?  And yet, what can one do?  You would tell me forthwith,
in the goodness, the compassion, which I read in your eyes;
Confide to me your objections to religion, and I will try to
solve them.  Monseigneur, I should hardly know how to answer
you.  My objections are 'Legion!'  They are without number,
like the stars in the sky: they come to us on all sides, from
every quarter of the horizon, as if on the wings of the wind;
and they leave in us, as they pass, ruins only, and darkness.
Such has been my experience, and that of many others; and it
has been as involuntary as it is irreparable."

"And I--Monsieur!" said the bishop, suddenly, casting on me
one of his august looks, "Do you suppose that I am but a
play-actor in my cathedral church?"

"Monseigneur!"

"Yes!  Listening to you, one would suppose that we were come
to a period of the world in which one must needs be either an
atheist or a hypocrite!  Personally, I claim to be neither
one nor the other."

"Need I defend myself on that point, Monseigneur?  Need I say
that I did not come here to give you offence?"

"Doubtless! doubtless!  Well, Monsieur, I admit; not without
great reserves, mind! for one is always more or less responsible
for the atmosphere in which he lives, the influences to which
he is subject, for the habitual turn he gives to his thoughts;
still, I admit that you are the victim of the incredulity of the
age, that you are altogether guiltless in your scepticism, your
atheism! since you have no fear of hard words.  Is it therefore
any the less certain that the union of a fervent believer, such
as my niece, with a man like yourself would be a moral disorder
of which the consequences might be disastrous?  Do you think it
could be my duty, as a relative of Mademoiselle de Courteheuse,
her spiritual father, as a prelate of the Church, to lend my
hands to such disorder, to preside over the shocking union of
two souls separated by the whole width of heaven?"

[229] The bishop, in proposing that question, kept his eyes
fixed ardently on mine.

"Monseigneur," I answered, after a moment's embarrassment, "you
know as well as, and better than I, the condition of the world,
and of our country, at this time.  You know that unhappily I
am not an exception: that men of faith are rare in it.  And
permit me to tell you my whole mind.  If I must needs suffer
the inconsolable misfortune of renouncing the happiness I had
hoped for, are you quite sure that the man to whom one of these
days you will give your niece may not be something more than
a sceptic, or even an atheist?"

"What, Monsieur?"

"A hypocrite, Monseigneur!  Mademoiselle de Courteheuse is
beautiful enough, rich enough, to excite the ambition of those
who may be less scrupulous than I.  As for me, if you now know
that I am a sceptic, you know also that I am a man of honour:
and there is something in that!"

"A man of honour!" the bishop muttered to himself, with a
little petulance and hesitation.  "A man of honour!  Yes, I
believe it!"  Then, after an interval, "Come, Monsieur," he
said gently, "your case is not as desperate as you suppose.
My Aliette is one of those young enthusiasts through whom
Heaven sometimes works miracles."  And Bernard refusing any
encouragement of that hope (the "very roots of faith are
dead" in him for ever) "since you think that," the bishop
answers, "it is honest to say so.  But God has His ways!"

Soon after, the journal comes to an end with that peculiar crisis in
Bernard's life which had suggested the writing of it.  Aliette, with
the approval of her family, has given him her hand.  Bernard accepts
it with the full purpose of doing all he can to make his wife as
happy as she is charming and beloved.  The virginal first period of
their married life in their dainty house in Paris--the pure and
beautiful picture of the mother, the father, and at last the child, a
little [230] girl, Jeanne--is presented with M. Feuillet's usual
grace.  Certain embarrassments succeed; the development of what was
ill-matched in their union; but still with mutual loyalty.  A far-
reaching acquaintance with, and reflection upon, the world and its
ways, especially the Parisian world, has gone into the apparently
slight texture of these pages.  The accomplished playwright may be
recognised in the skilful touches with which M. Feuillet, unrivalled,
as his regular readers know, in his power of breathing higher notes
into the frivolous prattle of fashionable French life, develops the
tragic germ in the elegant, youthful household.  Amid the
distractions of a society, frivolous, perhaps vulgar, Aliette's mind
is still set on greater things; and, in spite of a thousand rude
discouragements, she maintains her generous hope for Bernard's
restoration to faith.  One day, a little roughly, he bids her
relinquish that dream finally.  She looks at him with the moist,
suppliant eyes of some weak animal at bay.  Then his native goodness
returns.  In a softened tone he owns himself wrong.

"As to conversions;--no one must be despaired of.  Do you
remember M. de Rance?  He lived in your favourite age;--M. de
Rance.  Well! before he became the reformer of La Trappe he
had been a worldling like me, and a great sceptic--what
people called a libertine.  Still he became a saint!  It is
true he had a terrible reason for it.  Do you know what it
was converted him?"

Aliette gave a sign that she did not know.

"Well! he returned to Paris after a few days' absence.  He
[231] ran straight to the lady he loved; Madame Montbazon,
I think: he went up a little staircase of which he had the
key, and the first thing he saw on the table in the middle
of the room was the head of his mistress, of which the
doctors were about to make a post-mortem examination."

"If I were sure," said Aliette, "that my head could have
such power, I would love to die."

She said it in a low voice, but with such an accent of loving
sincerity that her husband had a sensation of a sort of painful
disquiet.  He smiled, however, and tapping her cheek softly,
"Folly!" he said.  "A head, charming as yours, has no need to
be dead that it may work miracles!"

Certainly M. Feuillet has some weighty charges to bring against the
Parisian society of our day.  When Aliette revolts from a world of
gossip, which reduces all minds alike to the same level of vulgar
mediocrity, Bernard, on his side, can perceive there a deterioration
of moral tone which shocks his sense of honour.  As a man of honour,
he can hardly trust his wife to the gaieties of a society which
welcomes all the world "to amuse itself in undress."

It happened that at this perplexed period in the youthful
household, one and the same person became the recipient both
of the tearful confidences of Madame de Vaudricourt and those
of her husband.  It was the Duchess of Castel-Moret [she is
another of M. Feuillet's admirable minor sketches] an old
friend of the Vaudricourt family, and the only woman with
whom Aliette since her arrival in Paris had formed a kind
of intimacy.  The Duchess was far from sharing, on points
of morality, and above all of religion, the severe and
impassioned orthodoxy of her young friend.  She had lived,
it is true, an irreproachable life, but less in consequence
of defined principles than by instinct and natural taste.
She admitted to herself that she was an honest woman as a
result of her birth, and had no further merit in the matter.
She was old, very careful of [232] herself, and a pleasant
aroma floated about her, below her silvery hair.  People
loved her for her grace--the grace of another time than ours--
for her wit, and her worldly wisdom, which she placed freely
at the disposal of the public.  Now and then she made a match:
but her special gift lay rather in the way in which she came
to the rescue when a marriage turned out ill.  And she had no
sinecure: the result was that she passed the best part of her
time in repairing family rents.  That might "last its time,"
she would say.  "And then we know that what has been well
mended sometimes lasts better than what is new."

A little later, Bernard, in the interest of Aliette, has chivalrously
determined to quit Paris.  At Valmoutiers, a fine old place in the
neighbourhood of Fontainebleau, they established themselves for a
country life.  Here Aliette tastes the happiest days since her
marriage.  Bernard, of course, after a little time is greatly bored.
But so far they have never seriously doubted of their great love for
each other.  It is here that M. Feuillet brings on the scene a kind
of character new in his books; perhaps hardly worthy of the other
company there; a sort of female Monsieur de Camors, but without his
grace and tenderness, and who actually commits a crime.  How would
the morbid charms of M. de Camors have vanished, if, as his wife once
suspected of him, he had ever contemplated crime!  And surely, the
showy insolent charms of Sabine de Tallevaut, beautiful,
intellectually gifted, supremely Amazonian, yet withal not drawn with
M. Feuillet's usual fineness, scarcely hold out for the reader, any
more than for [233] Bernard himself, in the long run, against the
vulgarising touch of her cold wickedness.  Living in the
neighbourhood of Valmoutiers, in a somewhat melancholy abode (the
mystery of which in the eyes of Bernard adds to her poetic charm)
with her guardian, an old, rich, freethinking doctor, devoted to
research, she comes to Valmoutiers one night in his company on the
occasion of the alarming illness of the only child.  They arrive
escorted by Bernard himself.  The little Jeanne, wrapped in her
coverlet, was placed upon the table of her play-room, which was
illuminated as if for a party.  The illness, the operation (skilfully
performed by the old doctor) which restores her to life, are
described with that seemingly simple pathos in which M. Feuillet's
consummate art hides itself.  Sabine remains to watch the child's
recovery, and becomes an intimate.  In vain Bernard struggles against
the first real passion of his life;--does everything but send its
object out of his sight.  Aliette has divined their secret.  In the
fatal illness which follows soon after, Bernard watches over her with
tender solicitude; hoping against hope that the disease may take a
favourable turn.

"My child," he said to her one day, taking the hand which
she abandoned to him, "I have just been scolding old Victoire.
She is losing her head.  In spite of the repeated assurances
of the doctors, she is alarmed at seeing you a little worse
than usual to-day, and has had the Cure sent for.  Do you
wish to see him?"

"Pray let me see him!"

[234] She sighed heavily, and fixed upon her husband her large
blue eyes, full of anguish--an anguish so sharp and so singular
that he felt frozen to the marrow.

He could not help saying with deep emotion, "Do you love me no
longer, Aliette?"

"For ever!" murmured the poor child.

He leaned over her with a long kiss upon the forehead.  She saw
tears stealing from the eyes of her husband, and seemed as if
surprised.

Soon afterwards Aliette is dead, to the profound sorrow of Bernard.
Less than two years later he has become the husband of Mademoiselle
Tallevaut.  It was about two years after his marriage with Sabine
that Bernard resumed the journal with which we began.  In the pages
which he now adds he seems at first unchanged.  How then as to that
story of M. de Rance, the reformer of La Trappe, finding the head of
his dead mistress; an incident which the reader of La Morte will
surely have taken as a "presentiment"?  Aliette had so taken it.  "A
head so charming as yours," Bernard had assured her tenderly, "does
not need to be dead that it may work miracles!"--How, in the few
pages that remain, will M. Feuillet justify that, and certain other
delicate touches of presentiment, and at the same time justify the
title of his book?

The journal is recommenced in February.  On the twentieth of April
Bernard writes, at Valmoutiers:

Under pretext of certain urgently needed repairs I am come to
pass a week at Valmoutiers, and get a little pure air.  By my
orders they have kept Aliette's room under lock and key since
[235] the day when she left it in her coffin.  To-day I re-
entered it for the first time.  There was a vague odour of her
favourite perfumes.  My poor Aliette! why was I unable, as you
so ardently desired, to share your gentle creed, and associate
myself to the life of your dreams, the life of honesty and peace?
Compared with that which is mine to-day, it seems to me like
paradise.  What a terrible scene it was, here in this room!  What
a memory!  I can still see the last look she fixed on me, a look
almost of terror! and how quickly she died!  I have taken the room
for my own.  But I shall not remain here long.  I intend to go
for a few days to Varaville.  I want to see my little girl: her
dear angel's face.

VALMOUTIERS, April 22.--What a change there has been in the world
since my childhood: since my youth even! what a surprising change
in so short a period, in the moral atmosphere we are breathing!
Then we were, as it were, impregnated with the thought of God--a
just God, but benevolent and fatherlike.  We really lived under
His eyes, as under the eyes of a parent, with respect and fear,
but with confidence.  We felt sustained by His invisible but
undoubted presence.  We spoke to Him, and it seemed that He
answered.  And now we feel ourselves alone--as it were abandoned
in the immensity of the universe.  We live in a world, hard,
savage, full of hatred; whose one cruel law is the struggle for
existence, and in which we are no more than those natural elements,
let loose to war with each other in fierce selfishness, without
pity, with no appeal beyond, no hope of final justice.  And above
us, in place of the good God of our happy youth, nothing, any
more! or worse than nothing--a deity, barbarous and ironical,
who cares nothing at all about us.

The aged mother of Aliette, hitherto the guardian of his daughter,
is lately dead.  Bernard proposes to take the child away with
him to Paris.  The child's old nurse objects.  On April the twenty-
seventh, Bernard writes:

For a moment--for a few moments--in that room where I have been
shutting myself up with the shadow of my poor [236] dead one, a
horrible thought had come to me.  I had driven it away as an
insane fancy.  But now, yes! it is becoming a reality.  Shall I
write this?  Yes!  I will write it.  It is my duty to do so; for
from this moment the journal, begun in so much gaiety of heart,
is but my last will and testament.  If I should disappear from
the world, the secret must not die with me.  It must be bequeathed
to the natural protectors of my child.  Her interests, if not her
life, are concerned therein.

Here, then, is what passed: I had not arrived in time to render
my last duty to Madame de Courteheuse.  The family was already
dispersed.  I found here only Aliette's brother.  To him I
communicated my plan concerning the child, and he could but
approve.  My intention was to bring away with Jeanne her nurse
Victoire, who had brought her up, as she brought up her mother.
But she is old, and in feeble health, and I feared some
difficulties on her part; the more as her attitude towards myself
since the death of my first wife has been marked by an ill grace
approaching to hostility.  I took her aside while Jeanne was
playing in the garden.

"My good Victoire," I said, "while Madame de Courteheuse was
living, I considered it a duty to leave her granddaughter in
her keeping.  Besides, no one was better fitted to watch over
her education.  At present my duty is to watch over it myself.
I propose therefore to take Jeanne with me to Paris; and I hope
that you may be willing to accompany her, and remain in her
service." When she understood my intention, the old woman, in
whose hands I had noticed a faint trembling, became suddenly
very pale.  She fixed her firm, grey eyes upon me: "Monsieur
le Comte will not do that!"

"Pardon me, my good Victoire, that I shall do.  I appreciate
your good qualities of fidelity and devotion.  I shall be very
grateful if you will continue to take care of my daughter, as
you have done so excellently.  But for the rest, I intend to
be the only master in my own house, and the only master of my
child."  She laid a hand upon my arm: "I implore you, Monsieur,
don't do this!"  Her fixed look did not leave my face, and
seemed to be questioning me to the very bottom of my soul.
"I have never believed it," she murmured, "No!  I [237] never
could believe it.  But if you take the child away I shall."

"Believe what, wretched woman? believe what?"

Her voice sank lower still.  "Believe that you knew how her
mother came by her death; and that you mean the daughter to
die as she did."

"Die as her mother did?"

"Yes! by the same hand!"

The sweat came on my forehead.  I felt as it were a breathing of
death upon me.  But still I thrust away from me that terrible
light on things.

"Victoire!" I said, "take care!  You are no fool: you are
something worse.  Your hatred of the woman who has taken the
place of my first wife--your blind hatred--has suggested to
you odious, nay! criminal words."

"Ah!  Ah!  Monsieur", she cried with wild energy.  "After
what I have just told you, take your daughter to live with
that woman if you dare."

I walked up and down the room awhile to collect my senses.
Then, returning to the old woman, "Yet how can I believe you?"
I asked.  "If you had had the shadow of a proof of what you
give me to understand, how could you have kept silence so long?
How could you have allowed me to contract that hateful marriage?"

She seemed more confident, and her voice grew gentler.  "Monsieur,
it is because Madame, before she went to God, made me take oath
on the crucifix to keep that secret for ever."

"Yet not with me, in fact,--not with me!"  And I, in turn,
questioned her; my eyes upon hers.  She  hesitated: then
stammered out, "True! not with you! because she believed, poor
little soul! that..."

"What did she believe?  That I knew it?  That I was an accomplice?
Tell me!"  Her eyes fell, and she made no answer.  "Is it
possible, my God, is it possible?  But come, sit by me here, and
tell me all you know, all you saw.  At what time was it you
noticed anything--the precise moment?"  For in truth she had
been suffering for a long time past.

Victoire tells the miserable story of Sabine's [238] crime--we must
pardon what we think a not quite worthy addition to the imaginary
world M. Feuillet has called up round about him, for the sake of
fully knowing Bernard and Aliette.  The old nurse had surprised her
in the very act, and did not credit her explanation.  "When I
surprised her," she goes on:

"It may already have been too late--be sure it was not the first
time she had been guilty--my first thought was to give you
information.  But I had not the courage.  Then I told Madame.
I thought I saw plainly that I had nothing to tell she was not
already aware of.  Nevertheless she chided me almost harshly.
'You know very well,' she said, 'that my husband is always there
when Mademoiselle prepares the medicines.  So that he too would
be guilty.  Rather than believe that, I would accept death at
his hands a hundred times over!'  And I remember, Monsieur, how
at the very moment when she told me that, you came out from
the little boudoir, and brought her a glass of valerian.  She
cast on me a terrible look and drank.  A few minutes afterwards
she was so ill that she thought the end was come.  She begged
me to give her her crucifix, and made me swear never to utter
a word concerning our suspicions.  It was then I sent for the
priest.  I have told you, Monsieur, what I know; what I have
seen with my own eyes.  I swear that I have said nothing but
what is absolutely true."  She paused.  I could not answer her.
I seized her old wrinkled and trembling hands and pressed them
to my forehead, and wept like a child.

May 10.--She died believing me guilty!  The thought is terrible
to me.  I know not what to do.  A creature so frail, so
delicate, so sweet.  "Yes!" she said to herself, "my husband
is a murderer; what he is giving me is poison, and he knows
it."  She died with that thought in her mind--her last thought.
And she will never, never know that it was not so; that I am
innocent; that the thought is torment to me: that I am the most
unhappy of men.  Ah!  God, all-powerful! if you indeed exist,
you see what I suffer.  Have pity on me!

Ah! how I wish I could believe that all is not over between
[239] her and me; that she sees and hears me; that she knew
the truth.  But I find it impossible! impossible!

June.--That I was a criminal was her last thought, and she
will never be undeceived.

All seems so completely ended when one dies.  All returns to
its first elements.  How credit that miracle of a personal
resurrection? and yet in truth all is mystery,--miracle,
around us, about us, within ourselves.  The entire universe
is but a continuous miracle.  Man's new birth from the womb
of death--is it a mystery less comprehensible than his birth
from the womb of his mother?

Those lines are the last written by Bernard de Vaudricourt.
His health, for some time past disturbed by grief, was
powerless against the emotions of the last terrible trial
imposed on him.  A malady, the exact nature of which was
not determined, in a few days assumed a mortal character.
Perceiving that his end was come, he caused Monseigneur
de Courteheuse to be summoned--he desired to die in the
religion of Aliette.  Living, the poor child had been
defeated: she prevailed in her death.

Two distinguished souls! deux etres d'elite--M. Feuillet thinks--
whose fine qualities properly brought them together.  When
Mademoiselle de Courteheuse said of the heroes of her favourite age,
that their passions, their errors, did but pass over a ground of what
was solid and serious, and which always discovered itself afresh, she
was unconsciously describing Bernard.  Singular young brother of
Monsieur de Camors--after all, certainly, more fortunate than he--he
belongs to the age, which, if it had great faults, had also great
repentances.  In appearance, frivolous; with all the light charm of
the world, yet with that impressibility to great things, according to
the law which makes the best of M. Feuillet's [240] characters so
interesting; above all, with that capacity for pity which almost
everything around him tended to suppress; in real life, if he exists
there, and certainly in M. Feuillet's pages, it is a refreshment to
meet him.

1886.



POSTSCRIPT

ainei de palaion men oinon, anthea d' hymnon neoteron+

[241] THE words, classical and romantic, although, like many other
critical expressions, sometimes abused by those who have understood
them too vaguely or too absolutely, yet define two real tendencies
in the history of art and literature.  Used in an exaggerated sense,
to express a greater opposition between those tendencies than really
exists, they have at times tended to divide people of taste into
opposite camps.  But in that House Beautiful, which the creative
minds of all generations--the artists and those who have treated
life in the spirit of art--are always building together, for the
refreshment of the human spirit, these oppositions cease; and the
Interpreter of the House Beautiful, the true aesthetic critic, uses
these divisions, only so far as they enable him to enter into the
peculiarities of the objects with which he has to do.  The term
classical, fixed, as it is, to a well-defined literature, and a well-
defined group in art, is clear, indeed; but then it has often been
used in a hard, and merely scholastic [242] sense, by the praisers of
what is old and accustomed, at the expense of what is new, by critics
who would never have discovered for themselves the charm of any work,
whether new or old, who value what is old, in art or literature, for
its accessories, and chiefly for the conventional authority that has
gathered about it--people who would never really have been made glad
by any Venus fresh-risen from the sea, and who praise the Venus of
old Greece and Rome, only because they fancy her grown now into
something staid and tame.

And as the term, classical, has been used in a too absolute, and
therefore in a misleading sense, so the term, romantic, has been used
much too vaguely, in various accidental senses.  The sense in which
Scott is called a romantic writer is chiefly this; that, in
opposition to the literary tradition of the last century, he loved
strange adventure, and sought it in the Middle Age.  Much later, in a
Yorkshire village, the spirit of romanticism bore a more really
characteristic fruit in the work of a young girl, Emily Bronte, the
romance of Wuthering Heights; the figures of Hareton Earnshaw, of
Catherine Linton, and of Heathcliffe--tearing open Catherine's grave,
removing one side of her coffin, that he may really lie beside her in
death--figures so passionate, yet woven on a background of delicately
beautiful, moorland scenery, being typical examples of that spirit.
In Germany, again, [243] that spirit is shown less in Tieck, its
professional representative, than in Meinhold, the author of Sidonia
the Sorceress and the Amber-Witch.  In Germany and France, within the
last hundred years, the term has been used to describe a particular
school of writers; and, consequently, when Heine criticises the
Romantic School in Germany--that movement which culminated in
Goethe's Goetz von Berlichingen; or when Theophile Gautier criticises
the romantic movement in France, where, indeed, it bore its most
characteristic fruits, and its play is hardly yet over where, by a
certain audacity, or bizarrerie of motive, united with faultless
literary execution, it still shows itself in imaginative literature,
they use the word, with an exact sense of special artistic qualities,
indeed; but use it, nevertheless, with a limited application to the
manifestation of those qualities at a particular period.  But the
romantic spirit is, in reality, an ever-present, an enduring
principle, in the artistic temperament; and the qualities of thought
and style which that, and other similar uses of the word romantic
really indicate, are indeed but symptoms of a very continuous and
widely working influence.

Though the words classical and romantic, then, have acquired an
almost technical meaning, in application to certain developments of
German and French taste, yet this is but one variation of an old
opposition, which may be traced from the [244] very beginning of the
formation of European art and literature.  From the first formation
of anything like a standard of taste in these things, the restless
curiosity of their more eager lovers necessarily made itself felt, in
the craving for new motives, new subjects of interest, new
modifications of style.  Hence, the opposition between the
classicists and the romanticists--between the adherents, in the
culture of beauty, of the principles of liberty, and authority,
respectively--of strength, and order or what the Greeks called
kosmiotes.+

Sainte-Beuve, in the third volume of the Causeries du Lundi, has
discussed the question, What is meant by a classic?  It was a
question he was well fitted to answer, having himself lived through
many phases of taste, and having been in earlier life an enthusiastic
member of the romantic school: he was also a great master of that
sort of "philosophy of literature," which delights in tracing
traditions in it, and the way in which various phases of thought and
sentiment maintain themselves, through successive modifications, from
epoch to epoch.  His aim, then, is to give the word classic a wider
and, as he says, a more generous sense than it commonly bears, to
make it expressly grandiose et flottant; and, in doing this, he
develops, in a masterly manner, those qualities of measure, purity,
temperance, of which it is the especial function of classical art
[245] and literature, whatever meaning, narrower or wider, we attach
to the term, to take care.

The charm, therefore, of what is classical, in art or literature, is
that of the well-known tale, to which we can, nevertheless, listen
over and over again, because it is told so well.  To the absolute
beauty of its artistic form, is added the accidental, tranquil, charm
of familiarity.  There are times, indeed, at which these charms fail
to work on our spirits at all, because they fail to excite us.
"Romanticism," says Stendhal, "is the art of presenting to people the
literary works which, in the actual state of their habits and
beliefs, are capable of giving them the greatest possible pleasure;
classicism, on the contrary, of presenting them with that which gave
the greatest possible pleasure to their grandfathers."  But then,
beneath all changes of habits and beliefs, our love of that mere
abstract proportion--of music--which what is classical in literature
possesses, still maintains itself in the best of us, and what pleased
our grandparents may at least tranquillise us.  The "classic" comes
to us out of the cool and quiet of other times; as the measure of
what a long experience has shown will at least never displease us.
And in the classical literature of Greece and Rome, as in the
classics of the last century, the essentially classical element is
that quality of order in beauty, which they possess, indeed, [246] in
a pre-eminent degree, and which impresses some minds to the exclusion
of everything else in them.

It is the addition of strangeness to beauty, that constitutes the
romantic character in art; and the desire of beauty being a fixed
element in every artistic organisation, it is the addition of
curiosity to this desire of beauty, that constitutes the romantic
temper.  Curiosity and the desire of beauty, have each their place in
art, as in all true criticism.  When one's curiosity is deficient,
when one is not eager enough for new impressions, and new pleasures,
one is liable to value mere academical proprieties too highly, to be
satisfied with worn-out or conventional types, with the insipid
ornament of Racine, or the prettiness of that later Greek sculpture,
which passed so long for true Hellenic work; to miss those places
where the handiwork of nature, or of the artist, has been most
cunning; to find the most stimulating products of art a mere
irritation.  And when one's curiosity is in excess, when it
overbalances the desire of beauty, then one is liable to value in
works of art what is inartistic in them; to be satisfied with what is
exaggerated in art, with productions like some of those of the
romantic school in Germany; not to distinguish, jealously enough,
between what is admirably done, and what is done not quite so well,
in the writings, for instance, of Jean Paul.  And if I had to give
[247] instances of these defects, then I should say, that Pope, in
common with the age of literature to which he belonged, had too
little curiosity, so that there is always a certain insipidity in the
effect of his work, exquisite as it is; and, coming down to our own
time, that Balzac had an excess of curiosity--curiosity not duly
tempered with the desire of beauty.

But, however falsely those two tendencies may be opposed by critics,
or exaggerated by artists themselves, they are tendencies really at
work at all times in art, moulding it, with the balance sometimes a
little on one side, sometimes a little on the other, generating,
respectively, as the balance inclines on this side or that, two
principles, two traditions, in art, and in literature so far as it
partakes of the spirit of art.  If there is a great overbalance of
curiosity, then, we have the grotesque in art: if the union of
strangeness and beauty, under very difficult and complex conditions,
be a successful one, if the union be entire, then the resultant
beauty is very exquisite, very attractive.  With a passionate care
for beauty, the romantic spirit refuses to have it, unless the
condition of strangeness be first fulfilled.  Its desire is for a
beauty born of unlikely elements, by a profound alchemy, by a
difficult initiation, by the charm which wrings it even out of
terrible things; and a trace of distortion, of the grotesque, may
perhaps linger, as an additional element of expression, about its
[248] ultimate grace.  Its eager, excited spirit will have strength,
the grotesque, first of all--the trees shrieking as you tear off the
leaves; for Jean Valjean, the long years of convict life; for
Redgauntlet, the quicksands of Solway Moss; then, incorporate with
this strangeness, and intensified by restraint, as much sweetness, as
much beauty, as is compatible with that.  Energique, frais, et
dispos--these, according to Sainte-Beuve, are the characteristics of
a genuine classic--les ouvrages anciens ne sont pas classiques parce
qu'ils sont vieux, mais parce qu'ils sont energiques, frais, et
dispos.  Energy, freshness, intelligent and masterly disposition:--
these are characteristics of Victor Hugo when his alchemy is
complete, in certain figures, like Marius and Cosette, in certain
scenes, like that in the opening of Les Travailleurs de la Mer, where
Deruchette writes the name of Gilliatt in the snow, on Christmas
morning; but always there is a certain note of strangeness
discernible there, as well.

The essential elements, then, of the romantic spirit are curiosity
and the love of beauty; and it is only as an illustration of these
qualities, that it seeks the Middle Age, because, in the over-charged
atmosphere of the Middle Age, there are unworked sources of romantic
effect, of a strange beauty, to be won, by strong imagination, out of
things unlikely or remote.

Few, probably, now read Madame de Stael's [249] De l'Allemagne,
though it has its interest, the interest which never quite fades out
of work really touched with the enthusiasm of the spiritual
adventurer, the pioneer in culture.  It was published in 1810, to
introduce to French readers a new school of writers--the romantic
school, from beyond the Rhine; and it was followed, twenty-three
years later, by Heine's Romantische Schule, as at once a supplement
and a correction.  Both these books, then, connect romanticism with
Germany, with the names especially of Goethe and Tieck; and, to many
English readers, the idea of romanticism is still inseparably
connected with Germany--that Germany which, in its quaint old towns,
under the spire of Strasburg or the towers of Heidelberg, was always
listening in rapt inaction to the melodious, fascinating voices of
the Middle Age, and which, now that it has got Strasburg back again,
has, I suppose, almost ceased to exist.  But neither Germany, with
its Goethe and Tieck, nor England, with its Byron and Scott, is
nearly so representative of the romantic temper as France, with
Murger, and Gautier, and Victor Hugo.  It is in French literature
that its most characteristic expression is to be found; and that, as
most closely derivative, historically, from such peculiar conditions,
as ever reinforce it to the utmost.

For, although temperament has much to do with the generation of the
romantic spirit, and [250] although this spirit, with its curiosity,
its thirst for a curious beauty, may be always traceable in excellent
art (traceable even in Sophocles) yet still, in a limited sense, it
may be said to be a product of special epochs.  Outbreaks of this
spirit, that is, come naturally with particular periods--times, when,
in men's approaches towards art and poetry, curiosity may be noticed
to take the lead, when men come to art and poetry, with a deep thirst
for intellectual excitement, after a long ennui, or in reaction
against the strain of outward, practical things: in the later Middle
Age, for instance; so that medieval poetry, centering in Dante, is
often opposed to Greek and Roman poetry, as romantic poetry to the
classical.  What the romanticism of Dante is, may be estimated, if we
compare the lines in which Virgil describes the hazel-wood, from
whose broken twigs flows the blood of Polydorus, not without the
expression of a real shudder at the ghastly incident, with the whole
canto of the Inferno, into which Dante has expanded them, beautifying
and softening it, meanwhile, by a sentiment of profound pity.  And it
is especially in that period of intellectual disturbance, immediately
preceding Dante, amid which the romance languages define themselves
at last, that this temper is manifested.  Here, in the literature of
Provence, the very name of romanticism is stamped with its true
signification: here we have indeed a romantic world, grotesque [251]
even, in the strength of its passions, almost insane in its curious
expression of them, drawing all things into its sphere, making the
birds, nay! lifeless things, its voices and messengers, yet so
penetrated with the desire for beauty and sweetness, that it begets a
wholly new species of poetry, in which the Renaissance may be said to
begin.  The last century was pre-eminently a classical age, an age in
which, for art and literature, the element of a comely order was in
the ascendant; which, passing away, left a hard battle to be fought
between the classical and the romantic schools.  Yet, it is in the
heart of this century, of Goldsmith and Stothard, of Watteau and the
Siecle de Louis XIV.--in one of its central, if not most
characteristic figures, in Rousseau--that the modern or French
romanticism really originates.  But, what in the eighteenth century
is but an exceptional phenomenon, breaking through its fair reserve
and discretion only at rare intervals, is the habitual guise of the
nineteenth, breaking through it perpetually, with a feverishness, an
incomprehensible straining and excitement, which all experience to
some degree, but yearning also, in the genuine children of the
romantic school, to be energique, frais, et dispos--for those
qualities of energy, freshness, comely order; and often, in Murger,
in Gautier, in Victor Hugo, for instance, with singular felicity
attaining them.

It is in the terrible tragedy of Rousseau, in [252] fact, that French
romanticism, with much else, begins: reading his Confessions we seem
actually to assist at the birth of this new, strong spirit in the
French mind.  The wildness which has shocked so many, and the
fascination which has influenced almost every one, in the squalid,
yet eloquent figure, we see and hear so clearly in that book,
wandering under the apple-blossoms and among the vines of Neuchatel
or Vevey actually give it the quality of a very successful romantic
invention.  His strangeness or distortion, his profound subjectivity,
his passionateness--the cor laceratum--Rousseau makes all men in love
with these.  Je ne suis fait comme aucun de ceux que j'ai sus.  Mais
si je ne vaux pas mieux, au moins je suis autre.  "I am not made like
any one else I have ever known: yet, if I am not better, at least I
am different."  These words, from the first page of the Confessions,
anticipate all the Werthers, Renes, Obermanns, of the last hundred
years.  For Rousseau did but anticipate a trouble in the spirit of
the whole world; and thirty years afterwards, what in him was a
peculiarity, became part of the general consciousness.  A storm was
coming: Rousseau, with others, felt it in the air, and they helped to
bring it down: they introduced a disturbing element into French
literature, then so trim and formal, like our own literature of the
age of Queen Anne.

In 1815 the storm had come and gone, but had left, in the spirit of
"young France," the [253] ennui of an immense disillusion.  In the
last chapter of Edgar Quinet's Revolution Francaise, a work itself
full of irony, of disillusion, he distinguishes two books,
Senancour's Obermann and Chateaubriand's Genie du Christianisme, as
characteristic of the first decade of the present century.  In those
two books we detect already the disease and the cure--in Obermann the
irony, refined into a plaintive philosophy of "indifference"--in
Chateaubriand's Genie du Christianisme, the refuge from a tarnished
actual present, a present of disillusion, into a world of strength
and beauty in the Middle Age, as at an earlier period--in Rene and
Atala--into the free play of them in savage life.  It is to minds in
this spiritual situation, weary of the present, but yearning for the
spectacle of beauty and strength, that the works of French
romanticism appeal.  They set a positive value on the intense, the
exceptional; and a certain distortion is sometimes noticeable in
them, as in conceptions like Victor Hugo's Quasimodo, or Gwynplaine,
something of a terrible grotesque, of the macabre, as the French
themselves call it; though always combined with perfect literary
execution, as in Gautier's La Morte Amoureuse, or the scene of the
"maimed" burial-rites of the player, dead of the frost, in his
Capitaine Fracasse--true "flowers of the yew."  It becomes grim
humour in Victor Hugo's combat of Gilliatt with the devil-fish, or
the incident, with all its ghastly comedy drawn [254] out at length,
of the great gun detached from its fastenings on shipboard, in
Quatre-Vingt-Trieze (perhaps the most terrible of all the accidents
that can happen by sea) and in the entire episode, in that book, of
the Convention.  Not less surely does it reach a genuine pathos; for
the habit of noting and distinguishing one's own most intimate
passages of sentiment makes one sympathetic, begetting, as it must,
the power of entering, by all sorts of finer ways, into the intimate
recesses of other minds; so that pity is another quality of
romanticism, both Victor Hugo and Gautier being great lovers of
animals, and charming writers about them, and Murger being unrivalled
in the pathos of his Scenes de la Vie de Jeunesse.  Penetrating so
finely into all situations which appeal to pity, above all, into the
special or exceptional phases of such feeling, the romantic humour is
not afraid of the quaintness or singularity of its circumstances or
expression, pity, indeed, being of the essence of humour; so that
Victor Hugo does but turn his romanticism into practice, in his
hunger and thirst after practical Justice!--a justice which shall no
longer wrong children, or animals, for instance, by ignoring in a
stupid, mere breadth of view, minute facts about them.  Yet the
romanticists are antinomian, too, sometimes, because the love of
energy and beauty, of distinction in passion, tended naturally to
become a little bizarre, plunging into the [255] Middle Age, into the
secrets of old Italian story.  Are we in the Inferno?--we are tempted
to ask, wondering at something malign in so much beauty.  For over
all a care for the refreshment of the human spirit by fine art
manifests itself, a predominant sense of literary charm, so that, in
their search for the secret of exquisite expression, the romantic
school went back to the forgotten world of early French poetry, and
literature itself became the most delicate of the arts--like
"goldsmith's work," says Sainte-Beuve, of Bertrand's Gaspard de la
Nuit--and that peculiarly French gift, the gift of exquisite speech,
argute loqui, attained in them a perfection which it had never seen
before.

Stendhal, a writer whom I have already quoted, and of whom English
readers might well know much more than they do, stands between the
earlier and later growths of the romantic spirit.  His novels are
rich in romantic quality; and his other writings--partly criticism,
partly personal reminiscences--are a very curious and interesting
illustration of the needs out of which romanticism arose.  In his
book on Racine and Shakespeare, Stendhal argues that all good art was
romantic in its day; and this is perhaps true in Stendhal's sense.
That little treatise, full of "dry light" and fertile ideas, was
published in the year 1823, and its object is to defend an entire
independence and liberty in the choice and treatment of subject, both
in [256] art and literature, against those who upheld the exclusive
authority of precedent.  In pleading the cause of romanticism,
therefore, it is the novelty, both of form and of motive, in writings
like the Hernani of Victor Hugo (which soon followed it, raising a
storm of criticism) that he is chiefly concerned to justify.  To be
interesting and really stimulating, to keep us from yawning even, art
and literature must follow the subtle movements of that nimbly-
shifting Time-Spirit, or Zeit-Geist, understood by French not less
than by German criticism, which is always modifying men's taste, as
it modifies their manners and their pleasures.  This, he contends, is
what all great workmen had always understood.  Dante, Shakespeare,
Moliere, had exercised an absolute independence in their choice of
subject and treatment.  To turn always with that ever-changing
spirit, yet to retain the flavour of what was admirably done in past
generations, in the classics, as we say--is the problem of true
romanticism.  "Dante," he observes, "was pre-eminently the romantic
poet.  He adored Virgil, yet he wrote the Divine Comedy, with the
episode of Ugolino, which is as unlike the Aeneid as can possibly be.
And those who thus obey the fundamental principle of romanticism, one
by one become classical, and are joined to that ever-increasing
common league, formed by men of all countries, to approach nearer and
nearer to perfection."

Romanticism, then, although it has its epochs, [257] is in its
essential characteristics rather a spirit which shows itself at all
times, in various degrees, in individual workmen and their work, and
the amount of which criticism has to estimate in them taken one by
one, than the peculiarity of a time or a school.  Depending on the
varying proportion of curiosity and the desire of beauty, natural
tendencies of the artistic spirit at all times, it must always be
partly a matter of individual temperament.  The eighteenth century in
England has been regarded as almost exclusively a classical period;
yet William Blake, a type of so much which breaks through what are
conventionally thought the influences of that century, is still a
noticeable phenomenon in it, and the reaction in favour of naturalism
in poetry begins in that century, early.  There are, thus, the born
romanticists and the born classicists.  There are the born
classicists who start with form, to whose minds the comeliness of the
old, immemorial, well-recognised types in art and literature, have
revealed themselves impressively; who will entertain no matter which
will not go easily and flexibly into them; whose work aspires only to
be a variation upon, or study from, the older masters.  "'Tis art's
decline, my son!" they are always saying, to the progressive element
in their own generation; to those who care for that which in fifty
years' time every one will be caring for.  On the other hand, there
are the born romanticists, who start with an original, [258] untried
matter, still in fusion; who conceive this vividly, and hold by it as
the essence of their work; who, by the very vividness and heat of
their conception, purge away, sooner or later, all that is not
organically appropriate to it, till the whole effect adjusts itself
in clear, orderly, proportionate form; which form, after a very
little time, becomes classical in its turn.

The romantic or classical character of a picture, a poem, a literary
work, depends, then, on the balance of certain qualities in it; and
in this sense, a very real distinction may be drawn between good
classical and good romantic work.  But all critical terms are
relative; and there is at least a valuable suggestion in that theory
of Stendhal's, that all good art was romantic in its day.  In the
beauties of Homer and Pheidias, quiet as they now seem, there must
have been, for those who confronted them for the first time,
excitement and surprise, the sudden, unforeseen satisfaction of the
desire of beauty.  Yet the Odyssey, with its marvellous adventure, is
more romantic than the Iliad, which nevertheless contains, among many
other romantic episodes, that of the immortal horses of Achilles, who
weep at the death of Patroclus.  Aeschylus is more romantic than
Sophocles, whose Philoctetes, were it written now, might figure, for
the strangeness of its motive and the perfectness of its execution,
as typically romantic; while, of Euripides, it may be said, that his
method in [259] writing his plays is to sacrifice readily almost
everything else, so that he may attain the fulness of a single
romantic effect.  These two tendencies, indeed, might be applied as a
measure or standard, all through Greek and Roman art and poetry, with
very illuminating results; and for an analyst of the romantic
principle in art, no exercise would be more profitable, than to walk
through the collection of classical antiquities at the Louvre, or the
British Museum, or to examine some representative collection of Greek
coins, and note how the element of curiosity, of the love of
strangeness, insinuates itself into classical design, and record the
effects of the romantic spirit there, the traces of struggle, of the
grotesque even, though over-balanced here by sweetness; as in the
sculpture of Chartres and Rheims, the real sweetness of mind in the
sculptor is often overbalanced by the grotesque, by the rudeness of
his strength.

Classicism, then, means for Stendhal, for that younger enthusiastic
band of French writers whose unconscious method he formulated into
principles, the reign of what is pedantic, conventional, and narrowly
academical in art; for him, all good art is romantic.  To Sainte-
Beuve, who understands the term in a more liberal sense, it is the
characteristic of certain epochs, of certain spirits in every epoch,
not given to the exercise of original imagination, but rather to the
working out of refinements of manner on some [260] authorised matter;
and who bring to their perfection, in this way, the elements of
sanity, of order and beauty in manner.  In general criticism, again,
it means the spirit of Greece and Rome, of some phases in literature
and art that may seem of equal authority with Greece and Rome, the
age of Louis the Fourteenth, the age of Johnson; though this is at
best an uncritical use of the term, because in Greek and Roman work
there are typical examples of the romantic spirit.  But explain the
terms as we may, in application to particular epochs, there are these
two elements always recognisable; united in perfect art--in
Sophocles, in Dante, in the highest work of Goethe, though not always
absolutely balanced there; and these two elements may be not
inappropriately termed the classical and romantic tendencies.

Material for the artist, motives of inspiration, are not yet
exhausted: our curious, complex, aspiring age still abounds in
subjects for aesthetic manipulation by the literary as well as by
other forms of art.  For the literary art, at all events, the problem
just now is, to induce order upon the contorted, proportionless
accumulation of our knowledge and experience, our science and
history, our hopes and disillusion, and, in effecting this, to do
consciously what has been done hitherto for the most part too
unconsciously, to write our English language as the Latins wrote
theirs, as the [261] French write, as scholars should write.
Appealing, as he may, to precedent in this matter, the scholar will
still remember that if "the style is the man" it is also the age:
that the nineteenth century too will be found to have had its style,
justified by necessity--a style very different, alike from the
baldness of an impossible "Queen Anne" revival, and an incorrect,
incondite exuberance, after the mode of Elizabeth: that we can only
return to either at the price of an impoverishment of form or matter,
or both, although, an intellectually rich age such as ours being
necessarily an eclectic one, we may well cultivate some of the
excellences of literary types so different as those: that in
literature as in other matters it is well to unite as many diverse
elements as may be: that the individual writer or artist, certainly,
is to be estimated by the number of graces he combines, and his power
of interpenetrating them in a given work.  To discriminate schools,
of art, of literature, is, of course, part of the obvious business of
literary criticism: but, in the work of literary production, it is
easy to be overmuch occupied concerning them.  For, in truth, the
legitimate contention is, not of one age or school of literary art
against another, but of all successive schools alike, against the
stupidity which is dead to the substance, and the vulgarity which is
dead to form.


NOTES


241. +Transliteration: ainei de palaion men oinon, anthea d' hymnon
neoteron.  Translation: "Praise wine for its age, but the song in first
bloom.  Pindar, Odes, Book O, Poem 9, Line 47.

244. +Transliteration: kosmiotes.  Liddell and Scott definition:
"propriety, decorum, orderly behavior."







This etext was produced by Norman Wolcott.







Autobiography of Benvenuto Cellini

[Redactor's Note: This version of the Autobiography, one of the most
famous of all time, was translated by John Addington Symonds
(1840-1893). Cellini lived from 1500-1571. This version is in ASCII
and is also supplied in a single file HTML version. ]

-------------------------------------------------------------------------

The Autobiography of
Benvenuto Cellini

Translated By
John Addington Symonds

With Introduction and Notes
Volume 31

-------------------------------------------------------------------------

Introductory Sonnet

     THIS tale of my sore-troubled life I write,
        To thank the God of nature, who conveyed
        My soul to me, and with such care hath stayed
        That divers noble deeds I've brought to light.
     'Twas He subdued my cruel fortune's spite:
        Life glory virtue measureless hath made
        Such grace worth beauty be through me displayed
        That few can rival, none surpass me quite.
     Only it grieves me when I understand
        What precious time in vanity I've spent-
        The wind it beareth man's frail thoughts away.
     Yet, since remorse avails not, I'm content,
        As erst I came, WELCOME to go one day,
        Here in the Flower of this fair Tuscan land.

Introductory Note

AMONG the vast number of men who have thought fit to write down the
history of their own lives, three or four have achieved masterpieces
which stand out preeminently: Saint Augustine in his "Confessions,"
Samuel Pepys in his "Diary," Rousseau in his "Confessions." It is among
these extraordinary documents, and unsurpassed by any of them, that the
autobiography of Benvenuto Cellini takes its place.

The "Life" of himself which Cellini wrote was due to other motives than
those which produced its chief competitors for first place in its class.
St. Augustine's aim was religious and didactic, Pepys noted down in his
diary the daily events of his life for his sole satisfaction and with no
intention that any one should read the cipher in which they were
recorded. But Cellini wrote that the world might know, after he was
dead, what a fellow he had been; what great things he had attempted, and
against what odds he had carried them through. "All men," he held,
"whatever be their condition, who have done anything of merit, or which
verily has a semblance of merit, if so be they are men of truth and good
repute, should write the tale of their life with their own hand." That
he had done many things of merit, he had no manner of doubt. His repute
was great in his day, and perhaps good in the sense in which he meant
goodness; as to whether he was a man of truth, there is still dispute
among scholars. Of some misrepresentations, some suppressions of
damaging facts, there seems to be evidence only too good-a man with
Cellini's passion for proving himself in the right could hardly have
avoided being guilty of such-; but of the general trustworthiness of his
record, of the kind of man he was and the kind of life he led, there is
no reasonable doubt.

The period covered by the autobiography is from Cellini's birth in 1500
to 1562; the scene is mainly in Italy and France. Of the great events of
the time, the time of the Reformation and the Counter-Reformation, of
the strife of Pope and Emperor and King, we get only glimpses. The
leaders in these events appear in the foreground of the picture only
when they come into personal relations with the hero; and then not
mainly as statesmen or warriors, but as connoisseurs and patrons of art.
Such an event as the Sack of Rome is described because Benvenuto himself
fought in it.

Much more complete is the view he gives of the artistic life of the
time. It was the age of Michelangelo, and in the throng of great artists
which then filled the Italian cities, Cellini was no inconsiderable
figure. Michelangelo himself he knew and adored. Nowhere can we gain a
better idea than in this book of the passionate enthusiasm for the
creation of beauty which has bestowed upon the Italy of the Renaissance
its greatest glory.

Very vivid, too, is the impression we receive of the social life of the
sixteenth century; of its violence and licentiousness, of its zeal for
fine craftsmanship, of its abounding vitality, its versatility and its
idealism. For Cellini himself is an epitome of that century. This man
who tells here the story of his life was a murderer and a braggart,
insolent, sensual, inordinately proud and passionate; but he was also a
worker in gold and silver, rejoicing in delicate chasing and subtle
modelling of precious surfaces; a sculptor and a musician; and, as all
who read his book must testify, a great master of narrative. Keen as was
Benvenuto's interest in himself, and much as he loved to dwell on the
splendor of his exploits and achievements, he had little idea that
centuries after his death he would live again, less by his "Perseus" and
his goldsmith's work than by the book which he dictated casually to a
lad of fourteen, while he went about his work.

The autobiography was composed between 1558 and 1566, but it brings the
record down only to 1562. The remainder of Cellini's life seems to have
been somewhat more peaceful. In 1565 he married Piera de Salvadore
Parigi, a servant who had nursed him when he was sick; and in the care
of his children, as earlier of his sister and nieces, he showed more
tenderness than might have been expected from a man of his boisterous
nature. He died at Florence, May 13, 1571, and was buried in The Church
of the Annunziata in that city.

-------------------------------------------------------------------------

Autobiography of Benvenuto Cellini

I

ALL men of whatsoever quality they be, who have done anything of
excellence, or which may properly resemble excellence, ought, if they
are persons of truth and honesty, to describe their life with their own
hand; but they ought not to attempt so fine an enterprise till they have
passed the age of forty. This duty occurs to my own mind now that I am
travelling beyond the term of fifty-eight years, and am in Florence, the
city of my birth. Many untoward things can I remember, such as happen to
all who live upon our earth; and from those adversities I am now more
free than at any previous period of my career-nay, it seems to me that I
enjoy greater content of soul and health of body than ever I did in
bygone years. I can also bring to mind some pleasant goods and some
inestimable evils, which, when I turn my thoughts backward, strike
terror in me, and astonishment that I should have reached this age of
fifty-eight, wherein, thanks be to God, I am still travelling
prosperously forward.



II

IT is true that men who have laboured with some show of excellence, have
already given knowledge of themselves to the world; and this alone ought
to suffice them; I mean the fact that they have proved their manhood and
achieved renown. Yet one must needs live like others; and so in a work
like this there will always be found occasion for natural bragging,
which is of divers kinds, and the first is that a man should let others
know he draws his lineage from persons of worth and most ancient origin.

I am called Benvenuto Cellini, son of Maestro Giovanni, son of Andrea,
son of Cristofano Cellini; my mother was Madonna Elisabetta, daughter to
Stefano Granacci; both parents citizens of Florence. It is found written
in chronicles made by our ancestors of Florence, men of old time and of
credibility, even as Giovanni Villani writes, that the city of Florence
was evidently built in imitation of the fair city of Rome; and certain
remnants of the Colosseum and the Baths can yet be traced. These things
are near Santa Croce. The Capitol was where is now the Old Market. The
Rotonda is entire, which was made for the temple of Mars, and is now
dedicated to our Saint John. That thus is was, can very well be seen,
and cannot be denied, but the said buildings are much smaller than those
of Rome. He who caused them to built, they say, was Julius Caesar, in
concert with some noble Romans, who, when Fiesole had been stormed and
taken, raised a city in this place, and each of them took in hand to
erect one of these notable edifices.

Julius Caesar had among his captains a man of highest rank and valour,
who was called Fiorino of Cellino, which is a village about two miles
distant from Monte Fiascone. Now this Fiorino took up his quarters under
the hill of Fiesole, on the ground where Florence now stands, in order
to be near the river Arno, and for the convenience of the troops. All
those soldiers and others who had to do with the said captain, used then
to say: "Let us go to Fiorenze;" as well because the said captain was
called Fiorino, as also because the place he had chosen for his quarters
was by nature very rich in flowers. Upon the foundation of the city,
therefore, since this name struck Julius Caesar as being fair and apt,
and given by circumstance, and seeing furthermore that flowers
themselves bring good augury, he appointed the name of Florence for the
town. He wished besides to pay his valiant captain this compliment; and
he loved him all the more for having drawn him from a very humble place,
and for the reason that so excellent a man was a creature of his own.
The name that learned inventors and investigators of such etymologies
adduce, as that Florence is flowing at the Arno, cannot hold; seeing
that Rome is flowing at the Tiber, Ferrara is flowing at the Po, Lyons
is flowing at the Saone, Paris is flowing at the Seine, and yet the
names of all these towns are different, and have come to them by other
ways. [1]

Thus then we find; and thus we believe that we are descended from a man
of worth. Furthermore, we find that there are Cellinis of our stock in
Ravenna, that most ancient town of Italy, where too are plenty of gentle
folk. In Pisa also there are some, and I have discovered them in many
parts of Christendom; and in this state also the breed exists, men
devoted to the profession of arms; for not many years ago a young man,
called Luca Cellini, a beardless youth, fought with a soldier of
experience and a most valorous man, named Francesco da Vicorati, who had
frequently fought before in single combat. This Luca, by his own valour,
with sword in hand, overcame and slew him, with such bravery and
stoutness that he moved the folk to wonder, who were expecting quite the
contrary issue; so that I glory in tracing my descent from men of valour.

As for the trifling honours which I have gained for my house, under the
well-known conditions of our present ways of living, and by means of my
art, albeit the same are matters of no great moment, I will relate these
in their proper time and place, taking much more pride in having been
born humble and having laid some honourable foundation for my family,
than if I had been born of great lineage and had stained or overclouded
that by my base qualities. So then I will make a beginning by saying how
it pleased God I should be born.

Note 1. He is alluding to the name 'Fluenzia,' which some antiquaries of
his day thought to have been the earliest name of the city, derived from
its being near 'Arno Fluente.' I have translated the word 'fluente' in
the text literally, though of course it signifies "situated on a flowing
river." I need not call attention to the apocryphal nature of Cellini's
own derivation from the name of his supposed ancestor.



III

MY ancestors dwelt in Val d' Ambra, where they owned large estates, and
lived like little lords, in retirement, however, on account of the then
contending factions. They were all men devoted to arms and of notable
bravery. In that time one of their sons, the younger, who was called
Cristofano, roused a great feud with certain of their friends and
neighbours. Now the heads of the families on both sides took part in it,
and the fire kindled seemed to them so threatening that their houses
were like to perish utterly; the elders upon this consideration, in
concert with my own ancestors, removed Cristofano; and the other youth
with whom the quarrel began was also sent away. They sent their young
man to Siena. Our folk sent Cristofano to Florence; and there they
bought for him a little house in Via Chiara, close to the convent of S.
Orsola, and they also purchased for him some very good property near the
Ponte a Rifredi. The said Cristofano took wife in Florence, and had sons
and daughters; and when all the daughters had been portioned off, the
sons, after their father's death, divided what remained. The house in
Via Chiara with some other trifles fell to the share of one of the said
sons, who had the name of Andrea. He also took wife, and had four male
children. The first was called Girolamo, the second Bartolommeo, the
third Giovanni, who was afterwards my father, and the fourth Francesco.
This Andrea Cellini was very well versed in architecture, as it was then
practised, and lived by it as his trade. Giovanni, who was my father,
paid more attention to it than any of the other brothers. And since
Vitruvius says, amongst other things, that one who wishes to practise
that art well must have something of music and good drawing, Giovanni,
when he had mastered drawing, began to turn his mind to music, and
together with the theory learned to play most excellently on the viol
and the flute; and being a person of studious habits, he left his home
but seldom.

They had for neighbour in the next house a man called Stefano Granacci,
who had several daughters, all of them of remarkable beauty. As it
pleased God, Giovanni noticed one of these girls who was named
Elisabetta; and she found such favour with him that he asked her in
marriage. The fathers of both of them being well acquainted through
their close neighbourhood, it was easy to make this match up; and each
thought that he had very well arranged his affairs. First of all the two
good old men agreed upon the marriage; then they began to discuss the
dowry, which led to a certain amount of friendly difference; for Andrea
said to Stefano: "My son Giovanni is the stoutest youth of Florence, and
of all Italy to boot, and if I had wanted earlier to have him married, I
could have procured one of the largest dowries which folk of our rank
get in Florence:" whereupon Stefano answered: "You have a thousand
reasons on your side; but here am I with five daughters and as many
sons, and when my reckoning is made, this is as much as I can possibly
afford." Giovanni, who had been listening awhile unseen by them,
suddenly broke in and said: "O my father, I have sought and loved that
girl and not their money. Ill luck to those who seek to fill their
pockets by the dowry of their wife! As you have boasted that I am a
fellow of such parts, do you not think that I shall be able to provide
for my wife and satisfy her needs, even if I receive something short of
the portion you would like to get? Now I must make you understand that
the woman is mine, and you may take the dowry for yourself." At this
Andrea Cellini, who was a man of rather awkward temper, grew a trifle
angry; but after a few days Giovanni took his wife, and never asked for
other portion with her.

They enjoyed their youth and wedded love through eighteen years, always
greatly desiring to be blessed with children. At the end of this time
Giovanni's wife miscarried of two boys through the unskilfulness of the
doctors. Later on she was again with child, and gave birth to a girl,
whom they called Cosa, after the mother of my father. [1] At the end of
two years she was once more with child; and inasmuch as those longings
to which pregnant women are subject, and to which they pay much
attention, were now exactly the same as those of her former pregnancy,
they made their minds up that she would give birth to a female as
before, and agreed to call the child Reparata, after the mother of my
mother. It happened that she was delivered on a night of All Saints,
following the feast-day, at half-past four precisely, in the year 1500.
[2] The midwife, who knew that they were expecting a girl, after she had
washed the baby and wrapped it in the fairest white linen, came softly
to my father Giovanni and said: "I am bringing you a fine present, such
as you did not anticipate." My father, who was a true philosopher, was
walking up and down, and answered: "What God gives me is always dear to
me;" and when he opened the swaddling clothes, he saw with his own eyes
the unexpected male child. Joining together the palms of his old hands,
he raised them with his eyes to God, and said "Lord, I thank Thee with
my whole heart; this gift is very dear to me; let him be Welcome." All
the persons who were there asked him joyfully what name the child should
bear. Giovanni would make no other answer than "Let him be
Welcome-Benvenuto;" [3] and so they resolved, and this name was given me
at Holy Baptism, and by it I still am living with the grace of God.

Note 1. Cosa is Florentine for Niccolosa.

Note 2. The hour is reckoned, according to the old Italian fashion, from
sunset of one day to sunset of the next-twenty-four hours.

Note 3. Benvenuto means Welcome.



IV

ANDREA CELLINI was yet alive when I was about three years old, and he
had passed his hundredth. One day they had been altering a certain
conduit pertaining to a cistern, and there issued from it a great
scorpion unperceived by them, which crept down from the cistern to the
ground, and slank away beneath a bench. I saw it, and ran up to it, and
laid my hands upon it. It was so big that when I had it in my little
hands, it put out its tail on one side, and on the other thrust forth
both its mouths. [1] They relate that I ran in high joy to my
grandfather, crying out: "Look, grandpapa, at my pretty little crab."
When he recognised that the creature was a scorpion, he was on the point
of falling dead for the great fear he had and anxiety about me. He
coaxed and entreated me to give it him; but the more he begged, the
tighter I clasped it, crying and saying I would not give it to any one.
My father, who was also in the house, ran up when he heard my screams,
and in his stupefaction could not think how to prevent the venomous
animal from killing me. Just then his eyes chanced to fall upon a pair
of scissors; and so, while soothing and caressing me, he cut its tail
and mouths off. Afterwards, when the great peril had been thus averted,
he took the occurrence for a good augury.

When I was about five years old my father happened to be in a
basement-chamber of our house, where they had been washing, and where a
good fire of oak-logs was still burning; he had a viol in his hand, and
was playing and singing alone beside the fire. The weather was very
cold. Happening to look into the fire, he spied in the middle of those
most burning flames a little creature like a lizard, which was sporting
in the core of the intensest coals. Becoming instantly aware of what the
thing was, he had my sister and me called, and pointing it out to us
children, gave me a great box on the ears, which caused me to howl and
weep with all my might. Then he pacified me good-humouredly, and spoke
as follows: "My dear little boy, I am not striking you for any wrong
that you have done, but only to make you remember that that lizard which
you see in the fire is a salamander, a creature which has never been
seen before by any one of whom we have credible information." So saying,
he kissed me and gave me some pieces of money.

Note 1. The word is 'bocche,' so I have translated it by 'mouths.' But
Cellini clearly meant the gaping claws of the scorpion.



V

MY father began teaching me to play upon the flute and sing by note; by
notwithstanding I was of that tender age when little children are wont
to take pastime in whistles and such toys, I had an inexpressible
dislike for it, and played and sang only to obey him. My father in those
times fashioned wonderful organs with pipes of wood, spinets the fairest
and most excellent which then could be seen, viols and lutes and harps
of the most beautiful and perfect construction. He was an engineer, and
had marvellous skill in making instruments for lowering bridges and for
working mills, and other machines of that sort. In ivory he was the
first who wrought really well. But after he had fallen in love with the
woman who was destined to become my mother-perhaps what brought them
together was that little flute, to which indeed he paid more attention
than was proper-he was entreated by the fifers of the Signory to play in
their company. Accordingly he did so for some time to amuse himself,
until by constant importunity they induced him to become a member of
their band. Lorenzo de' Medici and Pietro his son, who had a great
liking for him, perceived later on that he was devoting himself wholly
to the fife, and was neglecting his fine engineering talent and his
beautiful art. [1] So they had him removed from that post. My father
took this very ill, and it seemed to him that they had done him a great
despite. Yet he immediately resumed his art, and fashioned a mirror,
about a cubit in diameter, out of bone and ivory, with figures and
foliage of great finish and grand design. The mirror was in the form of
a wheel. In the middle was the looking-glass; around it were seven
circular pieces, on which were the Seven Virtues, carved and joined of
ivory and black bone. The whole mirror, together with the Virtues, was
placed in equilibrium, so that when the wheel turned, all the Virtues
moved, and they had weights at their feet which kept them upright.
Possessing some acquaintance with the Latin tongue, he put a legend in
Latin round his looking-glass, to this effect-"Whithersoever the wheel
of Fortune turns, Virtue stands firm upon her feet:"

     Rota sum: semper, quoquo me verto, stat Virtus.

A little while after this he obtained his place again among the fifers.
Although some of these things happened before I was born, my familiarity
with them has moved me to set them down here. In those days the
musicians of the Signory were all of them members of the most honourable
trades, and some of them belonged to the greater guilds of silk and
wool; [2] and that was the reason why my father did not disdain to
follow this profession, and his chief desire with regard to me was
always that I should become a great performer on the flute. I for my
part felt never more discontented than when he chose to talk to me about
this scheme, and to tell me that, if I liked, he discerned in me such
aptitudes that I might become the best man in the world.

Note 1. The Medici here mentioned were Lorenzo the Magnificent, and his
son Pietro, who was expelled from Florence in the year 1494. He never
returned, but died in the river Garigliano in 1504.

Note 2. In the Middle Ages the burghers of Florence were divided into
industrial guilds called the Greater and the Lesser Arts. The former
took precedence of the latter, both in political importance and in
social esteem.



VI

AS I have said, my father was the devoted servant and attached friend of
the house of Medici; and when Piero was banished, he entrusted him with
many affairs of the greatest possible importance. Afterwards, when the
magnificent Piero Soderini was elected, and my father continued in his
office of musician, Soderini, perceiving his wonderful talent, began to
employ him in many matters of great importance as an engineer. [1] So
long as Soderini remained in Florence, he showed the utmost good-will to
my father; and in those days, I being still of tender age, my father had
me carried, and made me perform upon the flute; I used to play treble in
concert with the musicians of the palace before the Signory, following
my notes: and a beadle used to carry me upon his shoulders. The
Gonfalonier, that is, Soderini, whom I have already mentioned, took much
pleasure in making me chatter, and gave me comfits, and was wont to say
to my father: "Maestro Giovanni, besides music, teach the boy those
other arts which do you so much honour." To which my father answered: "I
do not wish him to practise any art but playing and composing; for in
this profession I hope to make him the greatest man of the world, if God
prolongs his life." To these words one of the old counsellors made
answer: "Ah! Maestro Giovanni, do what the Gonfalonier tells you! for
why should he never become anything more than a good musician?"

Thus some time passed, until the Medici returned. [2] When they arrived,
the Cardinal, who afterwards became Pope Leo, received my father very
kindly. During their exile the scutcheons which were on the palace of
the Medici had had their balls erased, and a great red cross painted
over them, which was the bearing of the Commune. [3] Accordingly, as
soon as they returned, the red cross was scratched out, and on the
scutcheon the red balls and the golden field were painted in again, and
finished with great beauty. My father, who possessed a simple vein of
poetry, instilled in him by nature, together with a certain touch of
prophecy, which was doubtless a divine gift in him, wrote these four
verses under the said arms of the Medici, when they were uncovered to
the view:-

     These arms, which have so long from sight been laid
       Beneath the holy cross, that symbol meek,
       Now lift their glorious glad face, and seek
     With Peter's sacred cloak to be arrayed.

This epigram was read by all Florence. A few days afterwards Pope Julius
II. died. The Cardinal de' Medici went to Rome, and was elected Pope
against the expectation of everybody. He reigned as Leo X, that generous
and great soul. My father sent him his four prophetic verses. The Pope
sent to tell him to come to Rome; for this would be to his advantage.
But he had no will to go; and so, in lieu of reward, his place in the
palace was taken from him by Jacopo Salviati, upon that man's election
as Gonfalonier. [4] This was the reason why I commenced goldsmith; after
which I spent part of my time in learning that art, and part in playing,
much against my will.

Note 1. Piero Soderini was elected Gonfalonier of the Florentine
Republic for life in the year 1502. After nine years of government, he
was banished, and when he died, Machiavelli wrote the famous sneering
epitaph upon him. See J. A. Symonds' 'Renaissance in Italy,' vol. i. p.
297.

Note 2. This was in 1512, when Lorenzo's two sons, Giuliano and Giovanni
(afterwards Pope Leo X), came back through the aid of a Spanish army,
after the great battle at Ravenna.

Note 3. The Medicean arms were "or, six pellets gules, three, two, and
one." The Florentine Commune bore, "argent a cross gules."

Note 4. Cellini makes a mistake here. Salviati married a daughter of
Lorenzo de' Medici, and obtained great influence in Florence; but we
have no record of his appointment to the office of Gonfalonier.



VII

WHEN my father spoke to me in the way I have above described, I
entreated him to let me draw a certain fixed number of hours in the day;
all the rest of my time I would give to music, only with the view of
satisfying his desire. Upon this he said to me: "So then, you take no
pleasure in playing?" To which I answered, "No;" because that art seemed
too base in comparison with what I had in my own mind. My good father,
driven to despair by this fixed idea of mine, placed me in the workshop
of Cavaliere Bandinello's father, who was called Michel Agnolo, a
goldsmith from Pinzi di Monte, and a master excellent in that craft. [1]
He had no distinction of birth whatever, but was the son of a
charcoal-seller. This is no blame to Bandinello, who has founded the
honour of the family-if only he had done so honestly! However that may
be, I have no cause now to talk about him. After I had stayed there some
days, my father took me away from Michel Agnolo, finding himself unable
to live without having me always under his eyes. Accordingly, much to my
discontent, I remained at music till I reached the age of fifteen. If I
were to describe all the wonderful things that happened to me up to that
time, and all the great dangers to my own life which I ran, I should
astound my readers; but, in order to avoid prolixity, and having very
much to relate, I will omit these incidents.

When I reached the age of fifteen, I put myself, against my father's
will, to the goldsmith's trade with a man called Antonio, son of Sandro,
known commonly as Marcone the goldsmith. He was a most excellent
craftsman and a very good fellow to boot, high-spirited and frank in all
his ways. My father would not let him give me wages like the other
apprentices; for having taken up the study of this art to please myself,
he wished me to indulge my whim for drawing to the full. I did so
willingly enough; and that honest master of mine took marvellous delight
in my performances. He had an only son, a bastard, to whom he often gave
his orders, in order to spare me. My liking for the art was so great,
or, I may truly say, my natural bias, both one and the other, that in a
few months I caught up the good, nay, the best young craftsmen in our
business, and began to reap the fruits of my labours. I did not,
however, neglect to gratify my good father from time to time by playing
on the flute or cornet. Each time he heard me, I used to make his tears
fall accompanied with deep-drawn sighs of satisfaction. My filial piety
often made me give him that contentment, and induce me to pretend that I
enjoyed the music too.

Note 1. Baccio Bandinello, the sculptor, and a great rival of Cellini's,
as will appear in the ensuing pages, was born in 1487, and received the
honour of knighthood from Clement VII and Charles V. Posterity has
confirmed Cellini's opinion of Bandinello as an artist; for his works
are coarse, pretentious, and incapable of giving pleasure to any person
of refined intelligence.



VIII

AT that time I had a brother, younger by two years, a youth of extreme
boldness and fierce temper. He afterwards became one of the great
soldiers in the school of that marvellous general Giovannino de' Medici,
father of Duke Cosimo. [1] The boy was about fourteen, and I two years
older. One Sunday evening, just before nightfall, he happened to find
himself between the gate San Gallo and the Porta a Pinti; in this
quarter he came to duel with a young fellow of twenty or thereabouts.
They both had swords; and my brother dealt so valiantly that, after
having badly wounded him, he was upon the point of following up his
advantage. There was a great crowd of people present, among whom were
many of the adversary's kinsfolk. Seeing that the thing was going ill
for their own man, they put hand to their slings, a stone from one of
which hit my poor brother in the head. He fell to the ground at once in
a dead faint. It so chanced that I had been upon the spot alone, and
without arms; and I had done my best to get my brother out of the fray
by calling to him: "Make off; you have done enough." Meanwhile, as luck
would have it, he fell, as I have said, half dead to earth. I ran up at
once, seized his sword, and stood in front of him, bearing the brunt of
several rapiers and a shower of stones. I never left his side until some
brave soldiers came from the gate San Gallo and rescued me from the
raging crowd; they marvelled much, the while, to find such valour in so
young a boy.

Then I carried my brother home for dead, and it was only with great
difficulty that he came to himself again. When he was cured, the Eight,
who had already condemned out adversaries and banished them for a term
of years, sent us also into exile for six months at a distance of ten
miles from Florence. [2] I said to my brother: "Come along with me;" and
so we took leave of our poor father; and instead of giving us money, for
he had none, he bestowed on us his blessing. I went to Siena, wishing to
look up a certain worthy man called Maestro Francesco Castoro. On
another occasion, when I had run away from my father, I went to this
good man, and stayed some time with him, working at the goldsmith's
trade until my father sent for me back. Francesco, when I reached him,
recognised me at once, and gave me work to do While thus occupied, he
placed a house at my disposal for the whole time of my sojourn in Siena.
Into this I moved, together with my brother, and applied myself to
labour for the space of several months. My brother had acquired the
rudiments of Latin, but was still so young that he could not yet relish
the taste of virtuous employment, but passed his time in dissipation,

Note 1. Cellini refers to the famous Giovanni delle Bande Nere, who was
killed in an engagement in Lombardy in November 1526, by the Imperialist
troops marching to the sack of Rome. His son Cosimo, after the murder of
Duke Alessandro, established the second Medicean dynasty in Florence.

Note 2. The Eight, or Gli Otto, were a magistracy in Florence with
cognizance of matters affecting the internal peace of the city.



IX

THE CARDINAL DE' MEDICI, who afterwards became Pope Clement VII., had us
recalled to Florence at the entreaty of my father. [1] A certain pupil
of my father's, moved by his own bad nature, suggested to the Cardinal
that he ought to send me to Bologna, in order to learn to play well from
a great master there. The name of this master was Antonio, and he was in
truth a worthy man in the musician's art. The Cardinal said to my father
that, if he sent me there he would give me letters of recommendation and
support. My father, dying with joy at such an opportunity, sent me off;
and I being eager to see the world, went with good grace.

When I reached Bologna, I put myself under a certain Maestro Ercole del
Piffero, and began to earn something by my trade. In the meantime I used
to go every day to take my music lesson, and in a few weeks made
considerable progress in that accursed art. However I made still greater
in my trade of goldsmith; for the Cardinal having given me no
assistance, I went to live with a Bolognese illuminator who was called
Scipione Cavalletti (his house was in the street of our Lady del
Baraccan); and while there I devoted myself to drawing and working for
one Graziadio, a Jew, with whom I earned considerably.

At the end of six months I returned to Florence, where that fellow
Pierino, who had been my father's pupil, was greatly mortified by my
return. To please my father, I went to his house and played the cornet
and the flute with one of his brothers, who was named Girolamo, several
years younger than the said Piero, a very worthy young man, and quite
the contrary of his brother. On one of those days my father came to
Piero's house to hear us play, and in ecstasy at my performance
exclaimed: "I shall yet make you a marvellous musician against the will
of all or any one who may desire to prevent me." To this Piero answered,
and spoke the truth: "Your Benvenuto will get much more honour and
profit if he devotes himself to the goldsmiths trade than to this
piping." These words made my father angry, seeing that I too had the
same opinion as Piero, that he flew into a rage and cried out at him:
"Well did I know that it was you, you who put obstacles in the way of my
cherished wish; you are the man who had me ousted from my place at the
palace, paying me back with that black ingratitude which is the usual
recompense of great benefits. I got you promoted, and you have got me
cashiered; I taught you to play with all the little art you have, and
you are preventing my son from obeying me; but bear in mind these words
of prophecy: not years or months, I say, but only a few weeks will pass
before this dirty ingratitude of yours shall plunge you into ruin." To
these words answered Pierino and said: "Maestro Giovanni, the majority
of men, when they grow old, go mad at the same time; and this has
happened to you. I am not astonished at it, because most liberally have
you squandered all your property, without reflecting that your children
had need of it. I mind to do just the opposite, and to leave my children
so much that they shall be able to succour yours." To this my father
answered: "No bad tree ever bore good fruit; quite the contrary; and I
tell you further that you are bad, and that your children will be mad
and paupers, and will cringe for alms to my virtuous and wealthy sons."
Thereupon we left the house, muttering words of anger on both sides. I
had taken my father's part; and when we stepped into the street
together, I told him I was quite ready to take vengeance for the insults
heaped on him by that scoundrel, provided he permit me to give myself up
to the art of design. He answered: "My dear son, I too in my time was a
good draughtsman; but for recreation, after such stupendous labours, and
for the love of me who am your father, who begat you and brought you up
and implanted so many honourable talents in you, for the sake of
recreation, I say, will not you promise sometimes to take in hand your
flute and that seductive cornet, and to play upon them to your heart's
content, inviting the delight of music?" I promised I would do so, and
very willingly for his love's sake. Then my good father said that such
excellent parts as I possessed would be the greatest vengeance I could
take for the insults of his enemies.

Not a whole month had been completed after this scene before the man
Pierino happened to be building a vault in a house of his, which he had
in the Via dello Studio; and being one day in a ground-floor room above
the vault which he was making, together with much company around him, he
fell to talking about his old master, my father. While repeating the
words which he had said to him concerning his ruin, no sooner had they
escaped his lips than the floor where he was standing (either because
the vault had been badly built, or rather through the sheer mightiness
of God, who does not always pay on Saturday) suddenly gave way. Some of
the stones and bricks of the vault, which fell with him, broke both his
legs. The friends who were with him, remaining on the border of the
broken vault took no harm, but were astounded and full of wonder,
especially because of the prophecy which he had just contemptuously
repeated to them. When my father heard of this, he took his sword, and
went to see the man. There, in the presence of his father, who was
called Niccolaio da Volterra, a trumpeter of the Signory, he said, "O
Piero, my dear pupil, I am sorely grieved at your mischance; but if you
remember it was only a short time ago that I warned you of it; and as
much as I then said will come to happen between your children and mine."
Shortly afterwards, the ungrateful Piero died of that illness. He left a
wife of bad character and one son, who after the lapse of some years
came to me to beg for alms in Rome. I gave him something, as well
because it is my nature to be charitable, as also because I recalled
with tears the happy state which Pierino held when my father spake those
words of prophecy, namely, that Pierino's children should live to crave
succour from his own virtuous sons. Of this perhaps enough is now said;
but let none ever laugh at the prognostications of any worthy man whom
he has wrongfully insulted; because it is not he who speaks, nay, but
the very voice of God through him.

Note 1. This Cardinal and Pope was Giulio, a natural son of Giuliano,
Lorenzo de' Medici's brother, who had been killed in the Pazzi
conspiracy, year 1478. Giulio lived to become Pope Clement VII., to
suffer the sack of Rome in 1527, and to make the concordat with Charles
V. at Bologna in 1529-30, which settled for three centuries the destiny
of Italy. We shall hear much more of him from Cellini in the course of
this narrative.



X

ALL this while I worked as a goldsmith, and was able to assist my good
father. His other son, my brother Cecchino, had, as I said before, been
instructed in the rudiments of Latin letters. It was our father's wish
to make me, the elder, a great musician and composer, and him, the
younger, a great and learned jurist. He could not, however, put force
upon the inclinations of our nature, which directed me to the arts of
design, and my brother, who had a fine and graceful person, to the
profession of arms. Cecchino, being still quite a lad, was returning
from his first lesson in the school of the stupendous Giovannino de'
Medici. On the day when he reached home, I happened to be absent; and
he, being in want of proper clothes, sought out our sisters, who,
unknown to my father, gave him a cloak and doublet of mine, both new and
of good quality. I ought to say that, beside the aid I gave my father
and my excellent and honest sisters, I had bought those handsome clothes
out of my own savings. When I found I had been cheated, and my clothes
taken from me, and my brother from whom I should have recovered them was
gone, I asked my father why he suffered so great a wrong to be done me,
seeing that I was always ready to assist him. He replied that I was his
good son, but that the other, whom he thought to have lost, had been
found again; also that it was a duty, nay, a precept from God Himself,
that he who hath should give to him who hath not; and that for his sake
I ought to bear this injustice, for God would increase me in all good
things. I, like a youth without experience, retorted on my poor
afflicted parent; and taking the miserable remnants of my clothes and
money, went toward a gate of the city. As I did not know which gate
would start me on the road to Rome, I arrived at Lucca, and from Lucca
reached Pisa.

When I came to Pisa (I was about sixteen years of age at the time), I
stopped near the middle bridge, by what is called the Fish-stone, at the
shop of a goldsmith, and began attentively to watch what the master was
about. [1] He asked me who I was, and what was my profession. I told him
that I worked a little in the same trade as his own. This worthy man
bade me come into his shop, and at once gave me work to do, and spoke as
follows: "Your good appearance makes me believe you are a decent honest
youth." Then he told me out gold, silver, and gems; and when the first
day's work was finished, he took me in the evening to his house, where
he dwelt respectably with his handsome wife and children. Thinking of
the grief which my good father might be feeling for me, I wrote him that
I was sojourning with a very excellent and honest man, called Maestro
Ulivieri della Chiostra, and was working with him at many good things of
beauty and importance. I bade him be of good cheer, for that I was bent
on learning, and hoped by my acquirements to bring him back both profit
and honour before long. My good father answered the letter at once in
words like these: "My son, the love I bear you is so great, that if it
were not for the honour of our family, which above all things I regard,
I should immediately have set off for you; for indeed it seems like
being without the light of my eyes, when I do not see you daily, as I
used to do. I will make it my business to complete the training of my
household up to virtuous honesty; do you make it yours to acquire
excellence in your art; and I only wish you to remember these four
simple words, obey them, and never let them escape your memory:

     In whatever house you be,
     Steal not, and live honestly."

Note 1. The Fish-stone, or Pietra del Pesce, was the market on the quay
where the fish brought from the sea up the Arno to Pisa used to be sold.



XI

THIS letter fell into the hands of my master Ulivieri, and he read it
unknown to me. Afterwards he avowed that he had read it, and added: "So
then, my Benvenuto, your good looks did not deceive me, as a letter from
your father which has come into my hands gives me assurance, which
proves him to be a man of notable honesty and worth. Consider yourself
then to be at home here, and as though in your own father's house."

While I stayed at Pisa, I went to see the Campo Santo, and there I found
many beautiful fragments of antiquity, that is to say, marble
sarcophagi. In other parts of Pisa also I saw many antique objects,
which I diligently studied whenever I had days or hours free from the
labour of the workshop. My master, who took pleasure in coming to visit
me in the little room which he had allotted me, observing that I spent
all my time in studious occupations, began to love me like a father. I
made great progress in the one year that I stayed there, and completed
several fine and valuable things in gold and silver, which inspired me
with a resolute ambition to advance in my art.

My father, in the meanwhile, kept writing piteous entreaties that I
should return to him; and in every letter bade me not to lose the music
he had taught me with such trouble. On this, I suddenly gave up all wish
to go back to him; so much did I hate that accursed music; and I felt as
though of a truth I were in paradise the whole year I stayed at Pisa,
where I never played the flute.

At the end of the year my master Ulivieri had occasion to go to
Florence, in order to sell certain gold and silver sweepings which he
had; [1] and inasmuch as the bad air of Pisa had given me a touch of
fever, I went with the fever hanging still about me, in my master's
company, back to Florence. There my father received him most
affectionately, and lovingly prayed him, unknown by me, not to insist on
taking me again to Pisa. I was ill about two months, during which time
my father had me most kindly treated and cured, always repeating that it
seemed to him a thousand years till I got well again, in order that he
might hear me play a little. But when he talked to me of music, with his
fingers on my pulse, seeing he had some acquaintance with medicine and
Latin learning, he felt it change so much if he approached that topic,
that he was often dismayed and left my side in tears. When I perceived
how greatly he was disappointed, I bade one of my sisters bring me a
flute; for though the fever never left me, that instrument is so easy
that it did not hurt me to play upon it; and I used it with such
dexterity of hand and tongue that my father coming suddenly upon me,
blessed me a thousand times, exclaiming that while I was away from him I
had made great progress, as he thought; and he begged me to go forwards,
and not to sacrifice so fine an accomplishment.

Note 1. I have translated 'spazzature' by 'sweepings.' It means all
refuse of the precious metals left in goldsmith's trays.



XII

WHEN I had recovered my health, I returned to my old friend Marcone, the
worthy goldsmith, who put me in the way of earning money, with which I
helped my father and our household. About that time there came to
Florence a sculptor named Piero Torrigiani; [1] he arrived from England,
where he had resided many years; and being intimate with my master, he
daily visited his house; and when he saw my drawings and the things
which I was making, he said: "I have come to Florence to enlist as many
young men as I can; for I have undertaken to execute a great work of my
king, and want some of my own Florentines to help me. Now your method of
working and your designs are worthy rather of a sculptor than a
goldsmith; and since I have to turn out a great piece of bronze, I will
at the same time turn you into a rich and able artist." This man had a
splendid person and a most arrogant spirit, with the air of a great
soldier more than a sculptor, especially in regard to his vehement
gestures and his resonant voice, together with a habit he had of
knitting his brows, enough to frighten any man of courage. He kept
talking every day about his gallant feats among those beasts of
Englishmen.

In course of conversation he happened to mention Michel Agnolo
Buonarroti, led thereto by a drawing I had made from a cartoon of that
divinest painter. [2] This cartoon was the first masterpiece which
Michel Agnolo exhibited, in proof of his stupendous talents. He produced
it in competition with another painter, Lionardo da Vinci, who also made
a cartoon; and both were intended for the council-hall in the palace of
the Signory. They represented the taking of Pisa by the Florentines; and
our admirable Lionardo had chosen to depict a battle of horses, with the
capture of some standards, in as divine a style as could possibly be
imagined. Michel Agnolo in his cartoon portrayed a number of
foot-soldiers, who, the season being summer, had gone to bathe in Arno.
He drew them at the very moment the alarm is sounded, and the men all
naked run to arms; so splendid in their action that nothing survives of
ancient or of modern art which touches the same lofty point of
excellence; and as I have already said, the design of the great Lionardo
was itself most admirably beautiful. These two cartoons stood, one in
the palace of the Medici, the other in the hall of the Pope. So long as
they remained intact, they were the school of the world. Though the
divine Michel Agnolo in later life finished that great chapel of Pope
Julius, [3] he never rose half-way to the same pitch of power; his
genius never afterwards attained to the force of those first studies.

Note 1. Torrigiani worked in fact for Henry VIII., and his monument to
Henry VII. still exists in the Lady Chapel of Westminster Abbey. From
England he went to Spain, where he modelled a statue of the Virgin for a
great nobleman. Not receiving the pay he expected, he broke his work to
pieces; for which act of sacrilege the Inquisition sent him to prison,
where he starved himself to death in 1522. Such at least is the legend
of his end.

Note 2. The cartoons to which Cellini here alludes were made by Michel
Angelo and Lionardo for the decoration of the Sala del Gran Consiglio in
the Palazzo Vecchio at Florence. Only the shadows of them remain to this
day; a part of Michel Angelo's, engraved by Schiavonetti, and a
transcript by Rubens from Lionardo's, called the Battle of the Standard.

Note 3. The Sistine Chapel in the Vatican.



XIII

NOW let us return to Piero Torrigiani, who, with my drawing in his hand,
spoke as follows: "This Buonarroti and I used, when we were boys, to go
into the Church of the Carmine, to learn drawing from the chapel of
Masaccio. [1] It was Buonarroti's habit to banter all who were drawing
there; and one day, among others, when he was annoying me, I got more
angry than usual, and clenching my fist, gave him such a blow on the
nose, that I felt bone and cartilage go down like biscuit beneath my
knuckles; and this mark of mine he will carry with him to the grave."
[2] These words begat in me such hatred of the man, since I was always
gazing at the masterpieces of the divine Michel Agnolo, that although I
felt a wish to go with him to England, I now could never bear the sight
of him.

All the while I was at Florence, I studied the noble manner of Michel
Agnolo, and from this I have never deviated. About that time I
contracted a close and familiar friendship with an amiable lad of my own
age, who was also in the goldsmith's trade. He was called Francesco, son
of Filippo, and grandson of Fra Lippo Lippi, that most excellent
painter. [3] Through intercourse together, such love grew up between us
that, day or night, we never stayed apart. The house where he lived was
still full of the fine studies which his father had made, bound up in
several books of drawings by his hand, and taken from the best
antiquities of Rome. The sight of these things filled me with passionate
enthusiasm; and for two years or thereabouts we lived in intimacy. At
that time I fashioned a silver bas-relief of the size of a little
child's hand. It was intended for the clasp to a man's belt; for they
were then worn as large as that. I carved on it a knot of leaves in the
antique style, with figures of children and other masks of great beauty.
This piece I made in the workshop of one Francesco Salimbene; and on its
being exhibited to the trade, the goldsmiths praised me as the best
young craftsman of their art.

There was one Giovan Battista, surnamed Il Tasso, a wood-carver,
precisely of my own age, who one day said to me that if I was willing to
go to Rome, he should be glad to join me. [4] Now we had this
conversation together immediately after dinner; and I being angry with
my father for the same old reason of the music, said to Tasso: "You are
a fellow of words, not deeds." He answered: "I too have come to anger
with my mother; and if I had cash enough to take me to Rome, I would not
turn back to lock the door of that wretched little workshop I call
mine." To these words I replied that if that was all that kept him in
Florence I had money enough in my pockets to bring us both to Rome.
Talking thus and walking onwards, we found ourselves at the gate San
Piero Gattolini without noticing that we had got there; whereupon I
said: "Friend Tasso, this is God's doing that we have reached this gate
without either you or me noticing that we were there; and now that I am
here, it seems to me that I have finished half the journey." And so,
being of one accord, we pursued our way together, saying, "Oh, what will
our old folks say this evening?" We then made an agreement not to think
more about them till we reached Rome. So we tied our aprons behind our
backs, and trudged almost in silence to Siena. When we arrived at Siena,
Tasso said (for he had hurt his feet) that he would not go farther, and
asked me to lend him money to get back. I made answer: "I should not
have enough left to go forward; you ought indeed to have thought of this
on leaving Florence; and if it is because of your feet that you shirk
the journey, we will find a return horse for Rome, which will deprive
you of the excuse." Accordingly I hired a horse; and seeing that he did
not answer, I took my way toward the gate of Rome. When he knew that I
was firmly resolved to go, muttering between his teeth, and limping as
well as he could, he came on behind me very slowly and at a great
distance. On reaching the gate, I felt pity for my comrade, and waited
for him, and took him on the crupper, saying: "What would our friends
speak of us to-morrow, if, having left for Rome, we had not pluck to get
beyond Siena?" Then the good Tasso said I spoke the truth; and as he was
a pleasant fellow, he began to laugh and sing; and in this way, always
singing and laughing, we travelled the whole way to Rome. I had just
nineteen years then, and so had the century.

When we reached Rome, I put myself under a master who was known as Il
Firenzuola. His name was Giovanni, and he came from Firenzuola in
Lombardy, a most able craftsman in large vases and big plate of that
kind. I showed him part of the model for the clasp which I had made in
Florence at Salimbene's. It pleased him exceedingly; and turning to one
of his journeymen, a Florentine called Giannotto Giannotti, who had been
several years with him, he spoke as follows: "This fellow is one of the
Florentines who know something, and you are one of those who know
nothing." Then I recognised the man, and turned to speak with him; for
before he went to Rome, we often went to draw together, and had been
very intimate comrades. He was so put out by the words his master flung
at him, that he said he did not recognise me or know who I was;
whereupon I got angry, and cried out: "O Giannotto, you who were once my
friend-for have we not been together in such and such places, and drawn,
and ate, and drunk, and slept in company at your house in the country? I
don't want you to bear witness on my behalf to this worthy man, your
master, because I hope my hands are such that without aid from you they
will declare what sort of a fellow I am."

Note 1. The Chapel of the Carmine, painted in fresco by Masaccio and
some other artist, possibly Filippino Lippi, is still the most important
monument of Florentine art surviving from the period preceding Raphael.

Note 2. The profile portraits of Michel Angelo Buonarroti confirm this
story. They show the bridge of his nose bent in an angle, as though it
had been broken.

Note 3. Fra Filippo Lippi was a Carmelite monk, whose frescoes at Prato
and Spoleta and oil-paintings in Florence and elsewhere are among the
most genial works of the pre-Raphaelite Renaissance. Vasari narrates his
love-adventures with Lucrezia Buti, and Robert Browning has drawn a
clever portrait of him in his "Men and Women." His son, Filippo or
Filippino, was also an able painter, some of whose best work survives in
the Strozzi Chapel of S. Maria Novella at Florence, and in the Church of
S. Maria Sopra Minerva at Rome.

Note 4. Tasso was an able artist, mentioned both by Vasari and Pietro
Aretino. He stood high in the favour of Duke Cosimo de' Medici, who took
his opinion on the work of other craftsmen.



XIV

WHEN I had thus spoken, Firenzuola, who was a man of hot spirit and
brave, turned to Giannotto, and said to him: "You vile rascal, aren't
you ashamed to treat a man who has been so intimate a comrade with you
in this way?" And with the same movement of quick feeling, he faced
round and said to me: "Welcome to my workshop; and do as you have
promised; let your hands declare what man you are."

He gave me a very fine piece of silver plate to work on for a cardinal.
It was a little oblong box, copied from the porphyry sarcophagus before
the door of the Rotonda. Beside what I copied, I enriched it with so
many elegant masks of my invention, that my master went about showing it
through the art, and boasting that so good a piece of work had been
turned out from his shop. [1] It was about half a cubit in size, and was
so constructed as to serve for a salt-cellar at table. This was the
first earning that I touched at Rome, and part of it I sent to assist my
good father; the rest I kept for my own use, living upon it while I went
about studying the antiquities of Rome, until my money failed, and I had
to return to the shop for work. Battista del Tasso, my comrade, did not
stay long in Rome, but went back to Florence.

After undertaking some new commissions, I took it into my head, as soon
as I had finished them, to change my master; I had indeed been worried
into doing so by a certain Milanese, called Pagolo Arsago. [2] My first
master, Firenzuola, had a great quarrel about this with Arsago, and
abused him in my presence; whereupon I took up speech in defence of my
new master. I said that I was born free, and free I meant to live, and
that there was no reason to complain of him, far less of me, since some
few crowns of wages were still due to me; also that I chose to go, like
a free journeyman, where it pleased me, knowing I did wrong to no man.
My new master then put in with his excuses, saying that he had not asked
me to come, and that I should gratify him by returning with Firenzuola.
To this I replied that I was not aware of wronging the latter in any
way, and as I had completed his commissions, I chose to be my own master
and not the man of others, and that he who wanted me must beg me of
myself. Firenzuola cried: "I don't intend to beg you of yourself; I have
done with you; don't show yourself again upon my premises." I reminded
him of the money he owed me. He laughed me in the face; on which I said
that if I knew how to use my tools in handicraft as well as he had seen,
I could be quite as clever with my sword in claiming the just payment of
my labour. While we were exchanging these words, an old man happened to
come up, called Maestro Antonio, of San Marino. He was the chief among
the Roman goldsmiths, and had been Firenzuola's master. Hearing what I
had to say, which I took good care that he should understand, he
immediately espoused my cause, and bade Firenzuola pay me. The dispute
waxed warm, because Firenzuola was an admirable swordsman, far better
than he was a goldsmith. Yet reason made itself heard; and I backed my
cause with the same spirit, till I got myself paid. In course of time
Firenzuola and I became friends, and at his request I stood godfather to
one of his children.

Note 1. Cellini's use of the word 'arte' for the 'art' or 'trade' of
goldsmiths corresponds to "the art" as used by English writers early in
this century. See Haydon's Autobiography, 'passim.'

Note 2. The Italian is 'sobbillato,' which might be also translated
'inveigled' or 'instigated.' But Varchi, the contemporary of Cellini,
gives this verb the force of using pressure and boring on until somebody
is driven to do something.

XV

I WENT on working with Pagolo Arsago, and earned a good deal of money,
the greater part of which I always sent to my good father. At the end of
two years, upon my father's entreaty, I returned to Florence, and put
myself once more under Francesco Salimbene, with whom I earned a great
deal, and took continual pains to improve in my art. I renewed my
intimacy with Francesco di Filippo; and though I was too much given to
pleasure, owing to that accursed music, I never neglected to devote some
hours of the day or night to study. At that time I fashioned a silver
heart's-key ('chiavaquore'), as it was then so called. This was a girdle
three inches broad, which used to be made for brides, and was executed
in half relief with some small figures in the round. It was a commission
from a man called Raffaello Lapaccini. I was very badly paid; but the
honour which it brought me was worth far more than the gain I might have
justly made by it. Having at this time worked with many different
persons in Florence, I had come to know some worthy men among the
goldsmiths, as for instance, Marcone, my first master; but I also met
with others reputed honest, who did all they could to ruin me, and
robbed me grossly. When I perceived this, I left their company, and held
them for thieves and black-guards. One of the goldsmiths, called
Giovanbattista Sogliani, kindly accommodated me with part of his shop,
which stood at the side of the New Market near the Landi's bank. There I
finished several pretty pieces, and made good gains, and was able to
give my family much help. This roused the jealousy of the bad men among
my former masters, who were called Salvadore and Michele Guasconti. In
the guild of the goldsmiths they had three big shops, and drove a
thriving trade. On becoming aware of their evil will against me, I
complained to certain worthy fellows, and remarked that they ought to
have been satisfied with the thieveries they practised on me under the
cloak of hypocritical kindness. This coming to their ears, they
threatened to make me sorely repent of such words; but I, who knew not
what the colour of fear was, paid them little or no heed.



XVI

IT chanced one day that I was leaning against a shop of one of these
men, who called out to me, and began partly reproaching, partly
bullying. I answered that had they done their duty by me, I should have
spoken of them what one speaks of good and worthy men; but as they had
done the contrary, they ought to complain of themselves and not of me.
While I was standing there and talking, one of them, named Gherardo
Guasconti, their cousin, having perhaps been put up to it by them, lay
in wait till a beast of burden went by. [1] It was a load of bricks.
When the load reached me, Gherardo pushed it so violently on my body
that I was very much hurt. Turning suddenly round and seeing him
laughing, I struck him such a blow on the temple that he fell down,
stunned, like one dead. Then I faced round to his cousins, and said:
"That's the way to treat cowardly thieves of your sort;" and when they
wanted to make a move upon me, trusting to their numbers, I, whose blood
was now well up, laid hands to a little knife I had, and cried: "If one
of you comes out of the shop, let the other run for the confessor,
because the doctor will have nothing to do here." These words so
frightened them that not one stirred to help their cousin. As soon as I
had gone, the fathers and sons ran to the Eight, and declared that I had
assaulted them in their shops with sword in hand, a thing which had
never yet been seen in Florence. The magistrates had me summoned. I
appeared before them; and they began to upbraid and cry out upon
me-partly, I think, because they saw me in my cloak, while the others
were dressed like citizens in mantle and hood; [2] but also because my
adversaries had been to the houses of those magistrates, and had talked
with all of them in private, while I, inexperienced in such matters, had
not spoken to any of them, trusting in the goodness of my cause. I said
that, having received such outrage and insult from Gherardo, and in my
fury having only given him a box on the ear, I did not think I deserved
such a vehement reprimand. I had hardly time to finish the word box,
before Prinzivalle della Stufa, [3] who was one of the Eight,
interrupted me by saying: "You gave him a blow, and not a box, on the
ear." The bell was rung and we were all ordered out, when Prinzivalle
spoke thus in my defence to his brother judges: "Mark, sirs, the
simplicity of this poor young man, who has accused himself of having
given a box on the ear, under the impression that this is of less
importance than a blow; whereas a box on the ear in the New Market
carries a fine of twenty-five crowns, while a blow costs little or
nothing. He is a young man of admirable talents, and supports his poor
family by his labour in great abundance; I would to God that our city
had plenty of this sort, instead of the present dearth of them."

Note 1. The Italian is 'apposto che passassi una soma.' The verb
'appostare' has the double meaning of lying in wait and arranging
something on purpose. Cellini's words may mean, 'caused a beast of
burden to pass by.'

Note 2. Varchi says that a man who went about with only his cloak or
cape by daytime, if he were not a soldier, was reputed an ill-liver. The
Florentine citizens at this time still wore their ancient civil dress of
the long gown and hood called 'lucco.'

Note 3. This man was an ardent supporter of the Medici, and in 1510
organized a conspiracy in their favour against the Gonfalonier Soderini.



XVII

AMONG the magistrates were some Radical fellows with turned-up hoods,
who had been influenced by the entreaties and the calumnies of my
opponents, because they all belonged to the party of Fra Girolamo; and
these men would have had me sent to prison and punished without too
close a reckoning. [1] But the good Prinzivalle put a stop to that. So
they sentenced me to pay four measures of flour, which were to be given
as alms to the nunnery of the Murate. [2] I was called in again; and he
ordered me not to speak a word under pain of their displeasure, and to
perform the sentence they had passed. Then, after giving me another
sharp rebuke, they sent us to the chancellor; I muttering all the while,
"It was a slap and not a blow," with which we left the Eight bursting
with laughter. The chancellor bound us over upon bail on both sides; but
only I was punished by having to pay the four measures of meal. Albeit
just then I felt as though I had been massacred, I sent for one of my
cousins, called Maestro Annibale, the surgeon, father of Messer
Librodoro Librodori, desiring that he should go bail for me. [3] He
refused to come, which made me so angry, that, fuming with fury and
swelling like an asp, I took a desperate resolve. At this point one may
observe how the stars do not so much sway as force our conduct. When I
reflected on the great obligations which this Annibale owed my family,
my rage grew to such a pitch that, turning wholly to evil, and being
also by nature somewhat choleric, I waited till the magistrates had gone
to dinner; and when I was alone, and observed that none of their
officers were watching me, in the fire of my anger, I left the palace,
ran to my shop, seized a dagger and rushed to the house of my enemies,
who were at home and shop together. I found them at table; and Gherardo,
who had been the cause of the quarrel, flung himself upon me. I stabbed
him in the breast, piercing doublet and jerkin through and through to
the shirt, without however grazing his flesh or doing him the least harm
in the world. When I felt my hand go in, and heard the clothes tear, I
thought that I had killed him; and seeing him fall terror-struck to
earth, I cried: "Traitors, this day is the day on which I mean to murder
you all." Father, mother, and sisters, thinking the last day had come,
threw themselves upon their knees, screaming out for mercy with all
their might; but I perceiving that they offered no resistance, and that
he was stretched for dead upon the ground, thought it too base a thing
to touch them. I ran storming down the staircase; and when I reached the
street, I found all the rest of the household, more than twelve persons;
one of them had seized an iron shovel, another a thick iron pipe, one
had an anvil, some of them hammers, and some cudgels. When I got among
them, raging like a mad bull, I flung four or five to the earth, and
fell down with them myself, continually aiming my dagger now at one and
now at another. Those who remained upright plied both hands with all
their force, giving it me with hammers, cudgels, and anvil; but inasmuch
as God does sometime mercifully intervene, He so ordered that neither
they nor I did any harm to one another. I only lost my cap, on which my
adversaries seized, though they had run away from it before, and struck
at it with all their weapons. Afterwards, they searched among their dead
and wounded, and saw that not a single man was injured.

Note 1. Cellini calls these magistrates 'arronzinati cappuccetti,' a
term corresponding to our Roundheads. The democratic or anti-Medicean
party in Florence at that time, who adhered to the republican principles
of Fra Girolamo Savonarola, distinguished themselves by wearing the long
tails of their hoods twisted up and turned round their heads. Cellini
shows his Medicean sympathies by using this contemptuous term, and by
the honourable mention he makes of Prinzivalle della Stufa

Note 2. A convent of closely immured nuns.

Note 3. The word I have translated 'massacred' above is 'assassinato.'
It occurs frequently in Italian of this period, and indicates the
extremity of wrong and outrage.



XVIII

I WENT off in the direction of Santa Maria Novella, and stumbling up
against Fra Alessio Strozzi, whom by the way I did not know, I entreated
this good friar for the love of God to save my life, since I had
committed a great fault. He told me to have no fear; for had I done
every sin in the world, I was yet in perfect safety in his little cell.

After about an hour, the Eight, in an extraordinary meeting, caused one
of the most dreadful bans which ever were heard of to be published
against me, announcing heavy penalties against who should harbour me or
know where I was, without regard to place or to the quality of my
protector. My poor afflicted father went to the Eight, threw himself
upon his knees, and prayed for mercy for his unfortunate young son.
Thereupon one of those Radical fellows, shaking the crest of his twisted
hood, stood up and addressed my father with these insulting words: [1]
"Get up from there, and begone at once, for to-morrow we shall send your
son into the country with the lances." [2] My poor father had still the
spirit to answer: "What God shall have ordained, that will you do, and
not a jot or little more." Whereto the same man replied that for certain
God had ordained as he had spoken. My father said: "The thought consoles
me that you do not know for certain;" and quitting their presence, he
came to visit me, together with a young man of my own age, called Pierro
di Giovanni Landi-we loved one another as though we had been brothers.

Under his mantle the lad carried a first-rate sword and a splendid coat
of mail; and when they found me, my brave father told me what had
happened, and what the magistrates had said to him. Then he kissed me on
the forehead and both eyes, and gave me his hearty blessing, saying:
"May the power of goodness of God be your protection;" and reaching me
the sword and armour, he helped me with his own hands to put them on.
Afterwards he added: "Oh, my good son, with these arms in thy hand thou
shalt either live or die." Pier Landi, who was present, kept shedding
tears; and when he had given me ten golden crowns, I bade him remove a
few hairs from my chin, which were the first down of my manhood. Frate
Alessio disguised me like a friar and gave me a lay brother to go with
me. [3] Quitting the convent, and issuing from the city by the gate of
Prato, I went along the walls as far as the Piazza di San Gallo. Then I
ascended the slope of Montui, and in one of the first houses there I
found a man called Il Grassuccio, own brother to Messer Benedetto da
Monte Varchi. [4] I flung off my monk's clothes, and became once more a
man. Then we mounted two horses, which were waiting there for us, and
went by night to Siena. Grassuccio returned to Florence, sought out my
father, and gave him the news of my safe escape. In the excess of his
joy, it seemed a thousand years to my father till he should meet the
member of the Eight who had insulted him; and when he came across the
man, he said: "See you, Antonio, that it was God who knew what had to
happen to my son, and not yourself?" To which the fellow answered: "Only
let him get another time into our clutches!" And my father: "I shall
spend my time in thanking God that He has rescued him from that fate."

Note 1. 'Un di queli arrovellati scotendo la cresto dello arronzinato
cappuccio.' See above, p. 31. The democrats in Cellini's days were
called at Florence 'Arrabbiati' or 'Arrovellati.' In the days of
Savonarola this nickname had been given to the ultra-Medicean party or
Palleschi.

Note 2. 'Lanciotti.' There is some doubt about this word. But it clearly
means men armed with lances, at the disposal of the Signory.

Note 3. 'Un converso,' an attendant on the monks.

Note 4. Benedetto da Monte Varchi was the celebrated poet, scholar, and
historian of Florence, better known as Varchi. Another of his brothers
was a physician of high repute at Florence. They continued throughout
Cellini's life to live on terms of intimacy with him.



XIX

AT Siena I waited for the mail to Rome, which I afterwards joined; and
when we passed the Paglia, we met a courier carrying news of the new
Pope, Clement VII. Upon my arrival in Rome, I went to work in the shop
of the master-goldsmith Santi. He was dead; but a son of his carried on
the business. He did not work himself, but entrusted all his commissions
to a young man named Lucagnolo from Iesi, a country fellow, who while
yet a child had come into Santi's service. This man was short but well
proportioned, and was a more skilful craftsman than any one whom I had
met with up to that time; remarkable for facility and excellent in
design. He executed large plate only: that is to say, vases of the
utmost beauty, basons, and such pieces. [1] Having put myself to work
there, I began to make some candelabra for the Bishop of Salamanca, a
Spaniard. [2] They were richly chased, so far as that sort of work
admits. A pupil of Raffaello da Urbino called Gian Francesco, and
commonly known as Il Fattore, was a painter of great ability; and being
on terms of friendship with the Bishop, he introduced me to his favour,
so that I obtained many commissions from that prelate, and earned
considerable sums of money. [3]

During that time I went to draw, sometimes in Michel Agnolo's chapel,
and sometimes in the house of Agostino Chigi of Siena, which contained
many incomparable paintings by the hand of that great master Raffaello.
[4] This I did on feast-days, because the house was then inhabited by
Messer Gismondo, Agostino's brother. They plumed themselves exceedingly
when they saw young men of my sort coming to study in their palaces.
Gismondo's wife, noticing my frequent presence in that house-she was a
lady as courteous as could be, and of surpassing beauty-came up to me
one day, looked at my drawings, and asked me if I was a sculptor or a
painter; to whom I said I was a goldsmith. She remarked that I drew too
well for a goldsmith; and having made one of her waiting-maids bring a
lily of the finest diamonds set in gold, she showed it to me, and bade
me value it. I valued it at 800 crowns. Then she said that I had very
nearly hit the mark, and asked me whether I felt capable of setting the
stones really well. I said that I should much like to do so, and began
before her eyes to make a little sketch for it, working all the better
because of the pleasure I took in conversing with so lovely and
agreeable a gentlewoman. When the sketch was finished, another Roman
lady of great beauty joined us; she had been above, and now descending
to the ground-floor, asked Madonna Porzia what she was doing there. She
answered with a smile: "I am amusing myself by watching this worthy
young man at his drawing; he is as good as he is handsome." I had by
this time acquired a trifle of assurance, mixed, however, with some
honest bashfulness; so I blushed and said: "Such as I am, lady, I shall
ever be most ready to serve you." The gentlewoman, also slightly
blushing, said: "You know well that I want you to serve me;" and
reaching me the lily, told me to take it away; and gave me besides
twenty golden crowns which she had in her bag, and added: "Set me the
jewel after the fashion you have sketched, and keep for me the old gold
in which it is now set." On this the Roman lady observed: "If I were in
that young man's body, I should go off without asking leave." Madonna
Porzia replied that virtues rarely are at home with vices, and that if I
did such a thing, I should strongly belie my good looks of an honest
man. Then turning round, she took the Roman lady's hand, and with a
pleasant smile said: "Farewell, Benvenuto." I stayed on a short while at
the drawing I was making, which was a copy of a Jove by Raffaello. When
I had finished it and left the house, I set myself to making a little
model of wax, in order to show how the jewel would look when it was
completed. This I took to Madonna Porzia, whom I found with the same
Roman lady. Both of them were highly satisfied with my work, and treated
me so kindly that, being somewhat emboldened, I promised the jewel
should be twice as good as the model. Accordingly I set hand to it, and
in twelve days I finished it in the form of a fleur-de-lys, as I have
said above, ornamenting it with little masks, children, and animals,
exquisitely enamelled, whereby the diamonds which formed the lily were
more than doubled in effect.

Note 1. Cellini calls this 'grosseria.'

Note 2. Don Francesco de Bobadilla. He came to Rome in 1517, was shut up
with Clement in the castle of S. Angelo in 1527, and died in 1529, after
his return to Spain.

Note 3. This painter, Gio. Francesco Penni, surnamed Il Fattore, aided
Raphael in his Roman frescoes and was much beloved by him. Together with
Giulio Romano he completed the imperfect Stanze of the Vatican.

Note 4. Cellini here alludes to the Sistine Chapel and to the Villa
Farnesina in Trastevere, built by the Sienese banker, Agostino Chigi. It
was here that Raphael painted his Galatea and the whole fable of Cupid
and Psyche.



XX

WHILE I was working at this piece, Lucagnolo, of whose ability I have
before spoken, showed considerable discontent, telling me over and over
again that I might acquire far more profit and honour by helping him to
execute large plate, as I had done at first. I made him answer that,
whenever I chose, I should always be capable of working at great silver
pieces; but that things like that on which I was now engaged were not
commissioned every day; and beside their bringing no less honour than
large silver plate, there was also more profit to be made by them. He
laughed me in the face, and said: "Wait and see, Benvenuto; for by the
time that you have finished that work of yours, I will make haste to
have finished this vase, which I took in hand when you did the jewel;
and then experience shall teach you what profit I shall get from my
vase, and what you will get from your ornament." I answered that I was
very glad indeed to enter into such a competition with so good a
craftsman as he was, because the end would show which of us was
mistaken. Accordingly both the one and the other of us, with a scornful
smile upon our lips, bent our heads in grim earnest to the work, which
both were now desirous of accomplishing; so that after about ten days,
each had finished his undertaking with great delicacy and artistic skill.

Lucagnolo's was a huge silver piece, used at the table of Pope Clement,
into which he flung away bits of bone and the rind of divers fruits,
while eating; an object of ostentation rather than necessity. The vase
was adorned with two fine handles, together with many masks, both small
and great, and masses of lovely foliage, in as exquisite a style of
elegance as could be imagined; on seeing which I said it was the most
beautiful vase that ever I set eyes on. Thinking he had convinced me,
Lucagnolo replied: "Your work seems to me no less beautiful, but we
shall soon perceive the difference between the two." So he took his vase
and carried it to the Pope, who was very well pleased with it, and
ordered at once that he should be paid at the ordinary rate of such
large plate. Meanwhile I carried mine to Madonna Porzia, who looked at
it with astonishment, and told me I had far surpassed my promise. Then
she bade me ask for my reward whatever I liked; for it seemed to her my
desert was so great that if I craved a castle she could hardly
recompense me; but since that was not in her hands to bestow, she added
laughing that I must beg what lay within her power. I answered that the
greatest reward I could desire for my labour was to have satisfied her
ladyship. Then, smiling in my turn, and bowing to her, I took my leave,
saying I wanted no reward but that. She turned to the Roman lady and
said: "You see that the qualities we discerned in him are companied by
virtues, and not vices." They both expressed their admiration, and then
Madonna Porzia continued: "Friend Benvenuto, have you never heard it
said that when the poor give to the rich, the devil laughs?" I replied:
"Quite true! and yet, in the midst of all his troubles, I should like
this time to see him laugh;" and as I took my leave, she said that this
time she had no will to bestow on him that favour.

When I came back to the shop, Lucagnolo had the money for his vase in a
paper packet; and on my arrival he cried out: "Come and compare the
price of your jewel with the price of my plate." I said that he must
leave things as they were till the next day, because I hoped that even
as my work in its kind was not less excellent than his, so I should be
able to show him quite an equal price for it.



XXI

ON the day following, Madonna Porzia sent a major-domo of hers to my
shop, who called me out, and putting into my hands a paper packet full
of money from his lady, told me that she did not choose the devil should
have his whole laugh out: by which she hinted that the money sent me was
not the entire payment merited by my industry, and other messages were
added worthy of so courteous a lady. Lucagnolo, who was burning to
compare his packet with mine, burst into the shop; then in the presence
of twelve journeymen and some neighbours, eager to behold the result of
this competition, he seized his packet, scornfully exclaiming "Ou! ou!"
three or four times, while he poured his money on the counter with a
great noise. They were twenty-five crowns in giulios; and he fancied
that mine would be four or five crowns 'di moneta.' [1] I for my part,
stunned and stifled by his cries, and by the looks and smiles of the
bystanders, first peeped into my packet; then, after seeing that it
contained nothing but gold, I retired to one end of the counter, and,
keeping my eyes lowered and making no noise at all, I lifted it with
both hands suddenly above my head, and emptied it like a mill hopper.
[2] My coin was twice as much as his; which caused the onlookers, who
had fixed their eyes on me with some derision, to turn round suddenly to
him and say: "Lucagnolo, Benvenuto's pieces, being all of gold and twice
as many as yours, make a far finer effect." I thought for certain that,
what with jealousy and what with shame, Lucagnolo would have fallen dead
upon the spot; and though he took the third part of my gain, since I was
a journeyman (for such is the custom of the trade, two-thirds fall to
the workman and one-third to the masters of the shop), yet inconsiderate
envy had more power in him than avarice: it ought indeed to have worked
quite the other way, he being a peasant's son from Iesi. He cursed his
art and those who taught it him, vowing that thenceforth he would never
work at large plate, but give his whole attention to those brothel
gewgaws, since they were so well paid. Equally enraged on my side, I
answered, that every bird sang its own note; that he talked after the
fashion of the hovels he came from; but that I dared swear that I should
succeed with ease in making his lubberly lumber, while he would never be
successful in my brothel gewgaws. [3] Thus I flung off in a passion,
telling him that I would soon show him that I spoke truth. The
bystanders openly declared against him, holding him for a lout, as
indeed he was, and me for a man, as I had proved myself.

Note 1. 'Scudi di giuli' and 'scudi di moneta.' The 'giulio' was a
silver coin worth 56 Italian centimes. The 'scudi di moneta' was worth
10 'giulios.' Cellini was paid in golden crowns, which had a much higher
value. The 'scuda' and the 'ducato' at this epoch were reckoned at [7]
'lire,' the 'lira' at 20 'soldi.'

Note 2. The packet was funnel-shaped, and Cellini poured the coins out
from the broad end.

Note 3. The two slang phrases translated above are 'bordellerie' and
'coglionerie.'



XXII

NEXT day, I went to thank Madonna Porzia, and told her that her ladyship
had done the opposite of what she said she would; for that while I
wanted to make the devil laugh, she had made him once more deny God. We
both laughed pleasantly at this, and she gave me other commissions for
fine and substantial work.

Meanwhile, I contrived, by means of a pupil of Raffaello da Urbino, to
get an order from the Bishop of Salamanca for one of those great
water-vessels called 'acquereccia,' which are used for ornaments to
place on sideboards. He wanted a pair made of equal size; and one of
them he entrusted to Lucagnolo, the other to me. Giovan Francesco, the
painter I have mentioned, gave us the design. [1] Accordingly I set hand
with marvellous good-will to this piece of plate, and was accommodated
with a part of his workshop by a Milanese named Maestro Giovan Piero
della Tacca. Having made my preparations, I calculated how much money I
should need for certain affairs of my own, and sent all the rest to
assist my poor father.

It so happened that just when this was being paid to him in Florence, he
stumbled upon one of those Radicals who were in the Eight at the time
when I got into that little trouble there. It was the very man who had
abused him so rudely, and who swore that I should certainly be sent into
the country with the lances. Now this fellow had some sons of very bad
morals and repute; wherefore my father said to him: "Misfortunes can
happen to anybody, especially to men of choleric humour when they are in
the right, even as it happened to my son; but let the rest of his life
bear witness how virtuously I have brought him up. Would God, for your
well-being, that your sons may act neither worse nor better toward you
than mine do to me. God rendered me able to bring them up as I have
done; and where my own power could not reach, 'twas He who rescued them,
against your expectation, out of your violent hands." On leaving the
man, he wrote me all this story, begging me for God's sake to practise
music at times, in order that I might not lose the fine accomplishment
which he had taught me with such trouble. The letter so overflowed with
expressions of the tenderest fatherly affection, that I was moved to
tears of filial piety, resolving, before he died, to gratify him amply
with regard to music. Thus God grants us those lawful blessings which we
ask in prayer, nothing doubting.

Note 1. That is, Il Fattore. See above, p. 34.



XXIII

WHILE I was pushing forward Salamanca's vase, I had only one little boy
as help, whom I had taken at the entreaty of friends, and half against
my own will, to be my workman. He was about fourteen years of age, bore
the name of Paulino, and was son to a Roman burgess, who lived upon the
income of his property. Paulino was the best-mannered, the most honest,
and the most beautiful boy I ever saw in my whole life. His modest ways
and actions, together with his superlative beauty and his devotion to
myself, bred in me as great an affection for him as a man's breast can
hold. This passionate love led me oftentimes to delight the lad with
music; for I observed that his marvellous features, which by complexion
wore a tone of modest melancholy, brightened up, and when I took my
cornet, broke into a smile so lovely and so sweet, that I do not marvel
at the silly stories which the Greeks have written about the deities of
heaven. Indeed, if my boy had lived in those times, he would probably
have turned their heads still more. [1] He had a sister, named Faustina,
more beautiful, I verily believe, than that Faustina about whom the old
books gossip so. Sometimes he took me to their vineyard, and, so far as
I could judge, it struck me that Paulino's good father would have
welcomed me as a son-in-law. This affair led me to play more than I was
used to do.

It happened at that time that one Giangiacomo of Cesena, a musician in
the Pope's band, and a very excellent performer, sent word through
Lorenzo, the trumpeter of Lucca, who is now in our Duke's service, to
inquire whether I was inclined to help them at the Pope's Ferragosto,
playing soprano with my cornet in some motets of great beauty selected
by them for that occasion. [2] Although I had the greatest desire to
finish the vase I had begun, yet, since music has a wondrous charm of
its own, and also because I wished to please my old father, I consented
to join them. During eight days before the festival we practised two
hours a day together; then on the first of August we went to the
Belvedere, and while Pope Clement was at table, we played those
carefully studied motets so well that his Holiness protested he had
never heard music more sweetly executed or with better harmony of parts.
He sent for Giangiacomo, and asked him where and how he had procured so
excellent a cornet for soprano, and inquired particularly who I was.
Giangiacomo told him my name in full. Whereupon the Pope said: "So,
then, he is the son of Maestro Giovanni?" On being assured I was, the
Pope expressed his wish to have me in his service with the other
bandsmen. Giangiacomo replied: "Most blessed Father, I cannot pretend
for certain that you will get him, for his profession, to which he
devotes himself assiduously, is that of a goldsmith, and he works in it
miraculously well, and earns by it far more than he could do by
playing." To this the Pope added: "I am the better inclined to him now
that I find him possessor of a talent more than I expected. See that he
obtains the same salary as the rest of you; and tell him from me to join
my service, and that I will find work enough by the day for him to do in
his other trade." Then stretching out his hand, he gave him a hundred
golden crowns of the Camera in a handkerchief, and said: [3] "Divide
these so that he may take his share."

When Giangiacomo left the Pope, he came to us, and related in detail all
that the Pope had said; and after dividing the money between the eight
of us, and giving me my share, he said to me: "Now I am going to have
you inscribed among our company." I replied: "Let the day pass;
to-morrow I will give my answer." When I left them, I went meditating
whether I ought to accept the invitation, inasmuch as I could not but
suffer if I abandoned the noble studies of my art. The following night
my father appeared to me in a dream, and begged me with tears of
tenderest affection, for God's love and his, to enter upon this
engagement. Methought I answered that nothing would induce me to do so.
In an instant he assumed so horrible an aspect as to frighten me out of
my wits, and cried: "If you do not, you will have a father's curse; but
if you do, may you be ever blessed by me!" When I woke, I ran, for very
fright, to have myself inscribed. Then I wrote to my old father, telling
him the news, which so affected him with extreme joy that a sudden fit
of illness took him, and well-nigh brought him to death's door. In his
answer to my letter, he told me that he too had dreamed nearly the same
as I had.

Note 1. 'Gli Arebbe fatti piu uscire de' gangheri;' would have taken
them still more off the hinges.

Note 2. Lit., "the largest piece left of me should be my ears."

Note 3. The Camera Apostolica was the Roman Exchequer.



XXIV

KNOWING now that I had gratified my father's honest wish, I began to
think that everything would prosper with me to a glorious and honourable
end. Accordingly, I set myself with indefatigable industry to the
completion of the vase I had begun for Salamanca. That prelate was a
very extraordinary man, extremely rich, but difficult to please. He sent
daily to learn what I was doing; and when his messenger did not find me
at home, he broke into fury, saying that he would take the work out of
my hands and give it to others to finish. This came of my slavery to
that accursed music. Still I laboured diligently night and day, until,
when I had brought my work to a point when it could be exhibited, I
submitted it to the inspection of the Bishop. This so increased his
desire to see it finished that I was sorry I had shown it. At the end of
three months I had it ready, with little animals and foliage and masks,
as beautiful as one could hope to see. No sooner was it done than I sent
it by the hand of my workman, Paulino, to show that able artist
Lucagnolo, of whom I have spoken above. Paulino, with the grace and
beauty which belonged to him, spoke as follows: "Messer Lucagnolo,
Benvenuto bids me say that he has sent to show you his promises and your
lumber, expecting in return to see from you his gewgaws." This message
given, Lucagnolo took up the vase, and carefully examined it; then he
said to Paulino: "Fair boy, tell your master that he is a great and able
artist, and that I beg him to be willing to have me for a friend, and
not to engage in aught else." The mission of that virtuous and
marvellous lad caused me the greatest joy; and then the vase was carried
to Salamanca, who ordered it to be valued. Lucagnolo took part in the
valuation, estimating and praising it far above my own opinion.
Salamanca, lifting up the vase, cried like a true Spaniard: "I swear by
God that I will take as long in paying him as he has lagged in making
it." When I heard this, I was exceedingly put out, and fell to cursing
all Spain and every one who wished well to it.

Amongst other beautiful ornaments, this vase had a handle, made all of
one piece, with most delicate mechanism, which, when a spring was
touched, stood upright above the mouth of it. While the prelate was one
day ostentatiously exhibiting my vase to certain Spanish gentlemen of
his suite, it chanced that one of them, upon Monsignor's quitting the
room, began roughly to work the handle, and as the gentle spring which
moved it could not bear his loutish violence, it broke in his hand.
Aware what mischief he had done, he begged the butler who had charge of
the Bishop's plate to take it to the master who had made it, for him to
mend, and promised to pay what price he asked, provided it was set to
rights at once. So the vase came once more into my hands, and I promised
to put it forthwith in order, which indeed I did. It was brought to me
before dinner; and at twenty-two o'clock the man who brought it
returned, all in a sweat, for he had run the whole way, Monsignor having
again asked for it to show to certain other gentlemen. [1] The butler,
then, without giving me time to utter a word, cried: "Quick, quick,
bring the vase." I, who wanted to act at leisure and not to give up to
him, said that I did not mean to be so quick. The serving-man got into
such a rage that he made as though he would put one hand to his sword,
while with the other he threatened to break the shop open. To this I put
a stop at once with my own weapon, using therewith spirited language,
and saying: "I am not going to give it to you! Go and tell Monsignor,
your master, that I want the money for my work before I let it leave
this shop." When the fellow saw he could not obtain it by swaggering, he
fell to praying me, as one prays to the Cross, declaring that if I would
only give it up, he would take care I should be paid. These words did
not make me swerve from my purpose; but I kept on saying the same thing.
At last, despairing of success, he swore to come with Spaniards enough
to cut me in pieces. Then he took to his heels; while I, who inclined to
believe partly in their murderous attack, resolved that I would defend
myself with courage. So I got an admirable little gun ready, which I
used for shooting game, and muttered to myself: "He who robs me of my
property and labour may take my life too, and welcome." While I was
carrying on this debate in my own mind, a crowd of Spaniards arrived,
led by their major-domo, who, with the headstrong rashness of his race,
bade them go in and take the vase and give me a good beating. Hearing
these words, I showed them the muzzle of my gun, and prepared to fire,
and cried in a loud voice: "Renegade Jews, traitors, is it thus that one
breaks into houses and shops in our city of Rome? Come as many of you
thieves as like, an inch nearer to this wicket, and I'll blow all their
brains out with my gun." Then I turned the muzzle toward their
major-domo, and making as though I would discharge it, called out: "And
you big thief, who are egging them on, I mean to kill you first." He
clapped spurs to the jennet he was riding, and took flight headlong. The
commotion we were making stirred up all the neighbours, who came
crowding round, together with some Roman gentlemen who chanced to pass,
and cried: "Do but kill the renegades, and we will stand by you." These
words had the effect of frightening the Spaniards in good earnest. They
withdrew, and were compelled by the circumstances to relate the whole
affair to Monsignor. Being a man of inordinate haughtiness, he rated the
members of his household, both because they had engaged in such an act
of violence, and also because, having begun, they had not gone through
with it. At this juncture the painter, who had been concerned in the
whole matter, came in, and the Bishop bade him go and tell me that if I
did not bring the vase at once, he would make mincemeat of me; [2] but
if I brought it, he would pay its price down. These threats were so far
from terrifying me, that I sent him word I was going immediately to lay
my case before the Pope.

In the meantime, his anger and my fear subsided; whereupon, being
guaranteed by some Roman noblemen of high degree that the prelate would
not harm me, and having assurance that I should be paid, I armed myself
with a large poniard and my good coat of mail, and betook myself to his
palace, where he had drawn up all his household. I entered, and Paulino
followed with the silver vase. It was just like passing through the
Zodiac, neither more nor less; for one of them had the face of the lion,
another of the scorpion, a third of the crab. However, we passed onward
to the presence of the rascally priest, who spouted out a torrent of
such language as only priests and Spaniards have at their command. In
return I never raised my eyes to look at him, nor answered word for
word. That seemed to augment the fury of his anger; and causing paper to
be put before me, he commanded me to write an acknowledgment to the
effect that I had been amply satisfied and paid in full. Then I raised
my head, and said I should be very glad to do so when I had received the
money. The Bishop's rage continued to rise; threats and recriminations
were flung about; but at last the money was paid, and I wrote the
receipt. Then I departed, glad at heart and in high spirits.

Note 1. The Italians reckoned time from sundown till sundown, counting
twenty-four hours. Twenty-two o'clock was therefore two hours before
nightfall. One hour of the night was one hour after nightfall, and so
forth. By this system of reckoning, it is clear that the hours varied
with the season of the year; and unless we know the exact month in which
an event took place, we cannot translate any hour into terms of our own
system.

Note 2. Lit., "the largest piece left of me should be my ears."



XXV

WHEN Pope Clement heard the story-he had seen the vase before, but it
was not shown him as my work-he expressed much pleasure and spoke warmly
in my praise, publicly saying that he felt very favourably toward me.
This caused Monsignor Salamanca to repent that he had hectored over me;
and in order to make up our quarrel, he sent the same painter to inform
me that he meant to give me large commissions. I replied that I was
willing to undertake them, but that I should require to be paid in
advance. This speech too came to Pope Clement's ears, and made him laugh
heartily. Cardinal Cibo was in the presence, and the Pope narrated to
him the whole history of my dispute with the Bishop. [1] Then he turned
to one of his people, and ordered him to go on supplying me with work
for the palace. Cardinal Cibo sent for me, and after some time spent in
agreeable conversation, gave me the order for a large vase, bigger than
Salamanca's. I likewise obtained commissions from Cardinal Cornaro, and
many others of the Holy College, especially Ridolfi and Salviati; they
all kept me well employed, so that I earned plenty of money. 2

Madonna Porzia now advised me to open a shop of my own. This I did; and
I never stopped working for that excellent and gentle lady, who paid me
exceedingly well, and by whose means perhaps it was that I came to make
a figure in the world.

I contracted close friendship with Signor Gabbriello Ceserino, at that
time Gonfalonier of Rome, and executed many pieces for him. One, among
the rest, is worthy of mention. It was a large golden medal to wear in
the hat. I engraved upon it Leda with her swan; and being very well
pleased with the workmanship, he said he should like to have it valued,
in order that I might be properly paid. Now, since the medal was
executed with consummate skill, the valuers of the trade set a far
higher price on it than he had thought of. I therefore kept the medal,
and got nothing for my pains. The same sort of adventures happened in
this case as in that of Salamanca's vase. But I shall pass such matters
briefly by, lest they hinder me from telling things of greater
importance.

Note 1. Innocenzio Cibo Malaspina, Archbishop of Genoa, and nephew of
Lorenzo de' Medici. He was a prelate of vast wealth and a great patron
of arts and letters.

Note 2. Marco Cornaro was a brother of Caterina, the Queen of Cyprus. He
obtained the hat in 1492. Niccolo Ridolfi was a nephew of Leo X.
Giovanni Salviati, the son of Jacopo mentioned above, was also a nephew
of Leo X, who gave him the hat in 1517.



XXVI

SINCE I am writing my life, I must from time to time diverge from my
profession in order to describe with brevity, if not in detail, some
incidents which have no bearing on my career as artist. On the morning
of Saint John's Day I happened to be dining with several men of our
nation, painters, sculptors, goldsmiths, amongst the most notable of
whom was Rosso and Gainfrancesco, the pupil of Raffaello. [1] I had
invited them without restraint or ceremony to the place of our meeting,
and they were all laughing and joking, as is natural when a crowd of men
come together to make merry on so great a festival. It chanced that a
light-brained swaggering young fellow passed by; he was a soldier of
Rienzo da Ceri, who, when he heard the noise that we were making, gave
vent to a string of opprobrious sarcasms upon the folk of Florence. [2]
I, who was the host of those great artists and men of worth, taking the
insult to myself, slipped out quietly without being observed, and went
up to him. I ought to say that he had a punk of his there, and was going
on with his stupid ribaldries to amuse her. When I met him, I asked if
he was the rash fellow who was speaking evil of the Florentines. He
answered at once: "I am that man." On this I raised my hand, struck him
in the face, and said: "And I am 'this' man." Then we each of us drew
our swords with spirit; but the fray had hardly begun when a crowd of
persons intervened, who rather took my part than not, hearing and seeing
that I was in the right.

On the following day a challenge to fight with him was brought me, which
I accepted very gladly, saying that I expected to complete this job far
quicker than those of the other art I practised. So I went at once to
confer with a fine old man called Bevilacqua, who was reputed to have
been the first sword of Italy, because he had fought more than twenty
serious duels and had always come off with honour. This excellent man
was a great friend of mine; he knew me as an artist and had also been
concerned as intermediary in certain ugly quarrels between me and
others. Accordingly, when he had learned my business, he answered with a
smile: "My Benvenuto, if you had an affair with Mars, I am sure you
would come out with honour, because through all the years that I have
known you, I have never seen you wrongfully take up a quarrel." So he
consented to be my second, and we repaired with sword in hand to the
appointed place, but no blood was shed, for my opponent made the matter
up, and I came with much credit out of the affair. [3] I will not add
further particulars; for though they would be very interesting in their
own way, I wish to keep both space and words for my art, which has been
my chief inducement to write as I am doing, and about which I shall have
only too much to say.

The spirit of honourable rivalry impelled me to attempt some other
masterpiece, which should equal, or even surpass, the productions of
that able craftsman, Lucagnolo, whom I have mentioned. Still I did not
on this account neglect my own fine art of jewellery; and so both the
one and the other wrought me much profit and more credit, and in both of
them I continued to produce things of marked originality. There was at
that time in Rome a very able artist of Perugia named Lautizio, who
worked only in one department, where he was sole and unrivalled
throughout the world. [4] You must know that at Rome every cardinal has
a seal, upon which his title is engraved, and these seals are made just
as large as a child's hand of about twelve years of age; and, as I have
already said, the cardinal's title is engraved upon the seal together
with a great many ornamental figures. A well-made article of the kind
fetches a hundred, or more than a hundred crowns. This excellent
workman, like Lucagnolo, roused in me some honest rivalry, although the
art he practised is far remote from the other branches of gold-smithery,
and consequently Lautizio was not skilled in making anything but seals.
I gave my mind to acquiring his craft also, although I found it very
difficult; and, unrepelled by the trouble which it gave me, I went on
zealously upon the path of profit and improvement.

There was in Rome another most excellent craftsman of ability, who was a
Milanese named Messer Caradosso. [5] He dealt in nothing but little
chiselled medals, made of plates of metal, and such-like things. I have
seen of his some paxes in half relief, and some Christs a palm in length
wrought of the thinnest golden plates, so exquisitely done that I
esteemed him the greatest master in that kind I had ever seen, and
envied him more than all the rest together. There were also other
masters who worked at medals carved in steel, which may be called the
models and true guides for those who aim at striking coins in the most
perfect style. All these divers arts I set myself with unflagging
industry to learn.

I must not omit the exquisite art of enamelling, in which I have never
known any one excel save a Florentine, our countryman, called Amerigo.
[6] I did not know him, but was well acquainted with his incomparable
masterpieces. Nothing in any part of the world or by craftsman that I
have seen, approached the divine beauty of their workmanship. To this
branch too I devoted myself with all my strength, although it is
extremely difficult, chiefly because of the fire, which, after long time
and trouble spent in other processes, has to be applied at last, and not
unfrequently brings the whole to ruin. In spite of its great
difficulties, it gave me so much pleasure that I looked upon them as
recreation; and this came from the special gift which the God of nature
bestowed on me, that is to say, a temperament so happy and of such
excellent parts that I was freely able to accomplish whatever it pleased
me to take in hand. The various departments of art which I have
described are very different one from the other, so that a man who
excels in one of them, if he undertakes the others, hardly ever achieves
the same success; whereas I strove with all my power to become equally
versed in all of them: and in the proper place I shall demonstrate that
I attained my object.

Note 1. St. John's Day was the great Florentine Festival, on which all
the Guilds went in procession with pageants through the city. Of the
Florentine painter, II Rosso, or Maitre Roux, this is the first mention
by Cellini. He went to France in 1534, and died an obscure death there
in 1541.

Note 2. This Rienzo, Renzo, or Lorenzo da Ceri, was a captain of
adventurers or Condottiere, who hired his mercenary forces to
paymasters. He defended Crema for the Venetians in 1514, and conquered
Urbino for the Pope in 1515. Afterwards he fought for the French in the
Italian wars. We shall hear more of him again during the sack of Rome.

Note 3. The Italian, 'restando dal mio avversario,' seems to mean that
Cellini's opponent proposed an accommodation, apologized, or stayed the
duel at a certain point.

Note 4. See Cellini's Treatise 'Oreficeria,' cap. vi., for more
particulars about this artist.

Note 5. His real name was Ambrogio Foppa. The nickname Caradosso is said
to have stuck to him in consequence of a Spaniard calling him
Bear's-face in his own tongue. He struck Leo X's coins; and we possess
some excellent medallion portraits by his hand.

Note 6. For him, consult Cellini's 'Oreficeria.'



XXVII

AT that time, while I was still a young man of about twenty-three, there
raged a plague of such extraordinary violence that many thousands died
of it every day in Rome. Somewhat terrified at this calamity, I began to
take certain amusements, as my mind suggested, and for a reason which I
will presently relate. I had formed a habit of going on feast-days to
the ancient buildings, and copying parts of them in wax or with the
pencil; and since these buildings are all ruins, and the ruins house
innumerable pigeons, it came into my head to use my gun against these
birds. So then, avoiding all commerce with people, in my terror of the
plague, I used to put a fowling-piece on my boy Pagolino's shoulder, and
he and I went out alone into the ruins; and oftentimes we came home
laden with a cargo of the fattest pigeons. I did not care to charge my
gun with more than a single ball; and thus it was by pure skill in the
art that I filled such heavy bags. I had a fowling-piece which I had
made myself; inside and out it was as bright as any mirror. I also used
to make a very fine sort of powder, in doing which I discovered secret
processes, beyond any which have yet been found; and on this point, in
order to be brief, I will give but one particular, which will astonish
good shots of every degree. This is, that when I charged my gun with
powder weighing one-fifth of the ball, it carried two hundred paces
point-blank. It is true that the great delight I took in this exercise
bid fair to withdraw me from my art and studies; yet in another way it
gave me more than it deprived me of, seeing that each time I went out
shooting I returned with greatly better health, because the open air was
a benefit to my constitution. My natural temperament was melancholy, and
while I was taking these amusements, my heart leapt up with joy, and I
found that I could work better and with far greater mastery than when I
spent my whole time in study and manual labour. In this way my gun, at
the end of the game, stood me more in profit than in loss.

It was also the cause of my making acquaintance with certain hunters
after curiosities, who followed in the track [1] of those Lombard
peasants who used to come to Rome to till the vineyards at the proper
season. While digging the ground, they frequently turned up antique
medals, agates, chrysoprases, cornelians, and cameos; also sometimes
jewels, as, for instance, emeralds, sapphires, diamonds, and rubies. The
peasants used to sell things of this sort to the traders for a mere
trifle; and I very often, when I met them, paid the latter several times
as many golden crowns as they had given giulios for some object.
Independently of the profit I made by this traffic, which was at least
tenfold, it brought me also into agreeable relations with nearly all the
cardinals of Rome. I will only touch upon a few of the most notable and
the rarest of these curiosities. There came into my hands, among many
other fragments, the head of a dolphin about as big as a good-sized
ballot-bean. Not only was the style of this head extremely beautiful,
but nature had here far surpassed art; for the stone was an emerald of
such good colour, that the man who bought it from me for tens of crowns
sold it again for hundreds after setting it as a finger-ring. I will
mention another kind of gem; this was a magnificent topaz; and here art
equalled nature; it was as large as a big hazel-nut, with the head of
Minerva in a style of inconceivable beauty. I remember yet another
precious stone, different from these; it was a cameo, engraved with
Hercules binding Cerberus of the triple throat; such was its beauty and
the skill of its workmanship, that our great Michel Agnolo protested he
had never seen anything so wonderful. Among many bronze medals, I
obtained one upon which was a head of Jupiter. It was the largest that
had ever been seen; the head of the most perfect execution; and it had
on the reverse side a very fine design of some little figures in the
same style. I might enlarge at great length on this curiosity; but I
will refrain for fear of being prolix.

Note 1. 'Stavano alle velette.' Perhaps 'lay in wait for.'



XXVIII

AS I have said above, the plague had broken out in Rome; but though I
must return a little way upon my steps, I shall not therefore abandon
the main path of my history. There arrived in Rome a surgeon of the
highest renown, who was called Maestro Giacomo da Carpi. [1] This able
man, in the course of his other practice, undertook the most desperate
cases of the so-called French disease. In Rome this kind of illness is
very partial to the priests, and especially to the richest of them.
When, therefore, Maestro Giacomo had made his talents known, he
professed to work miracles in the treatment of such cases by means of
certain fumigations; but he only undertook a cure after stipulating for
his fees, which he reckoned not by tens, but by hundreds of crowns. He
was a great connoisseur in the arts of design. Chancing to pass one day
before my shop, he saw a lot of drawings which I had laid upon the
counter, and among these were several designs for little vases in a
capricious style, which I had sketched for my amusement. These vases
were in quite a different fashion from any which had been seen up to
that date. He was anxious that I should finish one or two of them for
him in silver; and this I did with the fullest satisfaction, seeing they
exactly suited my own fancy. The clever surgeon paid me very well, and
yet the honour which the vases brought me was worth a hundred times as
much; for the best craftsmen in the goldsmith's trade declared they had
never seen anything more beautiful or better executed.

No sooner had I finished them than he showed them to the Pope; and the
next day following he betook himself away from Rome. He was a man of
much learning, who used to discourse wonderfully about medicine. The
Pope would fain have had him in his service, but he replied that he
would not take service with anybody in the world, and that whoso had
need of him might come to seek him out. He was a person of great
sagacity, and did wisely to get out of Rome; for not many months
afterwards, all the patients he had treated grew so ill that they were a
hundred times worse off than before he came. He would certainly have
been murdered if he had stopped. He showed my little vases to several
persons of quality; amongst others, to the most excellent Duke of
Ferrara, and pretended that he had got them from a great lord in Rome,
by telling this nobleman that if he wanted to be cured, he must give him
those two vases; and that the lord had answered that they were antique,
and besought him to ask for anything else which it might be convenient
for him to give, provided only he would leave him those; but, according
to his own account, Maestro Giacomo made as though he would not
undertake the cure, and so he got them.

I was told this by Messer Alberto Bendedio in Ferrara, who with great
ostentation showed me some earthenware copies he possessed of them. [2]
Thereupon I laughed, and as I said nothing, Messer Alberto Bendedio, who
was a haughty man, flew into a rage and said: "You are laughing at them,
are you? And I tell you that during the last thousand years there has
not been born a man capable of so much as copying them." I then, not
caring to deprive them of so eminent a reputation, kept silence, and
admired them with mute stupefaction. It was said to me in Rome by many
great lords, some of whom were my friends, that the work of which I have
been speaking was, in their opinion of marvellous excellence and genuine
antiquity; whereupon, emboldened by their praises, I revealed that I had
made them. As they would not believe it, and as I wished to prove that I
had spoken truth, I was obliged to bring evidence and to make new
drawings of the vases; for my word alone was not enough, inasmuch as
Maestro Giacomo had cunningly insisted upon carrying off the old
drawings with him. By this little job I earned a fair amount of money.

Note 1. Giacomo Berengario da Carpi was, in fact, a great physician,
surgeon, and student of anatomy. He is said to have been the first to
use mercury in the cure of syphilis, a disease which was devastating
Italy after the year 1495. He amassed a large fortune, which, when he
died at Ferrara about 1530, he bequeathed to the Duke there.

Note 2. See below, Book II. Chap. viii., for a full account of this
incident at Ferrara.



XXIX

THE PLAGUE went dragging on for many months, but I had as yet managed to
keep it at bay; for though several of my comrades were dead, I survived
in health and freedom. Now it chanced one evening that an intimate
comrade of mine brought home to supper a Bolognese prostitute named
Faustina. She was a very fine woman, but about thirty years of age; and
she had with her a little serving-girl of thirteen or fourteen. Faustina
belonging to my friend, I would not have touched her for all the gold in
the world; and though she declared she was madly in love with me, I
remained steadfast in my loyalty. But after they had gone to bed, I
stole away the little serving-girl, who was quite a fresh maid, and woe
to her if her mistress had known of it! The result was that I enjoyed a
very pleasant night, far more to my satisfaction than if I had passed it
with Faustina. I rose upon the hour of breaking fast, and felt tired,
for I had travelled many miles that night, and was wanting to take food,
when a crushing headache seized me; several boils appeared on my left
arm, together with a carbuncle which showed itself just beyond the palm
of the left hand where it joins the wrist. Everybody in the house was in
a panic; my friend, the cow and the calf, all fled. Left alone there
with my poor little prentice, who refused to abandon me, I felt stifled
at the heart, and made up my mind for certain I was a dead man.

Just then the father of the lad went by, who was physician to the
Cardinal Iacoacci, [1] and lived as member of that prelate's household.
[2] The boy called out: "Come, father, and see Benvenuto; he is in bed
with some trifling indisposition." Without thinking what my complaint
might be, the doctor came up at once, and when he had felt my pulse, he
saw and felt what was very contrary to his own wishes. Turning round to
his son, he said: "O traitor of a child, you've ruined me; how can I
venture now into the Cardinal's presence?" His son made answer: "Why,
father, this man my master is worth far more than all the cardinals in
Rome." Then the doctor turned to me and said: "Since I am here, I will
consent to treat you. But of one thing only I warn you, that if you have
enjoyed a woman, you are doomed." To this I replied: "I did so this very
night." He answered: "With whom, and to what extent?" [3] I said: "Last
night, and with a girl in her earliest maturity." Upon this, perceiving
that he had spoken foolishly, he made haste to add: "Well, considering
the sores are so new, and have not yet begun to stink, and that the
remedies will be taken in time, you need not be too much afraid, for I
have good hopes of curing you." When he had prescribed for me and gone
away, a very dear friend of mine, called Giovanni Rigogli, came in, who
fell to commiserating my great suffering and also my desertion by my
comrade, and said: "Be of good cheer, my Benvenuto, for I will never
leave your side until I see you restored to health." I told him not to
come too close, since it was all over with me. Only I besought him to be
so kind as to take a considerable quantity of crowns, which were lying
in a little box near my bed, and when God had thought fit to remove me
from this world, to send them to my poor father, writing pleasantly to
him, in the way I too had done, so far as that appalling season of the
plague permitted. [4] My beloved friend declared that he had no
intention whatsoever of leaving me, and that come what might, in life or
death, he knew very well what was his duty toward a friend. And so we
went on by the help of God: and the admirable remedies which I had used
began to work a great improvement, and I soon came well out of that
dreadful sickness.

The sore was still open, with a plug of lint inside it and a plaster
above, when I went out riding on a little wild pony. He was covered with
hair four fingers long, and was exactly as big as a well-grown bear;
indeed he looked just like a bear. I rode out on him to visit the
painter Rosso, who was then living in the country, toward Civita
Vecchia, at a place of Count Anguillara's called Cervetera. I found my
friend, and he was very glad to see me; whereupon I said: "I am come to
do to you that which you did to me so many months ago." He burst out
laughing, embraced and kissed me, and begged me for the Count's sake to
keep quiet. I stayed in that place about a month, with much content and
gladness, enjoying good wines and excellent food, and treated with the
greatest kindness by the Count; every day I used to ride out alone along
the seashore, where I dismounted, and filled my pockets with all sorts
of pebbles, snail shells, and sea shells of great rarity and beauty.

On the last day (for after this I went there no more) I was attacked by
a band of men, who had disguised themselves, and disembarked from a
Moorish privateer. When they thought that they had run me into a certain
passage, where it seemed impossible that I should escape from their
hands, I suddenly mounted my pony, resolved to be roasted or boiled
alive at that pass perilous, seeing I had little hope to evade one or
the other of these fates; [5] but, as God willed, my pony, who was the
same I have described above, took an incredibly wide jump, and brought
me off in safety, for which I heartily thanked God. I told the story to
the Count; he ran to arms; but we saw the galleys setting out to sea.
The next day following I went back sound and with good cheer to Rome.

Note 1. Probably Domenico Iacobacci, who obtained the hat in 1517.

Note 2. 'A sua provisione stava, i. e.,' he was in the Cardinal's
regular pay.

Note 3. 'Quanto.' Perhaps we ought to read 'quando-when?'

Note 4. 'Come ancora io avevo fatto secondo l'usanza che promettava
quell' arrabbiata stagione.' I am not sure that I have given the right
sense in the text above. Leclanche interprets the words thus: "that I
too had fared according to the wont of that appalling season," 'i. e.,'
had died of the plague. But I think the version in my sense is more true
both to Italian and to Cellini's special style.

Note 5. 'I. e.,' to escape either being drowned or shot.



XXX

THE PLAGUE had by this time almost died out, so that the survivors, when
they met together alive, rejoiced with much delight in one another's
company. This led to the formation of a club of painters, sculptors, and
goldsmiths, the best that were in Rome; and the founder of it was a
sculptor with the name of Michel Agnolo. [1] He was a Sienese and a man
of great ability, who could hold his own against any other workman in
that art; but, above all, he was the most amusing comrade and the
heartiest good fellow in the universe. Of all the members of the club,
he was the eldest, and yet the youngest from the strength and vigour of
his body. We often came together; at the very least twice a week. I must
not omit to mention that our society counted Giulio Romano, the painter,
and Gian Francesco, both of them celebrated pupils of the mighty
Raffaello da Urbino.

After many and many merry meetings, it seemed good to our worthy
president that for the following Sunday we should repair to supper in
his house, and that each one of us should be obliged to bring with him
his crow (such was the nickname Michel Agnolo gave to women in the
club), and that whoso did not bring one should be sconced by paying a
supper to the whole company. Those of us who had no familiarity with
women of the town, were forced to purvey themselves at no small trouble
and expense, in order to appear without disgrace at that distinguished
feast of artists. I had reckoned upon being well provided with a young
woman of considerable beauty, called Pantasilea, who was very much in
love with me; but I was obliged to give her up to one of my dearest
friends, called Il Bachiacca, who on his side had been, and still was,
over head and ears in love with her. [2] This exchange excited a certain
amount of lover's anger, because the lady, seeing I had abandoned her at
Bachiacca's first entreaty, imagined that I held in slight esteem the
great affection which she bore me. In course of time a very serious
incident grew out of this misunderstanding, through her desire to take
revenge for the affront I had put upon her; whereof I shall speak
hereafter in the proper place.

Well, then, the hour was drawing nigh when we had to present ourselves
before that company of men of genius, each with his own crow; and I was
still unprovided; and yet I thought it would be stupid to fail of such a
madcap bagatelle; [3] but what particularly weighed upon my mind was
that I did not choose to lend the light of my countenance in that
illustrious sphere to some miserable plume-plucked scarecrow. All these
considerations made me devise a pleasant trick, for the increase of
merriment and the diffusion of mirth in our society.

Having taken this resolve, I sent for a stripling of sixteen years, who
lived in the next house to mine; he was the son of a Spanish
coppersmith. This young man gave his time to Latin studies, and was very
diligent in their pursuit. He bore the name of Diego, had a handsome
figure, and a complexion of marvellous brilliancy; the outlines of his
head and face were far more beautiful than those of the antique
Antinous: I had often copied them, gaining thereby much honour from the
works in which I used them. The youth had no acquaintances, and was
therefore quite unknown; dressed very ill and negligently; all his
affections being set upon those wonderful studies of his. After bringing
him to my house, I begged him to let me array him in the woman's clothes
which I had caused to be laid out. He readily complied, and put them on
at once, while I added new beauties to the beauty of his face by the
elaborate and studied way in which I dressed his hair. In his ears I
placed two little rings, set with two large and fair pearls; the rings
were broken; they only clipped his ears, which looked as though they had
been pierced. Afterwards I wreathed his throat with chains of gold and
rich jewels, and ornamented his fair hands with rings. Then I took him
in a pleasant manner by one ear, and drew him before a great
looking-glass. The lad, when he beheld himself, cried out with a burst
of enthusiasm: "Heavens! is that Diego?" I said: "That is Diego, from
whom until this day I never asked for any kind of favour; but now I only
beseech Diego to do me pleasure in one harmless thing; and it is this-I
want him to come in those very clothes to supper with the company of
artists whereof he has often heard me speak." The young man, who was
honest, virtuous, and wise, checked his enthusiasm, bent his eyes to the
ground, and stood for a short while in silence. Then with a sudden move
he lifted up his face and said: "With Benvenuto I will go; now let us
start."

I wrapped his head in a large kind of napkin, which is called in Rome a
summer-cloth; and when we reached the place of meeting, the company had
already assembled, and everybody came forward to greet me. Michel Agnolo
had placed himself between Giulio and Giovan Francesco. I lifted the
veil from the head of my beauty; and then Michel Agnolo, who, as I have
already said, was the most humorous and amusing fellow in the world,
laid his two hands, the one on Giulio's and the other on Gian
Francesco's shoulders, and pulling them with all his force, made them
bow down, while he, on his knees upon the floor, cried out for mercy,
and called to all the folk in words like these: "Behold ye of what sort
are the angels of paradise! for though they are called angels, here
shall ye see that they are not all of the male gender." Then with a loud
voice he added:

    "Angel beauteous, angel best,
     Save me thou, make thou me blest."

Upon this my charming creature laughed, and lifted the right hand and
gave him a papal benediction, with many pleasant words to boot. So
Michel Agnolo stood up, and said it was the custom to kiss the feet of
the Pope and the cheeks of angels; and having done the latter to Diego,
the boy blushed deeply, which immensely enhanced his beauty.

When this reception was over, we found the whole room full of sonnets,
which every man of us had made and sent to Michel Agnolo, My lad began
to read them, and read them all aloud so gracefully, that his infinite
charms were heightened beyond the powers of language to describe. Then
followed conversation and witty sayings, on which I will not enlarge,
for that is not my business; only one clever word must be mentioned, for
it was spoken by that admirable painter Giulio, who, looking round with
meaning [4] in his eyes on the bystanders, and fixing them particularly
upon the women, turned to Michel Agnolo and said: "My dear Michel
Agnolo, your nickname of crow very well suits those ladies to-day,
though I vow they are somewhat less fair than crows by the side of one
of the most lovely peacocks which fancy could have painted"

When the banquet was served and ready, and we were going to sit down to
table, Giulio asked leave to be allowed to place us. This being granted,
he took the women by the hand, and arranged them all upon the inner
side, with my fair in the centre; then he placed all the men on the
outside and me in the middle, saying there was no honour too great for
my deserts.; As a background to the women, there was spread an espalier
of natural jasmines in full beauty, [5] which set off their charms, and
especially Diego's, to such great advantage, that words would fail to
describe the effect. Then we all of us fell to enjoying the abundance of
our host's well-furnished table. The supper was followed by a short
concert of delightful music, voices joining in harmony with instruments;
and forasmuch as they were singing and playing from the book, my beauty
begged to be allowed to sing his part. He performed the music better
than almost all the rest, which so astonished the company that Giulio
and Michel Agnolo dropped their earlier tone of banter, exchanging it
for well-weighed terms of sober heartfelt admiration.

After the music was over, a certain Aurelio Ascolano, [6]remarkable for
his gift as an improvisatory poet, began to extol the women in choice
phrases of exquisite compliment. While he was chanting, the two girls
who had my beauty between them never left off chattering. One of them
related how she had gone wrong; the other asked mine how it had happened
with her, and who were her friends, and how long she had been settled in
Rome, and many other questions of the kind. It is true that, if I chose
to describe such laughable episodes, I could relate several odd things
which then occurred through Pantasilea's jealousy on my account; but
since they form no part of my design, I pass them briefly over. At last
the conversation of those loose women vexed my beauty, whom we had
christened Pomona for the nonce; and Pomona, wanting to escape from
their silly talk, turned restlessly upon her chair, first to one side
and then to the other. The female brought by Giulio asked whether she
felt indisposed. Pomona answered, yes, she thought she was a month or so
with a child; this gave them the opportunity of feeling her body and
discovering the real sex of the supposed woman. Thereupon they quickly
withdrew their hands and rose from table, uttering such gibing words as
are commonly addressed to young men of eminent beauty. The whole room
rang with laughter and astonishment, in the midst of which Michel
Agnolo, assuming a fierce aspect, called out for leave to inflict on me
the penance he thought fit. When this was granted, he lifted me aloft
amid the clamour of the company, crying: "Long live the gentleman! long
live the gentleman!" and added that this was the punishment I deserved
for having played so fine a trick. Thus ended that most agreeable
supper-party, and each of us returned to his own dwelling at the close
of day.

Note 1. This sculptor came to Rome with his compatriot Baldassare
Peruzzi, and was employed upon the monument of Pope Adrian VI., which he
executed with some help from Tribolo.

Note 2. There were two artists at this epoch surnamed Bachiacca, the
twin sons of Ubertino Verdi, called respectively Francesco and Antonio.
Francesco was an excellent painter of miniature oil-pictures; Antonio
the first embroiderer of his age. The one alluded to here is probably
Francesco.

Note 3. 'Mancare di una sipazza cosa.' The 'pazza cosa' may be the
supper-party or the 'cornacchia.'

Note 4. 'Virtuosamente.' Cellini uses the word 'virtuoso' in many
senses, but always more with reference to intellectual than moral
qualities. It denotes genius, artistic ability, masculine force, &c.

Note 5. 'Un tessuto di gelsumini naturali e bellissimi. Tessuto' is
properly something woven, a fabric; and I am not sure whether Cellini
does not mean that the ladies had behind their backs a tapestry
representing jasmines in a natural manner.

Note 6. Probably Eurialo d'Ascoli, a friend of Caro, Molza, Aretino.



XXXI

IT would take too long to describe in detail all the many and divers
pieces of work which I executed for a great variety of men. At present I
need only say that I devoted myself with sustained diligence and
industry to acquiring mastery in the several branches of art which I
enumerated a short while back. And so I went on labouring incessantly at
all of them; but since no opportunity has presented itself as yet for
describing my most notable performances, I shall wait to report them in
their proper place before very long. The Sienese sculptor, Michel
Agnolo, of whom I have recently been speaking, was at that time making
the monument of the late Pope Adrian. Giulio Romano went to paint for
the Marquis of Mantua. The other members of the club betook themselves
in different directions, each to his own business; so that our company
of artists was well-nigh altogether broken up.

About this time there fell into my hands some little Turkish poniards;
the handle as well as the blade of these daggers was made of iron, and
so too was the sheath. They were engraved by means of iron implements
with foliage in the most exquisite Turkish style, very neatly filled in
with gold. The sight of them stirred in me a great desire to try my own
skill in that branch, so different from the others which I practiced;
and finding that I succeeded to my satisfaction, I executed several
pieces. Mine were far more beautiful and more durable than the Turkish,
and this for divers reasons. One was that I cut my grooves much deeper
and with wider trenches in the steel; for this is not usual in Turkish
work. Another was that the Turkish arabesques are only composed of arum
leaves a few small sunflowers; [1] and though these have a certain
grace, they do not yield so lasting a pleasure as the patterns which we
use. It is true that in Italy we have several different ways of
designing foliage; the Lombards, for example, construct very beautiful
patterns by copying the leaves of briony and ivy in exquisite curves,
which are extremely agreeable to the eye; the Tuscans and the Romans
make a better choice, because they imitate the leaves of the acanthus,
commonly called bear's-foot, with its stalks and flowers, curling in
divers wavy lines; and into these arabesques one may excellently well
insert the figures of little birds and different animals, by which the
good taste of the artist is displayed. Some hints for creatures of this
sort can be observed in nature among the wild flowers, as, for instance,
in snap-dragons and some few other plants, which must be combined and
developed with the help of fanciful imaginings by clever draughtsmen.
Such arabesques are called grotesques by the ignorant. They have
obtained this name of grotesques among the moderns through being found
in certain subterranean caverns in Rome by students of antiquity; which
caverns were formerly chambers, hot-baths, cabinets for study, halls,
and apartments of like nature. The curious discovering them in such
places (since the level of the ground has gradually been raised while
they have remained below, and since in Rome these vaulted rooms are
commonly called grottoes), it has followed that the word grotesque is
applied to the patterns I have mentioned. But this is not the right term
for them, inasmuch as the ancients, who delighted in composing monsters
out of goats, cows, and horses, called these chimerical hybrids by the
name of monsters; and the modern artificers of whom I speak, fashioned
from the foliage which they copied monsters of like nature; for these
the proper name is therefore monsters, and not grotesques. Well, then, I
designed patterns of this kind, and filled them in with gold, as I have
mentioned; and they were far more pleasing to the eye than the Turkish.

It chanced at that time that I lighted upon some jars or little antique
urns filled with ashes, and among the ashes were some iron rings inlaid
with gold (for the ancients also used that art), and in each of the
rings was set a tiny cameo of shell. On applying to men of learning,
they told me that these rings were worn as amulets by folk desirous of
abiding with mind unshaken in any extraordinary circumstance, whether of
good or evil fortune. Hereupon, at the request of certain noblemen who
were my friends, I undertook to fabricate some trifling rings of this
kind; but I made them of refined steel; and after they had been well
engraved and inlaid with gold, they produced a very beautiful effect;
and sometimes a single ring brought me more than forty crowns, merely in
payment for my labour.

It was the custom at that epoch to wear little golden medals, upon which
every nobleman or man of quality had some device or fancy of his own
engraved; and these were worn in the cap. Of such pieces I made very
many, and found them extremely difficult to work. I have already
mentioned the admirable craftsman Caradosso, who used to make such
ornaments; and as there were more than one figure on each piece, he
asked at least a hundred gold crowns for his fee. This being so-not,
however, because his prices were so high, but because he worked so
slowly-I began to be employed by certain noblemen, for whom, among other
things, I made a medal in competition with that great artist, and it had
four figures, upon which I had expended an infinity of labour. These men
of quality, when they compared my piece with that of the famous
Caradosso, declared that mine was by far the better executed and more
beautiful, and bade me ask what I liked as the reward of my trouble; for
since I had given them such perfect satisfaction, they wished to do the
like by me. I replied that my greatest reward and what I most desired
was to have rivalled the masterpieces of so eminent an artist; and that
if their lordships thought I had, I acknowledged myself to be most amply
rewarded. With this I took my leave, and they immediately sent me such a
very liberal present, that I was well content; indeed there grew in me
so great a spirit to do well, that to this event I attributed what will
afterwards be related of my progress.

Note 1. 'Gichero,' arum maculatum, and 'clizia,' the sunflower.



XXXII

I SHALL be obliged to digress a little from the history of my art,
unless I were to omit some annoying incidents which have happened in the
course of my troubled career. One of these, which I am about to
describe, brought me into the greatest risk of my life. I have already
told the story of the artists' club, and of the farcical adventures
which happened owing to the woman whom I mentioned, Pantasilea, the one
who felt for me that false and fulsome love. She was furiously enraged
because of the pleasant trick by which I brought Diego to our banquet,
and she swore to be revenged on me. How she did so is mixed up with the
history of a young man called Luigi Pulci, who had recently come to
Rome. He was the son of one of the Pulcis, who had been beheaded for
incest with his daughter; and the youth possessed extraordinary gifts
for poetry together with sound Latin scholarship; he wrote well, was
graceful in manners, and of surprising personal beauty; he had just left
the service of some bishop, whose name I do not remember, and was
thoroughly tainted with a very foul disease. While he was yet a lad and
living in Florence, they used in certain places of the city to meet
together during the nights of summer on the public streets; and he,
ranking among the best of the improvisatori, sang there. His recitations
were so admirable, that the divine Michel Agnolo Buonarroti, that prince
of sculptors and of painters, went, wherever he heard that he would be,
with the greatest eagerness and delight to listen to him. There was a
man called Piloto, a goldsmith, very able in his art, who, together with
myself, joined Buonarroti upon these occasions. [1] Thus acquaintance
sprang up between me and Luigi Pulci; and so, after the lapse of many
years, he came, in the miserable plight which I have mentioned, to make
himself known to me again in Rome, beseeching me for God's sake to help
him. Moved to compassion by his great talents, by the love of my
fatherland, and by my own natural tenderness of heart, I took him into
my house, and had him medically treated in such wise that, being but a
youth, he soon regained his health. While he was still pursuing his
cure, he never omitted his studies, and I provided him with books
according to the means at my disposal. The result was that Luigi,
recognising the great benefits he had received from me, oftentimes with
words and tears returned me thanks, protesting that if God should ever
put good fortune in his way, he would recompense me for my kindness. To
this I replied that I had not done for him as much as I desired, but
only what I could, and that it was the duty of human beings to be
mutually serviceable. Only I suggested that he should repay the service
I had rendered him by doing likewise to some one who might have the same
need of him as he had had of me.

The young man in question began to frequent the Court of Rome, where he
soon found a situation, and enrolled himself in the suite of a bishop, a
man of eighty years, who bore the title of Gurgensis. [2] This bishop
had a nephew called Messer Giovanni: he was a nobleman of Venice; and
the said Messer Giovanni made show of marvellous attachment to Luigi
Pulci's talents; and under the pretence of these talents, he brought him
as familiar to himself as his own flesh blood. Luigi having talked of
me, and of his great obligations to me, with Messer Giovanni, the latter
expressed a wish to make my acquaintance. Thus then it came to pass,
that when I had upon a certain evening invited that woman Pantasilea to
supper, and had assembled a company of men of parts who were my friends,
just at the moment of our sitting down to table, Messer Giovanni and
Luigi Pulci arrived, and after some complimentary speeches, they both
remained to sup with us. The shameless strumpet, casting her eyes upon
the young man's beauty, began at once to lay her nets for him;
perceiving which, when the supper had come to an agreeable end, I took
Luigi aside, and conjured him, by the benefits he said he owed me, to
have nothing whatever to do with her. To this he answered: "Good
heavens, Benvenuto! do you then take me for a madman?" I rejoined: "Not
for a madman, but for a young fellow;" and I swore to him by God: "I do
not give that woman the least thought; but for your sake I should be
sorry if through her you come to break your neck." Upon these words he
vowed and prayed to God, that, if ever he but spoke with her, he might
upon the moment break his neck. I think the poor lad swore this oath to
God with all his heart, for he did break his neck, as I shall presently
relate. Messer Giovanni showed signs too evident of loving him in a
dishonourable way; for we began to notice that Luigi had new suits of
silk and velvet every morning, and it was known that he abandoned
himself altogether to bad courses. He neglected his fine talents, and
pretended not to see or recognise me, because I had once rebuked him,
and told him he was giving his soul to foul vices, which would make him
break his neck, as he had vowed.

Note 1. Piloto, of whom we shall hear more hereafter, was a prominent
figure in the Florentine society of artists, and a celebrated practical
joker. Vasari says that a young man of whom he had spoken ill murdered
him. Lasca's Novelle, 'Le Cene,' should be studied by those who seek an
insight into this curious Bohemia of the sixteenth century.

Note 2. Girolamo Balbo, of the noble Venetian family, Bishop of Gurck,
in Carinthia.



XXXIII

NOW Messer Giovanni bought his favourite a very fine black horse, for
which he paid 150 crowns. The beast was admirably trained to hand, so
that Luigi could go daily to caracole around the lodgings of that
prostitute Pantasilea. Though I took notice of this, I paid it no
attention, only remarking that all things acted as their nature
prompted; and meanwhile I gave my whole mind to my studies. It came to
pass one Sunday evening that we were invited to sup together with the
Sienese sculptor, Michel Agnolo, and the time of the year was summer.
Bachiacca, of whom I have already spoken, was present at the party; and
he had brought with him his old flame, Pantasilea. When we were at
table, she sat between me and Bachiacca; but in the very middle of the
banquet she rose, and excused herself upon the pretext of a natural
need, saying she would speedily return. We, meanwhile, continued talking
very agreeably and supping; but she remained an unaccountably long time
absent. It chanced that, keeping my ears open, I thought I heard a sort
of subdued tittering in the street below. I had a knife in hand, which I
was using for my service at the table. The window was so close to where
I sat, that, by merely rising, I could see Luigi in the street, together
with Pantasilea; and I heard Luigi saying: "Oh, if that devil Benvenuto
only saw us, shouldn't we just catch it!" She answered: "Have no fear;
only listen to the noise they're making; we are the last thing they're
thinking of." At these words, having made them both well out, I leaped
from the window, and took Luigi by the cape; and certainly I should then
have killed him with the knife I held, but that he was riding a white
horse, to which he clapped spurs, leaving his cape in my grasp, in order
to preserve his life. Pantasilea took to her heels in the direction of a
neighbouring church. The company at supper rose immediately, and came
down, entreating me in a body to refrain from putting myself and them to
inconvenience for a strumpet. I told them that I should not have let
myself be moved on her account, but that I was bent on punishing the
infamous young man, who showed how little he regarded me. Accordingly I
would not yield to the remonstrances of those ingenious and worthy men,
but took my sword, and went alone toward Prati:-the house where we were
supping, I should say, stood close to the Castello gate, which led to
Prati. [1] Walking thus upon the road to Prati, I had not gone far
before the sun sank, and I re-entered Rome itself at a slow pace. Night
had fallen; darkness had come on; but the gates of Rome were not yet
shut.

Toward two hours after sunset, I walked along Pantasilea's lodging, with
the intention, if Luigi Pulci were there, of doing something to the
discontent of both. When I heard and saw that no one but a poor
servant-girl called Canida was in the house, I went to put away my cloak
and the scabbard of my sword, and then returned to the house, which
stood behind the Banchi on the river Tiber. Just opposite stretched a
garden belonging to an innkeeper called Romolo. It was enclosed by a
thick hedge of thorns, in which I hid myself, standing upright, and
waiting till the woman came back with Luigi. After keeping watch awhile
there, my friend Bachiacca crept up to me; whether led by his own
suspicions or by the advice of others, I cannot say. In a low voice he
called out to me: "Gossip" (for so we used to name ourselves for fun);
and then he prayed me for God's love, using the words which follow, with
tears in the tone of his voice: "Dear gossip, I entreat you not to
injure that poor girl; she at least has erred in no wise in this
matter-no, not at all." When I heard what he was saying, I replied: "If
you don't take yourself off now, at this first word I utter, I will
bring my sword here down upon your head." Overwhelmed with fright, my
poor gossip was suddenly taken ill with the colic, and withdrew to ease
himself apart; indeed, he could not buy obey the call. There was a
glorious heaven of stars, which shed good light to see by. All of a
sudden I was aware of the noise of many horses; they were coming toward
me from the one side and the other. It turned out to be Luigi and
Pantasilea, attended by a certain Messer Benvegnato of Perugia, who was
chamberlain to Pope Clement, and followed by four doughty captains of
Perugia, with some other valiant soldiers in the flower of youth;
altogether reckoned, there were more than twelve swords. When I
understood the matter, and saw not how to fly, I did my best to crouch
into the hedge. But the thorns pricked and hurt me, goading me to
madness like a bull; and I had half resolved to take a leap and hazard
my escape. Just then Luigi, with his arm round Pantasilea's neck, was
heard crying: "I must kiss you once again, if only to insult that
traitor Benvenuto." At that moment, annoyed as I was by the prickles,
and irritated by the young man's words, I sprang forth, lifted my sword
on high, and shouted at the top of my voice: "You are all dead folk!" My
blow descended on the shoulder of Luigi; but the satyrs who doted on
him, had steeled his person round with coasts of mail and such-like
villainous defences; still the stroke fell with crushing force. Swerving
aside, the sword hit Pantasilea full in nose and mouth. Both she and
Luigi grovelled on the ground, while Bachiacca, with his breeches down
to heels, screamed out and ran away. Then I turned upon the others
boldly with my sword; and those valiant fellows, hearing a sudden
commotion in the tavern, thought there was an army coming of a hundred
men; and though they drew their swords with spirit, yet two horses which
had taken fright in the tumult cast them into such disorder that a
couple of the best riders were thrown, and the remainder took to flight.
I, seeing that the affair was turning out well, for me, ran as quickly
as I could, and came off with honour from the engagement, not wishing to
tempt fortune more than was my duty. During this hurly-burly, some of
the soldiers and captains wounded themselves with their own arms; and
Messer Benvegnato, the Pope's chamberlain, was kicked and trampled by
his mule. One of the servants also, who had drawn his sword, fell down
together with his master, and wounded him badly in the hand. Maddened by
the pain, he swore louder than all the rest in his Perugian jargon,
crying out: "By the body of God, I will take care that Benvegnato
teaches Benvenuto how to live." He afterwards commissioned one of the
captains who were with him (braver perhaps than the others, but with
less aplomb, as being but a youth) to seek me out. The fellow came to
visit me in the place of by retirement; that was the palace of a great
Neapolitan nobleman, who had become acquainted with me in my art, and
had besides taken a fancy to me because of my physical and mental
aptitude for fighting, to which my lord himself was personally well
inclined. So, then, finding myself made much of, and being precisely in
my element, I gave such answer to the captain as I think must have made
him earnestly repent of having come to look me up. After a few days,
when the wounds of Luigi, and the strumpet, and the rest were healing,
this great Neapolitan nobleman received overtures from Messer
Benvegnato; for the prelate's anger had cooled, and he proposed to
ratify a peace between me and Luigi and the soldiers, who had personally
no quarrel with me, and only wished to make my acquaintance. Accordingly
my friend the nobleman replied that he would bring me where they chose
to appoint, and that he was very willing to effect a reconciliation. He
stipulated that no words should be bandied about on either side, seeing
that would be little to their credit; it was enough to go through the
form of drinking together and exchanging kisses; he for his part
undertook to do the talking, and promised to settle the matter to their
honour. This arrangement was carried out. On Thursday evening my
protector took me to the house of Messer Benvegnato, where all the
soldiers who had been present at that discomfiture were assembled, and
already seated at table. My nobleman was attended by thirty brave
fellows, all well armed; a circumstance which Messer Benvegnato had not
anticipated. When we came into the hall, he walking first, I following,
he speak to this effect: "God save you, gentlemen; we have come to see
you, I and Benvenuto, whom I love like my own brother; and we are ready
to do whatever you propose." Messer Benvegnato, seeing the hall filled
with such a crowd of men, called out: "It is only peace, and nothing
else, we ask of you." Accordingly he promised that the governor of Rome
and his catchpoles should give me no trouble. Then we made peace, and I
returned to my shop, where I could not stay an hour without that
Neapolitan nobleman either coming to see me or sending for me.

Meanwhile Luigi Pulci, having recovered from his wound, rode every day
upon the black horse which was so well trained to heel and bridle. One
day, among others, after it had rained a little, and he was making his
horse curvet just before Pantasilea's door, he slipped and fell, with
the horse upon him. His right leg was broken short off in the thigh; and
after a few days he died there in Pantisilea's lodgings, discharging
thus the vow he registered so heartily to Heaven. Even so may it be seen
that God keeps account of the good and the bad, and gives to each one
what he merits.

Note 1. The Porta Castello was the gate called after the Castle of S.
Angelo. Prati, so far as I can make out, was an open space between the
Borgo and the Bridge of S. Angelo. In order to get inside Rome itself,
Cellini had to pass a second gate. His own lodging and Pantasilea's
house were in the quarter of the Bianchi, where are now the Via Giulia
and Via de' Banchi Vecchi.



XXXIV

THE WHOLE world was now in warfare. [1] Pope Clement had sent to get
some troops from Giovanni de' Medici, and when they came, they made such
disturbances in Rome, that it was ill living in open shops. [2] On this
account I retired to a good snug house behind the Banchi, where I worked
for all the friends I had acquired. Since I produced few things of much
importance at that period, I need not waste time in talking about them.
I took much pleasure in music and amusements of the kind. On the death
of Giovanni de' Medici in Lombardy, the Pope, at the advice of Messer
Jacopo Salviati, dismissed the five bands he had engaged; and when the
Constable of Bourbon knew there were no troops in Rome, he pushed his
army with the utmost energy up to the city. The whole of Rome upon this
flew to arms. I happened to be intimate with Alessandro, the son of
Piero del Bene, who, at the time when the Colonnesi entered Rome, had
requested me to guard his palace. [3] On this more serious occasion,
therefore, he prayed me to enlist fifty comrades for the protection of
the said house, appointing me their captain, as I had been when the
Colonnesi came. So I collected fifty young men of the highest courage,
and we took up our quarters in his palace, with good pay and excellent
appointments.

Bourbon's army had now arrived before the walls of Rome, and Alessandro
begged me to go with him to reconnoitre. So we went with one of the
stoutest fellows in our Company; and on the way a youth called Cecchino
della Casa joined himself to us. On reaching the walls by the Campo
Santo, we could see that famous army, which was making every effort to
enter the town. Upon the ramparts where we took our station several
young men were lying killed by the besiegers; the battle raged there
desperately, and there was the densest fog imaginable. I turned to
Alessandro and said: "Let us go home as soon as we can, for there is
nothing to be done here; you see the enemies are mounting, and our men
are in flight." Alessandro, in a panic, cried: "Would God that we had
never come here!" and turned in maddest haste to fly. I took him up
somewhat sharply with these words: "Since you have brought me here, I
must perform some action worthy of a man;" and directing my arquebuse
where I saw the thickest and most serried troop of fighting men, I aimed
exactly at one whom I remarked to be higher than the rest; the fog
prevented me from being certain whether he was on horseback or on foot.
Then I turned to Alessandro and Cecchino, and bade them discharge their
arquebuses, showing them how to avoid being hit by the besiegers. When
we had fired two rounds apiece, I crept cautiously up to the wall, and
observing among the enemy a most extraordinary confusion, I discovered
afterwards that one of our shots had killed the Constable of Bourbon;
and from what I subsequently learned, he was the man whom I had first
noticed above the heads of the rest. [4]

Quitting our position on the ramparts, we crossed the Campo Santo, and
entered the city by St. Peter's; then coming out exactly at the church
of Santo Agnolo, we got with the greatest difficulty to the great gate
of the castle; for the generals Renzo di Ceri and Orazio Baglioni were
wounding and slaughtering everybody who abandoned the defence of the
walls. [5] By the time we had reached the great gate, part of the foemen
had already entered Rome, and we had them in our rear. The castellan had
ordered the portcullis to be lowered, in order to do which they cleared
a little space, and this enabled us four to get inside. On the instant
that I entered, the captain Pallone de' Medici claimed me as being of
the Papal household, and forced me to abandon Alessandro, which I had to
do, much against my will. I ascended to the keep, and at the same
instant Pope Clement came in through the corridors into the castle; he
had refused to leave the palace of St. Peter earlier, being unable to
believe that his enemies would effect their entrance into Rome. [6]
Having got into the castle in this way, I attached myself to certain
pieces of artillery, which were under the command of a bombardier called
Giuliano Fiorentino. Leaning there against the battlements, the unhappy
man could see his poor house being sacked, and his wife and children
outraged; fearing to strike his own folk, he dared not discharge the
cannon, and flinging the burning fuse upon the ground, he wept as though
his heart would break, and tore his cheeks with both his hands. [7] Some
of the other bombardiers were behaving in like manner; seeing which, I
took one of the matches, and got the assistance of a few men who were
not overcome by their emotions. I aimed some swivels and falconets at
points where I saw it would be useful, and killed with them a good
number of the enemy. Had it not been for this, the troops who poured
into Rome that morning, and were marching straight upon the castle,
might possibly have entered it with ease, because the artillery was
doing them no damage. I went on firing under the eyes of several
cardinals and lords, who kept blessing me and giving me the heartiest
encouragement. In my enthusiasm I strove to achieve the impossible; let
it suffice that it was I who saved the castle that morning, and brought
the other bombardiers back to their duty. [8] I worked hard the whole of
that day; and when the evening came, while the army was marching into
Rome through the Trastevere, Pope Clement appointed a great Roman
nobleman named Antonio Santacroce to be captain of all the gunners. The
first thing this man did was to come to me, and having greeted me with
the utmost kindness, he stationed me with five fine pieces of artillery
on the highest point of the castle, to which the name of the Angel
specially belongs. This circular eminence goes round the castle, and
surveys both Prati and the town of Rome. The captain put under my orders
enough men to help in managing my guns, and having seen me paid in
advance, he gave me rations of bread and a little wine, and begged me to
go forward as I had begun. I was perhaps more inclined by nature to the
profession of arms than to the one I had adopted, and I took such
pleasure in its duties that I discharged them better than those of my
own art. Night came, the enemy had entered Rome, and we who were in the
castle (especially myself, who have always taken pleasure in
extraordinary sights) stayed gazing on the indescribable scene of tumult
and conflagration in the streets below. People who were anywhere else
but where we were, could not have formed the least imagination of what
it was. I will not, however, set myself to describe that tragedy, but
will content myself with continuing the history of my own life and the
circumstances which properly belong to it.

Note 1. War had broken out in 1521 between Charles V and Francis I,
which disturbed all Europe and involved the States of Italy in serious
complications. At the moment when this chapter opens, the Imperialist
army under the Constable of Bourbon was marching upon Rome in 1527.

Note 2. These troops entered Rome in October 1526. They were disbanded
in March, 1527.

Note 3. Cellini here refers to the attack made upon Rome by the great
Ghibelline house of Colonna, led by their chief captain, Pompeo, in
September 1526. They took possession of the city and drove Clement into
the Castle of S. Angelo, where they forced him to agree to terms
favouring the Imperial cause. It was customary for Roman gentlemen to
hire bravi for the defence of their palaces when any extraordinary
disturbance was expected, as, for example, upon the vacation of the
Papal Chair.

Note 4. All historians of the sack of Rome agree in saying that Bourbon
was shot dead while placing ladders against the outworks near the shop
Cellini mentions. But the honour of firing the arquebuse which brought
him down cannot be assigned to any one in particular. Very different
stories were current on the subject. See Gregorovius, 'Stadt Rom.,' vol.
viii. p. 522.

Note 5. For Renzo di Ceri see above. Orazio Baglioni, of the
semi-princely Perugian family, was a distinguished Condottiere. He
subsequently obtained the captaincy of the Bande Nere, and died fighting
near Naples in 1528. Orazio murdered several of his cousins in order to
acquire the lordship of Perugia. His brother Malatesta undertook to
defend Florence in the siege of 1530, and sold the city by treason to
Clement.

Note 6. Giovio, in his Life of the Cardinal Prospero Colonna, relates
how he accompanied Clement in his flight from the Vatican to the castle.
While passing some open portions of the gallery, he threw his violent
mantle and cap of a Monsignore over the white stole of the Pontiff, for
fear he might be shot at by the soldiers in the streets below.

Note 7. The short autobiography of Raffaello da Montelupo, a man in many
respects resembling Cellini, confirms this part of our author's
narrative. It is one of the most interesting pieces of evidence
regarding what went on inside the castle during the sack of Rome.
Montelupo was also a gunner, and commanded two pieces.

Note 8. This is an instance of Cellini's exaggeration. He did more than
yeoman's service, no doubt. But we cannot believe that, without him, the
castle would have been taken.



XXXV

DURING the course of my artillery practice, which I never intermitted
through the whole month passed by us beleaguered in the castle, I met
with a great many very striking accidents, all of them worthy to be
related. But since I do not care to be too prolix, or to exhibit myself
outside the sphere of my profession, I will omit the larger part of
them, only touching upon those I cannot well neglect, which shall be the
fewest in number and the most remarkable. The first which comes to hand
is this: Messer Antonio Santacroce had made me come down from the Angel,
in order to fire on some houses in the neighbourhood, where certain of
our besiegers had been seen to enter. While I was firing, a cannon shot
reached me, which hit the angle of a battlement, and carried off enough
of it to be the cause why I sustained no injury. The whole mass struck
me in the chest and took my breath away. I lay stretched upon the ground
like a dead man, and could hear what the bystanders were saying. Among
them all, Messer Antonio Santacroce lamented greatly, exclaiming: "Alas,
alas! we have lost the best defender that we had." Attracted by the
uproar, one of my comrades ran up; he was called Gianfrancesco, and was
a bandsman, but was far more naturally given to medicine than to music.
On the spot he flew off, crying for a stoop of the very best Greek wine.
Then he made a tile red-hot, and cast upon it a good handful of
wormwood; after which he sprinkled the Greek wine; and when the wormwood
was well soaked, he laid it on my breast, just where the bruise was
visible to all. Such was the virtue of the wormwood that I immediately
regained my scattered faculties. I wanted to begin to speak; but could
not; for some stupid soldiers had filled my mouth with earth, imagining
that by so doing they were giving me the sacrament; and indeed they were
more like to have excommunicated me, since I could with difficulty come
to myself again, the earth doing me more mischief than the blow.
However, I escaped that danger, and returned to the rage and fury of the
guns, pursuing my work there with all the ability and eagerness that I
could summon.

Pope Clement, by this, had sent to demand assistance from the Duke of
Urbino, who was with the troops of Venice; he commissioned the envoy to
tell his Excellency that the Castle of S. Angelo would send up every
evening three beacons from its summit accompanied by three discharges of
the cannon thrice repeated, and that so long as this signal was
continued, he might take for granted that the castle had not yielded. I
was charged with lighting the beacons and firing the guns for this
purpose; and all this while I pointed my artillery by day upon the
places where mischief could be done. The Pope, in consequence, began to
regard me with still greater favour, because he saw that I discharged my
functions as intelligently as the task demanded. Aid from the Duke of
Urbino [1] never came; on which, as it is not my business, I will make
no further comment.

Note 1. Francesco Maria della Rovere, Duke of Urbino, commanded a
considerable army as general of the Church, and was now acting for
Venice. Why he effected no diversion while the Imperial troops were
marching upon Rome, and why he delayed to relieve the city, was never
properly explained. Folk attributed his impotent conduct partly to a
natural sluggishness in warfare, and partly to his hatred for the house
of Medici. Leo X had deprived him of his dukedom, and given it to a
Medicean prince. It is to this that Cellini probably refers in the
cautious phrase which ends the chapter.



XXXVI

WHILE I was at work upon that diabolical task of mine, there came from
time to time to watch me some of the cardinals who were invested in the
castle; and most frequently the Cardinal of Ravenna and the Cardinal de'
Gaddi. [1] I often told them not to show themselves, since their nasty
red caps gave a fair mark to our enemies. From neighbouring buildings,
such as the Torre de' Bini, we ran great peril when they were there; and
at last I had them locked off, and gained thereby their deep ill-will. I
frequently received visits also from the general, Orazio Baglioni, who
was very well affected toward me. One day while he was talking with me,
he noticed something going forward in a drinking-place outside the Porta
di Castello, which bore the name of Baccanello. This tavern had for sign
a sun painted between two windows, of a bright red colour. The windows
being closed, Signor Orazio concluded that a band of soldiers were
carousing at table just between them and behind the sun. So he said to
me "Benvenuto, if you think that you could hit that wall an ell's
breadth from the sun with your demi-cannon here, I believe you would be
doing a good stroke of business, for there is a great commotion there,
and men of much importance must probably be inside the house." I
answered that I felt quite capable of hitting the sun in its centre, but
that a barrel full of stones, which was standing close to the muzzle of
the gun, might be knocked down by the shock of the discharge and the
blast of the artillery. He rejoined: "Don't waste time, Benvenuto. In
the first place, it is not possible, where it is standing, that the
cannon's blast should bring it down; and even if it were to fall, and
the Pope himself was underneath, the mischief would not be so great as
you imagine. Fire, then, only fire!" Taking no more thought about it, I
struck the sun in the centre, exactly as I said I should. The cask was
dislodged, as I predicted, and fell precisely between Cardinal Farnese
and Messer Jacopo Salviati. [2] It might very well have dashed out the
brains of both of them, except that just at that very moment Farnese was
reproaching Salviati with having caused the sack of Rome, and while they
stood apart from one another to exchange opprobrious remarks, my gabion
fell without destroying them. When he heard the uproar in the court
below, good Signor Orazio dashed off in a hurry; and I, thrusting my
neck forward where the cask had fallen, heard some people saying; "It
would not be a bad job to kill that gunner!" Upon this I turned two
falconets toward the staircase, with mind resolved to let blaze on the
first man who attempted to come up. The household of Cardinal Farnese
must have received orders to go and do me some injury; accordingly I
prepared to receive them, with a lighted match in hand. Recognising some
who were approaching, I called out: "You lazy lubbers, if you don't pack
off from there, and if but a man's child among you dares to touch the
staircase, I have got two cannon loaded, which will blow you into
powder. Go and tell the Cardinal that I was acting at the order of
superior officers, and that what we have done and are doing is in
defence of them priests, [3] and not to hurt them." They made away; and
then came Signor Orazio Baglioni, running. I bade him stand back, else
I'd murder him; for I knew very well who he was. He drew back a little,
not without a certain show of fear, and called out: "Benvenuto, I am
your friend!" To this I answered: "Sir, come up, but come alone, and
then come as you like." The general, who was a man of mighty pride,
stood still a moment, and then said angrily: "I have a good mind not to
come up again, and to do quite the opposite of that which I intended
toward you." I replied that just as I was put there to defend my
neighbours, I was equally well able to defend myself too. He said that
he was coming alone; and when he arrived at the top of the stairs, his
features were more discomposed that I thought reasonable. So I kept my
hand upon my sword, and stood eyeing him askance. Upon this he began to
laugh, and the colour coming back into his face, he said to me with the
most pleasant manner: "Friend Benvenuto, I bear you as great love as I
have it in my heart to give; and in God's good time I will render you
proof of this. Would to God that you had killed those two rascals; for
one of them is the cause of all this trouble, and the day perchance will
come when the other will be found the cause of something even worse." He
then begged me, if I should be asked, not to say that he was with me
when I fired the gun; and for the rest bade me be of good cheer. The
commotion which the affair made was enormous, and lasted a long while.
However, I will not enlarge upon it further, only adding that I was
within an inch of revenging my father on Messer Jacopo Salviati, who had
grievously injured him, according to my father's complaints. As it was,
unwittingly I gave the fellow a great fright. Of Farnese I shall say
nothing here, because it will appear in its proper place how well it
would have been if I had killed him.

Note 1. Benedetto Accolti of Arezzo, Archbishop of Ravenna in 1524,
obtained the hat in 1527, three days before the sack of Rome. He was a
distinguished man of letters. Niccolo Gaddi was created Cardinal on the
same day as Accolti. We shall hear more of him in Cellini's pages.

Note 2. Alessandro Farnese, Dean of the Sacred College, and afterwards
Pope Paul III. Of Giacopo Salviati we have already heard, p. 14.

Note 3. 'Loro preti.' Perhaps 'their priests.'



XXXVII

I PURSUED my business of artilleryman, and every day performed some
extraordinary feat, whereby the credit and the favour I acquired with
the Pope was something indescribable. There never passed a day but what
I killed one or another of our enemies in the besieging army. On one
occasion the Pope was walking round the circular keep, [1] when he
observed a Spanish Colonel in the Prati; he recognised the man by
certain indications, seeing that this officer had formerly been in his
service; and while he fixed his eyes on him, he kept talking about him.
I, above by the Angel, knew nothing of all this, but spied a fellow down
there, busying himself about the trenches with a javelin in his hand; he
was dressed entirely in rose-colour; and so, studying the worst that I
could do against him, I selected a gerfalcon which I had at hand; it is
a piece of ordnance larger and longer than a swivel, and about the size
of a demiculverin. This I emptied, and loaded it again with a good
charge of fine powder mixed with the coarser sort; then I aimed it
exactly at the man in red, elevating prodigiously, because a piece of
that calibre could hardly be expected to carry true at such a distance.
I fired, and hit my man exactly in the middle. He had trussed his sword
in front, [2] for swagger, after a way those Spaniards have; and my
ball, when it struck him, broke upon the blade, and one could see the
fellow cut in two fair halves. The Pope, who was expecting nothing of
this kind, derived great pleasure and amazement from the sight, both
because it seemed to him impossible that one should aim and hit the mark
at such a distance, and also because the man was cut in two, and he
could not comprehend how this should happen. He sent for me, and asked
about it. I explained all the devices I had used in firing; but told him
that why the man was cut in halves, neither he nor I could know. Upon my
bended knees I then besought him to give me the pardon of his blessing
for that homicide; and for all the others I had committed in the castle
in the service of the Church. Thereat the Pope, raising his hand, and
making a large open sign of the cross upon my face, told me that he
blessed me, and that he gave me pardon for all murders I had ever
perpetrated, or should ever perpetrate, in the service of the Apostolic
Church. When I felt him, I went aloft, and never stayed from firing to
the utmost of my power; and few were the shots of mine that missed their
mark. My drawing, and my fine studies in my craft, and my charming art
of music, all were swallowed up in the din of that artillery; and if I
were to relate in detail all the splendid things I did in that infernal
work of cruelty, I should make the world stand by and wonder. But, not
to be too prolix, I will pass them over. Only I must tell a few of the
most remarkable, which are, as it were, forced in upon me.

To begin then: pondering day and night what I could render for my own
part in defence of Holy Church, and having noticed that the enemy
changed guard and marched past through the great gate of Santo Spirito,
which was within a reasonable range, I thereupon directed my attention
to that spot; but, having to shoot sideways, I could not do the damage
that I wished, although I killed a fair percentage every day. This
induced our adversaries, when they saw their passage covered by my guns,
to load the roof of a certain house one night with thirty gabions, which
obstructed the view I formerly enjoyed. Taking better thought than I had
done of the whole situation, I now turned all my five pieces of
artillery directly on the gabions, and waited till the evening hour,
when they changed guard. Our enemies, thinking they were safe, came on
at greater ease and in a closer body than usual; whereupon I set fire to
my blow-pipes, [3] Not merely did I dash to pieces the gabions which
stood in my way; but, what was better, by that one blast I slaughtered
more than thirty men. In consequence of this manoeuvre, which I
repeated twice, the soldiers were thrown into such disorder, that being,
moreover, encumbered with the spoils of that great sack, and some of
them desirous of enjoying the fruits of their labour, they oftentimes
showed a mind to mutiny and take themselves away from Rome. However,
after coming to terms with their valiant captain, Gian di Urbino, [4]
they were ultimately compelled, at their excessive inconvenience, to
take another road when they changed guard. It cost them three miles of
march, whereas before they had but half a mile. Having achieved this
feat, I was entreated with prodigious favours by all the men of quality
who were invested in the castle. This incident was so important that I
thought it well to relate it, before finishing the history of things
outside my art, the which is the real object of my writing: forsooth, if
I wanted to ornament my biography with such matters, I should have far
too much to tell. There is only one more circumstance wh